By increasing the contact
areas with the surrounding
world, we will increase the
quality of the provided
education, strengthen the
knowledge exchange and
enable the students to gain
contacts in the labour
market.

In 2008, the leaders of the University of Gothenburg and VINNOVA began the joint
initiative known as the Knowledge Management Platform (KMP) programme. Research
and Utilization presents the results of this multifaceted and extensive study that was
conducted in a unique university-wide project. This effort has been led by Ulf Petrusson,
Professor and Director of the Institute for Innovation and Social Change at the School of
Business, Economics and Law at the University of Gothenburg.

From Vision 2020, University
of Gothenburg
ISBN: 978-91-87869-03-7

+

RES

=

ION

How can university administrations, innovation offices and other support systems
develop organisational capabilities for managing research results as intellectual assets
and create public resources? What role do the relatively recently established innovation
offices have and how can they expand their operational support to the academic
environments? This book presents what can be seen as a Swedish/Nordic model for the
functions of academic environments and innovative offices and how they can manage
research in collaboration and utilization processes.

EA RC

T I L I Z AT

U

We are engaged in close
cooperation with the
surrounding society, work
for sustainable development and are an active and
appreciated provider of
knowledge.

The book begins by examining existing expectations on the research world to promote
utilization as defined by existing public governance and the explicitly expressed will of
politicians. The focus then shifts to enabling researchers to realize their ambitions of
taking social responsibility and for promoting utilization of research results as an integrated part of academic activities. The starting point for these analyses and the presented
proposals is that utilization of research results and collaboration with external actors
should be a self-evident mission for an “academic environment” and serve as a complement to the research and education missions.

RESEARCH AND UTILIZATION

Our standpoints and
decisions shall be based on
a clear responsibility for the
development of society.

In Research and Utilization, the author analyses and proposes how universities can
enable researchers and academic environments to promote increased utilization of
research results and manage the demand for expanded collaboration with the outside
world, including companies and public authorities.

H

By identifying the
University's knowledge
assets and evaluating their
potential benefit, we will
strengthen both our
research and innovation
efforts.

Department of Law's publication series School of Business,
Economics and Law at the University of Gothenburg

ULF PETRUSSON

019

The mandate of higher
education institutions shall
include third stream
activities and the provision
of information about their
activities, as well as ensuring
that benefit is derived from
their research findings.
In the course of their
operations, higher education
institutions shall promote
sustainable development to
assure for present and
future generations a sound
and healthy environment,
economic and social welfare,
and justice.
From the Swedish
Higher Education Act
(chapter 1, section 2
and chapter 1, section 5)

ULF PETRUSSON

Research and Utilization

ULF PETRUSSON

3

© Ulf Petrusson
Title of Swedish first edition: “Forskning och Nytta”
(Tre Böcker Förlag AB, Göteborg, Sweden, 2015)
Cover: Jeffrey Johns
Text block: Franz Daiss
Printed by: Ale Tryckteam AB. Bohus, Sweden, 2016
Translation: Accent Språkservice AB
ISBN: 978-91-87869-03-7

4

Contents
Foreword

13

Background

16

1. Introduction
22
1.1 The university’s responsibility for collaboration and utilization
22
1.1.1 Expanded responsibility for universities to utilize research results
22
1.1.2 Increasing expectations by society for universities’ capacity for
collaboration
23
1.1.3 KMP – knowledge management in academic environments
25
1.2 The knowledge triangle and its normative consequences
26
1.3 The division of responsibility between the university as an organization
and university employees
29
1.3.1 Researcher collaboration and utilization in the private sphere and
in the university’s name
30
1.3.2 Integrated collaboration in academic environments
30
1.3.3 Interaction between individual researchers, academic environments,
the university administration, and managers
31
1.4 The distribution of responsibility for collaboration between the university
and its support structures
32
1.5 Idea- and knowledge-driven collaboration and collaboration driven by
societal challenges
32
1.5.1 Do researchers, academic environments, and universities need
to generate benefits?
33
1.5.2 Collaboration and utilization with a focus on research results
and other knowledge assets
33
1.5.3. Collaboration driven by societal challenges with a focus on researchers’
involvement in social development
34
1.5.4 Academic freedom and academic values in all collaboration
and utilization
35
1.6 KMP for learning and development
36
1.6.1 An academic basis for critique, learning, and development
36
1.6.2 Learning with a focus on organizational capabilities
39
1.6.3 Learning based on evaluation
39
1.7 Evaluation steps for developing a “Swedish Model” for collaboration
and innovation
40
1.7.1 Evaluation for normative development
40
1.7.2 Expectations and preconditions – Part 1
41
1.7.3 Leadership and organizational capabilities – Part 2
43
1.7.4 The practical management of research results – Part 3
46

Part 1 Expectations and preconditions

51

2. Governmental governance of universities
2.1 The universities’ responsibility for promoting utilization and collaboration
2.1.1 The government’s expectations of universities to collaborate and
promote utilization

52
52
53

5

2.1.2 Norms, systems of conduct and organizational capabilities
2.1.3 State governance of universities
2.2 Governance by objectives
2.2.1 Objectives-means analysis
2.2.2 Overall political objectives
2.2.3 Utilization objectives/operational targets
2.2.4 Objectives for utilization capability
2.2.5 Means–ends determination at university level
2.3 Rule-based governance
2.3.1 Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance
2.3.2 Responsibilities and necessary conditions for universities to act
as collaborative and utilizing actors
2.3.3 Obligation to and prospects of managing intellectual assets
2.3.4 Obligation to and prospects of managing utilization and collaboration
processes within university activities
2.3.5 Employer’s responsibility for enabling employees to promote
utilization in both public and private capacities
2.4 Programme- and project-based governance
2.4.1 Analysis of research financiers’ governance
2.4.2 Expectations for universities’ organizational capabilities
for collaboration
2.4.3 Expectations for universities as contracting parties in collaborations
2.4.4 Expectations of the universities’ management of intellectual assets
2.4.5 Expectations for universities’ ability to facilitate and regulate
transparency
2.5 Resource- and result-based governance of collaboration
and utilization
2.5.1 Analysis of resource- and result-based governance
2.5.2 Opportunity to use direct research and education appropriations
for collaboration and utilization
2.5.3 “External” research funding and expectations of impact
2.5.4 Resources targeting collaboration and utilization
2.5.5 Impact on the society as a basis for resource allocation
2.6 Conclusions
3. Collaboration and utilization in academic environments
3.1 Expectations and preconditions in academic environments
3.2 Academic environments with the ability to collaborate and
promote utilization
3.2.1 Researcher dialogues about the challenges of collaborating
and promoting utilization
3.2.2 Evaluation of the academic environment as a knowledge
management platform
3.3 Four logics for “promotion of utilization”
3.3.1 Utilization that creates value in itself
3.3.2 Promoting utilization by making knowledge available to the public
3.3.3 Promote utilization by making research findings applicable to specific
stakeholders
3.3.4 Promoting utilization through innovative projects
3.3.5 Promoting utilization by making knowledge available in open
contractual networks
3.4 The ability of academic environments to promote utilization
3.4.1 The regulation governing internal control and inspection

6

54
55
58
59
59
60
61
62
63
63
64
71
75
80
84
84
87
90
92
96
99
99
100
101
103
105
109
112
112
113
114
116
120
120
121
123
125
128
132
132

3.4.2 Risks when knowledge is to be made publicly available
3.4.3 Risks when knowledge should be made applicable for
stakeholders and users
3.4.4 Risks associated with innovation processes
3.4.5 Risks associated with open platform processes
3.5 Conclusions

139
144
148
151

Part 2 University governance and organizational capabilities

155

4. Responsibilities for university management
4.1 A public-based responsibility for collaboration and utilization
4.1.1 Policy making at university level
4.1.2 Academic leadership and responsibility
4.2 Obstacles to an expanded management responsibility for
collaboration and utilization
4.2.1 Conflicting university ideas
4.2.2 Professor’s privilege as an argument for universities not
taking responsibility
4.2.3 Collaboration and utilization as visionary rhetoric
4.2.4 Managers’ collaboration, academic career and side jobs
4.2.5 The challenge of implementing leadership within the public
administrative model
4.3 Specification of managerial responsibility
4.3.1 The university’s roles as authority, employer and contractual party
4.3.2 The university management’s actions for developing an
institutional model for collaboration and utilization
4.4 Conclusions

156
156
157
158

5. Objectives and strategy
5.1 Governance based on objectives
5.1.1 Model for managing collaboration and utilization by objectives
5.1.2 Vision and strategy as tools for governance by objectives
5.1.3 An enabling governance by objectives process
5.1.4 The process at the University of Gothenburg
5.2 The university’s overarching objectives
5.2.1 Objectives concerning competitiveness and research-based
value creation
5.2.2 Objectives for the university’s position and competitiveness
5.2.3 Objectives for the surrounding society’s development
5.2.4 Objectives concerning researchers’ private interests
5.2.5 Objectives for economic value creation
5.2.6 Objectives for ecological, biological and material value creation
5.2.7 Objectives for social and humanistic value creation
5.2.8 Objectives for artistic value creation
5.2.9 Overarching objectives for the University of Gothenburg’s activities
5.3 Objectives for utilization
5.3.1 Objectives for making knowledge assets publicly available
5.3.2 Objectives for making knowledge assets relevant to
specific stakeholders
5.3.3 Objectives for developing knowledge assets as innovation processes
5.3.4 Objectives for implementing knowledge assets in open
contractual network processes

136

159
159
160
162
162
163
164
164
165
169
171
171
172
173
174
174
175
176
178
180
181
182
182
184
185
185
187
187
188
188
189

7

5.3.5 The University of Gothenburg’s objectives for utilization
5.4 Objectives for utilization capabilities
5.4.1 Autonomy objectives
5.4.2 Support system objectives
5.4.3 Ownership responsibility objectives
5.4.4 The University of Gothenburg’s objectives concerning
organizational capabilities
5.5 Conclusions
6. Policies and norms
6.1 Universities’ norm systems for utilization and collaboration
6.1.1 Model for developing organizational capabilities in the form
of action plans
6.1.2 Policy as a governance instrument
6.1.3 Implementing the EU’s recommendation
6.1.4 The process at the University of Gothenburg
6.2 Organizational system for managing knowledge assets
6.2.1 Operational procedures for utilization and collaboration
6.2.2 General reflections on the current system for utilization and
collaboration
6.2.3 System for identifying and evaluating knowledge assets
6.2.4 System for establishing objectives and strategic assessments regarding
utilization logic
6.2.5 System for making knowledge assets publicly available
6.2.6 System for making knowledge assets applicable for users
and stakeholders
6.2.7 System for developing knowledge assets as innovations
6.2.8 System for managing knowledge assets in open research and
innovation platforms
6.3 Organizational allocation of responsibility
6.3.1 Norms for promoting complete academic environments
6.3.2 Researchers’ and teachers’ responsibilities
6.3.3 Managerial responsibility
6.3.4 Responsibility for an internal innovation office
6.3.5 Responsibilities of holding companies as incubators linked
to universities
6.3.6 Responsibility for an academic unit to provide training and enable
critical dialogue
6.4 Principles governing universities’ ownership responsibilities
6.4.1 Ten principles for governing how universities should manage
research results as knowledge assets
6.4.2 Utilization of knowledge assets in the public interest
6.4.3 The researcher has the right and responsibility to utilize their
knowledge assets
6.4.4 Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure
6.4.5 Knowledge assets for continued research
6.4.6 Background knowledge in collaborations
6.4.7 The availability and confidentiality of knowledge assets
6.4.8 Innovation projects within the framework of university activities
6.4.9 Licensing in the public interest
6.4.10 Stimulating private utilization
6.4.11 Unethical use of knowledge assets
6.5 Principles governing incentives for researchers and teachers

8

190
190
191
192
193
194
195
200
200
201
202
203
204
204
204
205
207
208
210
211
212
214
215
216
216
218
221
225
227
228
229
230
230
231
231
232
233
233
234
234
235
235

6.5.1 Incentives for developing universities’ assumption of responsibility
6.5.2 Supplying public resources to promote the utilization of knowledge
assets in academic environments
6.5.3 Assigning academic credentials for promoting utilization
6.5.4 Providing special resources for innovation projects under
public management
6.5.5 Share of royalties from university licensing and similar
6.5.6 Private income through secondary employment
6.6 Conclusions
7. The Innovation Academy
7.1 Academic training structure for learning, dialogue and critique
7.2 Skills development and critical dialogue
7.2.1 Specification of the responsibility for the creation of arenas
for learning, dialogue and critique
7.2.2 Seminar for dialogue and critique
7.2.3 Workshop for practice-based learning and dialogue
7.2.4 Training in developing practical skills
7.2.5 Courses for professional development
7.2.6 External theme days for learning and dialogue
7.3 Training for operational responsibility
7.3.1 Specification of the responsibility for initiating, securing and
providing role-specific training and further training
7.3.2 Management training
7.3.3 Postgraduate studies
7.3.4 Training for innovation advisors
7.4 Communication, evaluation and follow-up
7.4.1 Specification of the responsibility for monitoring, overseeing and
communicating collaboration and utilization work
7.4.2 Survey of activities within the university
7.4.3 Development of the tool kit and support system
7.4.4 Communication about academic environments and their
knowledge assets
7.4.5 Evaluation of impact on society
7.5 An innovation academy with collaboration coordinators
7.6 Conclusions

236
237
237
238
238
239
239
243
243
245
245
246
246
248
249
250
250
250
251
252
252
254
254
254
255
256
256
256
257

Part 3 Management of research results

259

8. IAM for academic environments
8.1 Support systems and processes for enabling academic
environments to utilize research results
8.1.1 The Innovation Office and operational capability for collaboration
and utilization
8.1.2 KMP as a lab for developing multiple support systems
8.1.3 Starting point taken from CIP’s models for the “management of
intellectual assets”
8.1.4 Support systems for four proactive processes
8.2 Action plan for initiating collaboration and utilization
in academic environments
8.2.1 Obligation to prepare action plans
8.2.2 Overarching governance by objectives in academic environments
8.2.3 Concrete ambitions according to the various types of utilization logic

260
260
260
261
262
263
265
265
266
268

9

8.2.4 Securing resources and other operational planning
8.3 The Innovation Office and operational procedures governing the
university’s promotion of utilization
8.3.1 The Innovation Office’s role in integrating collaboration and
utilization into the academic environments
8.3.2 The promotion of utilization under the auspices of the university
8.3.3 Reactive and proactive support for researchers and academic
environments
8.3.4 The Innovation Office’s coordinating role
8.3.5 The Innovation Office’s internal organizational functions
8.4 Sources of external information
8.4.1 Evaluation of access to various information services and sources
8.4.2 Pilot project with the Gothenburg University Library and the
Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV) on research and
innovation-related information
8.4.3 Survey of sources and range of services offered by the university
library and PRV
8.4.4 Division of responsibility for collection and analysis of
external information
8.5 Conclusions

268
269
269
270
272
273
275
276
276
277
278
280
281

9. Claiming intellectual assets
288
9.1 Support system for claiming knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets
288
9.2 Procedures for claiming intellectual assets
291
9.2.1 Evaluating which procedures to develop
291
9.2.2 General procedures for researchers and academic environments
when claiming intellectual assets
294
9.2.3 Special procedure for academic environments with extensive
collaboration and utilization projects
298
9.2.4 Special procedure for academic environments where the university
is responsible for managing knowledge assets in collaboration
and utilization programmes
301
9.3 Process support for claiming knowledge assets
303
9.3.1 Evaluation of the capture process in academic environments
303
9.3.2 Identification of knowledge assets
305
9.3.3 Claiming scientific value
307
9.3.4 Staking a claim to the research result’s utility
309
9.3.5 Claiming control of the research result
311
9.3.6 Preparing an asset list
314
9.4 Tools for categorizing intellectual assets
320
9.4.1 Evaluation of categorization model when claiming intellectual assets
320
9.4.2 Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on its
nature and value
323
9.4.3 Categorizing how research results can be claimed as intellectual
property assets
337
9.4.4 Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on
how they are used and created in collaborations projects
345
9.4.5 Categorizing research results can be claimied based on their
importance for the academic activities
347
9.5 Tools for the organizational control of claims to knowledge assets
349
9.5.1 Evaluation of a model for the organizational control of research results 349

10

9.5.2 “Degunking” and organizational title clearance
9.5.3 Management of novelty claims and confidentiality
9.5.4 Management of claims to relationships of dependence
9.6 Sources of research and innovation-related information
9.6.1 Evaluation of available sources and expertise
9.6.2 Research information for claiming intellectual assets
9.6.3 Patent information for evaluating research results as assets
9.6.4 Patent information as support during clearance processes
9.7 Conclusions

352
357
359
362
362
363
363
366
367

10. Positioning an academic environment
10.1 Support system for positioning an academic environment
10.2 Procedures for positioning academic environments
10.2.1 Evaluating which procedures to develop
10.2.2 General routine for researchers and academic environments
concerning positioning academic environments
10.3 Process support when positioning academic environments
10.3.1 Evaluation of the positioning process
10.3.2 Identify knowledge fields and create a knowledge tree
10.3.3 Evaluate research fields and research position
10.3.4 Evaluating utilization areas and utilization-related position
10.3.5 Evaluating the IP landscape and control position
10.3.6 Road map for the academic environment
10.4 Sources of research and innovation-related information
10.4.1 Evaluating sources, services and expertise
10.4.2 External information as a basis for research maps
10.4.3 External information as a basis for utilization maps
10.4.4 External information as a basis for control maps
10.5 Conclusions

369
369
372
372

11. Utilization decisions
11.1 Support system for decision-making in utilization and
collaboration contexts
11.2 Procedures for making decisions about utilization and the
collaboration management of knowledge assets
11.2.1 Assessing which procedures and principles need to be developed
11.2.2 General procedures for making utilization decisions and the
collaborative management of knowledge assets
11.3 Process support for utilization deliberations
11.3.1 Assessing the process for enabling making utilization decisions in
academic environments
11.3.2 Considerations concerning utilization
11.3.3 Considerations related to collaboration ethics
11.3.4 Considerations necessary for a public institution when making
decisions about utilization
11.3.5 Utilization decisions and IA governance
11.4 Tools for university licensing for the public benefit
11.4.1 Evaluation of a model for when and how the university can
assume control of research results
11.4.2 Value proposition based on the pursuit of public responsibility
11.4.3 Licensing for knowledge transfer to users and stakeholders

373
376
376
379
383
387
390
393
395
395
397
397
398
399
400
400
404
404
405
409
409
410
416
418
421
422
422
424
426

11

11.4.4 Licensing for innovation
11.4.5 Licensing for open platforms
11.5 Conclusions

430
431
431

12. Administrative governance of intellectual assets
12.1 Support system for organizing knowledge assets
in academic environments
12.2 Procedures for the administrative management of intellectual
assets and contracts
12.3 Conclusions

432

434
434

Part 4 The KMP Formula

435

432

13. Summary
436
13.1 The KMP formula for increased public responsibility in
academic environments
436
13.2 A knowledge triangle for identifying expectations and conditions
437
13.2.1 How can universities develop their ability to understand and
manage both internal and external expectations?
437
13.2.2 How do universities manage the state’s expectations under
the prevailing circumstances?
438
13.2.3 How should universities manage academics’ expectations based on
the prevailing circumstances?
442
13.3 A “development circle” for organisational capabilities in universities
445
13.3.1 How can and should universities develop their capabilities as
organizations to assume public responsibility?
445
13.3.2 University management sets the stage based on a number of processes 446
13.3.3 Governance-by-objectives process
446
13.3.4 Norm development, role allocation and institutional development
449
13.3.5 The Innovation Academy
453
13.4 An IAM framework for operational collaboration and utilization
454
13.4.1 How can and should universities develop their operational
capabilities for promoting utilization and collaborating?
454
13.4.2 The Innovation Office’s coordinating and developmental role
456
13.4.3 Support systems for integrating collaboration and
promoting utilization
457
13.5 A Swedish model for collaboration and the utilization of research results
460
List of figures
List of sources and bibliography
Annex 1 – Summary of meetings within the KMP project
Annex 2 – List of academic environments which have attended during
the KMP programme
Annex 3-6 is available at www.iis.gu.se
Annex 3 – Report on bibliometric support sub-project
Annex 4 – Outtake - Landscaping analysis
Annex 5 – Illustrative examples from academic environments with the ability
to collaborate and promote utilization
Annex 6 – Illustrative examples from four logics for "promotion of utilization"

12

461
465
473
485

Foreword
This is one person’s narrative of the efforts of a large group of people spanning several years; the account of a development programme implemented at the University of
Gothenburg known as the KMP programme. As the narrator, I have come to realize
that I am part of a project that extends beyond the boundaries of the activities of the
University of Gothenburg. This is a narrative of how a Swedish model for collaboration and the utilization of research results might be designed. It examines what lies at
the heart of the university concept in an increasingly globalized and knowledgeoriented society. As the narrator, I have become very aware that the transformation
process where the university increasingly is expected to collaborate with the surrounding society and promote the utilization of research results, currently being
implemented at the European and national levels, is to a large degree, directly related
to the question of why we pursue research and higher education at all.
We live in an age when it is natural for politicians to allocate large sums of public
money to research. It is not equally clear just why this is the case, however. The
general political standpoint, there are high hopes that research will generate increased
growth, sustainability, welfare development, and competitive advantage. Research
initiatives often go hand in hand with political declarations asserting that society
needs more innovations. All the same, the question is just what universities are
expected to achieve through these enormous investments in research in concrete
terms. For universities and researchers, the obvious question that arises is “Why
should we conduct research?”. No one – neither politicians nor university representatives – believe that research’s primary purpose is to help universities achieve a higher
ranking in various indices and, thereby, appear more competitive. No one believes the
purpose of research is to benefit the researchers themselves; that is to say, that it
would be an end in itself to make possible prestigious careers based on the number of
articles published in well-reputed journals, or that researchers, based on professor’s
privilege, should own research results privately and thus earn as much extra income
as possible. And no one believes that the opportunity for researchers affiliated with
universities to start their own companies is reason enough to conduct research. Still,
it seems that, when the expectations imposed on a university are concretized, the
question of why we conduct research is reduced these considerations.
For me, this book is about public responsibility in as much as it discusses how a university as an organization can develop a model for utilizing research results for public
benefit. This has proven to be a massive endeavour. Its length is largely due to a
desire to do the KMP programme justice and to describe all the evaluations that the
programme has consisted of in a practical sense. The programme has grown with
time. The further we progressed, the greater our hopes became of practically developing a university model in which the task of collaborating and promoting utilization
was integrated into academic environments’ activities. It has become clear that the
establishment of innovation offices has created the preconditions for developing a
Swedish model for knowledge transfer that is based on the desire to assume broader
public responsibility.
This is a narrative that includes many different voices. Though I have assumed the
role of narrator, I would like to stress that not only the KMP programme itself, but
also this narrative, have been collective processes. In taking on the task of recording

13

this story, I have certainly influenced it with my own personal interpretation. Nonetheless, I have always attempted to ensure that those who have worked within the
programme also recognize themselves clearly reflected in my version of events. It feels
as if nearly the entire university has been involved since the programme’s inception in
2008. That said, the influence of a number of individuals has been especially important to the programme and, as such, also to this account. Andrew Telles has assisted
me as programme coordinator since day one. He has ensured that we have achieved
everything we set out to achieve. Another person who has had a great impact on the
programme is Sara Dahlberg. She has assumed overarching responsibility for the
processes within the programme that relate to the university’s governance. Another
key contributor is Magnus Eriksson, who has been responsible for coordinating all
seminars and training and who has also made major contributions to KMP’s work in
other ways.
In my opinion, the KMP programme is so interesting because it has succeeded in
engaging the university’s various “spheres of power” in the issue of collaboration and
utilization: Researchers and teachers have worked closely with advisors from the
Grants and Innovation Office and GU Holding. Students have also played a part.
The university administration has played an active role, held a running dialogue and
continuously monitored the programme. Through the university’s Institute for
Innovation and Social Change (IIS), we have benefited from an active steering committee comprised of Deputy-Vice Chancellor Margareta Wallin Peterson, all of the
university’s deans and the managers of the Grants and Innovation Office and GU
Holding, respectively. A special committee was also appointed for the programme,
through which we coordinated, discussed, and summarized our work. Margareta
Wallin Peterson headed up the committee’s work. Others who have also played key
roles in the programme’s operational management along the way include Claes
Jansson, Klementina Österberg, Madelene Fryklind, Jens Bördin, Boo Edgar, Mattias
Lindgren, Niklas Fernqvist, and Ludde Edgren.
An important aspect of the KMP programme is its evaluation of how the government
governs universities. This evaluation was conducted in cooperation with Jan Lidhard
of Sweden’s Ministry of Finance and resulted in a report to Sweden’s Expert Group
on Public Economics (ESO). Another important person for the evaluation was Björn
Skarp. The work carried out here laid the foundation for much of the other work
done within the KMP programme. The second chapter of this book, in particular, has
been influenced by this work, which was previously presented as supporting data for
the report submitted to ESO. Jan Lidhard has also been an important external partner with whom we have held a running dialogue during the course of programme’s
work.
Another aspect of the programme that has had a major influence on this narrative is
the many examinations we have conducted of academic environments. Many people
have been involved in these evaluations, not least of all students from the University
of Gothenburg’s Intellectual Capital Management (ICM) programme. Individuals
who have made especially important contributions, in addition to those mentioned
earlier, are Jonas Lindgren, Karin Lersten, Erik Hansson, Ana-Maria Popescu, Lorna
Fletcher, Karthik Venkitesh, Emil Haldorson, and Bo Heiden. Each has in different
respects contributed to the solutions on how to utilize research results through concrete projects.
Another aspect of major importance is our evaluation of how to use various forms of
research and utilization information as data on which to base decisions. We began

14

this work by enlisting the help of Gothenburg University Library. Bo Jarneving has
been the main contributor on the library’s behalf. In due course, we came to realize
the importance of also working with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office
(PRV). As a result, we established a joint development project that involved many
individuals from both PRV and the University of Gothenburg. Susanne Hellman
served as the project manager at PRV, while the work done at the university was primarily coordinated by Johan Johansson and Christoffer Hermansson, who also
played a special role in assembling and developing our findings.
Not least of all, our collaboration with PRV revealed to us the importance of adopting a national perspective when working in a development programme like KMP.
VINNOVA, which provided the majority of the programme’s funding, has been eager
for the programme to benefit other universities too. During the course of our work
we have held a number of national and also international seminars at which we discussed the KMP programme. In this respect, Linköping University proved to be a
particularly important partner. We also developed a collaborative partnership with
Linköping University on several fronts. Göran Hessling became an especially important contact with whom to discuss the programme. Over time, he came to play an
active role in our work and has generously contributed his knowledge of how universities can develop their management and governance capabilities. We formed a group
that focused specifically on these issues, consisting of Sara Dahlberg, Göran Hessling,
Björn Skarp, Isabelle Nugin, and Mats Glavå. This group has proven to be important
in several respects with evaluating and developing the university’s role as a public
authority, employer, and contracting party.
The KMP programme has always maintained a close relationship with Chalmers
University of Technology. There are so many interfaces that give rise to collaboration
with Chalmers when it comes to utilization of research results. We have been fortunate always to enjoy Chalmers’ support for and interest in the KMP programme.
Individuals within Chalmers’ organization who have served as important speaking
partners for us over the years are Mats Lundqvist, Anders Karlström, Henric Rhedin,
Fredrik Hörstedt, and Jesper Vasell.
A number of those whom I have already mentioned have also helped in completing
this book by reading different versions of the manuscript and providing comments
and suggestions. Åke Magnusson assumed special responsibility for monitoring the
recording of the account and for examining the written texts in detail. Mattias
Lindgren assisted with the graphics. Mikael Bernardini and Carolina Helgesson have
also provided help with certain supporting documentation.
Gothenburg, Sweden, 30 October 2014
Ulf Petrusson

15

Background
Deputy Vice-Chancellor Margareta Wallin Peterson
From ad hoc to systematic and strategic work in support of collaboration and
the utilization of research results
The University of Gothenburg has gradually raised its ambition level for strengthening its competitiveness and has increased its focus on explicitly assuming public
responsibility. The question that arises, however, is how we can effectively join forces
on collaboration in a university that is as large and diverse as the University of
Gothenburg, with its eight faculties covering such areas as medicine, odontology,
nursing, natural sciences, IT, education, the humanities, social sciences, art, and business. Is it even possible to view what was once called the “third mission” of academic
institutions in the same way for all of these different parts of the university?
To better explain the journey, we have undertaken and which has led to the publication of this book, I will describe a series of important events. I assumed the post of
Pro-Vice-Chancellor in 2004 and was tasked with working on external relations.
At approximately the same time, what was then the Swedish National Agency for
Higher Education (now the Swedish Higher Education Authority) tasked public universities with assessing the quality of their collaboration. We had no databases or
supporting data that could help us summarize the field. In fact, the field itself was
not especially easy to define, even though Sweden’s Higher Education Act states that
universities are required to provide information about their activities and collaborate
and to promote utilization. So, how does one go about collecting information from
5,500 employees, summarizing it in a set format consisting of a few pages and successfully demonstrate quality? Did systematic quality-assurance efforts within the
field even exist, given that QA had primarily been the task of individual employees?
The National Agency for Higher Education’s conclusion, as stated in a report entitled
Högskolan samverkar [translation: Universities’ Collaboration with Society], was that
it was no longer relevant to talk about a “third mission”, as collaboration was an
approach that was already well integrated with research and education. The
Authority chose to establish the following objectives for work done by academic
institutions: a) collaboration in support of democracy (work with profiling, recruitment, and public education/research communication), b) collaboration in support of
knowledge development and growth (participation in the knowledge and innovation
system to support the founding of new companies), and c) collaboration in support
of better education (the design of educational programmes to meet the needs of the
labour market and to give students the opportunity to make contacts in the community during their education). This was the most important result of the initiative;
that is, the categorization of collaboration under different headings to make it more
concrete and the direction provided in how to think and work strategically. This was
not sufficient, however. A great deal more work was needed. Moreover, the question
of how to view “approaches” as concepts certainly needed to be further developed.
I had been actively involved in the Council for Identity and Image since 2002; a university-wide project concerning the identity, image, and profile of the University of
Gothenburg, through which various investigations and analyses had led to the estab-

16

lishment of a number of basic values for defining the university. This on-going profiling work has been based on size and location, openness, social involvement, breadth,
and diversity, an emphasis on the university’s primary missions and the sustainable
society. We produced a strategic profile based on this platform and the two parts laid
the foundation for a vision that the university board approved in 2004 entitled
Göteborgs universitet 2010 [translation: The University of Gothenburg 2010]. We
subsequently prepared a strategic plan for the period 2007-2010 to concretize the
ideas contained in the vision. Although we understood that the surrounding world
and our own circumstances could change, we summarized our vision this way:
“Through robust and internationally competitive research and education, intensive
collaboration with the surrounding community, and effective support processes, we
are prepared to meet even the unexpected.” This proved to be important groundwork. By knowing who we are, what our vision is and how we can achieve it, we are
both strengthened internally and become a strong and attractive partner to others.
Visions were prepared for research, education, collaboration, personnel, organization,
administration, and finances, as were strategic focus areas to help reach the objectives. We created committees for research, education, and collaboration led by myself
and fellow pro-vice-chancellor Lennart Weibull that included representatives from all
faculties.
That same year, 2007, all academic institutions in Sweden were also tasked by the
Ministry of Education and Research to prepare a document on their joint research
and education strategies for the period 2009-2012 in the lead-up to the publication
of Government Bill 2012/13:30 on Research and Innovation. The format was set by
the Ministry in advance and we were also required to describe our research’s
strengths, along with our research and education profiles. This proved to be both an
intensive and useful assignment, given that such a document had never been produced previously. We formulated the concept of complete academic environments,
which has become an important characteristic of the University of Gothenburg; that
is, academic environments in which research, education, and collaboration are combined. In a way, this harmonized well with what the Swedish National Agency for
Higher Education had written about “approaches”, but clarified the concept. We
thus decided to retire the “knowledge triangle”, which had been introduced during
the Swedish Presidency of the Council of the European Union. As it was presented,
the triangle includes research, education, and innovation. In our view, collaboration
is a more inclusive concept than innovation and is much better suited to a diverse
university’s multifaceted collaboration activities. Viewed from a management perspective, however, it became somewhat confusing to have two policy documents in play
at the same time (i.e., Strategic Plan for 2007-2010 and Change for Quality and
Renewal: Strategies for Research and Education 2009-2012), which were completely
different in nature. While the two documents overlapped in part, they had wholly
different time horizons. Nonetheless, collaboration was described as an increasingly
important mission, as was the university’s assumption of collective responsibility, as
opposed to relying on individual employees. It was a new way of looking at the matter and required that it be defined and that a university-wide responsibility be established, at the same time as a great deal of collaboration was occurring at the level of
individual employees. We expressed our view this way: “Individual academic institutions have a major public responsibility to promote the use of the knowledge they
generate.” To achieve a single policy document that covered a longer period, we
began work to produce a new and more long-term document, Vision 2020, for the
period 2013-2020. We decided to involve a large number of employees and students
in this and, through well-prepared seminars and workshops, to arrive at important
and well-supported alternatives.

17

In parallel with our work, the university’s Vice-Chancellor also initiated a project
called Renewing the University of Gothenburg, which had more of an organizational
and administrative focus. She tasked former vice-chancellor of Lund University,
Göran Bexell, and Christina Rogestam, who had previously served as university
director at the University of Gothenburg, with preparing a proposal. Bexell and
Rogestam did not feel that they had the requisite knowledge to be able to cover the
field of collaboration in its entirety, however, especially innovation and entrepreneurship, at which time I asked the vice-chancellor to assign this task to me, so that we
could prepare a comprehensive overview of the university’s organization and activities. My assignment culminated in the report IE2011 – Utredning av samverkansuppgiften vid Göteborgs universitet [translation: Study of the Collaboration Mission
at the University of Gothenburg], which had a special focus on the areas of innovation and entrepreneurship. This report was intended to be used as supporting documentation in the preparation of the Vision 2020 document and to present a proposal
for the professionalization and organization of the university’s on-going work in the
field, so as to be able to continue the systematic work of establishing objectives and
strategies for assuming major public responsibility.
This was the first time we had ever prepared a summary of the area with a focus on
innovation and entrepreneurship within the University of Gothenburg — a complex
area to both develop and communicate. The challenges in the field have increased
dramatically in recent years. Society views academic institutions as important actors
in achieving tomorrow’s sustainable society and a brighter future. The process
employed by the working group was very important and, by working with the
academic aspect within the framework of the Institute of Innovation and
Entrepreneurship, the administrative aspect in the form of the Research and
Innovation Services office (now the Grants and Innovation Office) and the university’s holding company, GU Holding, the result proved to be very useful in on-going
efforts.
We reviewed the objectives in our existing policy documents, the system of norms for
the project, how the field had developed over time, how far along the various faculties had progressed, the structure and organization at the time, which actors we
collaborated with in different ways, and what was taking place at the EU, national,
and regional levels. We analyzed what work lay ahead of us to achieve our objectives
and assessed what was needed on our part to reach them and to be able to meet
future challenges.
We concluded that the following were needed: a new management structure, a system
of norms for allocating responsibility, management procedures for knowledge assets
and conflicts of interest, a strengthening of the support provided for innovation within what was then the Research and Innovation Services office, a clarification and
strengthening of the holding company’s role, a better developed structure for education and research, and a stronger collaboration with Chalmers University of
Technology and Region Västra Götaland. An assessment of our work was submitted
to an external panel of experts to gain important feedback before undertaking both
short- and long-term work. The feedback we received was very positive and the
panel’s concluding remarks were as follows: “The commission to collaborate, including work related to innovation and entrepreneurship, will become increasingly important for the university as time goes on. To date, no Swedish university can be said to
have taken such bold initiatives within the field of collaboration that it can be viewed
as a clear part of the university’s profile. The University of Gothenburg has excellent
potential to become the first among Sweden’s universities to adopt such a profile. The

18

positive effect of such a development on the university’s education and research activities could be significant.” Naturally, these comments were very encouraging to us
going forward and emphasized collaboration’s role in strengthening research and
education.
How, then, was the internal development work at the University of Gothenburg conducted? While the Research and Innovation Services office (now the Grants and
Innovation Office) and GU Holding have functioned as support organizations for a
long time, the academic aspect and integration between the structures did not exist
prior to 2008, when we created a new institute at the School of Business, Economics
and Law to integrate innovation work. At that time, the school founded a new
department, the Institute of Innovation and Entrepreneurship, with the exciting task
of serving as an ordinary department, but with the added university-wide commission
to contribute to coordinating research and education throughout the university and
to actively participate in the work to develop the way the university handles its
responsibility as an owner, in accordance with the relevant policy documents. The
then dean of the school was very active and the Sten A Olsson Foundation for
Research and Culture proved to be an important source of funding at the outset. In
2012, the node was further developed by separating the university-wide mission and
making it into its own centre, called the Institute for Innovation and Social Change
(IIS). The name helped to affirm that the mission was broader and harmonized with
the policy documents. In my role as pro-vice-chancellor for collaboration I have
served as chairperson for IIS’s steering committee. Moreover, I have worked to
increase the number of deans sitting on the steering committee from only a few to the
current situation, where all university deans are part of the committee and the managers of the Grants and Innovation Office and GU Holding are deputy members.
This has helped integrate development on the academic side with the administration’s
support work and the holding company’s activities.
Professor Ulf Petrusson, who is the author of this book, is director of IIS and our
collaboration has developed over time. It began when Professor Petrusson was
appointed as my special advisor soon after I was awarded the position of pro-vicechancellor. He is highly knowledgeable in the field and has a scientific background
and both international and business-world contacts. In 2007 he prepared a report for
VINNOVA entitled Universitet i kunskapsekonomin [translation: Universities in the
Knowledge Economy], which was widely circulated. Prof. Petrusson and his colleagues within the University of Gothenburg and at Chalmers University of
Technology cooperated closely. A joint centre that focused on issues related to intellectual property and their strategic role, the Center for Intellectual Property Studies
(CIP), had existed for a number of years and the knowledge that had been amassed
as a result of its work was very valuable. Initially, the field was in its infancy, but has
developed strongly. Academia, the public sector and the business community have
been given opportunities to meet, thanks to CIP’s international CIP Forum conferences held every other year between 2001 and 2011 in Gothenburg. An additional
step forward was taken in 2007 when Region Västra Götaland, Business Region
Göteborg, the City of Gothenburg, Göteborg & Co., Chalmers Industriteknik, and
former state-owned company Innovationsbron AB were invited to participate to
expand discussions to local and regional development. These meetings have provided
us with an understanding of the international situation and knowledge of what
development is needed and what challenges we face.
As such, we had a solid foundation on which to stand when Deputy Director General
of VINNOVA, Lena Gustafsson, toured a number of Sweden’s academic institutions

19

in 2008 to identify those that were interested in developing a university-wide project
concerning collaboration with VINNOVA’s support. The interest was significant from
both sides and we were able to initiate a pilot project at the end of 2009. IIS was
tasked with managing this project. The pilot project inspired further work and, at the
end of 2011, VINNOVA decided to initiate the Knowledge Management Project
(KMP), the results of which are presented in this book. It has been a long and arduous project, but also extremely interesting, and the knowledge acquired from it has
been important from a number of different perspectives. Here, too, we have derived
great benefit from our cooperation with Chalmers, both in connection with CIP, but
also in the development of Master’s programmes in entrepreneurship that are based
on methods for managing knowledge assets. Students studying these programmes
have made invaluable contributions under the guidance of highly competent supervisors. We also made use of the knowledge accumulated within the framework of CIP’s
spin-off company, CIP-PS (where “PS” stands for “professional services”). CIP-PS
deals with businesses and how they can work strategically with knowledge assets.
Our intention was to integrate this knowledge into an academic institution, with its
associated opportunities and controls. This book is the result of many individuals’
hard work and presents a solid basis on which to formulate a model for control and
management, professionalize support structures, and create an innovation academy
for targeted education and a continued critical approach to the field.
Why, then, have we expended so much effort on this issue? Is the assignment we
received from the Ministry of Education and Research not sufficient? The simple
answer is no. The field has neither been defined nor regulated sufficiently to match
the significant requirements imposed on today’s academic institutions to be competitive both nationally and internationally. A number of government ministries are involved and their work is not always synchronized. Consequently, Ulf Petrusson and
the Ministry of Finance’s Jan Lidhard conducted a systematic, holistic investigation of
how Sweden’s academic institutions are governed, entitled Forskning och innovation
statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation: Research
and Innovation: State Governance of Universities’ Collaboration and Utilization].
Their intent was to provide the Swedish government with well-supported proposals
for future initiatives. The investigation’s conclusion is that there is no clear strategy
or governance at the national level, which further strengthened our resolve to assume
responsibility for developing the field.
Does our summary of all the experience gained and proposals for implementation
represent everything that we and other academic institutions need to address in the
field going forward? After having made a good deal of progress, we came to realize
that the field of collaboration cannot be fully described within KMP’s framework.
To gain a complete overview, in a similar way, we must also produce supporting data
on which to develop a platform for collaboration that is driven by social challenges.
We have now begun to do so in cooperation with the university managements of
Linköping University and Umeå University, where Lena Gustafsson now serves as
vice-chancellor. Cooperation among these three comprehensive universities helps
accelerate the process, and we are currently working to further develop the model
created through the KMP programme. We have also applied the important insight
that it is exceptionally important to promote development through the institutions’
university managements to be able to assume responsibility and ensure that collaboration is integrated with all their activities and at all their organizational levels.
We now have a good foundation on which to stand and to use this methodology to
supplement the idea- and knowledge-driven collaboration platform with a social

20

challenge-driven collaboration platform. That is to say, there is more work yet to be
done.
The University of Gothenburg’s Vision 2020 policy document states the following:
“It is our aim that, by 2020, the University of Gothenburg will be characterized by
responsible and active collaboration work. This will create a ripple effect that spreads
knowledge to the surrounding world, utilizes research results and stimulates an influx
of new ideas and knowledge. In turn, this will make the university a highly attractive
partner for potential collaborators.” We are well on our way to creating the right
conditions for just such a development.

21

1. Introduction
1.1 The university’s responsibility for collaboration and utilization
This book addresses how Swedish universities can develop and assume responsibility
for idea- and knowledge-based collaboration, that is to say, collaboration with a
focus on managing and utilizing research results. It should contribute to a development in which universities as organizations assume public responsibility for research
results as public resources. It describes and discusses how universities can initiate just
such a development by identifying and evaluating what constitute knowledge assets
and other intellectual assets. Special importance is attached to how the task of promoting utilization and collaboration can and should be integrated with academic
environments’ research and educational activities. Particular emphasis is placed on
how university administrations and the newly established university innovation
offices can uphold this responsibility.
1.1.1 Expanded responsibility for universities to utilize research results
Section 2 of Sweden’s Higher Education Act (SFS 1992:1434) establishes that a university’s principal mission (i.e., research and education) must include collaboration
with the surrounding community, the provision of information about its activities,
and the promotion of the utilization of research results.
The task of promoting the utilization of research results is a relatively recent mission.
It was established through an act of parliament on the basis of the 2008 research policy bill. The bill establishes that collaboration and promoting the use of research
results should be integrated as natural components of research and education activities.1 By expanding their mission of universities, there is also an increased need for
universities to assume greater responsibility for utilization of research results at the
organizational level and for what the Swedish government has described as
“research-based innovation”. The question is what this assumption of responsibility
is expected to consist of in more practical terms.
In conjunction with the state’s more detailed specification of universities’ responsibility for collaboration in 2008, the University of Gothenburg launched its Knowledge
Management Platform (KMP) programme. The programme was designed based on
the ambition to investigate, critically discuss and, subsequently, to define in concrete
terms how the university as an organization can and should assume responsibility for
managing and utilizing research results. Of particular interest is how the university
can organize managing research results in various structures/platforms. The KMP
programme primarily focuses on the circumstances at the University of Gothenburg.
However, the ambition is for the programme’s results to be able to be applied at
other universities also.
The broadened responsibility and the expectations laid out in the 2008 research and
innovation bill created the framework for the KMP programme. The bill explained
that the task of promoting the utilization of research results requires universities to
adopt measures to ensure that results benefit the community at large. According to
1 Government bills 2008/09:50, p. 117 f and 2009/10:149.

22

the bill, this could be achieved through further refining, selling, commercializing, or
helping research results to find practical application by some other means.
Again according to the bill, commercialization can, for example, be achieved by
patenting inventions and licensing them to existing or newly-founded companies. It
also notes that, if research-based innovations are to be realized, incentives are needed
for the actors involved, as are structures that provide commercial expertise, financing, and regulatory frameworks that are not unduly restrictive.2 To facilitate and
expedite the universities’ assumption of greater responsibility, a number of “innovation offices” were founded and associated with the universities.3

1.1.2 Increasing expectations by society for universities’ capacity for collaboration
The increased responsibility for integrating collaboration and the task of promoting
the utilization of research results should be understood from the standpoint of the
heightened expectations placed on academic institutions by society. Universities and
university colleges are allocated significant state funding to conduct research. As a
result of the 2008 research and innovation bill, the level of funding provided was
raised by five billion kronor annually to approximately 30 billion kronor. On the
basis of the most recent bill passed in 2012, the Swedish parliament allocated an
additional four billion kronor in funding each year.
Sweden’s political decision-makers are firmly convinced that research-based innovation is crucial to Sweden’s continued prosperity. An explicit objective of research has
long been that it should contribute to economic growth.
Another overarching political objective for research is to help consolidate and
strengthen the competitiveness of Swedish companies. Increased political expectations
are linked to universities’ opportunity to contribute to the creation of new innovations through collaboration with external actors and the utilization of research
results. It is no longer considered sufficient for universities to limit their role to educating students and expanding the collective body of scientific knowledge. They are
increasingly expected to contribute to the founding of new companies and to developing new, knowledge-based industries. Research groups are also expected to be able
to act as professional collaborators with international universities and other types of
actors in international research, education, and now also innovation arenas.
Moreover, politicians are increasingly expressing their desire for universities to
assume responsibility for regional development. Globalization and the transition to a
more knowledge-intensive business world has meant that the importance of a regional knowledge base is now more strongly emphasized. More and more, regions are
viewing themselves as actors exposed to competition. Being competitive in the international arena requires a number of strong sectors and clusters that have the ability
to attract companies, including companies that are active internationally. The creation and existence of regional industrial and business clusters becomes a high priority. Success here requires an institutional infrastructure at the local and regional levels.
Universities are most always considered to be an important part of this kind of infra2 Government bill 2008/09:50, p. 113-114.
3 The Swedish government established seven innovation offices. A special innovation office, Innovationskontor
Väst, was established for western-Swedish universities, with Chalmers University of Technology as its administrative
base.

23

structure. It is becoming increasingly common to speak of universities as bearers of
open innovation processes, R&D consortia, and innovation clusters.
Political expectations highlight complicated challenges as industries signal fewer jobs
in Sweden and the relocating of their production and development operations to
China and other countries. What should academic institutions do to assume greater
responsibility for encouraging businesses to base their R&D, innovation activities,
and production in Sweden? Or should the focus perhaps be on contributing to the
creation of new companies that can take the place of what was formerly “big industry” in Sweden? The challenges become even more complicated when it comes to
how we should practically develop future solutions for the environment, energy,
health, health care, segregation, and social justice.
Opinions are now being voiced that public leadership and involvement are required if
an extensive innovation project and processes with social impact are to be realized.
However, it is not obvious just how the national government intends to handle these
innovation policy challenges. Nor, for that matter, is it obvious how universities as
key actors are expected to develop and assume responsibility.
The question is whether or not universities as organizations have either the desire or
the ability to satisfy these expectations at all. In speaking publicly on the matter,
university representatives emphasize how important it is to collaborate with the
surrounding community and for research results to be utilized. Moreover, it is
increasingly common to speak about the need for autonomy if universities as organizations are going to be able to play a role in international research and innovation
arenas. In practice, however, the responsibility for collaboration and utilization seems
to be delegated to individual researchers. The so called “professor’s privilege”
(teacher’s exemption) applies within Swedish academia: researchers are assumed to
own the rights to their research results in a private capacity. It may be convenient for
university representatives to point out the fact that the researchers themselves hold
the rights to their results and, thereby, are also responsible for making sure that they
are utilized.
A common view is that matters related to utilization should be managed by an external innovation system.4 From an external standpoint, it is easy to view a university as
a smorgasbord of ideas with commercial potential. Moreover, to achieve long-term
success, a flow of good ideas is also needed. From this standpoint, university holding
companies, incubators, entrepreneurs’ schools, and the like are all actors competing
for ideas and even for flows of ideas, too. As such, universities almost take on the
nature of a market full of good ideas that, with the right support, can result in commercial innovation.
The professor’s privilege (teacher’s exemption) facilitates and can even be viewed as a
prerequisite for this “market mind-set”. Once they have pinpointed an idea of interest, it is up to the external support structures to offer the researcher(s) in question as
4 When the government expanded universities' responsibility in 2008, its research bill also highlighted the importance of an effective innovation system:“Innovation is the introduction of a new or significantly improved product,
service, process, organization, or other value-creating solution. Innovations are created in a dynamic and complex
interaction between the business world, academia, entrepreneurs, and society. For research-based innovations to
be created and developed, incentives are needed for the actors involved, as are structures that supply commercial
and other expertise and financing and regulatory frameworks that do not impose undue restrictions. A wellfunctioning system for knowledge transfer between academia and the business world is one of the cornerstones
for developing major Swedish high-tech enterprises.” See government bill 2008/09:50, p. 26.

24

interesting a value proposition as possible. From the individual researcher’s standpoint, they can, in a private capacity, make contact with these external actors and
evaluate which actor has the best offer. Admittedly, ordinarily it is expected that the
researchers themselves will participate in the innovation process and formation of the
company. There are only a handful of support structures that can offer other entrepreneurs to assume full or partial control of the idea.
1.1.3 KMP – knowledge management in academic environments
A distinguishing feature of the KMP programme is its focus on the university as an
organization. What is expected of the university’s management, administration, and
researchers/teachers in their role as employees representing a public authority? It is
one thing for researchers and teachers to pursue utilization and collaboration with
society in the form of side activities in a private capacity, and another when the collaboration and utilization are intended to be integrated elements of research and
education.
The University of Gothenburg has recently adopted a new vision, entitled Vision
2020. One of the vision’s recurring themes is public responsibility. Within the KMP
programme, it has been important to use this more comprehensive assumption of
responsibility as a point of departure. It is obvious that, in its efforts to assume
responsibility for social development, a university must go beyond the objective of
commercializing research results.
To help the University of Gothenburg succeed in achieving its vision, great emphasis
has been placed on integrating research, education, and collaboration and, in doing
so, on creating complete academic environments: “complete academic environments
create a unified whole that stimulates dynamic collaboration between education and
research on the one hand, and the business world and society on the other. The environments’ collaboration with the outside world allows new ideas to enjoy wider circulation. This enables an influx of new ideas and new knowledge that strengthens
and renews the disciplinary environments. It also entails an opportunity to continuously improve the quality of our operations with a view to setting prudent priorities… A complete academic environment requires a well-functioning infrastructure.
This is true of both the University of Gothenburg and of our national and international collaborations…” (Vision 2020)
One key issue is what is expected of such an environment in terms of collaboration
and promoting utilization.5 Thus, it seemed natural to link the KMP programme to
the university’s ambition to uphold its public responsibility and to develop its academic environments. As a result, the programme has been viewed and developed as
an important way of realizing the university’s vision to create complete academic
environments that integrate research and education with the task of utilizing research
results and collaborate. As an example, achieving this would mean that the university
could promote the utilization of research results internally, with professional support
from its research and innovation office. The challenge lies in stimulating strong
research environments to develop the capabilities needed to collaborate in a struc5 An overview of research insights about strong research and innovation environments can be found in the report
Impact Assessment of Strong Research and Innovation Systems, published by VINNOVA. Vinnova Analys VA 2011:07,
Section 5.

25

tured way, safeguard openness, and promote utilization in various ways. By focusing
on intellectual assets, the ambition is to also create genuine opportunity for research
groups to play an active role in international research and innovation arenas.
An important starting point for the KMP programme is the fact that research groups
are tasked with playing a role as actors in both international and local research and
innovation arenas. This makes it even more important for researchers to be able to
act as representatives for the academic environment and the university as a public
institution. This applies not only to research collaborations, but also to other forms
of collaboration. There is no doubt that the academic environment is becoming
increasingly important from an institutional perspective. The KMP programme’s
focus on academic environments involves an explicit acknowledgement of the fact
that academic activities are strongly influenced and guided by individual professions,
that is, by academics’ various initiatives and abilities. At the same time, the need for
organization and management is clear. An environment’s academic leadership and
administration are critical in making the work done there possible. Consequently,
one overarching challenge faced by the KMP programme is to analyze how a similar
institutional development can and should reasonably be effected and to recommend
how this can be achieved in practice.

1.2 The knowledge triangle and its normative consequences
An important preparation prior to the start of the KMP programme dealt the expectations universities have about the phenomena of innovation. The “knowledge triangle” was an obvious starting point for this work. This model was applied within the
EU to describe the exchange of knowledge between universities and the surrounding
community. In Sweden, the government and the state-run innovation agency VINNOVA emphasized the knowledge triangle as an important model for local universities. This model, which has consequently assumed a certain normative influence, consists of a triangle that illustrates the mutual relationship among research, education,
and innovation. It demonstrates the importance of integrating innovation processes
with a university’s primary tasks of research and education.
When the knowledge triangle was introduced, it was not obvious for whom it was
intended. Should each individual researcher have the ability to innovate or should
this occur at the group, departmental, faculty, or university level? Prior to the launch
of the KMP programme, the assumption was that integration should occur at the
university and at the research group levels, in accordance with the expanded responsibility defined by Sweden’s Higher Education Act. In principle, this would mean it
fully permeate the university’s operations. Moreover, with a statutory starting point
like Section 2 of the Higher Education Act, it is reasonable to assume that integration
should be based on some form of assumption of public responsibility.
An important conclusion from the early discussions about the concept of innovation
is that it may be seen as strange and, at times, even as outright challenging in the eyes
of academics. It risks challenging both the academic view of knowledge and the perception of the university as an organization. Many academics also claim, perhaps
with good reason, that an increased focus on innovation risks driving universities to
adopt a “market logic” and threatens academia’s ability to remain impartial and to
uphold academic values. There is a decades-old, on-going discussion about the “privatization” of academic activities that falls similar to the discussion of how managing
intellectual property rights affects universities. By thinking in terms of who holds the

26

copyright, the right to patent inventions, and so on, we introduce a “private logic”
into a public sphere.
Today, there is no doubt that the overarching development referred to as the emergence of the “knowledge economy” and “knowledge society” has already resulted in
relatively extensive changes. The idea that Swedish universities should collaborate
with the business world, healthcare, and other public sector activities has long been
established. Research collaborations, commissioned research, and commissioned education have gradually become a common feature of academic activities. Not least of
all, universities have played a clear role in contributing in various ways to the development of major enterprises like Astra Zeneca, Ericsson, Volvo, ABB, Electrolux, and
SCA. Naturally, by its very nature, applied research is more closely related to what
can be considered innovation processes. The question is whether or not the relatively
informal collaboration that has existed, and still exists, between Sweden’s industry
and researchers can be viewed as constituting something of a Swedish model for
knowledge transfer and promoting the utilization of research results.
The business world is increasingly knowledge-intensive in nature, and interest in
innovation efforts based on research and other knowledge development processes is
clearly growing. Recent decades have seen heightened expectations about universities’
contributions to future industries, in addition to their producing well-educated individuals and research results that are relevant to society. As such, it is not unusual for
politicians to talk about businesses of the future as being largely a result of academic
research.
Universities the world over have long since established technology/knowledge transfer
offices (TTOs) and similar organizations tasked with licensing research results. It is in
this context, in particular, that the concept of the entrepreneurial university is now
being discussed. In Sweden, much of the interest among those who promote innovation has been directed towards the preconditions for establishing companies.
Undeniably, university holding companies have a special responsibility in this regard.
A number of Swedish universities currently offer entrepreneurial programmes and
new companies have been formed in connection with some of these.6
A question that has influenced the KMP programme is the extent to which universities should assume responsibility for licensing, founding companies, conducting projects, and in other ways promoting the utilization of research results. It has also
become increasingly common to talk about how universities can contribute to various
social innovations. It has long been common for researchers to take the initiative in
different ways to utilize their research results in both the private and public sectors.
It is not obvious that a university as an organization should assume organizational
and academic responsibility for conducting development projects for the public sector, forming new companies, or licensing knowledge, for example. To this point, it
has not been commonplace for universities in Sweden to pursue licensing.
An interesting question is what approach the recently established innovation offices
will take. Is it possible and desirable to view the licensing model as the primary tool
for utilizing research results, similar to how the majority of international TTOs view
it? Or will we instead see the development of a unique Swedish model for innovation
offices?
6 See, for example, http://entrepreneur.chalmers.se/ and www.sahlgrenska.gu.se/utbildning/mom/gibbs/.

27

Universities are increasingly expected to play a role as actors in international arenas,
where it is important to be seen as an attractive partner. They are expected to host
academic environments with the ability to attract international students, researchers,
collaborators, and other interested stakeholders. Moreover, research groups are
increasingly expected to be active in international arenas when it comes to seeking
funding for their research. For academic managers, it becomes natural to think in
terms of what strengths their environment has that should be communicated to the
outside world. Universities are evolving into strategic actors with large numbers of
contractual relationships in research and innovation arenas.
An especially interesting development in this regard is the expectation that universities will participate in, and even act as organizers for, various institutional solutions,
such as centres of excellence, consortia, and partnerships. For its part, the European
Commission has lofty expectations of European universities. One example is seen in
the creation of the European Institute of Innovation and Technology (EIT) in 2008.
The purpose of the institute is to integrate the three areas of the knowledge triangle
to strengthen the EU’s innovative capacity and meet social challenges. This is to be
achieved by bringing together pre-eminent resources in the fields of research, education, and innovation in knowledge and innovation platforms called Knowledge and
Innovation Communities (KICs)7. In this case, Swedish academic institutions,
research institutes, and companies participate in the fields of energy and IT.8
In 2010 the European Commission also launched the Innovation Union as one of
seven flagship initiatives as part of the Europe 2020 strategy.9 Its objective is to
strengthen Europe’s knowledge base and reduce fragmentation in national research
and innovation systems. An important element is the development of supranational
arenas for innovation. Universities have been assigned a crucial role as bearers of
these arenas and platforms.
Perhaps the most important question within the KMP programme is what it means
for Swedish universities to assume organizational responsibility for the tasks defined
in the Higher Education Act in the context of today’s society. From this perspective,
innovation work is not a required task for universities. For this reason, it has been
natural for the KMP programme to instead focus on the implications of the mission
to collaborate and promote utilization as integrated aspects of university operations.
In this way, the knowledge triangle becomes more or less synonymous with the directive found in Section 2 of the Higher Education Act. This does not make it any less
important to consider the development described above, however. That said, with the
KMP programme, it was imperative to understand the university’s mission of promoting utilization and collaboration as much more than just innovation work.
A decisive aspect for the KMP programme as a whole was the decision to focus on
knowledge assets. This is because it facilitates a more highly developed management
of research results in utilization and collaboration processes. It is now a legal requirement for universities intending to initiate research collaborations financed by the EU
to have the ability to clarify what constitutes background knowledge and project
7 For a more detailed description of the EIT and KICs, see the Commission’s proposal for EIT’s Strategic Innovation
Agenda (SIA) the contribution of the EIT to a more innovative Europe, at: http://eit.europa.eu/eit-community/eitglance/eit-strategy-2014-2020.
8 KIC Inno Energy (Uppsala University and Sweden’s Royal Institute of Technology (KTH)) and EIT ICT Labs (KTH). Cf.
also government bill 2010/11:38.
9 Europe 2020 Flagship Initiative. Innovation Union. 6.10.2010. COM (2010) 546 final.

28

COLLABORATION /
UTILIZATION

KNOWLEDGE
TRIANGLE

RESEARCH

What expectations and preconditions exist
in connection with Swedish universities’
ability to develop their operations to manage
their increased responsibility to:
a) provide information about their activities
b) interact with the surrounding community
c) promote the utilization of research results
as an integrated part of their responsibility
to carry on research and education?

EDUCATION

Figure 1. The challenge of implementing the knowledge triangle at Swedish universities
results, respectively. Knowledge assets constitute a form of currency in research and
innovation arenas. Thus, the ability to manage knowledge assets largely becomes a
critical precondition for universities to be able to act as partners for existing industry
and to contribute to establishing of new companies. The legal management of knowledge assets through contracts becomes a means to establish research consortia and
other institutions for open research and innovation, and a vehicle for enabling multiple parallel utilizations. A particularly important assumption within the KMP programme is that the management of knowledge assets is key now that universities are
required to develop more society-oriented value creation and balance different interests. The university’s organizational capabilities for managing knowledge assets
emerged as a key issue in realizing the knowledge triangle.

1.3 The division of responsibility between the university as an
organization and university employees
An overarching question by the KMP programme is what responsibility the university
should assume as an organization and what responsibility individual researchers
should be expected to bear, respectively. Under the established system of norms,
researchers and teachers at the university work relatively free of constraints. The
rules governing collaboration are connected with and affected by the provisions of
Section 6 of the Higher Education Act concerning freedoms in research, for example.
According to this section, the general principles that apply to research are that
research issues may be freely selected and research methodologies may be freely
developed. In addition, research results may also be published freely. Furthermore,
the professor’s privilege applies to patentable inventions that have been developed
within a university.10 Teachers (professors, lecturers, and other teachers) are considered to retain the rights to any inventions created as part of their employment at a
university. No rights are considered to have been transferred to the employer unless
an agreement has been signed to this effect.11
10 Section 1, Act on the Right to Inventions by Employees (1949:345).
11 See also Chapter 2.

29

1.3.1 Researcher collaboration and utilization in the private sphere and
in the university’s name
One of the basic premises adopted by the KMP programme when examining the university’s assumption of responsibility as an organization is that its operations are
guided by the individuals as an academic profession. Further, the prevailing order at
Swedish universities includes the basic assumption that researchers own the rights to
their ideas and, thereby, also bear ultimate responsibility for whether or not and how
utilization should occur. It is the individual researcher’s and teacher’s ability and attitude that form the basis for all academic activities and also for utilization. It is now
increasingly viewed as acceptable for researchers to pursue various utilization
processes. Moreover, it has been empirically demonstrated that academic excellence
and entrepreneurial ability often go hand in hand.12 It is thought that the better the
researcher, the greater the potential for successful utilization. In addition, academics
with “practical backgrounds” are considered to be an asset to research groups.13
According to this approach, it is the researcher that has the role and responsibility to
choose which different actors in the internal and external support system to work
with. Depending on how internal and external support structures are used by the
researchers, responsibility is allocated differently in relation to possible “distributing”
actors. This can appear to be both attractive and effective and may also prove to be
so in reality. In this approach, the distribution of responsibility for knowledge assets
is managed based on a market logic.
However, the situation becomes complex when we consider that a university is part
of the state on the one hand (with its role as an authority) and, on the other, assumes
multiple contractual obligations as part of research programmes, for example. If a
university lacks the prerequisites for entering into agreements for knowledge assets
created within research programmes, its ability to participate in international research
and collaboration programmes as an actor/legal entity and its ability to assume
responsibility for meeting social challenges are limited. The more external actors control not only individual ideas, but also idea flows, the more the university is limited
in its assumption of responsibility. The fact that researchers establish their own holding companies that not only control the knowledge assets they have already created,
but are also assigned the rights to the knowledge assets they create in the future, renders the situation even more difficult.
A key observation made by the KMP programme is that it is not easy for researchers
to manage their knowledge assets both in their capacity as public authority employees and in a private capacity. This is particularly true because the basic assumption is
that researchers own their knowledge assets in a private capacity, at the same time as
they are required to observe the relatively rigid regulatory framework that applies to
public authorities. A lot is required of universities for researchers to be able integrate
the task of promoting utilization into public efforts, at the same time as they are to
own and manage their research results privately.
1.3.2 Integrated collaboration in academic environments
The KMP programme emphasizes the academic environment as an important organi12 See Clarysse, B., Tartari, V. and Salter, A. (2011), p. 1084-1085.
13 Franklin, S., Wright, M. and Lockett, A. (2001).

30

zational starting point. Ordinarily, research groups work on several projects and collaborate with one another. In the majority of disciplines, increasingly heavy demands
are being placed on the ability of researchers to develop areas of strength in cooperation with others. A common assumption is that the strongest and most pioneering
academic environments make attractive partners for collaboration and that they are
successful in pursuing utilization.14 With this kind of “complete academic environments” as a starting point, it becomes obvious that utilization involves so much more
than just the commercialization of ideas for potential products.
When the driving forces and responsibility lie within the academic environment,
greater demands are placed on the university as an organization. It also becomes
more difficult to assign the responsibility for promoting utilization to actors external
from the university. Reasonably, a university’s ability to utilize research results
involves more than just a system for managing researchers’ ideas. The move towards
complete academic environments requires the university to create capabilities that
allow successful environments to keep their knowledge assets organized and make
various forms of collaboration possible. One of the KMP programme’s key challenges
is to clarify what these forms are.
1.3.3 Interaction between individual researchers, academic environments,
the university administration, and managers
A central hypothesis of the KMP programme is that integrating the mission of collaborating and utilizing research results with research and education requires a relatively
advanced organizational approach. Many observers would like to view universities as
collegial institutions where researchers and teachers governs operations jointly. This
approach is in no way a given at modern universities, however. Increasingly greater
expectations are being placed on university management and the existing line organization, from the vice-chancellor, deans and department heads on down to individual
employees. Moreover, the university administration also plays an important role.
The basic assumption should be that a university is a rather complex organization
that is not easily directed or managed. It is also not an organization that can easily
promote specific and individual issues. It has also been observed that management
ambitions to remake the organization into an “entrepreneurial university” often have
the opposite effect.15 When asking how a university as an organization should
assume responsibility for utilization, it is important to specify the extent to which the
academic faculty, the line managers, or the administration are primarily responsible.
It is also important to distinguish between the collegial responsibility and the responsibility associated with researchers’ ownership of rights to their own results in a private capacity.
The complex interplay between these “spheres of power” can be viewed as a university’s Achilles’ heel, but also as its strength. For this reason, the KMP programme
came to focus almost immediately on how teamwork among individual researchers,
academic environments, the university administration, and head managers can and
should reasonably occur. It became clear that organization of university collaboration
and utilization of research results is a relatively undeveloped field. This, in itself, is
problematic for a public authority.
14 See, for example, Larsen, M. (2011), p. 6-7, Grimaldi, K. and Siegel, W. (2011), p. 1045-1046.
15 Philpott, K., Dooley, L., O’Reilly, C. and Lupton, G. (2011), p. 161-162.

31

1.4 The distribution of responsibility for collaboration between the
university and its support structures
Another question of critical importance in the development of the KMP programme
concerns which responsibilities should be managed internally and externally, respectively. At many universities, the support structure for the utilization of research
results is complicated and is characterized by unclear boundaries and distributions of
responsibility. For example, the actors involved may have tasks that overlap unnecessarily. In the past, the focus was often primarily on the support structures for utilizing research results that lie within the interface between the university and the business world (incubators, science parks, etc.). As a rule, the university’s internal support
structures have received less attention. Moreover, the role of the university holding
companies has not been entirely clear and their operations have most often been
undercapitalized. Experience has also shown that it is difficult to convince private
venture capitalists to finance the required measures for reducing the gap between
promising research results and possible innovation.
The challenges faced by universities become clearer when we more closely examine
how responsibility for utilization and collaboration is divided between a university
and external support structures. From a commercial perspective, a university is not
well suited to conducting business projects. Thus, the preconditions for successful
commercial utilization will always depend on either the existing business world’s and
public sector’s ability to convert knowledge assets into profitable products, or the
establishment of new companies with this ability. In most cases, commercialization
also requires significant investment. For this reason, investors such as venture capitalists, business angels, and other financial actors play a decisive and direct role. This
explains the University of Gothenburg’s dependence on external support structures
and its sharing of the responsibility for utilization.
The university’s ability to assume responsibility is influenced by its nature as a public
authority. A university must be governed and administered as a representative of the
state. For this reason, research results can reasonably be considered to be a result of
the work of a public authority, though not of its exercise of public authority.
Innovation work should also be managed on the basis of the administrative law code
that applies to public authorities. These regulations can deal with public documents,
archiving, and registration, for example. Public authorities are also not allowed to
assume commercial risk.
An overarching challenge for the KMP programme is how the university can develop
its ability to promote utilization within the framework of a system of administrative
law. Thus, an important question is the degree to which the university is capable
of assuming greater responsibility. As noted earlier, it is not clear what should be
managed by the university as public authority and what should be managed by the
university holding company, for example. The majority of universities in Sweden
have access to holding companies that can be used for risk-bearing collaboration and
utilization projects.

1.5 Idea- and knowledge-driven collaboration and collaboration
driven by societal challenges
Having worked with a programme focused on how universities manage research

32

results and other knowledge assets, it became evident that there are several different
ways to approach the issue of collaboration and utilization of research results.
Knowledge assets are not always what needs to be managed or utilized — far from it.
In our case, it was important to distinguish between idea- and knowledge-driven
collaboration and collaboration driven by societal challenges. Eventually, we came to
realize that the combination of the two approaches creates something of a holistic
approach to integrating the task of collaborating with the university’s primary activities of research and education.

1.5.1 Do researchers, academic environments, and universities need
to generate benefits?
As indicated earlier, one of the KMP programme’s main purposes is to ensure that the
responsibility for promoting utilization is not reduced to the pursuit of commercialization or increased growth, or for that matter, to the opportunity for university
researchers to earn a second income. Presumably, it is precisely this aspect that makes
many academics sceptical towards, and even directly averse to, viewing the promotion of utilization as their responsibility. Ordinarily, the same researchers have no
problem participating actively in public debates and in various societal processes as
part of their academic duties. Undoubtedly, from an academic perspective, there is
much to suggest that adopting a somewhat sceptical attitude is healthy. At the same
time, from the perspective of the KMP programme, it is important to realize that promoting utilization is about so much more. It is a question of what kind of public
responsibility researchers pursue.

1.5.2 Collaboration and utilization with a focus on research results
and other knowledge assets
The KMP programme focuses on utilization and collaboration through the management of research results and other knowledge assets. We describe this as idea- and
knowledge-driven collaboration. The distinguishing feature is that the starting point
is the actual research results themselves. The focus is on the responsibility of promoting practical application of research results in society and that these results be managed in collaboration with the surrounding society. It thus becomes natural to refer to
and discuss research results in terms of knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets. These are the two forms of intellectual assets that we focused on.
With this approach, utilization is a matter of working to see that research results,
as knowledge assets, are applied in practice and create value for society. Intellectual
property assets are used to control who may utilize these assets and on what terms
and conditions. Within KMP, an intellectual asset management (IAM) framework is
integrated with a programme intended to improve the ability to continually strengthen and develop academic environments and the university as an organization.
Innovation advisors, lawyers, collaboration managers, information analysts, and
others collaborated to identify and determine the opportunities of a specific research
environment. The results of this review can be used by the research environment to
make various decisions, such as what should be published, which assets can be used
for new research collaborations and strategic development, and which assets can be
licensed or otherwise commercialized. Either in whole or in part, the results can also
provide a basis for more long-term and strategic decisions that need to be made by a

33

CLAIM

DECIDE

Which research results should be
utilized and managed in
collaborative relationships?

Which considerations are relevant
and what decisions need to be made
in terms of how research results
should be utilized and managed?

POSITION

ORGANIZE

How should the academic
environment position itself
in international research,
education and
collaboration arenas?

How should research results be
managed from an organizational
standpoint in research, education,
collaboration and utilization
processes?

Figure 2. Knowledge-based collaboration in academic environments

department, faculty, or university-wide initiative. This form of collaboration is especially well-suited to the natural sciences, medicine, and engineering, though, naturally, is also applicable in other scientific fields.
1.5.3. Collaboration driven by societal challenges with a focus on researchers’
involvement in social development
The KMP programme’s work gradually revealed that it is not always appropriate to
apply a knowledge-based logic. In attempting to understand the public responsibility
of a comprehensive university, it becomes obvious that collaboration involves so
much more than the utilization of research results and their management. We were
able to perceive a more societal challenge-driven type of collaboration, which is more
a matter of how researchers and teachers help manage society’s challenges. In this
case, objectifying research results is not as obvious a choice. Instead, the starting
point becomes broad and often multi-disciplinary participation and public responsibility, rather than the management of intradisciplinary research results. Some typical
societal challenges are climate change, drug abuse, food safety, water supply, peace,
and security, but also the global financial system and issues concerning global
governance. Certain issues have a clear national or local character, even where more
than one nation is affected, such as urbanization, social unity, alienation, a country’s
global competitiveness, innovation systems, and the education system.
The university’s organizational capabilities for managing societal challenge-driven
collaboration seem to be even more underdeveloped than its capabilities for manag-

34

ing idea- and knowledge-based collaboration. There is much to suggest that the former will come to play an ever greater role in the future. For example, the EU’s
Horizon 2020 programme is strongly oriented towards societal challenges and a
multidisciplinary approach. Just as with idea- and knowledge-based collaboration,
there is a great need for universities to find frameworks for better identifying and
understanding societal challenge-driven collaboration. Only then can a strategic
approach towards this form of collaboration be adopted and be better visualized.
Moreover, for comprehensive universities, it is important to highlight the various
forms that involve the entire university and to construct a basis for a strategic project
in the area.
A basic assumption by the KMP programme is to develop the organizational capabilities of the university as a fundamental step in enabling the taking of increased
responsibility for societal challenge-driven collaboration, also. The assumption is that
the development of organizational capabilities for managing idea- and knowledgedriven collaboration lays the foundation for an organization-based assumption of
responsibility for more societal-challenge-driven collaboration. Naturally, academic
environments need to be able to manage both logics.
1.5.4 Academic freedom and academic values in all collaboration and utilization
The KMP programme has seen how crucial it is that academic staff have a stable set
of values when taking part in collaborative efforts. Individual responsibility for
upholding social values such as justice, a sustainable society, non-discrimination, and
suchlike is no less important when researchers become involved in collaboration and
the utilization of knowledge assets. From an organizational perspective it is important that academic environments can be developed as platforms for independence and
critique on the one hand and, on the other hand, for collaborative creativity and
value creation based on the pursuit of public responsibility.16 In an academic context,
the ambition to generate commercial profit must never be the central and defining
principle.
A key value for a programme like KMP is the protection of academic freedom.17 At
the same time, it is not clear just what academic freedom involves. It is important to
distinguish between different activities. To what forms of expression should this
freedom apply? For example, it is important to be able to distinguish between the
academic freedom to publish and the freedom to run a private company based on
research carried out using public funds. On the whole, the freedom to publish is
uncontroversial, while, in the eyes of many, academic freedom in connection with
commercialization is not as self-evident.
Naturally, just who may exercise this freedom is also important. Does it apply solely

16 The interesting aspects here are the social norms for academia, which Merton identified as CUDOS rules. These
are: Communalism, Universalism, Disinterestedness and Organized Scepticism. To what extent is it possible to combine a logic which requires researchers to eschew personal interest, for example, with a logic in which researchers
participate actively in utilization processes? Merton, R. (1973).
17 The freedoms associated with research are described in Section 6 of Sweden’s Higher Education Act. The following general principles apply for research:
1. research questions may be freely selected,
2. research methodologies may be freely developed, and
3. research results may be freely published.

35

to individual researchers, or does it also apply to universities themselves? From the
standpoint of the globalization and development of the university as an international
actor, the question can be asked as to whether the concept of academic freedom
involves something more. What is required for the university as an organization to be
able to develop as a free, critical, and independent actor in relation to the business
world and national and public actors? On an overarching, structural level, academic
freedom may very well conflict with the individual researcher’s pursuit of freedom.
Allowing external, privately-owned companies owned by employees and others to
control portfolios of research results does not necessarily facilitate or allow for academic freedom for research groups and the university. The risk is that the university
will end up becoming entangled in a number of difficult dependencies. A clear example of this would be if a university’s ability to initiate and conduct research collaborations becomes restricted. The same is true if it is restricted in its ability to maintain
and develop its position as a critical and independent actor in society.

1.6 KMP for learning and development
The overarching ambition behind the KMP programme is to generate knowledge and
initiate development processes for the university to take responsibility for collaboration and promoting utilization of research results. The programme’s ambition extends
beyond simply developing frameworks for commercialization and utilization. Instead,
its purpose is to generate knowledge about what the integration of research, education, and collaboration/utilization might possibly involve and entail in practice.
The focus lies on understanding the significance of an organizational assumption of
responsibility and on an assumption of responsibility based on academic values.
Great importance has been attached to conducting structured analyses and evaluations to lay a foundation for a well-supported academic learning process. It is also
intended that the learning and development process for idea- and knowledge-based
collaboration will pave the way for a corresponding initiative for collaboration driven by societal challenges.
1.6.1 An academic basis for critique, learning, and development
Because the focus lies on the university’s capabilities as an organization, the most
pressing questions are what organizational development and which structural solutions are envisaged when the university as an organization develops complete academic environments that have collaboration and utilization activities as integrated
processes. How can the innovation offices stimulate these environments? An important question in this respect is how to develop the role of the academic manager and
what form leadership should take in the responsibility to collaborate and utilize
research results. Another relevant question is how to design the role for the remainder of the administration and what form operational support should take. A related
question is what role should be assigned to the holding company and other external
structures controlled by the university. These questions show that the KMP programme is very much concerned with the university’s organizational development.
The university is not an organization that can be expected to implement sweeping
changes in an instant. Of course, its slow rate of change is both an advantage and
disadvantage. From an academic standpoint, it is reasonable that changes should be

36

implemented cautiously and in stages and be accompanied by a critical dialogue. The
KMP programme’s ambition is to make this possible. Changes should be based on a
running critical dialogue that involves the university’s various power structures and
levels. The KMP programme wants to involve representatives for management, the
administration, external support structures, and the academic staff. The Institute for
Innovation and Social Change was founded as an arena for this purpose.
University management was represented by the deputy vice-chancellor for external
relations and innovation and all of the university’s deans. As a result, a number of
processes could be initiated that required academic leadership. The KMP programme
looks at how university governance can be developed and how the institutional
system can be improved. Consequently, one of the programme’s overarching missions
became to design a development process for determining how university management, at its various levels, can lead and enable collaboration and utilization processes
in a structured way by assuming greater responsibility. Thanks to the deputy vicechancellor’s and university deans’ active leadership in the programme, the lessons
learned have been integrated into the development processes for management and
governance. The vice-chancellor and others in the university’s executive body have
received regular reports on the ongoing work.
The university’s Grants and Innovation Office (formerly the Research and Innovation
Services office) has played a prominent role in the KMP programme. In its 2008 bill,
the Swedish government stated that a model for an improved national innovation
system had been developed that assigned a key role to university-affiliated innovation
offices. The University of Gothenburg received its own innovation office as a result of
the parliament’s passing of the related 2012 bill.
The KMP programme looks at how the Grants and Innovation Office can develop its
support for the creation of complete academic environments. A carefully planned dialogue among innovation advisors, research groups, and representatives for university
management is an important part of the learning process. It is inevitable that the uni-

University Management

Vice-Rector/deans

Faculty

IIS
GU Holding

Grants and
Innovation
Oﬃce

Faculty

GU

University
Administration

External Support Structures

Figure 3. The Institute for Innovation and Social Change as an institutional base for
continuous learning and dialogue

37

versity administration will play a key role in any process for creating complete academic environments. The institutional development of this kind of environment is
intimately connected with the development of the support functions. The university
holding company also plays a key role here. Much of the more commercially-oriented
support is provided from here. The dialogue about role assignment between the
Grants and Innovation Office and the holding company is critical for future support
functions.
Thus, the KMP programme is a learning and development programme with a focus
on developing complete academic environments as the university’s most important
knowledge platform. This kind of environment should have the ability to manage
knowledge assets in research collaborations and other collaboration processes. In
other words, they should be able to promote utilization. This is where collaboration
should primarily be integrated with research and education. We have specifically chosen to use the term “knowledge platform” to express the fact that the university is
not a centrally-governed organization. It is an organization governed by the academic
profession where primarily researchers and teachers must manage their research and
education processes and their results. A key feature of the KMP programme is the
development of an institutional model for collaboration with a special focus on the
utilization of research results. The question is what kind of system and structural
solutions we foresee when the university develops complete academic environments

How should the
university develop its
organizational
capabilities
concerning
collaboration and
promoting
utilization?

bilities

Universi

M

agement’s
an
C
a
ap

The
capabilities of
researchers
and the
academic
environments?

ty

The capabilities of
prefects and other
leaders?

The Innovation
Oﬃce’s and
administration’s
capabilities?

The capabilities in the
interface with the external
innovation system?

Figure 4. Organizational capabilities for collaboration and promoting utilization

38

that integrate collaboration and utilization processes. It is likely not a “knowledge
transfer” organization, as in the US model.
1.6.2 Learning with a focus on organizational capabilities
As explained previously, the KMP programme focuses on universities’ capabilities for
promoting utilization and managing knowledge assets in cooperative relationships.
By “capabilities” we mean both individual capabilities and organizational capabilities. The KMP programme aims to stimulate the individual capabilities of researchers,
teachers, managers, research and innovation advisors, and others for promoting
utilization and collaboration. It also aims to contribute to universities’ collective
abilities to collaborate as organizations. These organizational capabilities require an
institutional development and assignment of roles; that is to say, the development of
systems of norms, structures, and organization. For this reason, it is fitting to discuss
“institutional learning”. We need to gain a more comprehensive understanding of the
institutional challenges related to integrating collaboration/utilization with research
and education.
This institutional learning can, in somewhat simplified terms, be described as a combination of analysis, dialogue, and the development of individual and organizational
capabilities. The more deeply internalized knowledge of how you can and should
manage collaboration and utilization at the individual level, the better the potential
for developing organizational capabilities. Once the latter are developed, individual
capabilities can also be developed. This creates what can be described as a circular
development process or interaction.
1.6.3 Learning based on evaluation
The ambition to initiate and conduct a well-organized learning process has defined
the KMP programme throughout. Project management and continuous monitoring
are fundamental elements. Much energy has been expended to clarify, organize, and
formalize the learning and development processes required. Throughout the project,
we have continuously proposed hypotheses that we wanted to test and evaluate. We
have also held recurring workshops at which we have discussed and critiqued the
results of our work.
Prior to the programme’s inception, we established a number of overarching questions and hypotheses. Perhaps KMP’s most important hypothesis has been that the
analysis and management of research results as knowledge assets in academic environments is a suitable way to enable a transformation process. Our expectations
from this hypothesis have been fulfilled. New hypotheses have also been proposed,
particularly related to the distribution of responsibility among individual researchers,
academic environments, and the university administration.
In turn, proposing hypotheses has shown the importance of more thorough evaluations. It quickly became clear that those of us working within the KMP programme
needed to expand our understanding of the interplay between the state control of
Swedish universities, the public administration of the authority’s operations, and the
management of research results within collaboration and utilization. In pursuing this,
we were able to initiate dialogues about how Swedish universities can develop their
organizational capabilities.

39

1.7 Evaluation steps for developing a “Swedish Model” for
collaboration and innovation
In its initial phase, the KMP programme has been designed as a process for developing the University of Gothenburg’s promotion of utilizing research results and the
management of research results in collaborative relationships. At the same time, we
have wanted the programme to also contribute to development at other universities.
As mentioned earlier, the programme has been designed based on the objective of
developing a model for collaboration and the utilization of research results that is
based on the academic environments, rather than on innovation systems — a model
based on researchers’ desire to uphold their public responsibility. The hypothesis here
is that there is a Swedish/Nordic tradition of administration and development for
this. Accordingly, this book can be viewed as a contribution to a national programme
that establishes how universities can and should develop their responsibility for promoting the utilization of research results and managing these in collaborative relationships.
1.7.1 Evaluation for normative development
It is important to emphasize that the KMP programme is not simply an academic
analysis project, but a collaborative development project run by the university’s key
actors. This development work should be based on an academically critical – even
self-critical – approach. The analysis should be viewed as normative in so much as
considerations about how the university should develop its operations are the
primary focus. The ambition is also to open the way for a more long-term critical
dialogue about these normative conclusions.
In pursuit of the ambition to normatively develop the university’s organizational
capabilities for collaboration, the KMP programme conducted a large number of
different evaluations and analyses that have facilitated a relatively comprehensive
dialogue and discussion. We then chose to focus primarily on three main areas of
evaluation.

What
expectations
and preconditions
exist concerning the
university’s ability to integrate
the task of collaboration and
promoting utilization?

How should the university
develop its organizational
capabilities for collaboration
and promoting utilization?

How should the concrete
research result be identiﬁed,
managed cooperatively and
included operatively in diﬀerent
utilization processes?

Figure 5. The KMP programme’s three main areas

Combined, the three areas for evaluation resulted in a comprehensive development
process. The individual areas are mutually related, build on one another, and, combined, have led to a dialogue that has resulted in deliberations and proposals. The
report presented in this book is based on these three areas of evaluation.

40

1.7.2 Expectations and preconditions – Part 1
The first part of the KMP programme comprises a comprehensive evaluation of the
expectations placed on the university by the state (top-down) on the one hand and
the expectations held by researchers and academic environments (bottom-up) on the
other hand. In both cases, the opportunity to move ahead and evaluate the potential
that exists for the university to fulfil its mission to collaborate and promote utilization is of particular interest.

STEP 2
What
expectations and
preconditions exist
concerning the university’s
ability to integrate the task
of collaboration and
promoting utilization?

Evaluation of the academic environments’ management of
research results to clarify both how they promote utilization
and the university’s need for organizational development.

STEP 1
Evaluation of the govermental governance of universities to clarify
expectations, obligations, preconditions, and opportunities
for collaborating and promoting utilization.

THE KNOWLEDGE TRIANGLE

Figure 6. The first part of the KMP programme
The state’s expectations and governance (Chapter 2)
Step 1: Evaluation of the state’s governance of universities to clarify expectations,
obligations, preconditions, and opportunities for collaboration and promoting
utilization.
As their principal, the Swedish state has given the country’s universities the mission
of promoting the utilization of research results and of managing research results in
collaborative relationships as an integrated part of their primary activities of research
and education.18 An initial step is to evaluate more concretely what expectations and
requirements exist on the part of the state about how universities should develop
their institutional accountability for collaboration and promoting utilization. As
noted earlier, the system of norms developed by the national government for the
collaboration and utilization mission is vague and underdeveloped.19 This does not
need to be viewed as wholly problematic, however. Instead, to a certain extent, it can
be viewed as providing both opportunity and freedom to develop a system of norms
tailored to suit the individual university. At the same time, the majority of universities
are public authorities and are obliged to abide by the existing body of state controls.
State governance includes all forms of relevant legislation, ordinances, and appropriation directions. Thus, the government’s financial control and the terms and condi18 To a large extent, this analysis was conducted jointly with Jan Lidhard. Its results were published in the report
ESO 2012:8 Forskning och innovation statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation:
Research and Innovation: State Governance of Universities’ Collaboration and Utilization] and in the background
report of the same name.
19 From a methodological standpoint, the evaluation is conducted using what can be described as a “socio-legal”
approach. We carry out a relatively comprehensive analysis of laws, ordinances, preparatory work, and other policy
documents relevant to the university. However, the internal legal analysis of the legal material will be subject to ongoing critical discussion in relation to the university’s mission to collaborate and promote utilization. We discuss
how the content of various control measures both enables and limits the university’s potential for utilization and
collaboration and the potential for institutional development.

41

tions associated with it are also included. The implementation of European community law and the programmes developed within the EU is important. Last, but not least,
other public authorities’ decrees and decisions also exert a controlling influence. All
the many agreements that the state enters into at every imaginable level are also very
important to consider in understanding university governance.
An important analytical process within the KMP programme has been to develop a
state-based governance model to be used in the evaluation (governance by objectives,
resource-based governance, regulatory governance and programme- and projectbased governance). In addition to assisting us in our analysis of state governance at
the national level, the management and analysis model is also intended for use with
the practical governance of operations at the university level. We have gone to great
lengths to prepare and clarify a comprehensive overview of how the state governs
collaboration and the promotion of utilization. This general overview and the specific
details contained in the analysis provide a basis for learning and development. In this
way, innovation advisors, researchers, and academic managers have the opportunity
to discuss the rules that apply. Naturally, these rules will affect how much room there
is to pursue different options. The amount of room available to develop state governance at the university level is important. It is relevant to talk about state governance
at this level, also. An important insight gained through the KMP programme is that
the public authority model not only creates challenges for universities in their relatively unique situations in relation to collaboration, but that it also has its advantages.
For this reason, it has been important for the KMP programme to evaluate how the
state’s 1) governance by objectives, 2) regulatory governance, 3) programme- and
project-based governance, and 4) resource- and result-based governance affect universities’ ability to collaborate and promote utilization. Using this evaluation, in Chapter
2 we highlight a number of insights gained into how the university can and should
develop its organizational capabilities.
Expectations and preconditions in academic environments (Chapter 3)
Step 2: Evaluation of academic environments’ management of research results to clarify both how they promote utilization and the university’s need for organizational
development.
The analysis of research results as knowledge assets is perhaps the primary basis for
learning within the KMP programme and the initiation of a structured development
process. By establishing a number of “pilots” to examine academic environments,
university-wide learning and development processes are initiated.20 The aim is to
acquire a greater understanding of what expectations are placed on researchers and
what ability they have in practice to promote utilization and manage research results
in collaboration processes. Is there potential to develop environments in which collaboration and utilization are integrated, i.e. complete academic environments? More
precisely, we need to determine which activities to encourage and which challenges/
risks need to be managed when academic environments develop their capabilities for

20 The KMP programme has evaluated and held dialogues with more than 30 different academic groups/environments. The evaluations are based on a method in which we first analyze the academic environments’ knowledge
assets and then hold a dialogue about how collaboration and utilization can occur.

42

integrating the taking of responsibility for collaboration and utilization activities.
The evaluation involves the Grants and Innovation Office and researchers jointly
examining the academic environment and identifying which knowledge assets are
managed in collaboration and for which assets utilization is considered important.
Management is involved by helping to identify research environments that are important for the university. The asset list produced through this analysis enables the
researchers, innovation advisors, and academic managers to discuss and adopt a
position on collaboration and utilization issues.
By defining research results as knowledge assets, objects are identified that can be
analyzed and managed and about which decisions need to be made. For example,
how should the assets be managed in different research processes? Are they used in
different collaborative relationships? In what ways can they be utilized? What ethical
challenges and considerations arise? A need for planning and reflection arises. In
turn, this leads to a discussion about what kind of support is needed from the Grants
and Innovation Office and the holding company. Questions about how management
should be involved become relevant, as are questions about how existing systems of
norms and rules affect the opportunity to manage knowledge assets.
A particularly important aspect of these evaluations has been specifying the different
ways in which academic environments can promote the utilization of research results.
What activities do researchers undertake to promote research results to be used and
utilized in the community? In what ways do academic environments promote the utilization of research results? We have endeavoured to identify a number of utilization
logics on the basis of this analysis. When defining these more specifically, we have
particularly analyzed which challenges and risks academic environments must deal
with when promoting utilization of research results.
We worked with researchers to evaluate both the expectations and preconditions for
the university’s development of its organizational capabilities to integrate collaboration
and utilization into academic environments’ ordinary activities.
1.7.3 Leadership and organizational capabilities – Part 2
A second part of the KMP programme aims to define concretely what university
management should do to enable academic environments and researchers to collaborate and promote utilization. In other words, we have evaluated university management’s enabling role and responsibility.21
It has been important to both evaluate and establish a dialogue about how institutional development at the university level should occur to successfully initiate, stimulate, and enable the integration of collaborative capabilities in academic environments. Naturally, responsibility for developing the university as an institution lies
with its management. At the same, it must be acknowledged that the university is a
complex organization from a management standpoint. The majority of universities
fall under state administration and thus are governed based on state administrative
21 This is where we have primarily pursued dialogue-based development work, together with a measure
of action research. This work has been characterized by the pursuit of concrete results by those responsible
for these questions, although our ambition has also been to conduct the evaluation based on an academic foundation.

43

logic. Moreover, universities are largely collegial organizations and governed by the
academics as a profession. In other words, much of their development occurs in the
interaction between researchers/teachers. All in all, the evaluation aims to clarify
what a Swedish institutional model for collaboration and the utilization of research
results consists of in concrete terms.

4 Evaluation of what forms of education, learning and dialogue
are needed to enable academic environments to pursue
collaboration and utilization and how these should be organized
How should the university
develop its organizational
capabilities concerning
collaboration and
promoting utilization?

3 Evaluation of the development of norms as a means to enable
the integration of collaboration and utilization in academic
environments

2 Evaluation of governance by objectives as a means for university
management to enable the integration of collaboration and
utilization in academic environments

1Evaluation of what university governance and accountability
as a public authority might reasonably involve vis-à-vis collaboration
and promoting the utilization of research results

Figure 7. The second part of the KMP programme

University management’s assumption of responsibility for collaboration and promoting utilization (Chapter 4)
Step 1: Evaluation of what university governance and accountability as a public
authority might reasonably involve vis-a-vis collaboration and promoting the
utilization of research results.
Using the KMP programme’s analyses discussed earlier, we have pinpointed a number
of critical processes for developing the university’s organizational capabilities for
promoting utilization and collaborating. The evaluation’s key challenge is to understand how university governance can enable academic environments to develop as
know-ledge management platforms — that is, as organizations where researchers can
collaborate and promote utilization in the public setting, while also having the
opportunity to utilize their research results in a private capacity. An important issue
to investigate is what concrete controls and organizational development need to be
implemented by university management. It was also important to examine how much
control university management has, if any, in relation to state governance as a whole.
Consequently, it became important to evaluate which measures on a university level
will generate organizational capabilities of enabling researchers and academic environments to utilize research results and collaborate. Through KMP’s evaluations, it
became clear that it is very much a question of narrowing down a few key elements
in university governance (governance tools). The evaluation came to focus on how
university governance can ensure:
● academic managers’ ability to enable
● the support apparatus’ ability to enable
● the academic staff’s ability to enable
● external support functions’ ability to enable.
In this way, the evaluation focused on what tools are available for developing actors’

44

ability to enable.22 When evaluating opportunities for control at the university level,
it is natural to discuss what university management should do. Inevitably, much of
the focus lies on the vice-chancellor as manager of the public authority. It is primarily
the vice-chancellor who must implement the governance measures that, in turn, will
open the way for other stakeholders to enable the researchers and academic environments to collaborate and promote the utilization of research results. Much of the
KMP programme’s work has focused on analyzing and discussing how to involve
university management in various ways and to establish an assumption of responsibility at the organizational level.
Leadership and governance by objectives (Chapter 5)
Step 2: Evaluation of governance by objectives as a means to enable the integration
of collaboration and utilization in academic environments.
Early on, it became apparent that the KMP programme needs to evaluate how the
university can use governance by objectives as a means to enable.23 In recent years, it
has become increasingly common for universities to develop visions and strategies to
guide their operations, much like companies. In the KMP programme, we evaluated
these as possible tools for managing these public authorities through objectives. Our
evaluation reviewed the use of these tools at a large number of universities. We also
participated actively in management-by-objectives work carried out at the University
of Gothenburg.
The evaluation largely came to focus on how governance by objectives can be developed into a plan rooted in the university’s teaching staff for how best to collaborate
and promote utilization. The ambition was to produce well-grounded supporting
documentation and decision-making data in support of universities’ governance by
objectives.
Leadership and normative control (Chapter 6)
Step 3: Evaluation of the development of norms as a means to enable the integration
of collaboration and utilization in academic environments.
It has been important for the KMP programme to define concretely how university
management can initiate a norm-based development process. It proved to be important to evaluate which concrete measures by university management result in an institutional development that, in turn, enables academic environments to collaborate and
promote the utilization of research results. In concrete terms, this is a question of
evaluating how the university should develop its policies, formal work plan, delegation schedule, instructions, and the like.
Our analysis covered various regulatory instruments and how these can be applied in
change and development processes. We also carried out relatively exhaustive compar22 From a methodological standpoint, we have studied various forms of university governance and also conducted
a comprehensive review of concrete control measures, primarily those applied at the University of Gothenburg.
23 We have reviewed the use of governance by objectives at all Swedish universities and also at some Nordic and
European universities.

45

isons of how equivalent management is handled at other universities. One normative
ambition was to contribute to a process that encourages a reasonable distribution of
responsibility for promoting utilization between academic managers, research and
innovation offices, and other parts of the administration. It was equally important to
contribute to a process that paves the way for developing a system and procedures
for managing research results as knowledge assets. Our ambition became to develop
a number of principles for determining how this management should take place within the framework of universities’ activities. We also considered it important to implement the norms and principles developed for European universities as part of
European cooperation to the extent possible.24
Education as an enabler (Chapter 7)
Step 4: Evaluation of what kinds of education, learning, and dialogue are needed to
enable academic environments to collaborate and promote utilization and how these
should be organized.
When working in a programme striving to conduct evaluations and carry on a critical
dialogue as a basis for university development, the fact that this type of development
is a long-term process cannot be ignored. It is a relatively complex undertaking.
Given the elevated expectations placed on universities in this respect, it is not easy to
go from being an academic to managing a university, department, or academic environment. Not least of all, from a purely operational standpoint, significant skill in
navigating the bureaucracy and an in-depth understanding of the norms that govern
the operations of a public authority are needed.
We quickly came to realize the importance of access to long-term learning, dialogue,
and education. As such, we have continuously evaluated and tested different forms of
education and dialogue. The KMP programme has organized seminar series, workshops, and similar activities. We have also participated actively in managerial training
programmes and other courses. In time, we concluded that it was important to evaluate the potential for and contribute to an academic education structure, an “innovation academy”, where we could provide scientifically-based education about and
critically discuss our responsibility to collaborate and promote utilization.
1.7.4 The practical management of research results – Part 3
The third part of the KMP programme focuses on how research results and other
knowledge assets can and should be managed from an operational standpoint. How
can/should the university manage programmes and projects from a purely operational
perspective in relation to external actors? In light of our knowledge of state governance, we realized that there is a major need to evaluate how programme- and project-based management should be handled at the university level. When concentrating
on this form of governance for academic environments, it becomes obvious that it is
not always possible to distinguish research projects, collaboration projects, and utilization projects from one another. The overarching question is how research results

24 See, in particular, Commission Recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge
transfer activities and Code of Practice for universities and other public research organisations. 10.4.2008. C (2008)
1329.

46

should be handled in internal and external relationships from a purely practical
standpoint.
The recurring theme of this third part is how the university as an organization can
develop its capabilities for managing research results as public resources. The KMP
programme’s work made it obvious that a system and procedures for the operational
management of programmes and projects must be based on insights on what is needed in the academic environments. As such, the KMP programme can be described as
an “experimental workshop” in which we have evaluated knowledge assets and how
they are managed in different relationships so as to produce models, processes, and
procedures. It became obvious that the Innovation Office is critically important in
this context. Moreover, at the University of Gothenburg we were fortunate enough to
have the Research and Innovation office as a joint unit. Much of the KMP programme’s work came to focus on how an innovation office can and should develop
to enable researchers and academic environments to collaborate and utilize research
results. What concrete support activities does a research and innovation office need
to provide? By adopting this focus, we were able to design a proposal detailing a recommended system and procedures for programme- and project-based management.
5Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for
the operational management of research results in research,
collaboration, and utilization.

4 Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for
operational management, considerations, and decisions about how
research results are to be utilized and managed in collaboration.

3 Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for
How should the concrete
research result be identiﬁed,
managed cooperatively and
included operatively in diﬀerent
utilization processes?

positioning research groups/researchers and portfolios of
knowledge assets in international research and innovation arenas.

2 Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for
identifying, analyzing, and claiming knowledge assets and
intellectual property assets.

1 Evaluation of which key processes and operational capabilities are
required to enable academic environments to promote utilization
and manage research results in collaboration.

Figure 8. The third part of the KMP programme
Support system consisting of procedures, processes, models, and support functions
(Chapter 8)
Step 1: Evaluation of which key processes and operational capabilities are required to
enable academic environments to promote utilization and manage research results in
collaboration.
Much of the KMP programme’s evaluation work has focused on what support measures are needed to help individual researchers and academic environments conduct
activities independently. A key element is to produce models, instructions, and other
tools for researchers to use. It is important to evaluate how the Grant’s and
Innovation Office and other actors need to participate actively in collaboration and
utilization processes.
The evaluation work largely focuses on different processes related to identifying,
evaluating, and managing knowledge assets.

47

An important element is analyzing how to use bibliometric research information,
patent information, and other innovation information to develop good supporting
data for promoting utilization and collaborate. We were particularly interested in
how the Grants and Innovation Office can use various information sources in its
work to support academic environments. It was also interesting to evaluate what
academics and managers themselves can use. What types of decision-making data do
individual researchers need and what do managers need when weighing different considerations concerning knowledge development projects? To analyze and develop the
use of patent and innovation information by public knowledge-based organizations,
a development project was initiated in cooperation with the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office (PRV) and Gothenburg University Library. This collaboration
focused on how innovation offices can assume a leading role in developing various
forms of decision-making data for use by academic environments and individual
researchers.
Identifying and analyzing which research results can and should be managed
(Chapter 9)
Step 2: Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for identifying,
analyzing, and claiming knowledge assets and intellectual property assets.
As noted previously, the ability to identify and analyze research results as knowledge
assets lies at the heart of the KMP programme. It is largely this ability that lays the
foundation for developing what we have chosen to describe as idea- and knowledgebased collaboration. In principle, this entails identifying research results that are
believed to create value. These research results are managed as objects that can be
controlled and transferred to other parties.
Consequently, one of the KMP programme’s key questions came to be how the
Innovation Office can develop support for identifying and analyzing research results
that should be managed cooperatively and whose utilization should be promoted in
different ways. It is important to evaluate when and how academic environments
must/should identify and analyze knowledge assets. In Sweden there is no invention
disclosure system in which researchers are obliged to report research results that have
utilization potential. Hence, the KMP’s point of departure is that a support system
for identifying and analyzing knowledge assets will lay the foundation for an institutional model for collaboration and utilization that suits the Swedish situation. Much
work has been done to experimentally test various models, processes, procedures,
and the like.
Academic environments with positions in international research
and innovation arenas (Chapter 10)
Step 3: Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for positioning
research groups/researchers and portfolios of knowledge assets in international
research and innovation arenas.
One related support system worth consideration is how the Innovation Office can
help research groups to evaluate their positions in national and international research
and collaboration arenas. Certain environments have much greater needs than others.
This is sometimes due to their having a special role as coordinators of large research

48

collaborations. Individual researchers may also wish to assume major responsibility
in relation to the surrounding society. Accordingly, some groups have significant
interest in and need to follow international developments in research and collaboration. The KMP programme worked relatively hard on evaluating bibliometric tools
and the like that can be used to produce good supporting documentation for academic environments when they analyze what is happening in their field externally. Our
collaboration with Gothenburg University Library and the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office focused primarily on this support system.
Considerations and decisions about managing research results (Chapter 11)
Step 4: Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for operational
management, considerations, and decisions about how research results are to be
utilized and managed in collaborations.
One evaluation viewed in the programme as very important was which decisions
about collaboration and promoting utilization need to be managed. Examining the
academic environments enabled us to begin categorizing different types of necessary
decisions. We were particularly interested in identifying what issues need to be considered and what decisions need to be made about the concrete management of
research results in various utilization activities. It was crucial for the KMP programme to produce models for the Innovation Office that could be used to support
the academic environments. In time, we realized that support is also needed regarding
the governance within the university as a public authority, such as with conflicts of
interest, open access to public documents, and the use of public resources. Of course,
an important question here is whether or not it is reasonable to expect an innovation
office to provide this support. In any event, it is reasonable that it should have the
ability to explain to researchers that there are considerations and decisions that need
to be addressed.
Managing portfolios of research results and contractual collaborations (Chapter 12)
Step 5: Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for the operational
management of research results in research, collaboration, and utilization.
The KMP programme’s final evaluation focused on how knowledge assets are actually managed/governed in the organization. Much of this evaluation came to focus on
the university’s role as a contracting party. The concrete management of research
results is very strongly aligned with contract management. Moreover, some academic
environments may need to manage a relatively large number of contractual relationships. The challenge for the KMP programme is to evaluate how we can manage
portfolios of knowledge assets in multiple interfaces from an operational standpoint.
This involves evaluating procedures for managing both research collaboration
processes and utilization processes. What responsibility should be given to academic
environments and what should be handled by innovation offices and other key
actors? All in all, this involves evaluating how a support system should be designed.

49

50

Expectations
and preconditions

51

2. Governmental governance
of universities
2.1 The universities’ responsibility for promoting utilization
and collaboration
Evaluation of the state’s governance of universities to clarify expectations, obligations, preconditions and opportunities for collaborating and promoting utilization
The Higher Education Act states that universities have a responsibility to collaborate
with the surrounding society and to promote the utilization of research results. Most
Swedish universities are national universities, i.e. they are created and governed by
the Swedish government. A key hypothesis of the KMP programme is that, if universities are to integrate and take organizational responsibility for their commission to
collaborate, they must have an institutional model within the framework of how the
state governs universities. Thus, an important element of the KMP programme was
to evaluate the governmental governance of universities to clarify expectations, obligations and preconditions for collaborating and promoting utilization.25
This evaluation resulted in a model for how governance can be understood and managed at university level. The intent is for this to form a basis for continued evaluation
of the best way to develop the universities’ ability to utilize and manage knowledge
assets.

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

What collaboration and utilizationrelated requirements and terms are
imposed in relation to public research
and innovation programmes?

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

What is the principal’s
(the goverment’s) vision
and objectives regarding the
university’s task of collaborating
and promoting utilization?

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What resources are set aside by
the goverment for the university
and to what extent are these
dependent on results (impact)?

What legal preconditions
exist for the university to
be able to collaborate and
promote utilization?

Figure 9. Evaluation of state governance of universities
25 The evaluation in this chapter is based on the analysis presented in Lidhard & Petrusson ESO 2012:8, Forskning
och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation: Research and
Innovation: State Governance of Universities’ Collaboration and Utilization] and in the background report of the
same name.

52

2.1.1 The government’s expectations of universities to collaborate and
promote utilization
The expectation that universities will collaborate with the surrounding community
has existed for many decades. The year 2008, when the KMP programme was introduced, must be viewed as something of a milestone in the context. Not solely because
the responsibility of universities according to Chapter 1, section 2 of the Higher
Education Act was clarified, but above all because it was the first time the government issued targeted state funding specifically to support collaboration and utilization of research results. One might even wonder if the reason the government decided
to place an innovation office at a few selected universities, without any form of investigation beforehand, was so that it would be natural to grant funds to the commission to collaborate. The 2008 research and innovation bill can be viewed as the starting gun for a development in which universities would take on an integrated responsibility for the commission to collaborate and utilization of research results. The
innovation offices were to be the engine of this development.
In the past decades, the question of what model Swedish universities should employ
for utilizing research results has been extensively discussed and evaluated.26 The
focus has primarily been on whether there is a reason to abandon the professor’s
privilege (teacher’s exemption) in favour of developing a model in which a university
has the right, and possibly also the obligation, to take over research results.27 The
question of whether or not to develop a new model has mainly been discussed in
terms of legislation and regulation, i.e., do we need changes to the legislation on
employers’ rights to employees’ invention (Lag 1949:345 om rätten till arbetstagares
uppfinningar).
As discussed above, the KMP programme has focused on opportunities to develop an
institutional model for idea- and knowledge-based utilization, based on organizational responsibility for and management of knowledge assets at university level. As additionally stated, one overall hypothesis for the entire KMP programme is that universities need to develop institutionally to be able to utilize and collaborate as an integral
part of their activities. The assumption, which was confirmed during the work with
the KMP programme, is that it will require a relatively extensive change of norm
systems, structures and organization. In fact, the more the KMP programme has
evolved, the clearer it has become that institutional development is the core issue in
this context. Integrating the “collaboration and utilization” element in academic
activities is quite simply a matter of institutional development.

26 See SOU 1996:70 Samverkan mellan högskolan och näringslivet [Enquiry into Interaction between Universities
and Business]; Prop. 1996/97:5 Forskning och samhälle [Research and Society]; Prop. 1998/99:94 Vissa forskningsfrågor [Certain Research Questions]; SOU 1998:128 Forskningspolitik [Research Policy]; Prop. 2001/01:3 Forskning och
förnyelse [Bill on Research and Renewal]; Prop. 2004/05:80 Forskning för ett bättre liv [Bill on Research for a Better
Life]; and most recently SOU 2005:95 Nyttiggörande av högskoleuppfinningar [Enquiry into Utilization of University
Innovations].
27 The academic exception is an exception from the employer’s right to innovations created by an employee, as
set out in the Swedish Act Lagen (1949:345) om rätten till arbetstagares uppfinningar.

53

Based on what was said in the 2008 research and innovation bill, it was natural to
focus specifically on the role of the innovation office in a university organization.
What responsibilities do the new innovation offices have? What kinds of priorities
can and should be developed for reporting, evaluating and managing research results
and other knowledge assets? What forms of utilization can and should be stimulated
and managed by the university as an organization? What kind of management methods should be applied and stimulated in academic environments?
2.1.2 Norms, systems of conduct and organizational capabilities
In the KMP programme we have chosen to see these issues as examples of what
determines a university’s organizational capability for collaboration. One overall
question for the evaluation is thus how organizational capability can be developed
within universities. It is interesting to consider the importance of norm development
in stimulating various systems of conduct, particularly for managing knowledge
assets, as a way of enabling organizational capability. A university’s organizational
capability naturally includes its researchers’ ability to take responsibility, at least in
their public capacity as public employees. An important assumption from the KMP
perspective is that norm development for how a university employee can, should and
must manage knowledge assets is really fundamental to the organizational capability
of collaborating. In the preliminary work for the KMP programme, it was found that
norm development, which is at the core of a university’s institutional development,
exists on at least four structural levels:
Level 1: Overall ideology/norms for academic activities
Level 2: The state’s governance and legal regulation of academic activities
Level 3: The university’s vision, strategy, policies, organization, decisions and
otherwise predetermined norm systems for how its activities are carried out
Level 4: Contract terms, management methods and other norm systems developed between stakeholders for the university’s activities
The report presented in this book is based on level three and the development of a
suitable organization alongside the well-balanced norm and governance systems at
university level. Since the focus is on the organizational capability of universities, it is
also important that the development work occurring at this level be in harmony with
norm development at the other levels. The influence of norm development at all levels determines the systems of conduct that in reality make up organizational capability. The university has only a limited normative space in which to develop its model.
If the institutional model deviates too significantly from the dominant ideology in
academia, academic staff will quickly challenge this. In this context, the development
of recent decades within the field of collaboration has certainly affected the universities’ views on knowledge. Simply using the concept of innovation has ideological
implications. Regardless of what universities want, their operations are influenced by
the “commodification” and “privatization” of knowledge processes that characterize
the knowledge economy. University activities are also influenced by the ideology that
defines the knowledge processes in areas such as open source code and creative commons. Within the KMP programme there is a broad awareness of the importance of

54

long-term academic criticism and dialogue on how universities design their collaborations. This dialogue is important not only for views on knowledge, but also for governance and management.28
Most Swedish universities are government authorities. The governance of the national government and other ruling bodies affects the universities’ organizational capability. The recent years’ autonomy reforms require a greater ability for the university
administration to act and govern. As stated above, the government sets aside significant resources for research and appears to expect that universities, as autonomous
actors, will carefully manage these investments. At the same time, it is not clear how
autonomous the universities really are. There is a built-in tension between a facultybased governance, administration-oriented governance and the more Board of
Directors and vice chancellor-based autonomous governance.
One assumption of the KMP programme is that integrating the commission collaborate and promote utilization into a university’s operations will most clearly show if
and where management and governance capability exists. Will universities be able to
take on clearer social responsibility as organizations? A characteristic of the collaboration field in recent decades is the structural transformation process, which, at least
in rhetorical terms, affords significant freedom to private interests for commercializing products. At the same time, state governance within the field of collaboration is
undeveloped and unclear. University administrations, administrative managers and
even staff seem to be at a loss as to how to integrate the commission to collaborate
and develop a more “general” type of responsibility.
This integration is so challenging because of the development occurring at the fourth
level defined above. To the degree that there is an organizational ability to collaborate, it largely results from the concrete norm development occurring in the interactive relationships of the researchers and their academic environments. It was obvious
when developing the KMP programme that certain individuals in particular, but also
some academic environments, had managed to develop a relatively strong ability to
collaborate and in various ways promote the utilization of research results. At the
same time, norm development at this level is typically largely defined by external
interests and a rhetorical desire to safeguard individual and commercial interests.
Often, researchers have developed their collaborative abilities through interaction
with external players. Many players seem to see their mission as contributing to solutions for how to create innovations and develop business from publicly funded
research. One of the most important tasks of the KMP programme has been trying to
understand current and future norm development within academic environments for
collaboration based on pursuing of social benefit.
2.1.3 State governance of universities
The presentation in this chapter is based on a relatively extensive analysis of governmental governance at the second level, which was made in a background report for
28 Much of the criticism of “new public management” comes to the fore when discussing the universities’ collaborative work.

55

the Expert Group on Public Economics.29 The analysis focused on how the government governs and enables universities to promote utilization of research results. In
our analysis, we divided governance into four aspects:
● governance by objectives
● rule-based governance
● programme- and project-based governance
● resource- and result-based governance
The basic assumption of the analysis was that if funding is employed under governmental control, then it requires various forms of governance. It is reasonable to
expect that the more funds that are granted, the more carefully defined and consciously applied this governance will be. Significant resources are dedicated to public
research.

How the government manages its administration – from “government”
to “governance”?
The state administration is in charge of implementing government policy. The government is assumed to have the overall responsibility for governance; however, in the
Swedish tradition the government does not intervene directly in the operations of the
administrative authorities. Our analysis of state governance was based on the fact
that this governance has changed significantly in recent decades.30 Over the years we
have seen a form of governance that focuses on results rather than resources used.31
The tendency is to place greater importance on horizontal approaches in administrative policy instead of traditional vertical approaches.32 These approaches can be summarized in the concept of governance33 as opposed to government. Increasingly, the
focus is on contractual relationships and partnerships.34 This development has
increasingly come to be called New Public Management.35
Our analysis found that the governance of universities is one of the most illustrative
29 See Lidhard & Petrusson ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och
nyttiggörande and the background report of the same title.
30 All of these changes are largely based in an increasing distrust of centrally governed policy in all Western countries. The latest development in the field of state governance is described in the official government reports SOU
2007:75 and SOU 2008:118.
31 Cf. Sjöblom, S. (2011), p. 9. Publications from the project Förvaltningslösningars språkliga konsekvenser (Språkon)
Utvärderingsprogrammet Arttu: undersökningar nr. 13 [translation: Linguistic Consequences of Solutions in the
Public Sector]. Evaluation Programme ARTTU: Investigations, no. 13.
32 The more horizontal approach can be seen as an expression of a view of the state as a player on a global arena
aiming to enable competitiveness. Petrusson, U. (1999), p. 229 ff.
33 The concept of governance is not clearly defined, but is used in a relatively wide sense. See SOU 2007: 75, p. 47
ff., And SOU 2008: 119, p. 42. For an example of how the term is used in the American discussion, see Hult, K. and
Walcott, C. (1989), p. 42 ff.
34 See background reports to the 2006 Management Committee (SOU 2008: 119), Section 5 Differential control by
Tarschys, D., p. 40 ff. For applications in public research, see also Skelcher, C. and Mathur, N. (2004), p. 11.
35 New Public Management is in no way a uniform concept with a specific content. It is considered able to
embrace certain general characteristics. In its broadest sense, it is thought to be “both a product and a response to
the increasingly complex, plural and fragmented nature of public policy implementation and service delivery in the
twenty-first century”. See Osborne, S. (2010), p. 9.

56

examples of the type of governance applied in New Public Management.36 There is a
clear shift of focus from administrative management systems to systems that measure
output and outcomes. In this context, the central issue is the development of contract-based governance and a more market-like attitude towards governance. This is
particularly true for innovation, where the boundaries between the public and private
governance logic are increasingly fuzzy.37
According to this new governance logic, the government takes on the role of enabler
rather than planner or regulator.38 In the international discussion on how New
Public Management can enhance the effectiveness of public research, it becomes
important to ensure that state governance allows for greater autonomy for universities.39 Following this line of thinking, governmental governance is increasingly about
how to lay the foundations for universities as organizations to develop their responsibility.
Governing universities as organizations
An important question in the analysis of state governance is its impact on and interaction with academic freedom. We have already determined that there has long been
a political desire to give universities a high degree of freedom in their activities, not
solely in terms of conducting research.40 There is a marked awareness of the importance of autonomy for national authorities in general, and that some authorities have
a greater need than others. The reasons for this vary. In the case of universities, the
need for autonomy is linked to the need for freedom, which is thought to be the best
way to promote the university’s activities.41 The government has clearly stated that
an excessively instrumental view of universities can threaten academic independence
and freedom. At the same time, the government is well aware of the importance of
balancing this need against the legitimate need of the national government to exert
influence on those activities.42
A general conclusion was that expectations are high for universities to develop their
own organizational capability and autonomy. At the same time, our analysis found a
scepticism in organizational research as to what can be achieved with the organization itself. Organizational autonomy and identity are perceived as difficult to achieve
within fields such as universities.43 One explanation for this is that universities are
36 Cf. Sjöblom, S. (2011), p.51 ff.
37 For a discussion on what characterizes the broad field of New Public Management, see SOU 2007:75, p. 93.
38 In an analysis of how state governance has developed, the following stages of development were identified: the
regulating state, the negotiating state, the planning state and the enabling state. Sjöblom, S. (2011),
p. 20.
39 Schubert, T. (2009), p. 1226.
40 See for example Prop. 1992/93:1 and Prop.2009/10:149. See also SOU 2008:104.
41 SOU 2007:75, p. 53.
42 Prop. 2006/07:43, p. 7. Also cf. Prop. 2009/10:149.
43 Brunsson and Sahlin-Andersson state:“Construction organizations involve the setting up or changing of entities
in such a way that they come to resemble the general and abstract concept of the organization. We will argue that
traditional public services in many countries have lacked some of the key aspects of organizations. They can be
described, at the most, as conspicuously “incomplete” organizations”. Brunsson, N. and Sahlin-Andersson, K. (2000), p.
722.

57

profession-driven organizations.44 This type of organization is characterized by
researchers and teachers bearing the primary responsibility for activities. At the same
time, the organization’s governance exerts significant hierarchical control over operations.45 When discussing academic freedom, we found it important to distinguish
between the need of universities to have freedom to act vis-à-vis the state, and the
need of researchers to have freedom to act vis-à-vis universities. It is self-evident that
these two needs for freedom are not necessarily fully compatible. Individual freedom
and responsibility may very well be at odds with responsibility at an organizational
level and limit the scope of organizational autonomy. At the same time, it is a wellestablished insight that university activities have become less individually based over
the years and more dependent on research teams and research environments.46 In this
development, the goal of governance is to measure outcomes and clarify responsibility, but it also increases the normative pressure on organizational line responsibility
and leadership at universities.47

2.2 Governance by objectives
In our analysis of state governance, we carried out a relatively extensive historical
analysis of the objectives set for universities’ collaboration in the fields of research
and economic policy.48 The overall question analyzed was what the state expects the

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

• What overall political objectives have
been established by the goverment?
• What operational targets regarding
utilization does the goverment expect?
• What targets are established by the
goverment regarding the university’s
utilization capabilities?

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

What is the principal’s (the goverment’s)
will regarding the university’s task of
collaborating and promoting utilization?

Figure 10. Evaluation of state objectives for universities
44 SOU 2007:75, p. 51.
45 Brunsson, N. and Sahlin-Andersson, K. (2000), p. 726.
46 Ibid, p. 725.
47 Schubert, T. (2009), p. 1233.
48 See appendix 1 in the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av
högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande.

58

universities to achieve through collaborating and promoting utilization. In general,
the state’s governance-by-objectives approach implies great expectations from the
universities, which are expressed in general terms.
2.2.1 Objectives-means analysis
In the analysis of government performance governance, we tried to acquire an understanding of objective-means.49 What ends (objective) are the means for other ends
(objectives)? Our governance model analyses the universities’ objectives at three levels. In doing so, it becomes clear that an objective at a lower level are a means for
achieving an objective at a higher level. In the KMP programme we have used this
categorization at university level as well.
2.2.2 Overall political objectives
In evaluating the state’s governance-by-objectives approach, we aimed to paint a picture of what may be viewed as the highest level of objectives – the ultimate goal of
the university’s utilization. We aimed to gain a greater understanding of the political
perspective today by charting the development of objectives over time.50 To gain an
overview, we analyzed the extensive material based on the following categories of
objectives:
Sociopolitical objectives – such as a sustainable and just society, preserving and
improving welfare, increasing employment, promoting regional development, nondiscrimination, better healthcare and social services51
Socioeconomic objectives – such as growth and growing the GDP, increasing public
revenues, boosting societal productivity, and preserving and enhancing Sweden’s
global competitiveness52
Economic policy objectives – such as technological renewal, competitiveness, increasing the rate of development, streamlining industrial production, stimulating growth
in small to medium-sized companies53

49 Analyzing the interaction between objectives and means is a relatively common practice in legal policy and legislative theory. For example, Jan Hellner uses the designations primary objectives and ultimate objectives in
demonstrating how primary objectives comprise the means for achieving ultimate objectives. See Hellner, J. (1990),
p. 167 ff.
50 See appendix 1 in the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation: Research and Innovation: State Governance of Universities’
Collaboration and Utilization], p.79.
51 Background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och
nyttiggörande , p.79.
52 Ibid, p.81.
53 Background report to ESO 2012:8 background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning
av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation: Research and Innovation: State Governance of
Universities’ Collaboration and Utilization], p. 83.

59

These categories are not exhaustive and they overlap to some degree. At the same
time, only after a relatively extensive analysis of mainly research-related bills was it
possible to identify these particular categories. The analysis of the bills indicated that
they often focused on socioeconomic objectives. There is no significant difference
over time between different governments. Bills related to research policy are generally
about:
● boosting competitiveness in the private sector
● contributing to development and renewal, primarily in the private sector
● increasing economic growth
Bills relating to economic policy generally emphasize:
● promoting the development of technological expertise
● creating conditions for economic growth
From an academic perspective, it is not necessarily a given to accept objectives such
as boosting economic growth, enhancing competitiveness in the business sector or
contributing to the development and renewal of the private sector.
When it comes to sociopolitical objectives, the Higher Education Act has a special
regulation in chapter 1, section 5. Through their activities, universities should promote sustainable development to assure a healthy and good environment, economic
and social welfare and justice for current and future generations. Gender equality
should always be observed and promoted in the universities’ activities. They should
also promote an understanding of other countries and international relationships. In
addition, universities should actively promote and expand recruitment to higher
education.
Above all, it is natural that the more comprehensive objectives are, the less of a normative effect they are likely to have. This is particularly the case when goal formulation at this level becomes bogged down in excessively rhetorical approach, primarily
defining the objectives in general terms, such as increased economic growth or
enhanced competitiveness. But this does not have to be the case. For universities in
particular, it is important to highlight general normative values. We must be aware
of this when discussing freedom in relation to governance. Academic activities have
always, and hopefully will always, in part been governed by the intent to achieve
values that are vital to society, such as non-discrimination, justice and sustainability.
To a large degree, utilization is about trying to contribute to the achievement of such
general values.
2.2.3 Utilization objectives/operational targets
A typical characteristic of political objectives is that they are usually hard to pin
down.54 It is not obvious to the individual researcher what is expected of him or her.
Nor does the government specify its expectations in detail. When aiming to meet
54 For more information about “utilization objectives”, see the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och
innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande, p. 84-88, and appendix 1 of the same
document.

60

objectives, it is easy to take a quantitative approach to governance – counting the
number of businesses, new hires, licenses or existing contracts. In the government’s
most recent research bills in particular, these seem to be typical operational targets.
One clear example of this is when the government decided to establish Innovation
Offices at some universities, as well as the “results” they are expected to report in the
universities’ annual reports.55
Based on the governance analysis carried out in the KMP programme, there is a clear
need for universities to clarify that utilization is not about commercial success; it is
about taking on challenges that are critical to society and meeting society’s demands
for research results.
One might also wonder if it should not be made clearer that the universities’ collaboration and utilization should occur on an academic basis, i.e. a values-based, critical
approach. This would make it clear that one of the university’s key objectives is to
remain as free and independent as possible. If the objectives are precise enough in this
respect, many unnecessary discussions can likely be avoided. One example of this is
whether employees have the right to placing something created largely through joint
resources into their own privately owned company and whether they can view it as a
fringe benefit. It is increasingly obvious that this is not necessarily the path to independence and freedom for universities, nor is it necessarily the right path to promoting sustainable development, economic and social welfare and justice. This does not
mean that creating new companies should not be an important goal in relation to the
overall ambition, nor that individual researchers should not have a right to compensation and incentive, such as joint ownership in a new company.
2.2.4 Objectives for utilization capability
With the state’s governance-by-objectives approach, the vital challenge at university
level is to develop the university organization to collaborate and promote utilization
as an integral part of the organization’s capability to educate and carry out
research.56 Certain organizational targets were established with the advent of holding
companies and later the Innovation Offices. However, there is still no clear understanding of what the state expects. The resources that were actually earmarked for
the holding companies’ and Innovation Offices’ activities cannot possibly be propor55 Appropriation directives for the 2014 budget year regarding grant 2:64, Särskilda utgifter inom universitet och
högskolor [Specific Expenses at Universities], p.11:“Each seat of higher learning that has an Innovation Office must
report in its 2014 annual report strategies and objectives for the operations and any possible synergies achieved in
collaboration with other Innovation Offices. The annual report should also indicate how the resources allocated to
a given university for the Innovation Office were utilized for the Innovation Office’s operations. In addition, the following must also be reported:
● number of ideas that have come in for evaluation or advising from researchers or students, and how an idea is
defined and delimited;
● number of ideas that have been passed along to the holding company linked to the university; and
● number of ideas that were not taken to the next level.”
56 For more information about “utilization capability objectives”, see the background report to ESO 2012:8,
Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande, p. 88-91, and appendix 1
of the same document.

61

tionate to the overall political expectations and objectives regarding the universities’
ability to contribute to community development. At a handful of universities, including Gothenburg University, resources were also targeted to developing an organizational capability to manage higher-education projects regarding entrepreneurship.
In all, the objectives for levels two and three are fragmentary and unclear. This relationship is particularly obvious for how expectations at one level interact with those
at the other levels.
2.2.5 Means–ends determination at university level
One key conclusion in the KMP programme is that universities need to develop their
own understanding of means and ends at the local level. The overall objectives are
diffuse and must be converted into concrete management of the administration,
which the Governance Enquiry (Styrutredningen) expresses as:57
“The political objectives have often been translated into targets at various levels with no clear causal relationships between them. There is no obvious connection between the overall objectives and the ends and
means at lower levels. The political discussion is often not about overall objectives, but about ends and
means much further down in the chain. The authorities do not always possess alternative means that can be
used to achieve an overall objective. The existence of any individual authority is linked to missions that are
often tied to the means selected at the political level… For these reasons among others, we are extremely
doubtful that outcome-oriented and more overall objectives are a good way of transforming political ambitions into management of the administration.”

To improve governance by objectives, this investigation recommends breaking objectives down into targets at different levels and demonstrating causal relationships
between them. The achievement of a target at one level is a step towards achieving an
overall objective. Targets at a given level can thus become the means of achieving one
or more ends at a higher level. The lessons learned in the KMP programme demonstrate the great need for this type of process at Swedish universities.
Our experience in the KMP programme is that there is a need for continuous dialogue about the overall objectives for the operations and how they interact with academic values and so on. One concrete example is the dialogue on how the universities, in their collaboration with the community, can live up to the requirements set
out in chapter 1, section 5 to promote sustainable development to assure a healthy
and good environment, economic and social welfare and justice for current and
future generations. The dialogue in the KMP programme shows the importance of
having such discussions at all levels of the universities. This is one of the reasons that
an academically-based educational platform – an “Innovation Academy” – is so
important.
Above all, the KMP programme points to the need to develop more concrete development of objectives, focusing on the interaction between utilization objectives and
objectives for organizational capability. There is much to indicate that this is a fundamental process in the development of the universities’ commitment to collaborate.
This issue is further dealt with in chapter 5.
57 SOU 2007:75, p. 14. (our translation)

62

2.3 Rule-based governance
There is a rule that requires universities to collaborate and promote utilization.58
However, the import of this rule can only be evaluated based on other rules – those
of public and civil law – that affect the universities’ opportunity and conditions to
utilize research results. This rule-based governance consists of the impact that all
rules have on universities – not only those specifically formulated for universities, but
also those that take no particular consideration of the specific situation of universities. Naturally, most rules are of the latter kind.
2.3.1 Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance
In analysing the state’s rule-based governance of universities’ collaboration, we placed
particular emphasis on the interaction between the national government’s formulation
of regulations and the institutional enabling of universities to act as collaborative and
utilizing actors. The focus is on the universities’ prospects of developing complete academic environments.59
In evaluating legislative enabling, we placed great emphasis on clarifying what issues
we need to analyse in more detail. Eventually we arrived at four general issues. The

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What legal preconditions determine
the university’s ability to collaborate
and promote utilization?
• What is the legal precondition for the
university to be an actor for
collaboration and utilization?
• What is the legal precondition for the
university to manage intellectual assets?
• What is the legal precondition for the
university to manage utilization and
collaboration processes in house?
• What is the legal precondition for the
university to enable its employees to
utilize in both public and private
capacities?

Figure 11. Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance

58 For a more extensive analysis of rule-based governance, see the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning
och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande [translation: Research and
Innovation: State Governance of Universities’ Collaboration and Utilization], pp. 103-163.
59 Cf. chapter 1 and its description of how GU, in Vision 2020, highlighted the importance of complete academic
environments as an important means for achieving strategic objectives.

63

very realization that these four issues were the most important made it much easier to
manage the relatively extensive, complex rule-based governance that universities must
deal with. This not only enables a relatively comprehensive analysis of this rule-based
governance; it also highlights the crucial importance of creating an institutional foundation for utilization.
2.3.2 Responsibilities and necessary conditions for universities to act as collaborative
and utilizing actors
The commitment to promote utilization and to collaborate as integral parts of the
universities’ activities led to an expectation that the universities must be able to act
independently in handling research results. Public universities are, as we have said,
state administrative authorities, as defined in the Instrument of Government (RF),
chapter 1, section 8.60 The state administrative authorities answer to the government
(RF chapter 12, section 1). Administrative authorities exercise public authority, but
they also carry out other activities. There is no clear constitutional definition of
“exercising public authority”. One commonly accepted definition is “decisions or
other measures that are ultimately an expression of society’s authority in relation to
its citizens”.61 The defining characteristic is whether an individual is in a position of
dependence towards the authority. Universities exercise their public authority to some
degree. When they do, it is usually in the form of accepting students for study and
issuing grades and degree certificates.
Administrative authorities are not independent legal entities. Like many other authorities, state universities are a part of the legal entity “the state” and thus have no independent legal entity. This means that they cannot have rights or responsibilities of
their own apart from their status as a representative of the state. Instead, they are
given missions in the form of authority under the law, regulation, appropriation
directives and possibly other directives from the parlament and government. Nor can
they enter into binding agreements under civil law with other Swedish state universities or other authorities. Contracts between authorities are more or less simply internal agreements. Any conflicts that arise between Swedish public universities are thus
not dealt with under civil law, but are handled by the universities themselves and
ultimately by the government.
Clear expectations for greater responsibility
Our analysis of rule-based governance found that, given the direction-giving government decisions and the commitment to promote utilization, it is inevitable that universities as organizations will shoulder greater responsibility for utilization. In particular, considering the extent of public funding that is allocated to and invested in universities, it is reasonable that the administrative authority takes some responsibility.
60 SFS 1974:152.
61 Prop. 1971:30 Part 2 p. 331. Cf. also section 3 of the old administrative law (ÄFL 1971:290):“the exercise of
authority to decide on benefits, rights, liabilities, disciplinary punishment or other comparable relationship for an
individual”.

64

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is the legal precondition for
the university to be an actor for
collaboration and utilization?
The possibility/obligation to:
• Act as a legal entity and a party in
a contract?
• Manage govermental funds and
ﬁnancial risks?
• Own companies and invest capital?
• Represent in boards and committees?
• Provide services?
• Use the holding company?
• Transfer resources between universities
and external support structures?

Figure 12. Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance of universities
However, the primary motivation for this is the new situation in which collaboration
and utilization are integrated into research and education – where the focus is no
longer on the individual, strong and independent researcher, but instead on integration in academic environments. In these environments, research teams are able to
collaborate with academic research groups, major industrial companies, small
research-intensive companies and public administration on an international arena.
This means that the responsibility for utilization issues, to some degree at least, is
transferred from external support structures to operations within the university. This
ensures long-term opportunities for the research team to pursue collaborative
research with openness and accessibility.
The question is to what degree the current rule-based governance allows such change.
Because universities are state administrative authorities, certain requirements are in
place under administrative law. At the same time, it is clear that a university is not a
government authority in the traditional sense.
Obligation to and prospects of acting as a legal entity and a party in a contract
There can be no doubt that universities have considerable obligations to act as a contracting party in the arenas of research and education above all, and increasingly also
for other types of collaboration. One key issue for universities as institutions is to
what degree they can enter into contracts as representatives of the state and under
what circumstances these contracts are binding for the state.62 Our analysis indicates
that it is reasonable to assume that public universities are entitled to enter into contracts as representatives of the state and thus incur obligations on the state. It is reasonable to assume that the commitment to collaborate and promote utilization cre62 See page 66

65

ates the potential for universities to bind the state in such contracts. However, it is
not obvious exactly what contractual commitments a university can make in relation
to the state. Nor is it obvious to what degree the state is bound by such contracts. At
what point does a university cross the line in its commitment to promote utilization?63 In addition, when can an external partner be found to be in bad faith? The
uncertainty is in itself unfortunate, and as we see it, it affects the universities’
prospects of promoting utilization. With all this in mind, one important task of the
KMP programme is to further develop contract management procedures.
Obligation to and prospects of managing state funds and financial risks
Without a doubt, collaborating and promoting utilization will incur costs. Thus, universities have some obligation to set aside resources for such activities. One key question to investigate further is the degree to which universities can take on risks and use
their funding to take on financial responsibilities in various contexts.64 Fairly extensive regulations cover this issue.65 For example, Ordinance (1995:1300) sets out the
rules for risk management for national authorities. It states that every authority must
identify risks of loss or damage in its own operations, evaluate the risks and calculate
62 As found in the study Statliga myndigheters avtal, SOU 1994:136 [National Authorities’ Contracts], the Instrument
of Government does not have a specific regulation that gives a government authority the right to incur financial
obligations on the part of the state. Nor does it contain a specific regulation entitling the government to commission a government authority to do so within the framework of the mandates that the Riksdag may have given the
government. However, the motivations for the Instrument of Government do assume that the government will to a
great degree transfer to subordinate authorities the responsibility to pay out funds and otherwise manage state
assets, through statutes and other directives. The government can use such directives to convey further instructions on the use of funds, assuming that this does not conflict with the government’s decision (Prop.1973:90, p.
346). Furthermore, for practical reasons it must be possible for authorities under the government to take on state
financial obligations with the support of directives from the government. The motivation for the Instrument of
Government also emphasizes the importance of giving the government and authorities sufficient freedom to take
on financial obligations, for the sake of efficiency within the administration; see p. 152.
63 Cf. the conclusions in Madell (1998), p. 541–2.
64 The Instrument of Government specifies rules as to what authorization national authorities have to incur financial obligations for the state. The Riksdag decides how state funding is to be used (chapter 1, section 4, second
paragraph). Funds may not be used in any way other than decided by the Riksdag (chapter 9, section 7, first paragraph) in its budgeting. State funds and other assets are at the disposal of the government (chapter 9, section 8).
The government may not take out loans or otherwise incur financial responsibilities on the part of the state without the authorization of the Riksdag (chapter 9, section 8). The government’s authorization to manage state funds
is further regulated in the Budget Act (2011:203). Chapter 11, section 1 states that the government may issue directions as to the implementation of the state budget. These directions are issued in special ordinances. Based on a
particular ordinance, the Swedish National Financial Management Authority (ESV) issues directives and general
advice regarding the ordinances.
65 The Capital Procurement Act (2011:210) is important in this context. This act contains regulations on the utilization of sales revenues and funding of investments. Another important ordinance is the Ordinance on the Transfer
of Moveable Property Belonging to the State (1996:1191), section 2, which applies to authorities under the government. This ordinance contains a specification of the regulations in the Budget Act. For example, miscellaneous movable property (other than shares and participations) may only be sold if the property is no longer needed for state
activities or if it has become unusable (section 6). Sales should follow market prices (section 7). Another important
ordinance is the Fee Regulation Act (1992:191), which states that an authority may only charge fees for goods and
services that it provides if this is provided for in a law or ordinance, or by a special decision by the Riksdag (section
3). If it is compatible with the authority’s legal mandate, instructions or other ordinance, the authority may provide
advice and other similar services at a fee, on condition that this activity is of a temporary nature and a small scale
(section 4). Section 5 indicates that, if no other financial objective has been decided on for these activities, fees shall

66

the costs, real or potential, to the state due to these risks.66 Further, the authority
shall undertake suitable measures to limit these risks and prevent loss or damage.67
One ordinance that is important in a broader operational perspective is the
Ordinance (2007:603) on Internal Governance and Control, which places the university governance in charge of managing operations based on the objectives set and the
risks faced. These are risks from a different perspective — not legal risks that might
incur sanctions; see below.
The conclusion of the KMP programme is that there are relatively good opportunities
to manage state funds for collaboration and utilization; what is lacking is procedures
for how to manage various activities. There is a need for a comprehensive initiative
regarding financial and financial-risk governance. However, the work with the more
operationally oriented risk management at universities for collaboration is particularly important.
Prospects for owning companies and investing capital
There are financial risks associated with starting, investing in and operating a company. When a university teaches entrepreneurship and other activities in which forming
a company is integrated with research and education, it is clear that the university
must take on some form of responsibility. Our analysis of the government’s rulebased governance indicates that universities should not start companies or make
investments.68 Universities cannot start joint companies without authorization even
with the intent of collaboration. The only type of association a university can create
is a non-profit. Naturally, this limits the universities’ autonomy and ability to promote utilization. One consequence might be that universities increasingly find themselves forced to carry out their collaborative and utilization activities within the
framework of the authority itself. These activities may lean towards the commercial
sector, but can still be carried out under the aegis of the university. They may not
have any natural place in the operations of the university’s holding company, e.g.
because the earning potential of the project cannot be verified with sufficient certainty. (More about this below.)

be calculated in such a way that they fully cover expenses. Yet another ordinance of interest here is the
Appropriations Ordinance (2011:223), which states that an authority may, without special authorization, enter into
an agreement involving hiring staff, renting equipment, delivering services and expendable items and so on for a
longer time than their funding is intended, if this is necessary for the authority’s day-to-day operations (section 17).
In addition, the Act (1993:1138) on Management of State Claims and the Ordinance (1998:140) on Gifts and
Donations are also applicable.
66 See section 3 in the Ordinance (1995:1300) on Risk Management for National Authorities.
67 Kammarkollegiet represents authorities in their risk management work; see section 1, first paragraph, and section 7, first paragraph on page 4 of the Act (2007:824) Instructions for Kammarkollegiet. In addition, state universities obtain their liability insurance from Kammarkollegiet.
68 Under the Capital Procurement Act, an authority may not acquire shares or participation rights in a company,
make a capital contribution or in any other way increase the state’s voting or ownership shares in a company without authorization from the government (chapter 2, section 7).

67

Prospects for representation in private boards and committees
One related issue affecting a university’s autonomy and ability to work as a collaborating and utilizing player is to what degree it is permitted for vice-chancellors, deans
and other academics to serve on various boards and committees. Overall, there seems
to be no clear line as to what kind of board memberships are acceptable and not
under the current regulations. However, universities are entitled to describe these
positions to the government and ask for guidance.69
Prospects for providing services
Promoting utilization may very well include participating in projects that are financed
in other ways than through research and education funding. One key issue in this
context is to what degree a university can manage different types of service revenues
and similar income. For example, to what degree can a university accept consulting
fees, royalties and so on in the context of promoting the utilization of research results
in the community? As we see it, this issue also affects the prospects for universities to
act as collaborative and utilizing players.
Under the Capital Procurement Act, an authority is entitled to receive and dispose of
non-state funds if the revenue is of temporary nature or a small scale. However, the
revenues must not impair public confidence in the unbiased nature of the authority.
The authority is not entitled to enter into agreements regarding such funds if this
leads to a greater need for funding from the state budget or that higher fees must be
charged for operations funded by fees.70
Universities have special approval for carrying out commissioned research and contract education.71 As we see it, the interpretation is that the limitation set out in
chapter 6, section 1 of the Capital Procurement Act is not applicable to revenues
from such activities. However, we feel that other types of collaboration and utilization than those specifically stated in the appropriation directives or other specific
directive are less clear in this regard; yet they can still be considered a mission for the

69 Experience shows that the government is not comfortable with responding to questions about representation.
For Gothenburg University it took two years to receive an answer.
70 See chapter 6, section 1 of the Capital Procurement Act. The Swedish National Financial Management Authority
(ESV)’s directions for chapter 6, section 1, first paragraph states that funds that an authority receives from intergovernmental organizations to which Sweden belongs are here considered to be state funds and are thus not covered
by this paragraph. Examples of such organizations are the EU, UN and the Nordic Council of Ministers.
71 The Ordinance on Contract Education at Universities and University Colleges (SFS 2002:760), section 1. For some
time, commissioned research has been viewed as a part of university activities; cf. Prop. 1985/86:11, p. 4 p, the
NYFOR Enquiry (SOU 1996:70), p. 60 and SOU 2008:104, p. 118 pp. Cf. also the appropriation directives. See the
appropriation directives for the 2012 budget year for universities, p. 4, paragraph 6, and Appendix 4 of
Avgiftsfinansierad verksamhet där det anges att för uppdragsutbildning och uppdragsforskning ska högskolan ta
ut full kostnadstäckning [Activities Funded by Fees in which Universities are to Charge Full Expenses for Contract
Education and Commissioned Research].

68

university under the Higher Education Act.72 Universities should be restrictive about
revenues that are neither temporary nor small-scale and request the government
examine the issue.
Obligation to and prospects of utilizing holding companies
Even if a university’s own opportunities for utilization are limited, they can utilize
their holding companies. Since 1994 universities have had the opportunity to start
companies with the approval of the government.73 The purpose is to enhance collaboration between universities and the business community. Currently there are 15
holding companies in Sweden, and two more have been proposed. The holding companies are owned by the state, which since 1998 is represented by the affected universities.
These companies pursue research and development work for commercial utilization
of projects and knowledge developed at universities. They are also committed to
own, sell and manage shares or participation rights in project or service companies.
However, they are not allowed to carry out operations that are fundamental tasks of
a university. The companies are to be operated on commercial principles. The dividend requirements should correspond to those for other companies with similar
focuses. These purposes and terms for the operations are defined by the guidelines
issued by the government in connection with the authorization for each university to
form a holding company. They are also reflected in each individual company’s articles
of association.
Implementing the commitment to promote utilization increases the risk of muddying
the boundaries between the university’s and its holding company’s operations. Prop.
2008/09:5074 states that the government sees a certain need to clarify the operations
and focus of the holding companies. The government feels that holding companies
should primarily contribute to facilitating the formation and commercial development of innovative companies based on the research at the given university. By owning and administering shares in these companies, the holding companies should contribute to the process of commercialization of research results. The holding companies should operate on market terms. It is not obvious what it means to be a player
that is meant to own companies created from universities’ research while at the same
time ensuring that this occurs on market terms.
One important element of the KMP programme is to evaluate and propose how to
achieve greater clarity regarding different roles. It is obvious that the holding compa72 The ESV’s directions indicate that when assessing whether a revenue is small-scale, the collective revenues for
the entire budget year under this paragraph should be compared to the authority’s total administrative costs for
the year. If the revenues exceed 5% of the total administrative costs for a period longer than two years, they are not
considered to be small-scale. For temporary revenues, there is no set limit for how large the revenue can be. The
authority need only investigate the temporary nature of said revenues if they cannot be considered small-scale
under this paragraph. If this is the case, the authority must calculate whether the revenues – minus the portions
that are temporary in nature – are of a small scale.
73 The background for this is described in Prop. 1992/93:170 p. 195–6.
74 See Prop. 1992/93:170 p. 125.

69

nies can have an important role in relation to universities and their utilization. At the
same time, the holding company is independent and its operations cannot be further
integrated into the university’s activities. One interesting question is how far the university can go in its utilization of the holding company. It is not completely clear that
the holding company enhances the autonomy of the university in a development in
which research and utilization processes are increasingly integrated. However, this is
a general problem. The more collaboration and utilization occur with external players, the more this affects the universities’ ability to develop strong academic environments. In our opinion, however, it is through their relationship with the holding companies that universities have the ability to develop a close, integrated relationship.
One key conclusion of the KMP programme is that the universities need to decide
how they feel the holding companies should develop their operations. There are also
strong indications that universities are dependent on the development of the holding
companies as a holding structure – i.e., as the holder of the university’s patents and
other intellectual assets, and as the “owner” of certain types of operations in which
the university’s activities touch on those of society, for example platforms for project
management for entrepreneurship education. This requires a different type of management than has been applied thus far.
Ability to transfer resources between universities and external support structures
One key question is to what degree a university can compel its holding company to
operate in the interests of the university. Should not a holding company be operated
so as to manage values created from public research? For example, to what degree
can universities transfer funds to the holding company, both financial capital and
other resources. Another interesting question is to what degree funds can be transferred from the holding company to the university. Can profits be transferred to the
university if the holding company is successful in its venture?
Capital contributions to a holding company may only be issued by the government.
A university is not considered to have the authority to contribute capital to its holding company, because these are state funds. One result of this has been that donations could not be transferred from the university to a holding company. Because of
this, the government proposed in Prop. 2010/11:1 to authorize the government to
make decisions on capital contributions to holding companies in the 2011–2014 period.75 Such capital contributions are to be funded through donations to the university.
The same bill also took up the possibility of universities to receive profits from holding companies.76 It is urgent, according to the government, that dividends from a
holding company can be transferred to the university that contributed its business
concept and — if the university is not the owner of the holding company — that has
an agreement with the holding company. The government’s assessment was that any
dividends from a holding company should be made available to fund the university’s
research, education and innovation activities. Such dividends are recognized under
75 See Prop. 2010/11:1, p. 67–8.
76 Ibid., p. 68–9.

70

a revenue heading and then distributed to the university in its government budget
appropriation.77
The lack of financial resources in the holding companies is without a doubt a major
problem. It seems reasonable for the holding companies to try to obtain funds from
all possible sources. This risks muddying the waters as to the actual activities of the
holding companies. One key conclusion of the KMP programme is that the universities need to decide how they feel the holding companies should develop their operations. There are also strong indications that universities are dependent on the development of the holding companies as a holding structure — i.e., as the holder of the
university’s patents and other intellectual assets, and as the responsible party for certain types of operations in which the university’s activities touch on those of society,
for example platforms for project management for entrepreneurship education.
However, this requires a different type of management than has been applied thus far.
2.3.3 Obligation to and prospects of managing intellectual assets
The commitment to promote utilization of research results and to collaborate means
that universities must be able to manage intellectual assets. Promoting utilization also
requires various types of control. The rule-based governance under civil law, which is
attendant on intellectual property rights, is in many ways decisive for the utilization
commitment. We chose to conduct a relatively extensive investigation of these

The possibility/obligation to:
• Hold intellectual property rights?
• Manage intellectual assets?
• Utilize intellectual assets?
• Commercialize intellectual assets?

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is the legal precondition for
the university to manage intellectual
assets?

Figure 13. Evaluation of state governance of universities’ management of intellectual assets
77 It is not clear in the wording of prop 2010/11:1 whether it refers to dividends in the narrow sense as defined by
the Companies Act or if it can refer to the transfer of other values from the company to the university. Another
question is how the contract between a university and another university’s holding company might be formulated.
We can note that an agreement with the company regarding the right to dividends is not binding under the
Company’s Act, as the AGM has exclusive rights to decide on dividends.

71

issues.78 The overall question of the KMP programme was not who is entitled to
research results, but rather what responsibilities and opportunities a university has to
manage research results, and therefore also the intellectual property rights to them.
The opportunity and obligation to possess and utilize intellectual property rights
In the Swedish context, there has been a long-upheld exemption to an employer’s
intellectual property rights to research results and other intellectual achievements of
its employees, when it comes to academic environments (professor’s privilege
teacher’s extemption).79 The first consideration we need to discuss is what this
exemption means in concrete terms. The state has been very restrictive in its development of the rules on this point. There are no elements of the legislation that specifically relate to the right to results in a university employment situation, apart from
patent rights. Thus, there are no regulations regarding copyright80, database protection, industrial design rights, plant breeders’ rights, or circuit layout design protection. As regards patent rights, there is only one rule in the employer’s right to inventions created by an employee (Lagen (1949:345) om rätten till arbetstagares
uppfinningar) that states that “teachers at universities, university colleges or other
institutions under the educational system shall not be considered employees under
this law” (section 1, paragraph 2). The interpretation from the legal doctrine and
that many surely consider prevailing is that under the law, teachers at universities and
other institutions of higher learning retain the rights to their inventions and can freely
decide how they are to be used, unless otherwise stated in a formal contract.81
According to that interpretation, universities have no right at all to utilize patentable
inventions that were financed by state funding, not even to meet their commitments
in research collaboration and so on.82 To treat patentable inventions as assets, this
interpretation would require the university to enter into a contract with the
researcher. Still, there are no judicial precedents in this area.
In discussions among legal scholars — the so-called legal doctrine — it has further
been argued that there is a legal custom throughout the field of intellectual property
78 See the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation — statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande, pp. 127-144.
79 See e.g. Karnell, G. (1968), p. 132. Karnell, G. (1972). Strömholm, S. (2002), p. 41, 80 pp.
80 There is no legislation regulating how copyright is dealt with in an employment situation. However, there is a
special rule for copyright to computer software. If it was created by an employee as a part of his or her work, or on
the instruction of the employer, the copyright belongs to the employer; see section 40 a of the Copyright Law. This
applies if nothing else has been agreed on in a contract.
81 The latest in a number of academic works is Wolk, S. (2008), p. 205–6.
82 However, this is an interpretation that does not necessarily follow on the law, the motivation for the law or court
decisions. One could claim that if there is no express legislation giving the employer the right to utilize patentable
innovations, then it is clear that all rights belong to the innovator, i.e. the employee. The legal premise has always
been, as stated above, that innovators have the right to their innovations; see section 1 of the Patents Act. At the
same time, this interpretation would make it difficult to talk about “rules of thumb” in copyright law, and even more
difficult to discuss a professor’s privilege to copyright law regarding software (see below). Instead, it is likely that we
have simply developed a common practice as regards patentable innovations as well. A number of enquiries have
been conducted on the academic exception. They are all based on the discussion in jurisprudence describing the
exception as judicial practice in the university world in which university employees have a personal right to the
results of their state-funded work. See, for example, the UHFOR Enquiry, SOU 2005:95.

72

rights according to which researchers and teachers hold all rights to their results. Of
primary importance in this context is the copyright to research results, which always
comes up in one way or another. There is no real legislation regarding the employer’s
right to an employee’s copyrighted work, apart from computer software. Neither the
law nor the preparatory work to the law contains any exception for teachers at universities. If a computer programme was developed on the instructions of the employer or as a phase of the employee’s work, the university would thus hold the rights to
the software. A reasonable question following on this would be what such a custom
— in which a university, teacher or other player feels that the teacher retains the
rights — implies.83 Once again, one existing view in legal doctrine is that there is an
exception for computer programmes as well.84 One argument that has been promoted up to now is that commercializing academic results is outside the universities’
activities, and thus, the employees should retain the rights.85 The commitment to
promote utilization of research results as set out in the Higher Education Act has
thus changed the basic pillars of this argument.
As regards copyright in general, there is a rule of thumb based on custom that says
that the employer is entitled to utilize the copyright-protected results of an employee’s
work.86 The more precise meaning and limitations to this rule of thumb are not
clearly defined.87 A relatively new public enquiry states that this rule of thumb is not
applicable to teachers and researchers employed by universities with the motivation
that a special industry custom applies.88
The opinion of several legal experts (doctrine) in jurisprudence is that there is a long,
well-established custom in which universities do not have an interest in the copyright

83 Admittedly, contracts break the rule in section 40a of the Copyright Law as regards the rights to computer software; however, we can note that nothing is stated expressly in the regulation about standard practice breaking the
rule, which we do see in other legislation, e.g. in section 3 of the Sales of Goods Act (SFS 1990:931):“The provisions
of this law do not apply if otherwise agreed in a contract, arising from custom developed between the parties or
business custom or other custom that must be considered binding for the parties.”
84 The NYFOR Enquiry, SOU 1996:70, reasons that computer software belongs to the teacher; see p. 212–3. The
argument is that there is an academic exception, although not as strong as that for patentable innovations. In addition, it states that “Innovations and computer software should be treated as equal within universities” and that “the
same regulations should apply to computer software as to innovations”, see p. 214.
85 SOU 1996:70, p. 212–3 and SOU 2005:95, p. 241.
86 In the decision AD 2002 no. 87, the Swedish Labour Court confirms the rule of thumb as a rule of interpretation
that, where no contract or express agreement exists, can be applied to the transfer of copyright and affiliated rights
in employment situations.
87 See SOU 2010:24, p. 144–5 for a description of the doctrine and the sparse judicial custom that exists regarding
this. According to some doctrines, Rosén (2006), p. 293–4, this rule of thumb implies that if no clear regulation exists
stating otherwise, the employer “acquires the copyright” to works that the employee creates under his or her
employment, or that are the result of a specific commitment to the employer that is required for the employee’s
normal activities. However, Levin and Koktvedgaard (2007), p. 123, among others, state things differently.
88 In certain fields, it is conceivable that copyright issues in employment situations are regulated so similarly overall
by the parties in such a similar way that one can speak of an industry custom. One example of a field in which an
industry custom has been established is the research world. In this field, it is established that the employer expressly does not obtain the rights to works created by an individual employed researcher. The question is how such
established systems or industry customs will be affected by the proposed regulation and whether an express
exception is required for these situations.” SOU 2010:24, p. 171.

73

to the results of their activities which are financed by state funding.89 The general
perception is that this custom seems to be based on the notion of an actual disinterest
and lack of a need to manage copyrights. The question is if the changed conditions
that now apply should lead to the conclusion that this general custom is in a state of
transformation.
As we see it, there is an uncertainty regarding the legal situation, which is related to
the process of change that universities are going through. The question is if new legal
attitudes and customs are not currently developing. The expanded mission of promoting utilization may well have such an effect. So may also the increased focus on
intellectual assets, in particular within the framework of the European research collaboration.90 The more researchers and teachers develop intellectual assets in their
work, the more reasonable it seems that universities can make claims to at least be
able to use them. If, for example, a researcher developed IT-based research tools, is it
not reasonable for his or her university to be able to use these tools for continued
research in the academic environment? The simple fact of discussing the meaning of
an authority’s responsibility reveals that the university has an obligation to ensure
that its operations are carried out efficiently, economizing with the state’s funding.91
At the same time, it is not clear what the result of this will be. Our conclusion is
nevertheless that the university reasonably has an obligation to manage research
results within its remit. This does not mean that there is a need to take over intellectual property rights from the employees. Above all, it is about the right to use the
research results of employees in the university’s operations. In this context, it is
important that the universities clarify what kind of use defines their commitment to
promote utilization and manage knowledge assets in research collaboration and so
on. Naturally, the situation is different if the universities intend to take over the rights
to research results. For the rights to patentable inventions, this will require that the
universities enter into contracts with their employees. Evidence suggests that universities will increasingly need to enter into such contracts on the rights to research
results, particularly to fulfil expectations from external parties. In major collaboration processes, it will become unmanageable if the universities cannot manage intellectual property rights to background knowledge as well as project results. This is
something that is expected in international research collaboration, and increasingly in
other types of collaboration.
With this background, one central task of the KMP programme is to investigate the
need for universities to be able to use research results and manage intellectual property rights.

89 See e.g. Wolk, S. (2008), p. 205–6. Cf. also Sandgren, C. (2003), particularly p. 39–40. Strömholm, S. (2002), particularly
p. 43–4.
90 See below in section 2.4.
91 Section 3 of the Government regulations (2007:515) states that: The Authority’s administration is answerable to
the government for operations and is to ensure that they are carried out efficiently and in accordance with applicable legislation and the obligations associated with Sweden’s membership in the European Union; that they are
reported reliably and correctly; and that the authority is economical with state funding.

74

The opportunity and obligation to administer intellectual assets
One key issue in this context is to what degree a university actually can maintain and
administer intellectual property rights. Is it perhaps the holding companies that
should manage such transactions? Yet, even if the holding companies have contractual rights to use or dispose of an intellectual asset, this does not entitle the university
to use it. In our opinion, there is a distinction between situations in which a university intends to be involved in the commercialization of an asset, and situations where
the university needs access to the asset, for example to use in a research context.
First and foremost, we should ask ourselves whether, and to what degree, it is possible for universities to hold intellectual property rights, whether through transfer or
license. There is no regulation that specifically addresses the issue of state ownership
of intellectual property rights. On the other hand, there is no regulation that expressly forbids authorities under the government from administering such rights on behalf
of the state. As an example, it seems reasonable that an authority should be able to
register and therefore hold an trademark right.92 There are also no deliberations that
indicate any potential obstacles to the authority managing, on behalf of the state, certain works (initially only the financial aspects93) that are protected under copyright
law. The lack of any specific regulations regarding state ownership of intellectual
property rights must, however, indicate that the general rules discussed above should
apply to universities’ holding such rights. As we see it, it is difficult to interpret any
concrete obstacles to universities holding intellectual property rights.
The KMP programme found that it is important for universities to develop routines
for the concrete management of knowledge assets. This in turn affects when and how
universities and their holding companies should hold intellectual property rights.94
2.3.4 Obligation to and prospects of managing utilization and collaboration
processes within university activities
The commitment to promote utilization and to collaborate as an integral part of
research and educational activities implies an expectation that universities can manage the task within the framework of its current remit as a public authority. As government authorities, universities are required to manage their operations in the form
of cases (ärenden). The provisions in the Administrative Procedure Act (1986:223)
prescribe how cases are to be managed.95 One overall question is what can be considered a case in terms of the utilization issue. What does the commitment to promote utilization mean from the perspective of administrative law? How should the
92 This is the case at the Karolinska Institute, Uppsala University, Gothenburg University, the Swedish Work
Environment Authority, the Swedish Transport Administration, the Swedish Environmental Protection Agency and
several other authorities.
93 As regards the rights to computer software under section 40 a of the Copyright Law, the non-profit portion of
the copyright is transferred to the employer, Prop. 1992/93:48, p. 115–6 and SOU 2010:24, p. 144 and 151–2. This has
been criticized in the doctrine; see SOU 2010:24, p. 148, Bruun, N. (1993), p. 160 f, Rosén, J. (2006), p. 291–2 and id. in
NIR 1993, p. 369–70.
94 See further in section 3.
95 Administrative Procedure Act, section 1, first sentence.

75

concrete responsibility for utilization be managed? How is case handling affected by
the fact that universities do not consider themselves to have any right to the academic
results to be utilized? Furthermore, it is well known that the principle of disclosure of
public documents creates challenges regarding patentability.

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is the legal precondition for the
university to manage utilization and
collaboration processes in house?
The obligation and opportunity to apply
a public authority/administration-based
model to:
• Ensure governance in accordance with
the responsibility of a public authority
• Evaluate operational risks
• Manage collaboration and utilization
as cases
• Manage public documents and to log
and archive cases
• Manage public documents and
conﬁdentiality

Figure 14. Evaluation of state rule-based governance of internal governance
Obligation to secure governance in accordance with the responsibility of a public
authority
The state has several routines developed to ensure public operations. However, universities tend to lack routines for the commitment to collaborate and promote utilization, and this leads to uncertainty. If it is unclear how to manage a task under state
governance, the situation can easily develop into a situation where the organization
avoids taking responsibility. Of course, the situation is not helped by the fact that
state employees who are involved in this internal governance personally own the
results of the operations, with all the potential conflicts of interest. It is obviously
difficult to handle cases in the public sector if it is practically impossible to distinguish which parts of the employee’s activities he or she is carrying out in a public or
private capacity.
Obligation to evaluate operational risks
As government authorities, universities are obligated to apply the rules of internal
governance and control. As set out in section 2 of the Regulation of Internal
Governance and Control, an authority must be able to show with reasonable certainty that it is completing its tasks and achieving objectives as defined in its requirements in the Government Agencies Ordinance. These requirements demand that
operations are efficient; follow applicable rules; produce reliable, correct reporting;

76

and economize with state funds.96 The ESV’s general advice regarding section 2 states
that the internal governance and control process aims to ensure that the authority’s
governance carries out its responsibilities for the operations. Section 3 states that
universities must conduct an analysis of what circumstances may risk impeding and
obstructing the universities’ ability to complete their commissions and meet their
operational targets.
The KMP programme found that the integration of collaboration and utilization of
knowledge assets must be considered one of the most crucial risks universities must
manage at this time.

Obligation to manage collaboration and utilization as cases
The provisions in the Administrative Procedure Act prescribe how cases (ärenden) are
managed.97 There is no clear constitutional definition of “case” (ärende). Nor is
there any definition of this term in the preparatory work for the Act. However, it is
reasonable to assume that case governance is an activity that results in some kind of
decision, activity or statement. Section 20 of the Government Agencies Ordinance
states that cases should primarily be settled after a report is presented on the case.98
The decision or other result does not necessarily need to be legally binding.99 Thus,
the obligation to manage public operations as cases does not extend beyond the
universities’ own exercise of public authority.
However, how the universities manage their commissions must largely be viewed as
“real activities” (faktiskt handlande), as described in administrative law, and such
operations do not need to be managed in the form of cases.100 The boundary
between cases and other administrative activities is, however, not obvious and must
often be decided from field to field and situation to situation.101
To the extent that the authority’s actions or positions affect individuals, it is more or
less given that the process must be treated as a case. Even if such an effect is not
obvious, if there is any need to be able to evaluate or follow up on a situation, case
management may be motivated.

96 Section 3 of the Government Agencies Ordinance states that: The Authority’s administration is answerable to
the government for operations and is to ensure that they are carried out efficiently and in accordance with applicable legislation and the obligations associated with Sweden’s membership in the European Union; that they are
reported reliably and correctly; and that the authority is economical with state funding.
97 Administrative Procedure Act, section 1, first sentence.
98 Section 21 also requires that for every decision on a case, a document must be executed showing: 1. the date of
the decision; 2. the contents of the decision; 3. who made the decision; 4. who presented the report; and 5. who was
involved in the final case management but not in the actual decision.
99 Cf. Strömberg, H. and Lundell, B. (2006), p. 79.
100 Real activities are designated in section 1 of the Administrative Procedure Act as “other administrative activity”,
i.e. other activities than case management. It refers to the actual actions of the authority, e.g. education or health
care.
101 Prop. 1971:30, p. 315.

77

In bill Prop. 2006/07:91 it is pointed out that the commission of universities includes
conducting free, independent research on a scientific basis.102 Research rarely leads
to formal decisions and normally does not count as an exercise of public authority.
Instead, the activities are typically concrete ones, such as measuring, sampling and
conducting trials. Therefore, according to this bill, research should not be dealt with
in the form of cases, but as what is called real action. This perception that research
typically consists of real action seems to be widespread.
The question is whether utilization processes affect individuals to a relatively large
degree, thus creating a fairly great need for evaluation and follow-up. This makes it
reasonable to assume that collaboration and utilization processes to a large degree
should be managed as cases. It is not unreasonable that processes such as developing
the operations of the innovation offices, establishing strategic collaborations with
industry and establishing platforms for development collaborations and open innovations should be managed as cases. The need for transparency and follow-up is obvious. In addition, various individuals and the public interest are also likely to be
affected. The more universities as organizations promote utilization, the more reasonable it is to manage their operations as cases. As we see it, the trend towards greater
awareness and clarity in utilization processes makes it more natural to see more elements of the operations as cases.
In the light of the teacher’s exemption/professor’s privilege, one might assert that,
since utilization occurs in a private capacity, then this cannot be managed as a case
by the university. It would be different if the employee did the work as a part of his
or her academic activities. If the utilization activities are integrated in the individual’s
research, it is reasonable that the researcher could describe it as real activities. The
fact that a researcher privately owns the results of his or her research does in fact
give us a reason to question whether everything the national authority does will in
some way affect an individual’s interests, either the employee’s personal interests or
the interests of the employee’s company.
Only sections 4–6 of the Administrative Procedure Act apply to real activities, as they
prescribe an obligation to provide services and an obligation for the authority to
work with other authorities.103
Actions from the university’s side are viewed as cases, whether or not this is desired.
The question is only whether the university has managed these actions in an administratively acceptable way. If universities lack clear procedures for decision-making
regarding collaboration and utilization, there is an elevated risk of repeatedly getting
into complicated situations. Thus, case management is directly linked to university
internal institutional procedures. It is, of course, easy for people engaged in commercial activities to view case management as bureaucratic and negative, but this does
not have to be the case. On the contrary, once established, case management can
result not only in better organization, but also in very practical transparency. One
102 Prop. 2006/07:91, p. 6.
103 Administrative Procedure Act, section 1, second sentence.

78

interesting question in the KMP programme has been to what degree procedures are
needed for managing collaboration cases.
Obligation to manage public documents and to log and archive cases
General administrative law and the Swedish principle of the disclosure of public
documents require that authorities maintain transparency in their activities as far as
possible.104 The principle of disclosure of public documents (principen om allmänna
handlingars offentlighet) is set out in chapter 2, section 1 of the Freedom of the Press
Act, which describes as a basic right to view an authority’s public documents.
Case management under administrative law applies primarily to handling public documents. By nature, collaboration and utilization generate a large volume of documents, including formal contracts. Chapter 2, section 3 of the Freedom of the Press
Act defines documents as public if they are held by an authority, while chapter 2,
sections 6 and 7 add to the definition with documents that are received or executed
by the authority. A document that has not been dispatched is considered to be executed if the case to which the document refers has been closed by the authority. If the
document does not refer to a specific case, it is executed if it has been adjusted or in
any other way finished by the authority.
Chapter 5 of the Public Access to Information and Secrecy Act (2009:400)105 states
that public documents must be registered (logged), making them available to the public. Furthermore, documents must be held and maintained. The Archives Act
(1990:782) contains rules for this. Weeding of documents is permitted, but must follow specific rules.
In the KMP programme, it initially seemed challenging and difficult to relate development work to these administrative regulations. However, over time we have come to
appreciate the constructive nature of these norms, in the collaborative context as
well. There is good reason to preserve the authority and administration model in the
future work of developing the universities’ collaborations and utilization work.
Obligation to manage public documents and confidentiality
Not all of an authority’s documents are made available to the public. Sometimes the
interests of confidentiality are more important than transparency. In such cases, the
right to view public documents can be limited where necessary in consideration of
certain interests listed in chapter 2, section 2 of the Freedom of the Press Act. One
such interest is protecting an individual’s financial circumstances. Permitted limitations to transparency are defined in OSL or another law referred to in OSL.106 If a

104 See chapter 2 of the Capital Procurement Act (1949:105).
105 Hereafter abbreviated as OSL.
106 Capital Procurement Act (1949:105), chapter 2, section 2, second paragraph; see also Lenberg, E., Geijer, U. and
Tansjö, A. (2009), p. 1.

79

public document is not subject to confidentiality under this legislation, an authority is
obligated to make it available to anyone who requests it.
The confidentiality issue is a particular challenge when managing knowledge assets.
Sweden applies the principle of disclosure of public documents, and all documents
executed or received by a university are considered public. The principle of disclosure
of public documents is set out in chapter 2, section 1 of the Freedom of the Press
Act, which describes as a basic human right to view an authority’s public documents.
A key challenge of the KMP programme is to develop how research results and
knowledge assets are to be managed as public documents.
Universities have an obligation to establish registries of public documents and to
facilitate searching for public documents under chapter 4, section 2 of OSL.
Managing confidentiality is a key element of this. Utilization that depends on establishing patentability or that the knowledge is a trade secret is a particular challenge
for universities. OSL contains provisions for universities to maintain confidentiality
regarding knowledge assets that were developed on commission107 or in collaboration with external players.108 Once again, the fact that researchers and teachers are
granted personal rights to their knowledge assets is a complicating factor. Does this
mean that such documents are not public documents as long as they are managed by
the researchers themselves? There are even those who recommend viewing researchers as external actors in this sense, which would make it possible to invoke
confidentiality. The question is what consequences this in turn would have for the
authority’s activities.

2.3.5 Employer’s responsibility for enabling employees to promote utilization in both
public and private capacities
The commitment to promote utilization and to collaborate as an integral part of
research and educational activities implies an expectation that the work description
of the researchers and teachers include collaboration and utilization. Still, the ability
to collaborate and promote utilization seems to be strongly dependent on individual
academics and their entrepreneurial drive. Therefore, it is reasonable to assume that
the responsibility to promote utilization always lies largely on individual researchers
in their public and private capacities. It is also reasonable that certain processes can
be managed by the researcher’s company or other structures to which the researcher
has transferred his or her research results. The expanded responsibility for utilization
thus creates relatively extensive expectations on the university as an employer to be
able to balance the activities of parties inside and outside the university.

107 Chapter 31, section 12 of OSL states that authorities must observe confidentiality in commissions regarding
testing; determination of properties or quantities; appraising; scientific, technological, financial or statistical studies;
or other such commissions that the authority is conducting for an individual.
108 Chapter 24, section 5 of OSL contains provisions for confidentiality in research collaborations with individuals.
The university is required to maintain confidentiality regarding information about an individual’s business or operating conditions and innovations or research results that have been presented or arrived at in research being carried out in collaboration with an individual.

80

Obligation/opportunity for the university to:
• Act as an employer and specify an
employee’s tasks
• Manage secondary employment
• Manage disqualiﬁcation and conﬂicts
of interest
RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is the legat precondition for the
university to enable its employees
to utilize in both public and private
capacities?

Figure 15. Evaluation of state governance of employees’ ability to promote utilization in both
public and private capacities
Prospects and obligation to act as an employer and specify an employee’s tasks
The principle of an employee’s obligation to work is based on a ruling by the
Swedish Labour Court (AD 1929 no. 29) which states that a person employed “is
obliged to carry out all such work for the employer that is naturally connected to its
operations and can be considered to fall within the employee’s general professional
qualifications, in exchange for the wage benefits that apply to the job for which he is
employed, as set out in the agreement.” Loyalty to one’s employer is an unwritten
legal rule. This means that an employee may not act in any way that can harm the
employer. The employee should also avoid situations in which conflicting obligations
may arise. Thus, the employee is to place the employer’s interests above his or her
own.109 In public employment, the employer’s opportunities to intervene in cases of
employee disloyalty are limited by the employee’s freedom of speech. Much indicates
that academics have relatively great freedom in this sense.
Undoubtedly, it is largely the task of the university as an employer to clarify to its
employees what they are expected to do when it comes to collaborating and promoting utilization in the context of their jobs. Even so, it is reasonable to have a dialogue
on these matters. There is good reason to assume that it is in the interests of universi109 The Swedish Labour Court has formulated the contents of the duty of loyalty as follows (AD 1994 no. 79):“The
basic perspective is that the employee may not harm the employer. All the different aspects of the duty of loyalty
are based on the idea that the employment contract does not consist solely of the exchange of regular output
based on property rights, but creates a personal relationship between the parties. The employment establishes
obligations that go farther than the general contract terms; they exist outside of the actual work output and could
therefore be characterized as additional obligations. If one were to try to state a common perspective, it is that the
employee is obligated to put the employer’s interests above his own and to avoid situations in which a conflict of
obligations arises.”

81

ty employees that their employer takes greater responsibility in collaboration and
utilization matters. It is far from always in the employees’ interest that they must
manage research results in a private capacity while serving as a representative of the
authority.
Prospects for and obligation to manage secondary employment
The Public Employment Act (1994:260) contains rules that generally prohibit any
secondary employment that can adversely affect the public’s confidence (section 7).
These rules are motivated by citizens’ demand for objective, impartial public administration. The authority’s reputation can also be harmed by such secondary employment. The law also contains provisions obligating employers to inform employees as
to what forms of secondary employment are not permitted, and obligating employees
to inform their employer about their secondary employment. In addition, there are
rules about secondary employment that impedes the employee’s performance of
duties. These are featured in collective agreements, because they deal with employer–employee relations.110
Since 1986, there are rules that give university teachers (researchers) expanded rights,
compared with those of other public employees, to have secondary employment.
According to chapter 3, section 7 of the Higher Education Act, such an employee is
allowed to have secondary employment in research and development work within the
same field as the employee’s duties, if it does not harm the public’s confidence in the
university. The secondary employment should be kept clearly separate from the
employee’s regular duties. The motivation for allowing such “R&D secondary
employment’ is to make full use of the resources these researchers represent. This
facilitates collaboration with society at large. Chapter 4, sections 14–15 of the Higher
Education Ordinance contain rules about the university’s obligation to inform
employees of the secondary employment rules and of the researchers’ obligation to
inform the university of any secondary employment. These rules are linked to corresponding rules in the Public Employment Act, but are more detailed. Among other
things, the universities must document the information to allow continuous monitoring of researchers’ secondary employment.111 There is nothing to prevent universities
from demanding compensation from employees for the use of facilities and equipment.112
110 In the national sphere, such rules exist in the collective employment agreement Villkorsavtalet, chapter 13, sections 10–11). Section 10 states that an employer can instruct the employee to cease his or her secondary employment if the employer considers the secondary employment to be an impediment to the employee’s duties. The
collective bargaining agreement also has a provision on competing secondary employment in Chapter 13, section
11, which states that “employees of authorities carrying out business or contract operations may not be employed
or contracted with a company in the same field of operations”. Nor may the employee run a company in the same
field, unless expressly approved by the employer.
111 As regards secondary employment, the Swedish Labour Court tried a case regarding a municipal agreement
that prohibited secondary employment. AD 1985:69. JCf. AD 1991:99.
112 Cf. SOU 1996:70, p. 211. At one time, Gothenburg University had rules for how employees could enter into
agreements with the department head to carry out their secondary employment as businesses within the university facilities — as knowledge companies. The aim was to try to bring together different interests in the commitment
to promote utilization and to help to provide clarity as to the R&D secondary employment of teachers and
researchers. Rental agreements for facilities and infrastructure are still allowed.

82

R&D secondary employment, as with other secondary employment, must not harm
the reputation of the university, impede the employee’s performance of duties or
compete with the university. The intent of the provision regarding R&D secondary
employment is that university teachers should be able to have secondary employment
in R&D that utilize their own subject-matter expertise.113 The regulation mainly had
in mind engineering and scientific fields.114 The reports presented were based on the
idea that commissioned research would continue to be the dominant form of collaboration between universities and the business sector.115
The question is, of course, how the universities’ commitment to promote utilization
will affect their assessment of secondary employment. There is much to suggest that
the problems regarding performance of duties, competition and risks to the university’s reputation will increase. A large part of the support activities that universities
carry out today aim to support researchers in utilizing their results, primarily in a
private capacity.
Prospects of managing disqualification and conflicts of interest
Section 11 of the Administrative Procedure Act contains provisions regarding disqualification. One definition of disqualification in case management is that the results
of the case can be expected to garner that individual or someone close to him or her
significant benefit or harm. This is a conflict of interest. In addition, section 11
describes more delicate disqualifying situations where “there is some other special circumstance that is likely to undermine confidence in his impartiality in the matter”.116

113 The preparatory work for the expansion of the right to secondary employment states that the provision refers
to professors, senior lecturers, adjunct professors, research assistants, hourly employed teachers and visiting professors (compare with the then-applicable chapter 4, section 1 of the Higher Education Ordinance [1993:100]). Pure
teaching jobs do not count as research or development work in this provision, which means that such jobs must
be assessed according to section 7 of the Public Employment Act. Nor does the provision apply to assignments
given to the researcher due to more general knowledge rather than subject-specific expertise. The types of secondary employment that the provision is intended for include advising on scientific matters and other consulting
jobs within the field of activity of the individual’s employment. This includes activities based on the teacher’s innovations in his or her field or production methods that he or she has developed. 102 Prop. 2006/07:91, p. 7.
114 Serving on the board of directors of a company whose operations are linked to the teacher’s field of activity
can also be viewed as R&D secondary employment under this provision. Teachers ought to have extensive opportunities to publish their knowledge and insights in written form on their own initiative or on commission from a
private publisher, on condition that this is does not impede the performance of their duties. See Arbetsgivarverket
Cirkulär 2002:A 8, 04-12-2002, p. 34; SOU 2000:80, Offentliganställdas bisysslor [Secondary Employment of Public
Employees], p. 91–2.
115 See Prop.1985/86:11, p. 4–5.
116 The effects of disqualification and how issues of disqualification are assessed are described in section 12 of the
Administrative Procedure Act. According to this provision, a person who is disqualified may not handle the matter.
He may, however, take steps that cannot be performed by someone else without an inconvenient delay. Anyone
who knows of any circumstance that could constitute his disqualification is obliged to disclose it on his own initiative. If an issue of disqualification has been raised and the person in question has not been replaced, the authority
shall decide the issue of disqualification as soon as possible. The challenged person may not take part in the consideration of the issue of his disqualification, unless the authority is not competent to act without him and there is
no one available to replace him without an inconvenient delay.

83

In the university world, it is very common that a researcher applies for and receives
funding from a research financier. At the same time, the researcher may have a private interest because the teacher’s exemption/professor’s privilege gives him or her the
right to a patentable invention developed through this research funding. One can
imagine that a certain research grant may be crucial to the researcher’s ability to create a new patentable invention. Or to continue the technical and commercial verification and development of the innovation.
One reasonable conclusion is that the expanded commitment to promote utilization
gives university employees greater responsibility in the framework of their public
employment. The university as an employer ought reasonably to clarify this duty. At
the same time, the question that must be asked is how the university can create
appropriate incentives for researchers to collaborate and promote utilization.
It is also important for researchers to be able to avoid continuous questioning of their
motives, particularly in conflicts of interest related to personal gain. It is not reasonable for a researcher to be solely responsible for making sure such situations do not
arise. One key aspect of the KMP programme was to contribute to helping universities as organizations to put much more time and energy into applying the rules on
secondary employment and disqualification issues. This in turn should lead to
improvements and better application of procedures and work plans for handling conflicts of interest.117

2.4 Programme- and project-based governance
Although the majority of university funding comes from the government, Swedish
universities are dependent on applying for a large part of this funding in competition
as if it was from external financiers (see below 2.5). Universities also participate to
varying degrees in projects in which municipalities, county councils and the business
sector fund research. Both external and state funding are based on projects and programmes. In the KMP programme, early on we concluded that programme- and
project-based governance is in many ways the most hands-on form of governance of
university collaboration. This creates great expectations for universities to act as
contracting parties and manage research results and other intellectual assets in
collaborative relationships. This is part of what is new in New Public Management.
2.4.1 Analysis of research financiers’ governance
In the KMP programme we conducted a fairly detailed analysis of programme- and
project-based governance. We found this degree of detail necessary to understand this

117 In recent years, there have been discussions about the degree to which support measures for researchers in
their private capacity are influenced by or highlight the importance of the rules of state governance, lead to distortion of competition, or should be taxed as fringe benefits. These questions need to be answered, probably through
further enquiries. It is not reasonable that the employees themselves are expected to investigate them.

84

• What is expected for the universities’
organizational capabilities for
collaboration?
• What is expected for universities as
contracting parties in collaboration?
• What is expected for universities’
management of intellectual assets?
• What is expected for universities’ ability
to facilitate and regulate openess and
transparency?

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What requirements concerning
collaboration and utilization and
other terms have been established in
relation to public research and
innovation programmes?

Figure 16. Evaluation of public research financiers’ expectations of universities’ ability
governance method more clearly. The total extent of programme- and project-based
governance is truly huge.118 We chose to limit ourselves to the governance carried
out by state- and EU-funded research programmes and projects. Of the Swedish
players, we chose to look closer at Vinnova and the Swedish Research Council. In
this document we will simply highlight relevant parts of governance at the EU level.
Our evaluation of the programme- and project-based governance focused particularly
on how governance sets the requirements for a) the universities’ promotion of utilization and b) the universities as contracting parties. In both aspects, we were interested
in the expectations and obligations for the universities to manage intellectual assets
and facilitate transparency.
The state’s programme- and project-based governance allows for participation, and
there is no doubt that the business community exerts a great influence on how collaboration is carried out. What makes this governance method interesting is the interaction between regulation, grant terms, grant agreements and more or less negotiated
norms for project agreements. Examining the trends worldwide, we find international
arenas developing for research and collaboration. The European Commission has
long promoted universities’ responsibility for utilization of publicly funded research.
Universities and other public players in the field of research have a prominent role in
the actualization of the TFEU (Treaty of the Functioning of the European Union).119
One key element is the aim to create a European Research Area (ERA), which con-

118 See the background report to ESO 2012:8, Forskning och innovation – statens styrning av högskolans
samverkan och nyttiggörande, pp. 162-213.
119 Common Actions for Growth and Employment. 20.7.2005 COM(2005) 330 final.

85

sists largely of publicly funded research organizations. In the efforts to develop the
Innovation Union, universities continue to play an important part, not least in establishing the strategic European Institute of Innovation and Technology (EIT) and its
Knowledge and Innovation Communities (KIC).
The European Commission sees it as its task to try to harmonize norm structures for
utilization at European universities and other public research institutions. There is an
ambition to develop general norms that can be applied throughout the EU to develop
European arenas for research and innovation.
To understand the evolution of this European arena for research and innovation, it is
of particular interest to study the framework programmes. The eighth framework
programme, Horizon 2020, is currently implemented. The KMP programme primarily analyzed the Seventh Framework Programme (FP7). Participation in the FP7 project was determined by its Rules for Participation,120 which establish the framework
programme and set out the funding terms.121 They also state that the Commission
must sign a grant agreement with the participants in each project.122 The rules specify the issues that the grant agreement regulates. For example, chapter III defines how
the projects should regulate publication of, utilization of and access to results and
background knowledge. This is set out in the terms of the Grant Agreement, which in
turn sets the framework for the project agreements (consortium agreements) — the
contracts between the participants in the project.
As we see it, the governance that occurs within the framework programmes is what
most clearly depicts institutional development at the European level. The type of contract is particularly interesting in this context, because it is so obviously a fundamental element of the aim to develop arenas for research and innovation. The EU chose
to build up this system with the universities and research institutes at its foundation.
Therefore, they must be strong enough to manage and even bear up the networks,
platforms and other structures now being developed in collaboration with industry
and other public players.
One overall assumption in the KMP programme is thus that Swedish universities are
involved in an institutional development process to be players on international arenas
for research and innovation. There is a clear pressure on Swedish universities to
adapt to an international and European development. A vital document in this is the
European Commission’s 2008 recommendation on Management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and Code of Practice for universities and other
public research organizations.123 The recommendation lists several principles to be
120 REGULATION (EC) No. 1906/2006 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND OF THE COUNCIL of 18 December 2006
(laying down the rules for the participation of undertakings, research centres and universities in actions under the
Seventh Framework Programme and for the dissemination of research results (2007–2013). OJ 2006/L 391/1.
121 These regulations in turn are based on Article 183 TFEU (previously Article 167 TEC) and 188 TFEU, second paragraph (previously Article 172 TEC, second paragraph) and Decision No 1982/2006/EC of the European Parliament
and of the Council of 18.12.2006, OJ 2006/L 412/1.
122 Rules for Participation, article 18.2.
123 Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities
and Code of Practice for universities and other public research organizations. 10.4.2008. C(2008) 1329.

86

applied at European universities,124 including that European universities should
develop skills in entrepreneurship and intellectual property management, and should
lay the foundations for securing open access and facilitating the protection of intellectual property rights.125 The Code of Practice embraces several principles divided into
three sections: first, principles for internal intellectual property policy; second, principles for knowledge transfer; and third, principles for research collaboration and
commissioned research. The idea is that these principles will be applied by individual
research organizations, including universities, and also be highlighted by research
financiers as conditions for receiving funds. It is worth noting that the European
Commission specifically notes this recommendation in its grant agreement template
for the Horizon 2020 programme and adds an obligation for universities and other
public research organizations to “take measures” to follow it.126
In the KMP programme, we found that developments in programme- and projectbased governance are not problem-free for universities. A situation in which research
teams are expected to be able to manage intellectual assets while more or less marketstyle structures are developed for research results, creates risks and challenges. At the
same time, this is a European and globally ongoing development that is intimately
related with the evolution and growing importance of the international knowledgebased society.
2.4.2 Expectations for universities’ organizational capabilities for collaboration
Our analysis of the state’s programme- and project-based governance shows that universities face ever greater expectations for their ability to promote utilization. This is
particularly obvious for governance at the EU level.
The universities’ ability to transfer knowledge
The Rules for Participation in the Seventh Framework Programme specify the issues
that the grant agreement regulates. The preamble (6) states that the rules are to
exploit utilization of intellectual assets developed by a partner in a research programme. The legitimate interests of the other participants and the EU must also be

124 The “Code of Practice for universities and other public research organizations concerning the management of
intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities” is addressed to member states, which are intended to encourage universities and other publicly funded research organizations to adopt policies that conform with the principles stated in Annex 1, see recommendation 1 and 2.
125 Ibid., see recommendation 4.
126 H2020 Model Grant Agreements: H2020 General MGA Multi: September 2014
“ARTICLE 23a MANAGEMENT OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY: 23a.1 Obligation to take measures to implement the
Commission Recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities.
Beneficiaries that are university or other public research organisations must take measures to implement the principles set out in Points 1 and 2 of the Code of Practice annexed to the Commission Recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities. (…) The beneficiaries must ensure that
researchers and third parties involved in the action are aware of them.”

87

• Expectations concerning the
universities’ ability to transfer
knowledge
• Expectations concerning the
universities’ ability to be a professional
partner to the community at large
• Expectations concerning the
universities’ ability to form companies
and commercialize research results

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is expected for the universities’
organizational capabilities for
collaboration?

Figure 17. Evaluation of the expectation that universities will collaborate with the
surrounding community

taken into consideration. Among other things, the grant agreement is to stipulate that
the participants must present a plan for how research results of the project will be
used and disseminated (a plan for the use and dissemination of foreground).127 Since
the university is the recipient of the funding, it is also the party responsible for developing this plan. In this context, the university is expected to have an organization
capable of knowledge transfer.
As discussed above, the Swedish government chose to propose in its Research and
Innovation Bill to allocate targeted funding to universities for the commitment to
promote utilization and to establish Innovation Offices at some of Sweden’s universities. That same year, the European commission issued the recommendation described
above, which can essentially be viewed as a document that largely defines how an
innovation office at a European university should work. This recommendation is one
of the more important elements in the Commission’s efforts to create a common
European framework for knowledge transfer.128 It can be viewed as a means of meeting the expectations created by the EU’s programme- and project-based governance.
The first recommendation states that publicly funded research organizations should
manage knowledge transfer as a strategic task.

127 Rules for Participation, article 20(1).
128 This recommendation targets the member states, and therefore also Sweden. Thus, it is the member states who
are recommended to harmonize their university governance and publicly funded research organizations. The recommendation can be viewed as an instrument for Vinnova in particular, and also for all other public innovation and
research players, to develop their programme- and project-based governance.

88

The overall aim of the recommendation is to contribute to improving the success of
converting knowledge into socioeconomic benefit: ”The active engagement of public
research organisations in intellectual property management and knowledge transfer is
essential for rate socioeconomic benefits, and for attracting student, scientists and
further research funding.”129 The Commission states that there are significant differences among member states regarding the regulation, policies and other governance
of public research organizations’ intellectual property management. This, says the
Commission, impedes and hampers cross-border knowledge transfer and the creation
of a common arena for research and innovation. The aim is to facilitate for states
and regions in updating their regulatory instruments through the recommendations
and principles. One express recommendation is that the member states collaborate
and take steps to improve “the coherence of their respective ownership regimes as
regards intellectual property rights in such a way as to facilitate cross-border collaborations and knowledge transfer in the field of research and development.”130
The universities’ ability to be a professional partner to the community at large
Perhaps the most overriding expectation of universities is for them to act as professional partners to the business community and the public sector. The principles in the
first part of the EU’s recommendation — principles that states are to ensure that individual universities apply in their utilization work — contain several norms as to how
universities should behave to develop as societal actors. For example, there should be
clear rules for researchers about reporting new research results and handling conflicts
of interest. In addition, there are principles about the importance of incentives to
researchers, both financial and other kinds, such as career facilitation. The commission also highlights the importance of public research organizations encouraging
researchers to consider building up portfolios of intellectual property in strategic
fields.131

Ability to form companies and commercialize research results
The importance of research organizations developing “exploitation mechanisms” is
highlighted for knowledge transfer. This means that research organizations should
not primarily focus on making money. There should also be a clear model for allocation of revenues. In addition, the importance of policies for licensing and creating
new companies is emphasized. These are typical principles that a public innovation
authority or research financier may require as elements in the development of utilization capability. From the KMP perspective, norms clearly need to be developed for
this.

129 Motivation 4, p. 2.
130 Recommendation 5.
131 Ibid., pp. 5–6.

89

The KMP programme showed that universities are expected to promote utilization
and that their capability to do so affects their prospects for obtaining research funding. Based on these lessons, it is reasonable to take a look at the degree to which universities are able and willing to live up to this recommendation, as this can be viewed
as an expression of the total programme- and project-based governance at EU level.
2.4.3 Expectations for universities as contracting parties in collaborations
As regards the existing programme- and project-based governance, we could not help
noticing that current institutional development is characterized by governance methods that come from New Public Management. The type of contract is particularly
interesting in this context, because it brings to light a fundamental element in the aim
to develop arenas for research and innovation.

• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to act as contracting parties with
private and public partners
• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to manage their employees’
research results in relation to external
contracting partners
• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to be bearers of contractual
research consortiums and other
knowledge platforms

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is expected for universities as
contracting parties in collaboration?

Figure 18. Evaluation of the expectation that universities will act as contracting parties

The universities’ ability to act as contracting parties with private and public partners
The EU chose to establish this contractual system with universities and research institutes at its foundation. Our analysis shows that this is a relatively advanced approach
espoused primarily by the European Commission. They developed all the tools to
facilitate the creation of research collaboration. The governance methods developed
in the framework programmes are an illustrative and particularly important example.
As stated above, participation in the Seventh Framework Programme’s projects is
determined by the Rules for Participation. The Commission uses a grant agreement

90

to regulate projects, and it sets up frameworks for the agreements that the project
participants will enter into (consortium agreements).132 A number of model consortium agreements have been developed by various parties.133
Thus, universities have a central role as contracting parties in a wider institutional
development process. The EU’s framework programmes demand fairly extensive
responsibility from participating universities to ensure that collaboration and utilization processes work.
The universities’ ability to manage their employees’ research results in relation to
external contracting partners
A key characteristic of programme- and project-based governance at EU level is that
the universities as organizations are responsible for collaboration as well as for
opportunities to promote utilization. It is not the researchers who enter into agreements on their research results. This places a lot of responsibility on the ability of
public research actors to manage intellectual assets, both in research collaboration
and for utilization. The universities are expected to manage all transactions regarding
intellectual assets and to ensure that they are legally feasible. We note that Swedish
universities cannot simply take on the responsibility set out in the EU research programme, particularly due to the teacher’s exemption/professor’s privilege. Swedish
universities have routinely chosen to handle this situation by the participating
researchers having to sign a so-called researcher approval.134 With this approval, uni-

132 In accordance with the rules set up for the Seventh Framework Programme, the Commission developed a
model grant agreement (MGA) to use in projects within the framework programme; see the Rules for Participation,
article 19.8. The grant agreement, as formulated in the model, consists of one core contract with a number of
annexes. Annex I (description of work) describes the project, what each party is to do and so on. Annex II contains
the general terms and conditions for the project, making it central to the commission’s governance of all framework programme projects. For certain project types, there can also be additional terms and conditions in Annex III.
The core contract can also contain special clauses that regulate specific issues. Examples of common special clauses in core contracts are ones that regulate the participation of the Commission’s Joint Research Centres (Special
Clause no. 1), regulations for third parties involved in the project who are affiliated with a beneficiary (no. 10), clauses regarding ethical considerations (no. 13 and no. 15), questions regarding research involving human embryos or
stem cells (no. 14), issues regarding clinical biomedical research involving human beings (no. 16) and regulations
regarding open access (no.39).See FP7 Grant Agreement — List of Special Clauses, Version 4, 22/04/2009 (published
on ftp://ftp.cordis.europa.eu/pub/fp7/docs/fp7-ga-clauses-v4_en.pdf ).
133 The system of researcher approval and department head approval, or similar documents, is presumably applied
by all Swedish universities in EU projects these days.
134 One key such agreement is DESCA (Development of a Simplified Consortium Agreement), which is a model for
consortium agreements that was initiated by key players in the Seventh Framework Programme and aims to
achieve a balance between the interests of the categories of players involved: large and small companies, universities, research institutes, etc. Consortium agreements are now also based on the DESCA template. There are also several other model agreements apart from DESCA, including IPCA (Integrated Projects Consortium Agreement),
EUCAR and IMG4. IPCA was published by the European Information & Communications Technology Industry
Association (EICTA) and is mainly intended to meet the needs of that industry. EUCAR is intended for projects
involving companies from the automotive industry, and IMG4 is for the aviation industry. It would be too time-consuming to take up all the details of all of these models here. Suffice it to say that the models differ in issues such as
the management of and access to other parties’ results and background knowledge.

91

versities can claim to hold the necessary rights and live up to their obligations as contracting parties in consortium agreements.135 We find that the universities’ inability
to manage their responsibilities is not simply a contractual, legal problem. In practice,
it means that the university does not have the ability to look after its own interests
under the conditions created by the EU’s research programmes.
Universities’ ability to be bearers of contractual research consortiums and other
knowledge platforms
Increasingly, universities are expected to be actors that can be bearers of contractual
networks and similar institutiona solvtions. Therefore, they must be strong enough to
manage and even bear up the networks, platforms and other structures now being
developed in collaboration with other public actors and the business sector. This is,
as stated above, not self-evident. The contracts and intellectual property rights are
building blocks for the creation of open platforms and the regulation of openness.
The natural starting point is that players in public research are expected to be able to
manage the rights to their results. The rules state that if employees or other staff
working for a beneficiary are entitled to claim rights to project results, the beneficiary
must ensure that these rights can be exercised in a way that is compatible with the
organization’s obligations under the grant agreement.136
In addition, the EU increasingly has a stated objective that universities should not
only take on responsibility for serving as a knowledge platform for the business community, but should also be responsible for establishing innovation systems for small
and medium-sized companies as well as start-ups. This is increasingly common, and
creates an even greater challenge for Swedish universities wishing to participate in
international collaborations. Such collaborations are often organized under new
forms and often in other legal entities, such as companies or economic associations.
EIT is an example of this. In the first call for KICs in 2009, a KIC in sustainable
energy was approved — KIC InnoEnergy, which was organized as a European company. To do this, the Swedeish parliament had to authorize the government to decide
on financial measures related to the company. With support of that authorization, the
government was able to decide that participating Swedish universities could use their
funds to acquire shares and provide capital contributions to the company.
2.4.4 Expectations of the universities’ management of intellectual assets
The analysis of programme- and project-based governance shows that the focus on
managing intellectual assets according to relatively clear definitions is what creates
135 At Gothenburg University, department head approval or a similar document must be signed for each EU project. Department head approval is a declaration that the department consents to the head researcher participating
in the EU project on the terms defined in the rules for the grant and the consortium agreement. The department
head makes clear that he or she is aware of and accepts the financial responsibility, including any liability to reimbursement. This establishes and clarifies the responsibilities of management, as the EU projects are signed according to specific regulations by the head of the Research and Innovation Office under direct delegation from the
vice-chancellor.
136 FP7, Rules for Participation, article 39(2), grant agreement II.26.3.

92

stability and flexibility. We have already stated that there are great expectations for
universities to be able to manage knowledge assets and other intellectual assets.
Ability to clarify what constitutes background knowledge and project results
A basic principle in the Seventh Framework Programme is that all IP-related issues
are to be clarified and handled by the management. The programme uses the terms
“background”137 (meaning background knowledge) and “foreground”138 (meaning
project results) throughout. The EU recommendation also notes the importance of
these terms.139 The principle is that each party should have the ability to clarify its
own background to offer clarity as to who has access to what. In addition, as regards
research collaboration, the project results should generally be owned by the party
who created the results: “In a collaborative research project, ownership of the fore-

• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to clarify what constitutes
background knowledge and project
results
• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to oﬀer access rights and
otherwise manage accessibility
• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to manage others’ background
knowledge and project results

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

What is expected for universities’
management of intellectual assets?

Figure 19. Evaluation of expectations of the universities’ management of intellectual assets

137 The Rules for Participation define background as:“information which is held by participants prior to their accession to the grant agreement, as well as copyrights or other intellectual property rights pertaining to such information, the application for which has been filed before their accession to the grant agreement, and which is needed
for carrying out the indirect action or for using the results of the indirect action”; see article 2(5).
138 A correspondingly broad definition is also given for foreground:“Results, including information, whether or not
they can be protected, which are generated by the indirect action concerned”; see article 2(4).
139 In the EU’s recommendation, the principles of collaborative and commissioned research in this context are of
particular importance:“The rules governing collaborative and contract research activities should be compatible
with the mission of each party. They should take into account the level of private funding and be in accordance
with the objectives of the research activities, in particular to maximise the commercial and socioeconomic impact
of the research, to support the public research organisation’s objective to attract private research funding, to maintain an intellectual property position that allows further academic and collaborative research, and avoid impeding
the dissemination of the R&D results”; see principle 15.

93

ground should stay with the party that has generated it, but can be allocated to the
different parties on the basis of a contractual agreement concluded in advance, adequately reflecting the parties’ respective interests, tasks and financial or other contributions to the project. In the case of contract research the foreground generated by
the public research organization is owned by the private-sector party. The ownership
of background should not be affected by the project.”140
This establishes the concepts and approach in European research projects. According
to the Rules for Participation, the beneficiaries are to define the necessary background for the project in a written agreement, and where necessary, agree to rule out
certain backgrounds.141 This is done through the consortium agreement142 and is a
task that universities are often unable to carry out. The ability to specify the previous
research results given as background requires that the universities see it as their mission to manage their operations as knowledge assets. The background concept adds a
new dimension in the management of research collaborations. Historically, much of
this type of governance has focused on who will own the results of the research.
When the focus is on background, clarifying and maintaining completed research as
an asset becomes a direct challenge.
Ability to offer access rights and otherwise manage accessibility
Another principle in the recommendation is about access rights to research results.
Each party should be entitled to have access to the background as well as the
foreground to the degree necessary to carry out the research project.143 The ability
to manage access rights is an overriding expectation in the EU’s framework programmes. Agreements for access rights regarding foreground or background for beneficiaries or third parties are meant to guarantee the right for other beneficiaries to utilize the foreground.144

140 See principle 17.
141 See article 47; also the grant agreement II:31.
142 With the DESCA templates, the parties own the foreground that they generate. The parties grant one another
various access rights to each other’s foreground and background. As a rule, each party is entitled to exclude certain
background from the obligation to grant access rights to the other parties. Swedish universities often use a formulation like this: XX University excludes, under all circumstances, the following from its obligation to make background rights available to another party:
● All background rights generated by staff, researchers or students at XX University, excluding those individuals
directly involved in the project;
● All background rights generated by staff, researchers or students at XX University who are directly involved in the
project, which fall outside the tasks of the research group at XX University within the framework of the project as
defined in the established project plan;
● All background rights to which XX University is not authorized to grant access, as a result of existing rights
belonging to a third party (or being under registration).
143 Principle 18, which requires that such rights be managed under terms that “adequately reflect the parties’
respective interests, tasks, and financial and other contributions to the project”.
144 Rules for Participation, article 48 and grant agreement II.32.

94

Therefore, the framework programme has clear expectations that universities will be
able to manage intellectual assets within the framework of the research collaboration,
and also will be able to promote utilization. Regarding the latter, licensing is one
method that is particularly recommended. Even exclusive licenses may be granted for
specific project foregrounds or backgrounds on condition that all beneficiaries confirm in writing that they waive their usage rights to this information. Just as in the
case where a beneficiary intends to grant an exclusive license to the foreground to a
third party in a third country that is not included in the Seventh Framework
Programme, the Commission is entitled to oppose the granting of such exclusive
rights, under certain conditions. If this occurs, the exclusive license may not be granted, unless the Commission is convinced that suitable guarantees will be
implemented.145
As regards the management of intellectual assets within the framework of the collaboration, access rights to the foreground shall be granted to other beneficiaries if this
is necessary for them to complete their own work in the project. Thus, intellectual
assets that are required to complete the research must be made accessible. Said access
right shall be granted at no charge.146 Beneficiaries shall have access rights to another party’s foreground if this is necessary for the beneficiary to utilize its own foreground for other purposes than carrying out the party’s own work in the project.
Where so agreed, said access right must be provided under fair and reasonable terms,
or at no charge.147 If a research team has developed a foreground based on another
beneficiary’s foreground generated within the project, permission to access said foreground shall be granted, whether or not the results are covered by any form of intellectual property rights. Once again, the university is expected to manage these
approvals. The same applies for access rights to background if this is necessary for
the team to utilize its own foreground.148
Our analysis of programme- and project-based governance by research financiers
found that quite a lot is expected of the universities — particularly in EU contexts —
in terms of taking on contractual obligations to provide and manage intellectual
assets. Many issues need to be brought to light in this context. For example, is it
enough to issue researcher approvals, or must the university develop routines to draw
up contracts for the rights to research results? When must the university ensure that

145 Rules for Participation, article 43 and grant agreement II.32.8.
146 Rules for Participation, article 49 and Grant Agreement II.33. Access rights to background shall be granted to
other beneficiaries if this is necessary for them to complete their own work in the project, on condition that the
beneficiary in question is entitled to grant that right. These access rights are to be granted at no charge, unless otherwise agreed by all beneficiaries before entering into the grant agreement.
147 Rules for Participation, article 50(1) and Grant Agreement II.34.1.
148 Rules for Participation, article 50(2) and Grant Agreement II.34.2. Under certain conditions, set out in the Grant
Agreement II.7, which is based on the Rules for Participation, article 18(7), a partner can have a subcontractor carry
out part of that party’s work as defined in the project’s Description of Work in Annex I of the Grant Agreement. In
such cases, the parties sign a subcontract with the external party. In the subcontract, the contractor must sign over
such rights to its foreground and background as are required for the party to meet its commitments to the
Commission under the grant agreement and to the other parties in the project under the consortium agreement.
The party in the project is answerable to the other parties in the consortium as regards the contractor’s actions.

95

it has the right to use and dispose of the assets? As we stated previously, there are
prospects for entering into agreements. Regardless of how the above questions are
answered, it is important that the university ensure that its employees properly manage the intellectual assets they create. Have the employees managed their data, software, databases, innovations and so on in such a way that it is possible for the university to enter into a specific research collaboration? If the university is not able to
clarify what makes up the background, situations will quickly arise in which they
cannot meet contractual commitments and other commitments in relation to the
research financier. This becomes particularly challenging when the university is
expected to contribute to and even act as organizers for major programme initiatives
in which portfolios of intellectual assets must be managed.
Ability to manage others’ background knowledge and project results
We have found that there are clear expectations for Swedish universities to be able to
manage not only their own intellectual assets, but also others’. It must be possible to
secure the maintenance of others’ knowledge assets within the framework of the collaboration. This development means that academic environments that are active in
international arenas must be able to manage their own and others’ portfolios of
research results. From a KMP perspective, this method of management is in many
ways the most essential to adopt. The ability to manage background knowledge in
academic environments is perhaps the most important pillar of universities’ ability
to take social responsibility for knowledge-based collaboration. If the university’s
managers see it as their mission to secure the background knowledge of academic
environments, i.e. the knowledge assets that are relevant to various types of research
and other collaborations, this will initiate an institutional development process.

2.4.5 Expectations for universities’ ability to facilitate and regulate transparency
Our analysis of programme-and project-based governance also demonstrated the
importance of universities developing a more systematic approach to promoting
accessibility and openness of research results. This is an area where expectations have
increased significantly in recent years, particularly since 1 January 2014 in connection with the Horizon 2020 framework programme.
There are clear expectations for universities as organizations to be able to systematically provide open access to research results. The new Horizon 2020 framework programme contains special “guidelines on open access to scientific publication and
research data in Horizon 2020”.149 The guidelines state that “Open access can be
defined as the practice of providing online access to scientific information that is free
of charge to the end-user and that is re-usable. In the context of research and innova-

149 http://ec.europa.eu/research/participants/data/ref/h2020/grants_manual/hi/oa_pilot/h2020-hi-oa-pilotguide_en.pdf

96

What is expected for universities’
ability to facilitate and regulate
openess and transparency?
• Expectations concerning the universities’
ability to control what is to be open
• Expectations concerning the universities’
capacity for open publishing of research
results

RULE-BASED
GOVERNACNE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNACNE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNACNE

GOVERNACNE
BY OBJECTIVES

• Expectations concerning the universities’
capacity for open archiving of data

Figure 20. Evaluation of expectations on universities to contribute to open access

tion, “scientific information” can refer to (i) peer reviewed scientific research articles
(published in scholarly journals) or (ii) research data (data underlying publications,
curated data and/or raw data).” Open access does not only include the right to read
the information, but also the right to copy, disseminate, link and so on.

Ability to control what is to be open
The fact that Horizon 2020 sets relatively extensive expectations for universities’
organizational capability to contribute to and facilitate openness does not mean that
all research results are to be made freely available. The guidelines explain that the
intent is not to create an obligation to make all research results open access:
“Misconceptions about open access to scientific publications: In the context of
research funding, open access requirements in no way imply an obligation to publish
results. The decision on whether or not to publish lies entirely with the funds. Open
access becomes an issue only if publication is elected as a means of dissemination.
Moreover, OA does not interfere with the decision to exploit research results commercially, e.g. through patenting. Indeed, the decision on whether to publish open
access must come after the more general decision on whether to publish directly or to
first seek protection.” The figure below illustrates the EU’s ambition for how data
should be handled.
Capacity for open publishing of research results
The legal basis of open access publishing is clarified in article 29.2 in the programme
agreement for Horizon 2020. It states that: “under Horizon 2020, each beneficiary

97

must ensure open access to all peer-reviewed scientific publications relating to its
results.” The idea is that open publication will occur in two steps: 1. “depositing
publications into repositories”, and 2. “providing open access to them. These two
steps may or may not occur at the same time, depending on whether open access
publishing (“gold” open access) or self-archiving (“green” open access) is used, and,
in the case of self-archiving, depending on the embargo period (if any).” Under the
first step, the beneficiary will submit a machine-readable copy of the published version, or a fully edited manuscript accepted for publication in a repository for scientific publications. This should be done as quickly as possible, and no later than the date
of publication. The second step may consist of “green open access” or “gold open
access”. The green version is based on self-archiving; the beneficiary ensures that the
research results are available within six months (12 months for social sciences and
humanities). The gold version means that researchers publish in open access journals.

Gold OA
Publication
Decision to
spread/share
Utilization
plan

Green OA
Archiving of
research data
Free accessibility
and usage

RESEARCH
RESULTS

Data management
plan

Controlled accessibility
and use
Decision to
exploit/protect

Patenting or other
form of protection

Figure 21. The EU’s description of universities’ open access management

Capacity for open archiving of data
A new addition in Horizon 2020 is the “Open research data pilot”, which aims to
improve and maximize accessibility of research data generated in the funded
projects.150 In this pilot, the parties carry out data management and establish a data
management plan. There are expectations regarding organizational capability to man-

150 The legal requirements for projects intending to participate in the pilot are listed in the options clause 29:3 in
the Model Grant Agreement.

98

age data and other research results.151 The parties are to store data in archives that
are available on the Internet — research data repositories. The aim is for these
archives to be available in a common Open Access Infrastructure for Research in
Europe (OpenAIRE).
In all, we find that the programme makes fairly extensive demands for managing
open access. This is an important finding of the KMP programme. The effort to
make research results more available to the public is an important way of promoting
utilization. At the same time, it is vital to be able to decide which paths to utilization
are the most appropriate.

2.5 Resource- and result-based governance of
collaboration and utilization
The goverment earmarks significant resources for universities’ operations. This in
itself creates great expectations. In recent decades, an increasingly results-oriented
tradition has developed for state funding. The ability to “produce” research results is
increasingly important. The more academic research teams publish in academically
renowned journals, the greater quality their universities’ research is thought to have.
Internationally, it has become common to develop distribution keys based on how
successful universities are in terms of publication. Over time, it has become increasingly common to think in these terms for collaboration and utilization. Obviously,
this will solidify and further specify expectations on universities, which will have a
normative effect.

2.5.1 Analysis of resource- and result-based governance
One key way for the government to manage utilization of research results is to allocate financial resources to the universities, i.e. resource governance of the operations.
In the KMP programme we found it important to create a greater understanding of
this development in which the allocation of resources depends on the results that the
university and its employees can produce. It is particularly interesting to examine the
expectations created by what is now described as indicators of “impact”. In our eval-

151 The legal basis of the principles of open access in Horizon 2020 is found in the framework programme and the
Rules for Participation. These rules explain that:“With regard to the dissemination of results through scientific publications, open access shall apply under the terms and conditions laid down in the grant agreement. Costs relating
to open access to scientific publications that result from research funded under Horizon 2020, incurred within the
duration of an action, shall be eligible for reimbursement under the conditions of the grant agreement. [...] the
grant agreement shall not stipulate conditions regarding open access to publications which would result in additional publishing costs after the completion of an action. With regard to the dissemination of research data, the
grant agreement may, in the context of the open access to and the preservation of research data, lay down terms
and conditions under which open access to such results shall be provided, in particular in ERC frontier research and
FET (Future and Emerging Technologies) research or in other appropriate areas, and taking into consideration the
legitimate interests of the participants and any constraints pertaining to data protection rules, security rules or
intellectual property rights. In such cases, the work programme or work plan shall indicate if the dissemination of
research data through open access is required.”

99

uation, we gradually zeroed in on four interacting aspects. We feel that these should
be evaluated to get an overview of how resource- and result-based governance works.

What resources does the government
allocate to the university and to
what extent are these dependent on
result (impact)?
• To what extent can the university use
resources set aside for research
and education for collaboration
and utilization?

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

• To what extent is impact on society a
basis for resource allocation?

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

• What resources are provided directly for
collaboration and utilization and
what results are expected?

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

• What resources can be applied for and
what results are expected?

Figure 22. Evaluation of the state’s resource- and result-based governance

Though several of these aspects have already been discussed in the section above,
they need to be evaluated, particularly based on resource and results-based governance. Like many other countries, Sweden is currently developing systems in which
funding is to be dependent, at least to some degree, on the results produced. There is
every indication that this type of governance is of growing importance, in Sweden
and at EU level.
2.5.2 Opportunity to use direct research and education appropriations
for collaboration and utilization
The Swedish parliament makes decisions on appropriations (objects and amounts),
authorization to place orders, credit frameworks, lending and guarantees and so on.
The government defines its governance of resources through appropriation directives,
which also include financial terms and conditions. Direct appropriations to universities are targeted to basic research, co-funding of external research projects, strategic
research fields and graduate studies. These appropriations are estimated to have
amounted to SEK 14.5 billion in 2014. The majority are paid out directly to universities that conduct research. Each university has a basic resource (block grant) for
research and graduate studies.
Examples of amounts for 2015: Uppsala University SEK 2 billion. Lund University
SEK 2 billion. Chalmers tekniska högskola AB (Chalmers University of Technology)

100

received a grant of SEK 824 million.152 Direct appropriations account for less than
half of the resources that universities have for research. The rest consists of external
funding from national and international financiers, as well as from the business and
public sectors.
In its bill Prop. 2008/09:50, the government found reason to implement a new model
for resource allocation to research and education at postgraduate level. Under this
bill, funds have been granted to universities since 2010 based on their results, measured with the indicators “external funding” and “scientific publication and number
of cites”. External funding includes funding the university receives from all external
financiers. So the indicator reflects a large part of the universities’ collaboration with
the community.153 It has been submitted for comment to relevant parties, but no formal decision by the government has been made.
An importend understanding, which has also been clearly communicated by the
government, is that there is nothing to prevent universities from using their basic
appropriation for collaboration and promoting utilization. This is particularly true
considering the fact that this should be an integrated part of the universities’ primary
mission of research and education. The question, however, is how realistic this is.
In the KMP programme, we found every reason to open the door to universities’
shouldering this responsibility.
2.5.3 “External” research funding and expectations of impact
Over half the resources for university research consist of external funding. External
research financiers can be divided into four groups:
● Research-funding authorities
● Other national authorities
● Research foundations
● The EU
A large part of the resources provided by these research financiers is channelled to
universities.154 As discussed above, a system of programme- and project-based governance has been developed that increasingly embraces expectations for universities to
be able to collaborate and promote utilization.

152 Appropriation 2:69 Enskilda utbildningsanordnare på högskoleområdet [Individual Education Providers in
Higher Education].
153 Anders Flodström conducted an evaluation of research quality as a basis for allocation of resources on commission by the Ministry of Education and Research. See the evaluation entitled Prestationsbaserad resurstilldelning
för universitet och högskolor [Performance-based Resource Allocation for Universities].
154 The funds to research-funding authorities as well as other government authorities come via the state budget.
Some players also fund the utilization of research results. The business sector makes major investments in R&D, in
the neighbourhood of SEK 80 billion in 2014 A certain, minor portion of these investments consists of commissions
of universities.

101

Research-funding authorities
Many of the state’s resources for research are targeted first to research-funding
authorities, who then channel them in various forms to universities.155 There are
four authorities charged with funding research and development:
The Swedish Research Council funds basic research of top scientific quality in all
sciences. The majority of the council’s research funding is allocated competitively to
researchers and teams carrying out research on their own initiatives. Funding is
granted in competition with other researchers nationwide based on expert reviews of
grant applications. A large part of the council’s work is administering this process for
preparing and reviewing applications. The Swedish Research Council has a block
grant156 covering five appropriations for 2015. These are earmarked for research in
medicine & health care and science & technology. Amounts for all areas: SEK 5.6
billion.
Vinnova’s mission is to fund “needs-motivated research”. A block grant157 funds
such research as well as programme-associated costs, etc. Amount: SEK 2.4 billion
for 2015. In addition to funding needs-motivated research, Vinnova is also tasked
with developing efficient innovation systems. Part of this task involves running the
Key Player Programme, which aims to support the universities’ role in collaboration
and utilization. The funding comes from the appropriation described above. As of
2015, Vinnova has taken over responsibility for the international incubator programme.
Formas is the research council for environment, rural industries and community planning. It has three fields of operation — research funding, strategy and analysis, and
research communication. Funds are granted to top-quality scientific research, and
research that has social relevance to the council’s fields of responsibility. To a limited
degree, Formas — which is a part of the Ministry of the Environment and Energy —
can also fund development work.
Forte is the research council for health, working life and welfare, a government
authority under the Ministry of Health and Social Affairs. Funding research into
health care and social care is a new mission given to Forte in 2013. The government’s
initiative in this area aims to enhance scientific knowledge and meet the needs and
demands of the health care system.158

155 A significant proportion of research funding to national authorities is targeted to defence — SEK 1.1 billion in
2015. Other national authorities received SEK 4.8 billion for 2011. Research fields that receive significant resources
are energy, international aid, communications and space research. Some of these funds are further channelled to
universities.
156 Swedish Research Council 3:1 Research and Research Information.
157 Vinnova 1:2 Research and Development.
158 http://www.forte.se/sv/Om/Styrande-dokument/

102

Research foundations
The research foundations that were established with funds from the former wageearners’ investment funds contributed about SEK 1.2 billion to R&D in 2013. The
biggest foundations are:
● The Swedish Foundation for Strategic Research (SSF) supports scientific,
technological and medical research of strategic importance for Sweden’s
competitiveness.
● The Knowledge Foundation provides grants to universities for research that
is important to the development of the business sector and for expanded
contacts with the business sector, primarily in the surrounding regions of
the universities.
● The Swedish Foundation for Strategic Environmental Research (MISTRA)
supports environmental research.
● The Swedish Foundation for Health Care Sciences and Allergy Research,
(the Vårdal Foundation) promotes research and graduate studies in the
fields of health care and allergies and other sensitivities.
There are also other foundations and organizations that provide grants to research,
such as the Knut and Alice Wallenberg Foundation and the Swedish Cancer Society.
The EU
Sweden is currently participating in the eighth framework programme, Horizon 2020
(2014–2020). The summary of the Seventh Framework Programme shows that
Swedish participants received nearly EUR 1.7 billion. Sweden continues to remain
competitive, ranking in the top ten. As of October 2013, Swedish participation
amounted to 3.8% of all funds granted. Universities are the most successful group of
players in the framework programme, and have received 63% of the funds that have
been granted to Swedish recipients.159 As stated above, these funds are believed to
greatly influence expectations on the universities’ ability to collaborate and promote
utilization.
2.5.4 Resources targeting collaboration and utilization
Over time, support structures have been developed for universities’ promotion of utilization. Holding companies have existed since 1994–1995. These days, all universities are entitled to form a holding company with the permission of the government.
The holding companies are funded through capital contributions via the state budget,
generally through special decisions in appropriation directives. The holding companies’ operations are controlled by their articles of association and special owners’
directives.
159 Seventh Framework Programme of the European Community for research, technological development and
demonstration activities (2007–2013). Decision no 1982/2006/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of
18 December 2006.

103

Since 2012, there are Innovation Offices at eleven universities and one joint Innovation Office for four universities. The Riksdag decides what funds can be used for
capital contributions. Allocation between the offices was determined based on the
strategies each university submitted. Vinnova gave the government proposals for
allocation of the funds. In the first year, a total of SEK 50 million was distributed.
The appropriation for 2015 amounts to just over SEK 98 million. The terms and
conditions of the appropriation directives160 state that each institution must take full
responsibility for following the applicable regulations in connection with any payments to other types of associations outside the sphere of the authority, such as
holding companies; in particular, as regards the Swedish Procurement Act and rules
for state funding. Each university that has an Innovation Office must report its
strategies and objectives in its 2015 annual report.
The annual report should also indicate how the resources allocated to a given university were utilized for the Innovation Office’s operations. In addition, the following
must also be reported:
● number of ideas that have come in for evaluation or advising from
researchers or students, and how an idea is defined and delimited;
● number of ideas that have been passed along to the holding company
linked to the university; and number of ideas that were not taken to the
next level.
In budget proposal 2011/12:1 (expense area 16)161, the government pointed out that
there are research results that can potentially be utilized through commercialization,
but whose researchers are not pursuing their commercialization. To increase the proportion of research results that are commercialized, the government proposes that
universities and their holding companies receive specific funding for establishing idea
banks with research results that researchers for various reasons are not seeking to
commercialize. In its appropriation directives for 2012, Vinnova was tasked with
issuing a call for funding for building up idea banks at university holding companies,
no more than 5–6, with a budget totalling SEK 11 million. The aim is that the funds
will primarily be used for purchasing entire or parts of research results, as well as
managing innovation advice services and innovation-supporting services. Another
appropriation directive162 made additional capital contributions of SEK 8 million to
four holding companies for developing idea banks during 2012. From 2013, all idea
bank funds are handled as capital contributions to the eleven holding companies with
idea banks. For 2013 and 2014, a total of SEK 11 million was appropriated for this.
Prior to 2009, the main focus of the university-related funding system was on the
holding companies. Resources for utilization were therefore channelled to them.
There were certain problems and ambiguities in connection with the allocation of
resources to the holding companies, as described in the report “Åtgärder för en effektivare holdingbolagsstruktur” [Measures for a More Efficient Holding Company

160 Block grant 2:64, Särskilda utgifter inom universitet och högskolor m.m. [Specific Expenses at Universities],
(ap.20).
161 Budget proposition 2011/12:1 (expense area 16), p. 75.
162 Block grant 3:13 Särskilda medel för forskningsändamål [Special Funds for Research Purposes].

104

Structure] and its circulation comments.163 The ambiguities regarded the role of the
companies. Since then, the Swedish National Audit Office has pointed out problems
in the management of certain holding companies,164 such as the lack of ownership
directives and in some cases lack of professionalism.
Vinnova’s Key Actors Programme, which was established in the mid-2000s, led to
resources being allocated to universities’ internal departments. However, this resource
management was not fully coordinated with the rule-based governance, as it was not
expressly a part of the universities’ commitment to promote utilization of research
results prior to July 2009.
The question is what expectations exist for the use of these resources towards utilization. With the previous formulation of the commission to collaborate, it was difficult
to specify these expectations. In its report Tillväxt genom samverkan? [Growth
Through Collaboration?]165, the Swedish National Audit Office points out that the
objectives of the commission to collaborate are formulated in a general way in the
appropriation directives, which gives only limited guidance as to what specific activities are to be carried out. Above all, the government has managed universities by
requiring them to establish action programmes and strategies, but has not followed
up these requirements with a demand for reporting back.
Even with the new task as of 2009 to promote utilization, it is difficult to specify
expectations. In recent years, the focus has mainly been on building up the Innovation Offices as described in the latest research policy bill. However, the 2010
appropriation directives166 specify that these operations should be evaluated by the
specific university. Thus, universities are to generate short and long-term goals for
their operations. They are also to develop proposals for key figures and indicators to
facilitate monitoring of how well the operations achieve their objectives.167
2.5.5 Impact on the society as a basis for resource allocation
Government decision I:8 U2013/1700/F, 14 March 2013, states that the Swedish
Research Council — in collaboration with Forte, Formas and Vinnova — is to
investigate and propose suggestions for a model for allocating resources to universities that includes peer reviewing of the quality and relevance of their research. The
decision is based on Prop. 2012/13:30 (Forskning och Innovation [Research and
Innovation]), which describes the Swedish Research Council’s mission in section 6.2.4
(p.61) as “Future resource allocation system that may include peer review of research

163 See Prop. 2008/09:50, appendices 9 and 10.
164 E.g. reg. no. 32-2008-0761, reg. no. 32-2009-0631 and reg. no. 32-2010-0705. RiR 2005:2, p. 30-1.
165 RiR 2005:2, p. 30-31.
166 Appropriation 2:54.
167 It might also be mentioned that the Innovation Funding Enquiry in May 2012 has submitted its final report,
Innovationsstödjande verksamheter vid universitet och högskolor: Kartläggning, analys och förslag till förbättringar
[Assessment, Analysis and Suggested Improvements], SOU 2012:41.

105

quality and relevance”. This work involves “investigating and submitting proposals
for a resource allocation system that makes it possible to allocate resources containing peer reviews of universities’ quality of research, including both scientific assessments and assessments of the relevance and benefit to society of the research. The
task should also include proposing statistical data as a basis for the peer review of
research quality and relevance, among other things” (Prop. 2012/13:30, p. 63). This
task is to be carried out per research area, based on the prospects of each individual
research field, every four to six years. The model can, but does not have to, contain
indicators, and is to be reported on 31 December 2014.
The Swedish Research Council’s mission (the FOKUS model)
The work process began in November 2012–May 2013 with the appointment of a
project team consisting of seven people. A preliminary study of other countries with
similar systems was initiated to arrive at best practices for how the model should be
designed.168 In preparation for the task, a number of starting points were defined to
create a clear working structure. One starting point is that the model to be presented
must promote quality by stipulating that all assessment be done by panels. Indicators
may be included, but are not a requirement. Another starting point is that the model
must be comprehensible and transparent in order to create a better climate in which
research funds are allocated fairly and according to a clear system that must not get
“lost” in administration. Yet another starting point is that the model should include
all research fields. Through a broad interpretation of relevance and social benefit,
resource efficiency will be weighed against a sufficiently informative model, taking
consideration of quality assurance parameters. This process has now generated a
proposed model. The model is based on the establishment of panels to assess the
universities.169
To reduce the workload on individual researchers, as much existing data as possible
should be used when gathering background data for the panels. Staffing statistics,
doctoral students and doctoral degrees, financial statistics and publications are examples of existing data that can be used as background information for the panels.
Descriptions, case studies and strategies are examples of background information
that must be produced specifically for the FOKUS model. The goal is for the panels
to assess the universities, rather than organizational units or individual researchers.
The panels must be provided with specific background information so they can develop an understanding of the context.
168 The benefits and drawbacks of various systems were assessed through continuous dialogue and gathering of
comments within and outside of the academic world. A reference group consisting of 8 vice-chancellors of universities in Sweden (including vice-chancellor Pam Fredman) was appointed, along with an international reference
group for quality assessment. Following the study, the findings were discussed with other authorities in combination with meetings and hearings with universities to collect viewpoints and discuss the formulation of the model
from a peer-review perspective.
169 The three factors are to be assessed and resources allocated using 5 comprehensive scientific fields (natural
science, technology, medicine, social science and humanities) in the main panels and 24 underlying research fields
(shown here: http://www.vr.se/download/18.439efd48145f49ad5fb137/1399991198241/FOKUS+indelningsf%C3%B6rslag+140529.pdf, 2014-06-30) in the
subpanels. Thus, there are 24 subpanels, one for each research field, and 5 main panels, one for each scientific field.

106

Research Evaluation in Sweden (FOKUS)

Background
information
(not graded)

70%
Scientific
quality

15%
Qualityenhancing
factors

15%
Impact of the
research outside
of academia

Figure 23. The Swedish Research Council’s model

The most significant assessment is regarding scientific quality (70%). The panels’
review is intended to include both cutting-edge and average quality by looking at
both the top results and the quality/overall potential.170 The data provided by the
university must always include the research team’s own description, publication profile and expert review.
Quality-enhancing factors (15%) should be evaluated in each scientific field; the main
panels conduct an overall review based on two criteria: potential for renewal and
long-term benefits. Quality-enhancing factors that are described are replenishment
with new researchers including doctoral students, international and national collaboration within academia, mobility, equality, integration of research and teaching, and
access to a research infrastructure.
The third assessment of quality is carried out by the main panels and deals with the
impact of the research outside of academia (15%), which is defined as “research to
achieve social, financial, environmental or cultural effects and impact”. This is to be
assessed in every scientific area, with the criteria “range” and “significance”. The
background information to the panels will consist of case studies measuring the
impact of the research in each area.
The Swedish Research Council’s FOKUS model still lacks several critical parameters.
It is still unclear how members will be selected to evaluate scientific quality. Since this
is a major part of the total appropriation, it is important that this selection occurs in
a way that can be accepted by all universities and ensures the promotion of quality,
regardless of the research field. The composition of the panels is also a great challenge, especially considering how many panels need to be formed. It has also not yet
been determined how the results of the evaluation will be translated into resources.

170 The background information to the panels for these evaluations consists of several parts. A description from
the university that puts the research into context and describes its strengths in relation to the criteria. Each university has the opportunity to describe how its research is carried out and what strengths it has. This will be assessed
along with a publication profile, looking at the number of publications coming from the university. Aggregated
publication lists should be used, so that even artistic research can be assessed by its publications. To judge the cutting-edge quality of research, an expert review (reading or similar activity) should be conducted in all research
fields based on a selection of the material submitted. There is no more precise description of the selection of materials; this is a part of the continued work.

107

Vinnova’s mission
Vinnova’s mission171 is to work with the Swedish Research Council, Forte and
Formas to develop methods and criteria for evaluating performance and quality in
the universities’ collaboration with the surrounding community in terms of relevance
and utilization of research-based knowledge.172 According to Vinnova, the government has tasked it with developing a model for evaluating performance and quality
in the universities’ collaboration with the surrounding community. This evaluation
will focus on criteria in the following four perspectives on collaboration: “collaboration strategy, implementation, collaborative activities and results of collaboration”.
Vinnova’s model is intended to involve resources that are not currently a part of the
total resource allocation for research (which is included in the Swedish Research
Council’s model). However, it is not clear how the model relates to the Swedish
Research Council’s model or more concretely how it is intended to be launched.
Vinnova has developed a proposal for a model in which a panel of experts jointly
evaluate performance and quality through a self-assessment and an assessment by
collaborative partners. Resources will be allocated through a collective assessment by
an international panel of experts who do not base their decisions on individual background documents or indicators. The people on the panel should be experienced with
practical and strategic collaboration work and be very familiar with the Swedish university system and how it works. According to Vinnova, collaboration will not be
evaluated as a separate area, but as an integrated part of the universities’ core
processes: education, research and accessibility173 of knowledge. Quality and performance in collaboration will be evaluated based on four perspectives:
● Strategy — a clear and well-established strategy for the universities’ collaboration with the community; objectives are determined at management
level and follow-up is a part of the development.
● Implementation — the link to internal priorities such as qualifications and
resource allocation, in which resources for collaboration and the promotion
of utilization must be a part of the university’s core processes.
Collaboration and utilization should be rewarded in the internal resource
allocation system and at recruiting and recording of qualifications; at the
same time, the strategy should be followed up and used to develop internal
processes.
● Activities — scope, development and follow-up through the involvement of
partners and other parts of the community in core processes that include
continuous follow-up and development.
● Results — the results of collaboration as regards the university’s development and the creation of value in the community through the development
and impact on core processes internally at the university.

171 Appropriation directive 2013-02-28, N2013/1162FIN.
172 The background to this task is defined in Prop. 2012/13:30 (Forskning och Innovation [Research and
Innovation]), which indicates that this task is linked to the Swedish Research Council's commission to develop a
future resource allocation system as set out in section 6.2.4 of the same bill.
173 The fact that Vinnova is introducing a new concept in this context has been pointed out as peculiar.

108

The idea is that the panel of experts will summarize this evaluation by assigning
points on a scale of 1–5 from the different perspectives, where 2–5 points are entitling of resource grants. A university that receives 0 or 1 point receives no resources.
Once the total points are calculated, they are combined into a collective evaluation of
the university’s quality and performance in collaboration with the community.174
The evaluation is intended to be primarily based on self-evaluations conducted by the
universities.

2.6 Conclusions
Under the Higher Education Act, universities have received expanded responsibilities
to promote utilization of research results as an integrated part of their activities. As
noted above, most Swedish universities are public authorities, which means that the
commitment to collaborate and promote utilization must be managed within this
organizational form. The universities’ own actions will thus constitute an element of
state governance. In the KMP programme, we analyzed the governance of the universities to develop a framework for a model for universities’ idea-and knowledge-based
collaboration. The government’s governance sets the frameworks of the public
authority model. Within these frameworks, individual universities have the opportunity, and as we see it the obligation, to develop their own model. We feel that the
governance methods for this need to be developed at university level.
The governance by objectives at university level
Universities need to make it clear that their organizations have a social responsibility
to promote utilization. The Higher Education Act addresses universities as organizations. It is reasonable to see promoting utilization as a part of academics’ jobs as
state employees, and to see this promotion as working for the best interests of society. This clarification may seem unnecessary, but it highlights why it is natural for a
university to take greater responsibility for managing knowledge assets. We have
found a clear need to define in concrete terms what is meant by promoting utilization
at university level. The government’s existing governance by objectives is not sufficient. Universities need to specify what other activities they typically view as promoting utilization. As we see it, this is about developing the ends-and-means definitions
discussed above. It is particularly important right now to define objectives for which
activities should be prioritized in promoting utilization (utilization objectives) and
how the universities’ organizational ability needs to be developed (objectives for
organizational capability). The universities should work to actively apply the
Regulation of Internal Governance and Control in order to develop their organizational capability to promote utilization.175

174 The plan for the pilot project is to weigh the different perspectives on collaboration equally.
175 See more about this in section 3.4.

109

The state’s rule-based governance at university level
Our analysis of the state’s rule-based governance shows many uncertainties in the
universities’ prospects of promoting utilization. Challenges exist at several levels. One
likely conclusion is that the public authority model is not fully adapted to universities
in general and to their utilization activities in particular. At the same time, it is obvious that many of the rules developed for public authorities may be of great significance for developing the universities’ organizational capability. Therefore, it is reasonable to assume that the current situation with the government’s facilitation/management of utilization of research results requires a more developed operating model
at university level. As we see it, the university should place special importance on
pointing out and managing various operational risks related to promoting utilization.
Particular focus should be placed on the risks of not facilitating utilization. Assessing
various risks associated with operational targets can highlight the impact of the
state’s rule-based governance in general. The shortcomings, if you will, of the public
authority model will be a natural part of risk management.
The Higher Education Act does not specify the responsibilities of the management,
administration and researchers in promoting utilization. One key element in the
development of the universities’ organizational capability is thus the allocation and
clarification of responsibilities. The recommendation of the EU, among others, highlights the importance of universities taking strategic responsibility for knowledge
transfer and innovation. Universities are largely governed by the academic profession,
which means that researchers and teachers largely determine the universities’ activities. It is not clear what strategic responsibility would mean for a university organization. Developing norms that clarify and allocate responsibility between different
“power spheres” in the universities is an important step. One central elements of this
norm development is the researchers’ responsibility as public employees. The expanded responsibility to promote utilization also ought to affect the extent and focus of
the employee’s obligation to work. Conversely, the employer’s responsibility for how
we manage collaboration is also critical. Questions about conflicts of interest and
potential bias come to the fore. It becomes increasingly clear to researchers and others how they can utilize research results in the form of secondary employment. In all,
this would lead to a clarification of the universities’ role and thereby also contribute
to their autonomy.
One crucial element of organizational ability is how knowledge assets are managed in
university operations. In the 2008 research bill, the government declared an intent to
introduce a reporting system regarding commercially interesting research results. This
has not yet been achieved. One reasonable conclusion is that individual universities
need to decide how they intend to manage knowledge assets at an organizational
level. This is directly linked with how universities aim to facilitate and support
researchers and the academic environments to promote utilization. It is important
that universities clarify the researchers’ incentives. One key conclusion here is that
universities need to differentiate between situations in which they intend to be
involved in the possible utilization of an asset, and situations where they need access
to the asset, for example in a research context. The simple fact that the university as
an organization is promoting the utilization of knowledge assets does not necessarily

110

mean that they have the right to use the asset. One key issue regarding the management of knowledge assets is how to manage and ensure secrecy where necessary.
Programme- and project-based governance at university level
It is clear that the universities’ role as actors and contracting parties on international
arenas for research and collaboration is of growing importance. There are great
expectations for universities to be able to manage portfolios of intellectual assets as
well as contracts. In contractual relationships universities must formulate strategies
for open access and the promotion of other utilization. The universities themselves
are not research financiers. Thus, it may be possible to set up specific requirements
for the management of collaboration processes on more of a project basis. In fact,
this is already being done.

Resource- and result-based governance at university level
It is difficult to separate resource-based governance from other types of governance.
Evidence suggests that universities have reason to set aside significantly larger
resources for promoting utilization and collaboration. Universities are relatively free
to do this. There is no government directive to prevent universities from utilizing
their basic funding appropriations. Universities do need to ensure that the programme and project resources set aside in externally funded research programmes for
the promotion of utilization are actually used for that purpose. Further, universities
should apply for external funding to develop their utilization promotion activities.
There is also every reason to believe that the universities’ funding in the future will be
partly based on their application of various indicators that show the social impact of
their research. It is important from the universities’ perspective to develop an understanding of what indicators are reasonable, not least so they are able to influence
state governance of their activities.

111

3. Collaboration and utilization in
academic environments
3.1 Expectations and preconditions in academic environments
Evaluation of academic environments’ management of research results to clarify
both how they promote utilization and the university’s need for organizational
development
The KMP programme analyzed several research groups’ knowledge assets (see Annex
2). A key element has been identifying and evaluating the expectations and needs that
individual researchers, research groups and management have for their knowledge
assets.
We learned in the KMP programme that evaluating intellectual assets is an effective
way of initiating and orchestrating a learning and development process. Encountering
and evaluating the knowledge assets of research groups inevitably leads to various
types of ends-means discussions. What do we want to achieve with our knowledge
assets and what means are available? As has already been concluded, an evaluation
of research groups’ knowledge assets sets the stage for clarifying both opportunities
and thresholds for utilization and collaboration.

In what ways and to what extent
do academic environments work
to promote the utilization of their
knowledge resources and what
expectations are there concerning
the further development of
this utilization?

Knowledge is
utilized by making it
available in open
contractual networks

What obstacles to/risks are there
of the university not fulﬁlling
its task of promoting utilization
and collaboration as an integrated
part of academic environments’
activities?

Knowledge is
utilized through
innovation processes

Knowledge is
utilized by making it
applicable to specific stakeholders

Knowledge is
utilized by making it
available to the public

Figure 24. Evaluation of expectations and preconditions in academic environments

112

A central analytical task has been evaluating and categorizing ways of promoting
utilization in the academic setting. On this basis and through the KMP programme,
we have held an ongoing dialogue about the challenges and risks that the university
must manage within academic environments. In the case of larger projects, for which
we have conducted a more extensive analysis, we have built support for the analysis
at both faculty and university management levels.
Assessments of knowledge assets inevitably leads to an analysis of the academic environment itself. One lesson learned is that such environments far from always have a
consensus about which utilization activities are important. To this end, the KMP programme has used management of knowledge assets as a way of better understanding
what enables a more society-oriented sense of responsibility. It was thus important to
relate management of knowledge assets to the operational goals of the university and
research groups and the risks involved if these are not realized. In this context, it is
important to stress the difference between identifying risks in general and identifying
risks that challenge the conditions for fulfilment of the operational goals for utilization.
All in all, this part involves evaluating the expectations of researchers and academic
environments regarding how the university as an organization can enable the task of
promoting utilization and collaboration. In this respect, we are also interested in
examining the ability of researchers to take an integrated responsibility within the
framework of the academic environment. What challenges/risks need then to be
managed? The evaluation resulted in a model for analysis of the ability in academic
environments to promote utilization, a risk management model.
The presentation will be structured as follows. Firstly, I will explain why we chose to
focus on academic environments and describe how the analyses of the environments’
knowledge assets have been carried out (section 3.2). Thereafter, I will review what
lessons were learned about how the academic environments work towards utilization
of research results. We have identified a number of logics for various forms of utilizeds activities within the KMP programme. In this way it is possible to evaluate
which goals and means are being pursued or should be pursued within academic
environments (section 3.3). The risks that the university needs to manage to promote
utilization and collaboration are assessed on the basis of the various logics (section
3.4).

3.2 Academic environments with the ability to collaborate and
promote utilization
An overarching and consistent hypothesis for the KMP programme is the collaborative tradition developed over the years among the Swedish universities needs to be
safeguarded. At the University of Gothenburg, developing an innovation office to
identify and promote ideas that have commercial potential was not an obvious move.
Instead, the ambition was to contribute to an innovation office that enabled
researchers to develop their social responsibility. This hypothesis viewed it reasonable
for the scientists and academic environments to have the ability to collaborate and
promote utilization, based on some sort of academic responsibility.

113

3.2.1 Researcher dialogues about the challenges of collaborating and promoting
utilization
The starting point for the KMP programme was to attempt to understand what it
means for researchers and teachers to assume responsibility for collaboration and
utilization as an integrated aspect of academic activities. During the course of the
programme, we have held a number of seminars and discussions, to which we invited
people from through out the university. We have also held a number of training
sessions in which we have had the opportunity to discuss researchers’ expectations
of the university’s organizational capacity for collaboration and promotion of utilization.176
It was important in our discussions to determine under what conditions researchers
feel that they have to promote utilization and to collaborate, both within and outside
the framework of the university. As early as the first stage of the programme, we
were able to identify a number of general and recurring arguments. Somewhat simplified, three main arguments emerged.
1) The need for a clearer and more well-equipped support system for academic
environments
We learned that there is a lot of interest for the support system to be able to advise
and assist researchers on utilization of their research. There were, and continue to be,
many voices that question in various ways the support provided by different players.
A common view is that there are too many players who are too poorly coordinated
and sometimes poorly equipped for the purpose.
QUESTION: HOW WELL DOES THE INNOVATION SUPPORT SYSTEM
CURRENTLY WORK?
Well, I think it has been very messy. There have been very many diﬀerent
stakeholders dealing with these questions. Each has had diﬀerent or very
many diﬀerent views on how to proceed and what to focus on. In some
cases, there have been very strong opinions about how this should be done.
Perhaps without being completely familiar with the project's breadth.
Anna-Carin Olin, Adjunct Professor at the Institute of Medicine

Our interpretation of these opinions is that researchers want greater clarity about
what support researchers can receive. Moreover, they also want more clarity about
the distribution of roles between different players. Furthermore, there are clear expectations that those tasked with providing advice and assistance should understand the
researchers’ situations. It was concluded that the support system need to be integrated into academic operations. When a university intends to develop an innovation
office, it should not just be about increasing the professional ability to transfer
“ideas” to businesses.
176 See also chapter 7 on the Innovation Academy.

114

2) The Need for Greater Clarity about What We Mean by Collaboration and
Utilization
Another factor which influenced the design of the KMP programme touched on the
concepts used. For many researchers, it is not obvious how to relate to such phenomena such as innovation. The very concept of utilization tends to be perceived as cumbersome. Even the relatively neutral and more comprehensive concept of collaboration was, and still is, a subject of discussion. We also detected clear scepticism among
many researchers to the concepts presented by the KMP programme, including the
concepts of knowledge assets, intellectual assets and knowledge management platforms.

QUESTION: WHAT DO WE MEAN BY UTILIZATION OF RESEARCH?
Here, I think we need to clarify a concept ﬁrst of all, what we mean by
utilization and collaboration in our context. Otherwise it is risky to come and
talk about utilization for arts students. That they think that this is selling out,
now we are going to start selling our research, we are not going to research
any more, but instead make ourselves useful, ﬁnancial justiﬁcations and such.
But that’s certainly not what it’s about. Instead, we need to take a real look at
research in the humanities and ask the question: “How are we useful?”
We know that we are useful. We have written books about being useful.
But that is not enough. If we are to make it a natural aspect, then we have to
actually discuss these issues properly and soon.
Jan Lif, Head of the Department of Philosophy, Linguistics and Theory of Science

Since “collaboration” and “promotion of utilization”, above all, are highly normative concepts, they naturally need to be clearly defined. Within the KMP programme,
we realized the importance of demonstrating a broad variety of utilization and collaborative activities. What does it mean to collaborate and promote utilization from
an academic perspective?
3) The need for developed interaction between support systems and academic
decision-makers
Another opinion with major impact on the KMP programme is that the support system is too disconnected from academic decision-makers when it comes to promoting
utilization. A recurring experience among researchers is that the academic leadership
does not necessarily feel any great responsibility for researchers’ collaboration and
utilization processes.
A recurring discussion is how much a support system should be intended to encourage academics’ private interests and how much it should act in the interest of the university as an organization. To what extent should researchers expect that the university will actively support them in private utilization of their research results, i.e. as a
side job?

115

QUESTION: WHAT IS YOUR EXPERIENCE OF WORKING WITH THE
RESEARCH AND INNOVATION OFFICE?
The work itself was incredibly interesting to me. New people show up who do
not know what GOArt is and then you are forced to focus: a new group of people,
what do they bring to the table. How do I explain what we are? Then, for once,
there was time to discuss in depth. What is our database, is it infrastructure to
develop, what did we learn at Örgryte, how can it be passed on? So the actual
process was very clear, but then I have not seen any link to who initiated it and
how it should be managed in the future. For example, I do not believe that the
Faculty Board or the board have any idea that this has been done, let alone how
it would be useful and the department has hardly any idea about it either.
So you feel disconnected. At the same time, I notice that it is on par with what we
usually get from the Research and Innovation Oﬃce. High quality, very competent
support, but many times disconnected from from the chain of command.
Johan Norrback, Senior Lecturer, Academy of Music and Drama

Within the KMP programme, we interpreted opinions about the university’s shortcomings as expectations that the university should develop its organizational capacities and meet the statutory task of integrating collaboration and utilization processes
in academic activities. This includes the expectation that university managers increase
their accountability. The interesting question is how will this happen? The University
of Gothenburg has long valued weighing and managing researchers’ legitimate interest in private utilization in accordance with the academic exception on the one hand
and the university’s interests as a public authority on the other.
3.2.2 Evaluation of the academic environment as a knowledge management platform
The KMP programme intended to create a deeper understanding of the expectations
that academic environments have for the university’s organizational ability to collaborate and to promote utilization. We also wanted to assess what potential the
research groups consider they have for collaboration and promotion of utilization.
Even before launching the KMP programme, we noted that for an academic environment to be able to manage various forms of research collaboration in parallel and to
commit to working towards utilization, their operations need to be managed as
knowledge assets (now often referred to as background knowledge and project
results). It seemed evident to us that developing an academic environment and being
able to assume greater social responsibility requires internal organizational capabilities manage knowledge assets in relation to a number of stakeholders. The academic
environment must be developed as a knowledge management platform. At this stage
it was, however, unclear how this should be designed or developed. What would the
university need to do for researchers and academic environments to be able to handle
this challenge? Nor was it clear why and how researchers should regard management
of knowledge assets as a given task. We had also noted that the expression “knowledge asset”, even when we explained that we were talking about an objectified
research result, tended to deter some researchers.

116

Evaluation for learning and dialogue
Many analyses of knowledge assets in academic environments were conducted within
the framework of the KMP programme. These analyses were based in part on interviews with researchers and others working in academic environments, and in part on
analyses of various types of knowledge sources, such as “Web of Science”, bibliometric information, patent information, business data, etc. It has been important to gain
a deeper understanding of the academic environment and its resources. A whole
group would often be involved in these analyses.177
The various analytical projects primarily focused on evaluation and learning. At the
same time, it was essential that the projects would help researchers in the short term.
Otherwise it would be difficult for them to regard management of knowledge assets
as essential. Although the analyses were adapted to each environment to some extent,
they were consistently based on the same basic format. The analysis work was based
on a framework developed within the Center for Intellectual Property (CIP) at the
University of Gothenburg and Chalmers University of Technology (for more details,
see Part 3). All evaluations have basically passed through five steps. See below.

Data
Databases
Content
Data correlations
Theoretical frameworks
Inventions
Software/tools

Figure 25. CIP’s categories of knowledge assets178
Step 1. Identification and assessment of knowledge assets
A first step is to identify and evaluate what constitutes a research group’s knowledge
assets, i.e. important research results. This is a matter of first creating an overview of
the academic environment itself and what it is engaged in. Then, there must be a
close interaction process with the research team to identify what research results
should be managed as knowledge assets. We used the programme developed by CIP
for the identification, evaluation and management of knowledge assets.
When the knowledge assets have been identified, they must be evaluated from a
“value perspective”. The interaction between the interviews and the analysis of
various sources of knowledge is very important. Typical questions asked include:
177 Students from the ICM course have played an important role in assessing the KMP programme. These students
evaluated knowledge assets in several academic environments every year.
178 This is discussed in more detail in Chapter 9.

117

● How important are the research results for the academic environment?
● What need is there for further research?
● How great a potential is there for utilization?

The assets are then evaluated from a control perspective. Questions asked here
include:
● Who can claim the rights to the assets, and who can claim the right to utilize
the assets?
● How are assets managed in cooperation agreements?
● Is it possible to control the assets by copyright or by other means?
● Is there a requirement for confidentiality?
● Is there a need in general to use the assets in academia?
To summarize, in the first step we have identified research results that possess some
form of public benefit and the control options that are available. An example for
illustration purposes can be found in the section “Step 1. Identification and evaluation of knowledge assets” in Annex 5.

Step 2. Evaluation of the academic environment’s position
Once the analysis of knowledge assets is complete, it is natural to begin clarifying
and defining the position that the captured assets offer the academic environment.
What is the research position, collaboration position and utilization position? Asking
these questions regularly can help promote a fruitful dialogue. The analyses performed to this end are not as homogeneous as those of the first step. Their common
denominator is using different sources of knowledge to describe how their own
position is related to other players’ positions in some type of arena for research and
innovation. A recurring ambition has been to discover which players hold strong
positions and who make potentially interesting collaboration partners.
Gradually, it became clear that there is a great need for additional information in this
regard. The university has only started to a limited extent to explore all the different
sources of knowledge available. It was, therefore, natural to initiate collaboration
between the Research and Innovation Office, the University Library, and the Swedish
Patent and Registration Office. In turn, this led to an improvement in knowledge
bases over time.179
Step 3. Evaluation of utilization opportunities
The analyses performed in steps one and two served as a basis for discussions on
how the academic environment can and intends to collaborate and promote utilization of its research. It was important for the evaluation team to analyse what could
be possible when it comes to different utilization activities, but also be a counterpart
179 An illustrative example can be found in the section “Step 2. Evaluation of the academic environment's position”
in Annex 5.

118

for discussions about potentially interesting options. How can an academic environment contribute to the created assets resulting in as much public benefit as possible?
Where in lays public responsibility?
By identifying research results as knowledge assets, we enable a more managementoriented approach to collaboration and utilization processes. We tried to demonstrate
that being able to manage knowledge assets supports the researchers’ utilization
processes. By regularly basing the projects on the academic environments has made it
natural to discuss utilization as an integral part of operations. Provided support has
often focused on applications for external research funding and research collaboration. Management of knowledge assets is an important element in clarifying the relevance of research.180
Step 4. Evaluation of challenges faced by the research team
A fourth step, which was not always explicit in the specific assessments, is a more
systematic review of the challenges facing the research group/academic environment.
What needs addressing for the academic environment to be able to responsibly promote translating concrete assets created by research into benefits for society? This
made it possible to initiate a discussion about what kind of support is needed.
Important issues here include what is expected of university management on different
levels and the administration. It is also useful to discuss the importance of external
support structures. Overall, the aim was to evaluate the requirement for academic
ability and institutional development. The analysis of governmental governance
helped us to eventually see that the aim is to identify different types of risk, i.e.
various circumstances under which the operation’s goal of promoting utilization is
not met or is compromised.
To make this step clear, we determined in dialogue with the vice-chancellor and
deans to select a limited number of environments where we could focus more closely
on evaluation of challenges and risks. If possible, we wanted to include one highly
significant academic environment at each of the faculties.181
Step 5. The process of reaching conclusions
After the evaluations were completed, we continued our dialogues about what we
learned. Our main objective was to understand how the university as a whole promotes utilization. In some cases, we conducted follow-up interviews with key individuals. Gradually, we were able to systematize different logics for discussion. In principle, we can say that the assessments made it possible for us to identify the issues that
are relevant for researchers to discuss and adopt a position to. The ambition was to
limit ourselves to developing a model that academic environments can use when
assessing to what extent utilization is promoted. The more evaluations we performed
180 See section “Step 3. Evaluation of utilization possibilities” in Annex 5.
181 See section “Step 4. Evaluation of challenges for the research group” in Annex 5.

119

of different academic environments, the more confident we became that it is possible
to achieve more or less comprehensive models. It also became gradually possible to
separate and systematize the different forms of operational risks.

3.3 Four logics for “promotion of utilization”
3.3.1 Utilization that creates value in itself
The purpose of this part of the KMP programme is to understand what expectations
the academic environment has for the university’s organizational ability to promote
utilization. Eventually, it became clear that the key to a deeper insight in this is to
evaluate how academic environments utilize their research results. Our focus on
knowledge assets made it possible to distinguish four logics for “promotion of utilization”. We have learnt from the KMP programme that all four logics for the promotion of utilization can be seen as alternative objectives/means for academic environments. We chose to see them as logics because we realized that they can be considered to create value in themselves. Promoting the wide availability of a research
result is a goal considered to create value in itself when it is fulfilled. This is also true
for the goal of ensuring that research results particularly relevant for specific public
actors are in fact pertinent to them. These goals cannot necessarily be fulfilled simultaneously. If working towards the latter goal of making research results applicable to
specific players, there is a great risk that it counteracts the first goal of making
research results generally available. When faced with determining how to promote
utilization, you are forced to manage one or more conflicting goals.
This is particularly evident with the goal of promoting utilization by using the knowledge in innovation processes. This is clearly a goal in itself and can often be seen as

The academic environment promotes
the utilization of the research result
by making it available in open
contractual networks

Knowledge assets are managed
as portfolios of background
knowledge, project results, etc.
in contractually- based
knowledge platforms
Contractual networks

The academic environment promotes
the utilization of research results
through innovation processes
Innovation processes
The academic environment promotes
the utilization of the research result
by making it available and applicable
for speciﬁc stakeholders

Applicable for specific stakeholders

Knowledge assets are
packaged as ideas,
which can be developed
into innovations
Knowledge assets are managed as
background and foreground
– may require patentability
or other control mechanism
for stakeholders

The academic environment
promotes the research result’s
utilization by making it as
widely available as possible
Publicly available

Figure 26. Four logics for academic environments that promote utilization

120

Knowledge assets are
transferred to the public
domain, without
intellectual property
restrictions

the most effective means of protecting the overall objectives of sustainability, competitiveness and growth.
The conflicting objectives when making research results public is obvious, as is also
the common conflict of wanting to make research results pertinent for users they
target. It has been apparent in the KMP programme that there is now a new goal
related to the promotion of utilization, namely utilization through contractual (open)
networks. This led us to begin talking about platforms for knowledge management.
We also believe that this logic makes it possible to manage goal conflicts in a more
structured way. It is also increasingly clear how intertwined research collaborations
are with utilization processes.
Every logic, i.e. every utilization goal, presupposes and requires its own particular
form of organizational ability. It goes without saying that the intention of making
research results available to all humanity requires more than ensuring formation of a
company and a number of new jobs. Much of the work of the KMP programme has
revolved around the organizational ability to promote utilization according to the
four logics. The fundamental evaluation work clarified the specific goal according to
the logic. It then analyzed the typical tasks required to achieve this goal. We realized
early on that only after we gained a relatively clear picture in this regard was it is
possible to discuss and determine the need for organizational ability. Developing
organizational ability for academic environments that use knowledge assets is therefore a goal in itself, which is the means of actually achieving the goal of promoting
utilization.
All in all, we observed that identifying the logics meant that we could gain a relatively comprehensive understanding from the evaluations of how the university can promote utilization. Finally, we were able to design a more or less holistic model for
academic environments to evaluate to the extent to which utilization is promoted. We
believe that this model clarifies the expectations on the university’s organizational
ability.

3.3.2 Promoting utilization by making knowledge available to the public
Probably the most common way to promote utilization of research results is to make
it available to the public, or if you prefer, humanity. As a goal, the ambition to put
research results into the public domain creates value in itself. When a researcher publishes his or her research findings it promotes utilization. From a basic research perspective, it is tempting to argue that the university’s organizational responsibility does
not necessarily need to go further. Experience gained from the KMP programme indicates that this form of utilization, however, is not what researchers normally associates with utilization. Rather, it is a natural part of actual research and educational
processes. Thus, one conclusion is that this logic has been integrated into the
University’s activities for a long time. Indirectly, we discovered that we can distinguish a number of sub-logics for how the availability takes place within the framework of this logic. We were especially interested in pinpointing the concrete means of
achieving the utilization-promotion objective by making the results publicly available.

121

Scientific availability
Publishing articles in international journals is typically associated with making
research results public. Other means are the publication of books and reports.
Authoring and presenting conference papers are additional ways for making research
results public. For researchers, this scientific way of making results public is a common approach.

Education-based availability
One of the means to meet this goal is to ensure that research results permeate academic education. A given approach to academic education is that it must be carried
out on a scientific basis. Writing textbooks and developing other educational materials are a fundamental way of making research results generally available. Students
become carriers of knowledge assets and are responsible for their utilization.
Activities such as career counselling, career support, labour market days, and alumni
activities could be seen as indirect collaboration elements that focus on students’ ability to utilize scientific knowledge. It is even more evident that this form of promoting
utilization is an integral part of operations.
Availability through popular science
Popular science publications and now the dissemination of information through the
Internet and other digital media are additional means for utilizing research results.
Open lectures, science fairs, science radio and TV shows are also ways of making
research results widely available. Social media opens up a variety of creative opportunities for this.

TO WHAT EXTENT DO WE WITHIN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT PROMOTE THE UTILIZATION
OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS BY MAKING THEM AS WIDELY PUBLICLY AVAILABLE AS POSSIBLE?

1. To what extent do we promote scientific availability?
a) Number of published and planned i) scientiﬁc articles, ii) books, iii) reports and iv) conference papers?
2. To what extent do we promote education-based availability?
a) Number of completed and planned lectures, seminars, etc. where research results are presented?
b) Number of published and planned text books and other educational materials?
3. To what extent do we promote popular science-based availability?
a) Number of published and planned popular science books?
b) Number of debate articles and extent of participation in public dialogue where research results are presented?
c) Extent of information about research results on websites, etc.?
d) Extent of posts about research results in social media?
e) Extent of scientiﬁc TV/radio presentations where research results are presented?
Overall: To what extent do we conduct activities that lead to research results becoming truly publicly available,
i.e. becoming a part of the public domain (without intellectual property restrictions), thus allowing them to be utilized?

Figure 27. Model for self-assessing how academic environments promote utilization by
making knowledge available to the public

122

Academic environments with the organizational ability to make research results
widely available
It is important that academic environments have an organizational ability to make
research results widely available. Clearly the ambition of academic publishing is the
most stimulated approach. Whether publication of research results actually makes
them generally available often seems irrelevant. From a KMP perspective, increasing
public responsibility evolves out of the discussion of how much academic environments can and should improve their efforts to make research results more widely
available.
Significant preparation is often required before research results can be made widely
available and useful for society, i.e. that they led to direct utilization, though this is
difficult to generalize. This is because different types of research differ significantly.
It could be argued that third-parties merely having knowledge of the research is, in
some sense, utilization of the results. The publication of handbooks and manuals
may be appropriate ways of making specific results applicable and publicly available.
The KMP programme noted that remarkably little work seems to have been done
to make research results widely available. Certainly, it appears that more and more
people are concerned with communication within the administration. However, it
is rare for academic environments to have developed plans and programmes for
disseminating research results to a wider audience. The scientists often have different
perceptions about what is strategically important and what should be done to make
knowledge assets available.182

3.3.3 Promote utilization by making research findings applicable to specific
users and stakeholders
A second logic for promoting utilization, which becomes evident when academic
environments are evaluated based on how to manage knowledge assets, is the efforts
to make research applicable to and thus help highlight and resolve actual problems of
specific stakeholders. The objective is to ensure that applied research is actually put
into practice. Utilization activities focus on ensuring that those who want and gain
benefit from research results are given access to them in the correct form. This goal
can also be considered a form of value creation. The more the university conducts
applied research and the more clearly the stakeholders of certain research are identified, the more important it becomes that research results are applicable. Medical and
technical research in particular have a long tradition of close collaboration in which
industrial enterprises and other public stakeholders expect research results that can
be used to cure diseases, solve social problems and so on. Nowadays, this practical
aspiration is a generally accepted approach throughout the university.

182 An illustrative example is found in the section “Academic Environments with the Organizational Ability to Make
Research Results Publicly Available” in Annex 6.

123

Scientific accessibility for applicability
By initiating research collaborations and financing commissioned research, businesses
and other stakeholders in society can ensure access to research results. The life
science and engineering fields speak of translational/translative research, which
promotes translating research results into applicable solutions. Collaborations and
commissioned research appear to be appropriate means applying research results
intended to solve specific problems and address specific challenges.
The KMP programme determined that a well thought out objective of increased
public responsibility is particularly important within this logic. Groups of researchers
can reach agreement around selected scientific issues and work together to ensure
that their research results actually affect the external actors who deal with the issues
in practice. Here, there is a relatively long tradition of dealing with contract research
and collaborative research as integral parts of operations.

Making research applicable through education
We can distinguish making research available through education as another
approach. Commissioned education and other targeted educational methods for specific stakeholders can be effective ways of promoting utilization. Specific stakeholders
in society can commission the university to transfer research results using educational
tools. Such aids can include manuals, check-lists, support systems, tools and so on.
Making research available through education seems increasingly common.

TO WHAT EXTENT DO WE WITHIN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT PROMOTE THE UTILIZATION
OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS BY MAKING THEM AVAILABLE AND APPLICABLE
TO INTENDED/PROPSPECTIVE STAKEHOLDERS?
1. To what extent do we promote scientific availability?
Extent to which we transfer research results through:
a) Commissioned research?
b) Collaborative research?
2. To what extent do we promote education-based availability?
Extent to which we transfer research results through:
a) Occupational training?
b) Degree projects?
c) Commissioned education?
d) Handbooks, instructions, manuals, etc.?
3. To what extent do we promote project-based availability?
Extent to which we transfer research results through:
a) Development projects?
b) Partnerships?
c) Licensing and consulting services?
d) Lobbying?
Overall: To what extent do we conduct activities that lead to research results becoming available/applicable
to intended/prospective stakeholders, thus allowing them to be utilized?

Figure 28. Model for self-assessing how academic environments promote utilization through
making knowledge applicable to stakeholders

124

Making research applicable through projects
Consulting assignments taken on by individual researchers can also be a valuable and
relevant way of making research available for practical use. Some scientists may have
significant opportunities to take on well-paid side projects, in which research results
are transferred through consulting, advising and other ways. This type of work may
be covered by the expanded right to secondary employment for researchers. However,
the research team may also promote utilization in this way within the framework of
its academic work. This could even involve more comprehensive development and
implementation commissions.
It could also involve promoting utilization through licensing. For example, developing new drugs requires extensive investments, which is why utilization often requires
patentability. This, in turn, places demands on the ability of the researchers and the
university to manage research results, such as patentable inventions. In some cases
utilization requires not only that the research is available to specifically selected parties, but also the protection of intellectual property for results when they are to be
exploited. For specified research findings are to result in public benefit, a specific
party may need to have control over the results to make commercial exploitation
possible. In other cases, it may be relevant to license research results to a number of
interested parties to stimulate and facilitate their application.
Academic environments with the organizational ability to make research results
applicable
In terms of developing organizational capacity, we have seen the addition of several
channels over the years that support collaboration between universities and society to
facilitate knowledge transfer. It is not uncommon for academic environments to have
established channels for knowledge transfer, particularly through individual research
initiatives. Some organizations have developed various forms of partnership and
other means to help transfer research findings in a more organized fashion. This is,
however, more the exception than the rule.
A strongly supported insight by the KMP programme is that the researchers working
to help outside parties gain access to the latest research results feel that their work is
not valued enough and even sometimes is unfunded. We observe that there is a great
need to encourage and develop these means of promoting utilization through the academic environment. Undoubtedly, individual researchers are already taking this very
approach. Even so, there is a clear need for improving the organizational capabilities
of the university.183
3.3.4 Promoting utilization through innovative projects
The most important individual logic for inspiring discussions within the KMP pro183 An illustrative example can be found in the section “Academic Environments with Organizational Ability to
Make Research Results Applicable' in Annex 6.

125

gramme has been when utilization occurs by applying research results in an innovative project. Here, the objective is to ensure that the research results actually lead to
new innovations. Utilization may even require the establishment of new businesses.
It is far from always that existing companies and existing social structures are able to
or even want to integrate new research. An important lesson, particularly from the
entrepreneurial schools associated with the university, is that extensive entrepreneurial and social transformation processes are required for radical new ideas to be realized, i.e. to be utilized. It may be a tautology that research results that change society
require socially transforming action. At the same time it shows how important this
third logic is. Innovative logic would seem to be of critical importance, perhaps even
pivotal, in the generation of entrepreneurial ability and drive. This can apply both to
natural or social science research results. That the goal is value creation in itself is
clear, particularly as its realization could mean new jobs and contribute to economic
growth.
At the same time, the fact that the university is clearly already promoting utilization
in this way and contributing to new jobs and businesses may have resulted in a too
narrow commercial approach to this innovation-based logic. The KMP programme
has clearly seen that innovation is associated with a more product-oriented “picking
the winner” type of mentality. When discussing commercial utilization, many people
isolate research results as a product that is clearly possible to produce. This approach
assumes there are one or more scientists (idea creators) who sense that the idea could
result in a new product. This approach does not necessarily occur naturally in academic endeavours. It is not uncommon for investors in commercializing innovations
originating from scientific research to require, in principle, that the business plan can
show (conceptually speaking) a product with clear demand from the market.
Evaluation of utilization is often linked with a market analysis of demand for a realizable product from the research. With this observation in mind, we tend to conclude
that there is a “verification gap” — a gap where we lack the ability to develop indemand products with a large future market.184 One important conclusion of the
KMP programme is that innovations in a university context are more a question of
social innovations, such as advanced care and social services. When discussing this
logic, it is therefore important to be able to look beyond the commercialization motivation.
Project-based innovation
Hence, it is important to highlight that promoting utilization through innovation
processes involves much more than just commercialization. With a starting point in
the academic environments, it is more relevant to highlight how research teams participate on the basis of their research results in various project processes that develop
social innovations. In some cases, this may involve developing specific services that
184 As alluded to above, the transformation towards the knowledge-based economy means that we are faced with
a new logic in terms of value creation. Production is no longer the bottleneck in value creation. In principle, in a
knowledge economy all knowledge processes can be immediately translated into commercial transactions of intellectual property, even before the actual knowledge-process has started. For example, staking a claim to knowledge
as a research tool means that we can establish markets in a research environment. The question is, of course,
whether these market transactions are beneficial and create welfare. It is perfectly possible that such transactions
block creativity, innovation, claims of assets and, thereby, future utilization.

126

TO WHAT EXTENT DO WE WITHIN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT PROMOTE THE UTILIZATION OF KNOWLEDGE
ASSETS THROUGH INNOVATION PROCESSES?

1. To what extent do we promote project-based innovation?
a) Extent to which we manage research results in projects and develop:
b) Social innovations?
c) Service innovations?
d) Product innovations, such as research tools, diagnostic tools, etc.?
2. To what extent do we promote licence-based innovation?
Extent to which we license/transfer knowledge to others who conduct innovation projects?
3. To what extent do we promote company-based innovation?
Extent to which we contribute to the creation of companies that develop and run innovation projects?
Overall: To what extent do our activities lead to research results actually becoming innovation processes,
thus allowing them to be utilized as much as possible?

Figure 29. Model for self-assessing how academic environments promote utilization through
innovation
can be offered to a large number of players. The importance of product innovation
from the complete university’s perspective is limited. Further, product innovations are
also more than innovations aimed at new industrial products. Especially interesting
for the KMP programme is the fact that product innovations are increasingly knowledge-intensive. It is becoming more and more natural for academics to work with
product innovations, such as bio-markers, animal models, databases, computer
games, apps and other software. This form of “softer” products, in principle, can be
developed in all fields of science. Several innovations are interesting from a research
perspective because they are both research tools and diagnostic tools. For this reason,
it is inevitable that this utilization logic gradually assumes more importance. The gap
between research and the market will then become smaller and smaller.
License-based innovation
To the extent the academic environment lacks the ability or will to develop and drive
innovation, it can allow other players to do so. It is often assumed, however, that the
innovation itself is obvious, so that another party is able and willing to make sure
that research results are utilized. Of course, a university does not have the ability to
develop pharmaceuticals or industrial products. In many cases, it is clear that the
university has no ability to run projects other than to a certain level of development,
after which the project must then be taken over by others. Promoting utilization
through innovation processes often requires licensing. The difference here is that the
university takes responsibility for developing the research results to an innovation
project, and then licenses the knowledge assets, i.e. more than the research results
themselves can be licensed.
Company-based innovation
There is no doubt that the establishment of new companies is an important means of
promoting utilization of research results. From a KMP perspective, however, a great

127

deal is required before research results can be transformed into viable companies. At
the same time, the entrepreneurial energy that is often required to form a company is
essential for realizing an innovation project. This likely also applies for social innovations. Many companies have been established linked to academic environments and
intended to conduct innovation projects made possible through research.
Academic environments with the organizational ability to carry out innovation
activities
An organisational capacity regularly highlighted for encouraging utilization encompasses assessing ideas, business advice and preparation of business plans, provision of
seed capital and facilities that can house the newly created company.185 Typical support functions for utilization are those of so-called incubators and, in some cases,
holding companies. It is within the framework of this logic we tend to discuss the
“innovation system” phenomenon.
An interesting lesson from the KMP programme is that researchers and academic
managers seem to expect that there should be a system that researchers can turn to
with their product ideas. This system should be as simple as possible and there
should be one entrance to it. It follows from the KMP programme that a system
needs to be developed that is integrated into the academic environment and that
covers significantly more than looking for ideas that can be commercialized.186
3.3.5 Promoting utilization by making knowledge available in open contractual
networks
The logic that may have been most interesting to evaluate and develop within the
KMP programme is utilization through researchers and academic environments managing research results and other knowledge assets in network transactions. The aim is
to capitalize on the knowledge results in “open knowledge structures”. The more
that society develops towards a knowledge-based society, the more this goal is seen as
value creation in itself. In a knowledge-based economy, the creation of structures for
open management of knowledge assets is crucial. Businesses and other stakeholders
in society increasingly the importance of open, yet still structured, collaborative
processes. Knowledge-intensive companies work increasingly with open innovation
and business models that involve open exchange of knowledge. This development
means a new logic for utilization of knowledge. This involves utilizing knowledge
185 As a research theme, this comes with its own set of problems. This is particularly true since the system
approach gives the impression that the innovation process involves a number of elements associated with several
institutions in a linear flow. Basic scientific findings would more or less linearly be transformed into new products
and processes, which in turn could be exploited by new and independent companies. Several of the more theoretically based analyses, including that of Lundvall and Nelson, maintain a relatively long distance from a linear
approach. Their stated aim is to “define the national systems of innovation in terms of determinants of, or factors
influencing, innovation processes”. See Edquist, C. (2005), p. 183. Fagerberg, J., Mowery, D. and Nelson, R. (2005).
186 Two illustrative examples can be found in the section “Academic Environments with Organizational Capabilities
to Innovate” in Annex 6.

128

Industry clusters
and platforms

Research consortia
and platforms
F

SME:s

INDUSTRY

UNIVERSITIES

F
F

F

F

START-UPS
F

F

SME:s

F
F
F

F

F
F

P
P

P

SME:s

Creative commons and
open source platforms

Figure 30. The university’s different arenas for research and innovation
assets in contractual networks with multi-stakeholders. The models may be more or
less open in terms of both participation and accessibility of the knowledge assets that
are managed in collaborations. Significantly, however, is that this involves transactions in knowledge assets. This development calls for a more thoughtful approach to
collaboration. It is much harder than previously to keep utilization of knowledge
assets separate from the different forms of research collaboration. This is why it is
increasingly natural to talk about arenas for research and innovation when discussing
research policy.
There are many indications of the university’s central role in developing this new
“open platform/arena logic” that is marked by the exchange of knowledge, culture
and market intertwined to different degrees. The more we have worked with IA
assessments in the academic environments, the more we have been able to distinguish
three categories. All three comprehensively affect, albeit in slightly different ways,
university collaboration.

129

TO WHAT EXTENT DO WE WITHIN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT PROMOTE THE UTILIZATION OF KNOWLEDGE
ASSETS BY MAKING THEM AVAILABLE IN OPEN CONTRACTUAL NETWORKS?

1. To what extent do we develop and participate in research-driven networks?
Extent to which we participate and contribute to:
a) Open databases containing research results?
2. To what extent do we develop and participate in industrial networks?
Extent to which we participate and contribute to:
a) Open innovation processes?
b) Common standards?
c) Industrial development clusters?
3. To what extent do we develop and participate in various commons?
Extent to which we participate and contribute to:
a) Open source platforms?
b) Creative commons?
c) Crowd sourcing?
Overall: To what extent do our activities lead to research results becoming open, becoming part
of contractually-regulated structures, thus allowing them to be utilized as much as possible?

Figure 31. Assessing how academic environments promote utilization by making knowledge
accessible in open contractual networks

Commons
A frequent way of making use of knowledge assets and research collaboration in the
field of information technology is open source code. There are many more or less
open models. Common for these is that they deal a contractual cooperation and
exchange of source code, in which the code is to be more or less openly available to
partners and other stakeholders. Because there are often many developers collaborating, an extensive contractual network is created with shared platforms. This means
for promoting utilization can be seen in a larger context, where researchers and
research groups are involved in contributing to the knowledge society common
assets.
Copyright and contracts are used to enable and regulate accessibility. It is quite possible to argue that this form of contractually regulated openness creates a high level of
universal accessibility, but also that it results in general utilization in a completely
different way than publication. This openness logic has gradually evolved beyond just
software development. Creative commons is a modern internationally established
movement that focuses on contractually open, commonly shared knowledge assets.
This movement has had an important impact, also among researchers. We have noted
initiatives in biotechnology and medicine that are characterized by a similar openness
ideology. As a type of utilization, it currently extends far beyond research in information technology and has the potential to have an impact on virtually all areas of
research. For example, the more we think in terms of data volumes representing
knowledge assets and we create portfolios of the assets in the form of IT-based data
archives that continuously evolve, the more natural this logic becomes. In the field
of publicly funded research, it is reasonable to assume that researchers and the
university as an organization take the responsibility of not only participating but
also contributing to this type of open platform.

130

Industrial networks
Industry and business in general have also begun to collaborate on the basis of an
open platform logic. It is increasingly common for industrial companies and other
companies to manage their development processes as open innovation. Researchers
and research teams are expected to take a greater responsibility as partners in relatively specific projects. Research results are utilized by the inclusion of industry-specific development processes in which multiple players are involved in more or less
open forms. Similarly, intellectual property rights and contracts are used to allow and
regulate the degree of openness.
In some industry sectors, including telecommunications, we have seen a trend for
companies to become increasingly dependent on interoperability, which requires common standards. The university is given an increasingly important role in development
and participation in open knowledge platforms that are linked to specific business
areas. This development is characterized to varying degrees based on area by
researchers being expected to clarify and manage their own and others’ knowledge
assets within contractual structures. Taken together, it becomes clear how these make
up the network of knowledge transactions, within which the university as an organization will at a minimum be able to take shared responsibility to maintain and develop the transactions.

Research-driven networks
The more researchers work from databases with research results and similar, the
more natural it becomes to promote utilization using this logic. This is where the
academic environments create an open platform that can subsequently be regulated
contractually. There are strong indications that academic environments throughout
the university are moving in this direction. An increasing number of academic environments active internationally are thinking in terms of e-learning and network-based
research. This places increased demands on the university’s organizational capacity
for management of knowledge assets, both as a result of research and education.

Academic environments with the organizational capacity to use research results in
open contractual networks
A major lesson from the KMP programme is that this logic requires portfolio management of knowledge assets for academic environments. As noted above, when
involved in European-funded research programmes, research groups are expected to
have the ability to manage their portfolio of background knowledge. Accordingly, we
can see how a particular type of open platform logic is developed within collaborative research. Research and innovation collaboration is becoming increasingly intertwined, according to this logic. In more or less all of the analyzed research environments that are working on more extensive research collaboration, the university is
expected to take an active responsibility. Clearly, this logic will fundamentally affect
the university’s role in research as well as education. It is becoming clear that the task

131

of promoting utilization is an integral part of university operations and requires relatively extensive organizational capacity to manage knowledge assets.187

3.4 The ability of academic environments to promote utilization
A fundamental conclusion of the evaluations carried out within the KMP programme
is the university has only limited ability to promote utilization as an integral part of it
activities. In our judgement, the university lacks sufficient organizational ability to
promote utilization in accordance with an academic approach to public responsibility. This can probably be explained by the fact that this task is relatively new and that
we are in a process of transformation. Our conclusion is not that the university’s
employees are not engaged in promoting utilization. On the contrary, every researcher and teacher is active in promoting utilization in some way. It is our opinion that,
as an organization, the university does not take adequate responsibility for enabling
researchers to promote utilization. The KMP programme has made it clear that the
university and its researchers possess a vast untapped potential for expanded public
responsibility. The conclusion is that it is the university’s organizational inability to
enable and manage the development itself that is the problem or threshold that must
be addressed.
3.4.1 The regulation governing internal control and inspection
On the basis of the management analysis (see Chapter 2), we were able to see that
the university’s lack of organisational ability to promote utilization must reasonably
be regarded as a direct operational risk.188 We realized that our analysis of the situation in academic environments must be translated into an understanding of what
constitutes operational risks. In this way we were able to take another step in the
specification of the expectations involved.
The risk that the university will not complete its required mission
As we have discussed above, universities must apply the rules of internal governance
and control (2007:603). In accordance with section 2 of the regulation on internal
governance and control, an authority must show with a reasonable degree of certainty that it fulfils its missions and objectives in accordance with the operational
requirements of the government regulations. These requirements mean that operations must be carried out effectively, in accordance with the applicable rules, with a
reliable and accurate accounting, and with good management of State funds.189
187 Two illustrative examples can be found in the section “Academic Environments with the Organizational
Capacity to use Research Results in Open Contractual Network” in Annex 6.
188 Conducting a risk analysis as a means of developing the university's activities was initiated in dialogue with
Linköping University (LiU). Several of the arguments described below can also be deemed to originate from LiU's
risk analysis.
189 Section 3 of the Government regulations states that: The authority's leadership is responsible to the
Government for operations and for ensuring that it is operated effectively and in accordance with the law and
responsibilities arising from Sweden's membership of the European Union, that reporting takes place in a reliable
and fair manner, and that the authority takes requisite care of state funds.

132

According to ESV’s general guidelines to Section 2, the process of internal governance
and control means that the public authority’s leadership takes complete responsibility
for operations. According to Section 3, the starting point is that the university must
analyze the circumstances that risk preventing and counteracting the fulfilment of its
mission and meeting their operational objectives.
The KMP programme was particularly interested in the application of this regulation
because we, together with the representatives of the academic environment, had
already identified and analyzed the academic environment’s knowledge assets, i.e. in
principle, the real and fundamental value that public research funding has made possible. We had implemented an internal and an external analysis, i.e. we had access to
a comprehensive analytical framework of what this public benefit might specifically
be. This allowed us to discuss in more concrete terms how the university reasonably
looks after and contributes to these assets actually being utilized and creating public
benefit. We continuously accumulated experiences about the challenges the academic
environments face. We were able to conduct a bottom-up risk analysis. In this way
we were able to develop the dialogue on what public responsibility and thereby government responsibility for promoting utilization reasonably can consist of.
The task of promoting utilization
Applying the regulation on internal control is particularly interesting for the KMP
programme because the process aims at the operations fulfilling its missions and
achieving its goals.190 The risk analysis should be conducted based on the information the university has and the operational goals that the university is to apply.
According to the Higher Education Act, universities have an overall mission of promoting utilization of research results and of collaborating. According to the ES guidelines, the regulatory framework for internal control and inspection makes the authorities’ leadership responsible for addressing the questions191:
● Where are we going?
● How do we get there?
● What risks might we encounter on the way?
During KMP’s work, we identified and evaluated the research results as objects that
have public benefits, i.e. knowledge assets. A reasonable interpretation of the government regulations is that knowledge assets in academic environments should be managed properly and, if possible, be included in reliable and accurate reporting. Even if
the premise is that there are individual researchers who have the right to patentable
inventions, the university is responsible for ensuring that the public benefits that
result from research actually benefit society. In accordance with the government regu-

190 In the process of risk management, it is thought that if a risk is fundamental, it is to be handled by the authority's leadership, i.e. the board and the vice-chancellor. The question is whether it is possible to clarify a risk more fundamentally than this. See ESV 2012:47 Guidelines for Managing Operational Risks. The process in accordance with
the regulation governing internal control and inspection p. 9.
191 ESV 2009:38 Guidelines on Internal Control and Inspection. A support for authorities' implementation of the
regulations governing internal control and inspection. p. 7.

133

lations, promoting utilization of research results must be carried out efficiently and in
compliance with applicable rules.
Academic environments as a control environment and the various risks
The risk analysis conducted by the KMP programme focuses on the concrete management of knowledge assets in academic environments. The risk analysis examines the
ability of the academic environment to promote utilization. The academic environment is therefore what we see as a relevant control environment as defined in the regulation.192 Our focus on the academic environment means that we both can focus on
researchers’ abilities and on the university’s organizational ability as a whole.
It was important in the KMP programme that the risk analysis is concrete and can
result in practical management and development of organizational capability. Risk
analysis of whether academic environments have the capacity to ensure that research
results lead to sustainability, welfare, justice, growth and so on is difficult to perform
in this respect. It was an important breakthrough when we concluded that the logics
discussed above represent alternative means, on the one hand, for promoting the
overall objectives and, on the other hand, goals for how specific and manageable
research findings can be utilized. The logics clarified the risks academic environments
at different faculties of the university have to deal with. Risks and challenges, of
course, differ between different environments and also in relation to different scientific fields. For us it was important to develop a risk assessment model that can be used
throughout the university. We concluded that if we could come up with a reasonably
comprehensive model for assessing risks related to the promoting utilization, we
would also deepen our understanding of the expectations of academic environments.
It is a way of making expectations tangible and is also something that needs to be
dealt with.
Risk management and action plans
At the university, the vice-chancellor is responsible to the board for ensuring risk
management is carried out in a satisfactory manner. According to the general guidelines to the regulations governing internal control and inspection, a risk analysis
means that the authority’s leadership must consider whether the risk should be
accepted or managed.193 Before the expanded responsibility was introduced in 2008,
acceptance could have been justified by the authority’s leadership considering it reasonable that the university not promote utilization because it is up to individual
192 Control and inspection is all about people's ability to understand and carry out their duties and management's
responsibilities include taking advantage of this ability. This is reflected in the authority's internal environment. A
properly functioning internal environment is a prerequisite for other parts of the internal control and inspection if
such risk analysis and control measures are to work. There is no requirement for a particular design of the internal
environment in the internal control and inspection regulations.' ESV 2009:38 Guidelines on Internal Control and
Inspection. A support for authorities' implementation of the regulations governing internal control and inspection.
p. 17.
193 See ESV 2012:47 Guidelines in Managing Operational Risks. The process in accordance with the regulation governing internal control and inspection p. 19.

134

a) To what extent do we experience that we have unclear
tasks, a lack of resources and limited incentives when it comes
to collaboration and promoting utilization?
1. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the individual capabilities and
competence to promote utilization, and to what extent is it
important for us to do so?
2. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability within the framework of our
activities to clarify goals and determine which are the most
appropriate utilization activities/logics for meeting the goals
and to decide what should be done in public or private
interests?
3. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability to manage the administrative
responsibility and responsibility of a public institution when
promoting utilization?

b) To what extent do we experience that there is an unclear
definition of roles when it comes to the responsibility to
collaborate and promote utilization?
c) To what extent do we experience that there are unclear
norms and directives concerning the task of promoting
utilization?
d) To what extent do we experience the organizational
management of knowledge assets as underdeveloped?
e) To what extent do we experience that there is a lack of
responsibility and support from management?
f ) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
the university administration?
g) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
external actors with regard to utilization in the private interest?
h) To what extent do we experience a lack of training and
education?

Figure 32. Assessing risks in academic environments when promoting utilization

instructors to utilize the university’s results privately, i.e. as a side job outside the
work the employee fulfils in his or her job. It is even possible to argue that it is
precisely this position the Swedish universities have taken, but which stops short of
being codified and intentional. Since promoting utilization is currently an explicit
task that is an integral part of university operations, this approach is no longer
reasonably possible.
This discussion, however, revealed an underlying risk and difficult circumstance.
Since researchers and other academics must in some sense always be responsible for
the practical work being carried out, does it really matter to what extent they do it
publicly or privately? The KMP programme concluded that this approach is one of
the main reasons for the university’s inability to promote utilization.194 We believe
that this situation constitutes a fundamental risk in itself. Throughout the KMP programme, it has been clear that Swedish universities face an inevitable institutional
development; the academic environment’s idea- and knowledge-based collaboration
requires that the university develops its organizational capacity. It is important to
clarify what responsibility is imposed on the academics in their public employment in
relation to what they may be authorized to do privately, i.e. as a secondary job, and
how this requires development of the university’s organizational capabilities.
Within the framework of the KMP programme, a lot of energy has been devoted to
assessing and discussing how the university’s organizational capacities can be developed. An important conclusion is that risk assessment by the academic environments
is a key instrument for developing the university’s organizational capacities.

194 See also in section 5.2.

135

Expectations become clear, possible to discuss and hopefully also manageable. Our
ambition is to develop a risk evaluation model that is based on the different utilization logics. We believe that it is important to clarify that the university’s capacity to
promote utilization can be linked to risks associated with the academic environments’
ability to 1) make research results widely available, 2) make research results applicable for stakeholders and users, 3) engage and stimulate innovation processes, and 4)
include research results in open contractual network processes. In this way, we can
begin to specify typical and manageable operational risks for each logic.195
Operational risks are circumstances that affect the extent to which utilization is possible, according to the different logics.
3.4.2 Risks when knowledge is to be made publicly available
As noted above, the challenge of making knowledge assets publicly available was not
the primary issue that was discussed in a review of a research group’s knowledge
assets. Still, the evaluations have allowed us to distinguish a number of general risks
about this logic.
The ability to make research results publicly available
An overarching risk is that the academic environments do not carry out activities that
result in knowledge assets becoming publicly available. Typical circumstances to
highlight in the risk analysis of making scientific and popular science available are
when implemented and planned activities:
● do not result in knowledge assets reaching many people
● do not result in their actual dissemination; i.e. the publications are not actu
ally read
● do not describe/capture knowledge assets in an understandable way that
enables practical utilization
Here it is necessary to distinguish between only making available research to other
academics, and ensuring it also reaches people able to utilize the knowledge assets. In
other words, it is one thing to make research results available for academics within
the same research discipline and quite another to reach the general public.
When making research generally available through education, risk assessments should
include such aspect as:
● whether the education is sufficiently scientifically based for making the
knowledge assets available
● whether the knowledge assets are made sufficiently educationally clear
● whether the students have/are given the preconditions to be able to translate
the knowledge assets into practical use

195 This allows us to develop our framework for, among other things, identification of which risk considerations
should be included in evaluations. See further Chapter 2.

136

WHAT OBSTACLES/RISKS EXIST WITH REGARD TO
UTILIZING KNOWLEDGE ASSETS BY MAKING THEM
AS WIDELY PUBLICLY AVAILABLE AS POSSIBLE?
1. To what extent do we have the capability to make research
results publicly available and to what extent is this
important to us?
2. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability within the framework of our
activities to clarify goals and determine which are the most
appropriate utilization activities/logics to meet the goals
and to decide what should be done in the public or
private interest?
3. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability to manage the administrative
responsibility and responsibility as a public institution when
we make research results publicly available?

a) To what extent do we experience that we have unclear tasks,
a lack of resources and limited incentives when it comes to
making research results publicly available?
b) To what extent do we experience that there is an unclear
division of roles when it comes to the responsibility to make
research results publicly available?
c) To what extent do we experience that there are unclear
norms and directives concerning the task of making research
results publicly available?
d) To what extent do we experience that the organizational
management of knowledge assets is underdeveloped?
e) To what extent do we experience that there is a lack of
responsibility and support from management?
f ) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from the
university administration?
g) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
external actors with regard to utilization in the private interest?
h) To what extent do we experience a lack of training and
education?

Figure 33. Self-assessment of risks related to being able to make research results publicly
available

There has been no detailed study in the KMP programme of how the academic environments actually managed to make research results widely available. As noted, it is
a well-established norm to publish research results and conduct education on the
basis of scientific knowledge. This is not, however, the same as making research
results public so that they can be exploited in the service of humanity. Our conclusion is that this is a risk area and that the academic environments can and should
develop their operations significantly in this regard.
The ability to consider utilization activities based on public responsibility
Another important risk factor to evaluate is whether we, in the academic environment, consider utilization through generally making available research in relation to
other forms of utilization. The question is whether publicly making research results
available actually has the potential to result in utilization of specific knowledge
assets. There is not doubt that this is a fundamental challenge. That something is
available does not mean that this will actually result in its use. It may even be that
the utilization of this logic can result in it not being possible subsequently to utilize
the research results in any of the other three logics. As previously noted, in some
areas, such as medicine, there is often a requirement for research result to be
patentable.
Risk management in this regard is largely a question of developing the ability to evaluate this utilization logic in relation to the other three logics. Which logic has, after
all, the best chances of resulting in practical application?

137

The ability to meet the university/state interests when we promote general
availability of research results
An additional risk is that we are unable to make research generally available in spite
of our responsibility as an authority. An initial observation is that the risk under this
logic is clearly limited. However, we have outlined some factors that are worth discussing.
As researchers, we are committed to not making knowledge assets commonly available: It is not unusual for researchers to be contractually committed to not to making
their research results publicly available. This can occur regarding commissioned
research and collaborative research. It is also possible that researchers have made
commitments to their own companies etc. to keep research results secret. Normally
though, this only applies for a short period to allow for patenting. This situation
should not be exaggerated. There is nothing that systematically prevents researchers
from publishing.
There are legal restrictions on utilization of the knowledge assets: A related and more
significant situation is that there are restrictions on the use of published knowledge
assets. This means, effectively, that the research results are not available in the sense
that they can be used practically anyway. If a researcher publishes research results
with the status patent pending, the result is indeed public, but is not necessarily free
to be used. When use of research results also includes copyright protection, this also
places restrictions on its use. For example, it is not clear how software could be made
publicly available. Use of computer software requires permission from the copyright
holders. This, incidentally, explains why development in this area paves the way for
the fourth logic.
Does the university enable academic environments to promote making research
results generally available?
One lesson from the KMP programme is that institutional arrangements for making
knowledge assets commonly available hardly come about of their own accord and
even less so when there are different utilization logics. With the university’s governance, it is an obvious risk that this fundamental logic is counteracted. The conclusion is that ensuring research results will be made widely available requires a relatively extensive awareness and management of knowledge assets. It is not reasonable, or
even desirable, for this responsibility only to be placed on the individual researcher.
This responsibility should also evolve within the academic environments. Further,
from a risk perspective, it is also crucial that academic environments are supported
and can develop organizational skills to ensure public availability.
Within the KMP programme, we have identified the following general factors/risks
that we feel academic environments should considered and estimate their extent in
advance. Our conclusion in the KMP programme is that there are circumstances that
create a risk scenario at university level and that need to be handled.
Unclear work assignments, limited resources and limited incentives: Incentive exists

138

in relation to academic publishing. There are, however, clearly limited incentives for
actually aiming to make knowledge assets widely available. It is also not common to
make it clear to researchers that their tasks include making research results publicly
available beyond academic publishing.
Unclear standards: There is a great lack of standards for publicly making available
results available beyond academic publication and a general opinion that education
should be scientifically grounded. The standard of publishing in ranked, peerreviewed journals severs only as a guidance and has no real impact.
Lack of management support: Our experience in the KMP programme shows that
leadership for enable general availability of research results is, admittedly, present,
but only to a limited extent. Generally we have actually noted that, from the university’s side, there is a desire to communicate and inform about the activities. The question is, however, the extent to which it seeks to make knowledge assets commonly
available and not primarily to strengthen the university’s “brand”. It is difficult to
distinguish a clear leadership in promoting making research results generally available to the outside world, for the good of humanity.
Lack of administrative support: Increasing numbers of public relations and reporters
and information officers are employed in the administration. The step of more systematically stimulating popular science and other ways of making results available is,
therefore, not far-fetched. According to this logic, the organizational ability for many
environments to promote utilization seems relatively attainable. Even so, clearly
much is left to be done.
Undeveloped management of knowledge assets: An assumption from the KMP programme was that, in principle, there is not a clear need to think in terms of knowledge assets if the university’s ambition of promoting utilization is limited to the logic
of promoting general availability of knowledge assets. As other logics became more
relevant, we felt it became increasingly important to be able to clarify which knowledge assets should be made publicly available. This also makes IAM important for
developing organizational ability to promote utilization by making it generally available. The ability to manage research results as knowledge assets also allows development of organizational capacity for this logic.
Undeveloped ability to evaluate knowledge assets: This logic also requires you to
specify what is valuable to use in reality. It is becoming increasingly clear that managerial capability is needed if the university is to promote the utilization of research
according to this logic. It is primarily critical to ensure that others can use the
research results without legal restrictions. Developing the organizational skills for
them, e.g. the innovation office, to evaluate knowledge assets would thereby stimulate utilization of this basic logic.
3.4.3 Risks when knowledge should be made applicable for stakeholders and users
The KMP programme showed that this second logic is perhaps the one that immediately comes to mind when asking how an academic setting can assume a more devel-

139

oped responsibility when working for utilization. As we discussed the risks associated
with achieving this logic, we also came to see a clearer pattern around which types of
operational risks arose.
The ability to make research results relevant to specific users and stakeholders
The overarching operational risk according to this logic is that academic environments and researchers do not promote making research results available to and making them applicable to their intended users. Extensive work is often required to make
research results applicable and enable the implementation of the same. Typical circumstances that we saw as important in the KMP programme are when academic
environments:
● identify and assess the users of the research results
● establish cooperation partnerships with users
● implement processes according to the various sub-logics, i.e. scientificallybased applicability, educationally-based applicability and project-based
applicability
● present knowledge assets in an applicable way
● enable effective implementation, solve problems etc.
● if necessary, can offer and manage control of knowledge assets
Typical for these circumstances is that they highlight the academic environment’s ability to act as a partner able to communicate and manage projects together with specific stakeholders.

WHAT OBSTACLES/RISKS EXIST WITH
REGARD TO UTILIZING KNOWLEDGE
ASSETS BY MAKING THEM AVAILABLE
AND APPLICABLE TO INTENDED/
PROSPECTIVE STAKEHOLDERS?
1. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the individual capability and competence
to make research results available and applicable to intended/
prospective stakeholders and to what extent is this
important to us?
2. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability within the framework of our
activities to clarify goals and determine which are the most
appropriate utilization activities/logics to meet the goals and
decide what should be done in the public or private interest?
3. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability to manage the administrative
responsibility and responsibility of a public institution when
we make research results available and applicable?

a) To what extent do we experience that we have unclear tasks,
a lack of resources and limited incentives when it comes to
making research results available and applicable?
b) To what extent do we experience that there is an unclear
division of roles when it comes to the responsibility to make
research results available and applicable?
c) To what extent do we experience that there are unclear
norms and directives concerning the task of making research
results available and applicable?
d) To what extent do we experience that the organizational
management of knowledge assets is underdeveloped?
e) To what extent do we experience that there is a lack of
responsibility and support from management?
f ) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from the
university administration?
g) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
external actors with regard to utilization in the private interest?
h) To what extent do we experience a lack of training
and education?

Figure 34. Self-assessment of risks related to being able to make research results applicable
for stakeholders

140

The ability to consider utilization activities based on public responsibility
Are academic environments aiming towards a value-based public responsibility? To
what extent do activities aim at making research results applicable to meeting overall
objectives, such as environmental sustainability? Further, beyond this more abstract
consideration of public responsibility, how appropriate are the actions for achieving
applicability according to logic two?
The knowledge assets are only applicable for a few actors: It is worth considering
whether utilization activities focus far too much on a single or a small number of
actors. The KMP programme has concluded that it is important to focus on whether
it is appropriate to limit making research results applicable to an individual or a few
actors. It may even be appropriate to question whether the university’s collaboration
activities distort competition and result in some actors receiving unfair state funding.
However, this risk should not be exaggerated. Still, in weighing the first logic,
it could obviously be argued that it may be better to work on making knowledge
as widely available as possible if you are not able to make it applicable for a few
actors.
Concerning research processes aimed at transferring knowledge assets to specific
stakeholders, it is crucial to determine who will hold the intellectual property rights
to the results. These are questions that are regularly dealt with in contracts in commissioned research, collaborative research and commissioned education. For instance,
when industrial companies participate in and fund research, there is a long tradition
of the companies retaining the rights to the results. This, of course, impacts the
extent to which knowledge assets become generally available. Obviously, availability
to the general public risks being restricted. Historically, when industry wants to
patent research results, the researchers wait to publish until the necessary patent
applications have been submitted. Just because researchers publish their research,
however, does not mean that the results will be generally applicable. Anyone who
wanting to exploit the results will have to have a license from the company holding
the rights.
Applicability of knowledge assets for specific stakeholders is not enough for utilization: One must also consider whether activities designed to make research results/
knowledge assets applicable for users and stakeholders are sufficient. Perhaps, there
are no stakeholders. Existing stakeholders may also not have the interest nor the
ability to apply the knowledge assets. In some cases, a relatively comprehensive
process of development and change is required, which may not necessarily be in the
interest of all existing stakeholders. It is relevant to assess whether research results
must be developed as innovation projects if they are to be utilized.
The inability to manage conflicting objectives related to the third utilization logic creates a risk. Active pursuit of applicability without success can prevent the conditions
for innovation and the formation of new companies. Stakeholders are not necessarily
interested in starting a company based on research results that are not secured
through intellectual property rights protection.

141

The ability to meet the university and governmental interests when we promote
availability of research results to intended users and stakeholders
We have also been able to discern a number of more narrowly defined circumstances
for the logic that we must consider when it comes to government responsibility. As
we have pointed out, each logic gives rise to some typical circumstances that create
operational risk.
Lack of critical independence: One general lesson is that the closer researchers work
with various stakeholders, the more they will be influenced by them. A danger exists
that researchers fall into dependency situations and are adversely affected in their
scientific efforts. This becomes even more difficult to manage if researchers also have
private consultancy relationships with the stakeholder. These are relatively well
known challenges and are fundamental to research ethics standards and standards for
secondary employment.
Distortion of competition and too extensive governmental support: As previously
noted, another important factor is that research groups work with singular private
sector stakeholders. This threatens to distort competitive conditions and may greatly
benefit certain stakeholders at the expense of others. In certain cases, it may be
necessary to discuss whether government support is appropriate. These are, however,
generally manageable risks. They are also very well-known risks at the university.
Restrictions on continued research: If there has been a transfer of research results, the
academic environments risk losing their ability to fully conduct continued research in
the relevant area. Historically, industrial companies in particular have had relatively
comprehensive claims to the rights to results from commissioned research in particular, but also from collaborative research. The university needs to ensure that future
academic actions will not result in breach of contract. In collaborative research,
research environments depend on being able to provide and retain the right to background knowledge. The fact that academic environments recognize the importance of
having an overview of which claims exist on the results helps in this regard. See more
about this risk below.196
Restrictions on application of knowledge assets: Another risk is that there may be
legal restrictions on how users can use specific knowledge assets. With individual
researchers in Sweden having the rights to their research results logically means they
must also have control over their knowledge assets if they are to be able to offer
stakeholders the right to exploit their research results. As soon as it is relevant to talk
about intellectual property rights for research results, it is essential to clarify who has
the right to what. This clarity does not always exist. In general, contract management
issues are an important risk factor.

196 See, among other things, page 128 about the undeveloped management of knowledge assets.

142

Does the university make it possible for academic environments to promote making
research results applicable to stakeholders and users?
A review of academic environments indicates the need for a more systematic approach
to making research results applicable for specific actors. Far from all academic environments have channels with external stakeholders. Nor is it especially common for
research groups to use available sources for external information to determine existing
needs and demands.
There is no doubt that the lack of sufficient organizational capacity to promote utilization according to this logic poses a serious risk to the university. This is directly
related to the university’s ability to operate as a professional partner to the community at large. Similarly, we have seen that much remains to be done within this logic to
improve the university’s ability to take public responsibility. The typical risks identified during the KMP programme are even more clear when seen through this logic.
Unclear work assignments, limited resources and limited incentives: Researchers are
only offered limited incentives to engage in making research results applicable
through their academic position. Still there is, certainly, an incentive to some extent
to obtain external research funding. In meeting their contractual commitments,
researchers can feel a responsibility for making their knowledge assets applicable. In
addition, researchers have incentives to engage in making research results applicable
as a secondary employment. As has been noted, working according to this logic is
typically what is meant by the extended right of academics to have secondary
employment. There is reason to review incentives for carrying out processes within
the framework of university to strengthen the academic environments’ ability to promote utilization. Within the KMP programme, we have determined that the lack of
financial resources for conducting utilization processes within the university is worth
noting. Researchers repeatedly point out that they feel that their collaborations are
above and beyond their regular work.
Lack of management support: In recent years, the university has increased its ability
to support the academic environments in the case of commissioned research and
commissioned education. There still appears to be only a limited ambition from management to actually enhance researchers’ ability to make research results applicable.
Within the KMP programme a recurring comment is that senior management, primarily at department head level, but also at senior university management level, needs to
increase its involvement. In some environments, we have indeed found that the managers want to contribute to concrete application of research results. It is particularly
apparent in this context that support and control by managers is needed. This often
involves developing long-term structural relationships between the university and
various stakeholders. The management is important for allowing action both within
and outside of the researchers’ academic position. Not least, how secondary employment is handled is important.
Lack of administrative support: Over the years, the administration has developed a
variety of support tools for stimulating this kind of utilization. At the central level,
there are functions to facilitate contract management and management of externally
funded research projects. At the department level, there is continuous development of
functions to facilitate the management of, not least, commissioned education and col-

143

laborative research. A lot is also happening within communications. The general conclusion within the KMP programme is that organizational capacity is developing, but
that much more can and should be done.
Unclear standards: A great deal has taken place in terms of development of standards. There are local discussions about what research ethics they should relate to.
Some practices have also evolved in terms of management of secondary employment.
Standards are being developed for how knowledge assets are handled in collaborative
projects. Even so, we have seen there is a need for a more integrated approach. This
is particularly true in how knowledge assets are handled in situations in which the
university is part of the collaborative work.
Undeveloped management of knowledge assets: As noted above, regular reviews are
conducted of external agreements. At the same time, it is clear that there is a need to
develop management of how research findings should be treated as knowledge assets
in relation to external partners.
Undeveloped ability to evaluate knowledge assets: Experience gained from the KMP
programme shows that the feasibility of longer term contributions to social development processes is based on the identification and evaluation of which knowledge
assets appear relevant to specific actors. It then becomes clearer how academic
research projects can be combined with collaborative research and commissioned
research. Commissioned education can be used systematically to implement knowledge assets with different stakeholders. There are many indications that more welltimed processes may stimulate intra-academic research, rather than discourage it.

3.4.4 Risks associated with innovation processes
Much of the work of the KMP programme focused on logic 3, i.e. when utilization is
promoted by innovation processes. This had the most intent discussions of risks. This
is naturally related to the fact that activities under this logic differ most from traditional academic activities. Here it is particularly challenging to evaluate what needs
to be dealt with within the university and what can reasonably be handled by the
surrounding innovation system. The interaction with the holding company is of
particular interest in this context. As noted several times previously, the KMP
programme has focused on operational risks for the university as an organization.

The ability to utilize research results through innovation processes
The KMP programme has made clear the importance of this logic. In some cases, it is
even crucial that research results benefit society. The more knowledge-oriented society becomes, the more important it is for the university to contribute to concrete innovation processes. This has shown that a comprehensive operational risk is that activities carried out in academic environments do not result in innovation processes.
Clearly it is not reasonable for the university as an organization to be engaged in

144

WHAT OBSTACLES/RISKS EXIST WITH REGARD
TO UTILIZING KNOWLEDGE ASSETS THROUGH
INNOVATION PROCESSES?
1. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the individual capability and competence
to turn research results into innovation processes and to what
extent is this important to us?
2. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability within the framework of our
activities to clarify goals and determine which are the most
appropriate utilization activities/logics to meet the goals and
to decide what should be done in the public or private interest?
3. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability to manage the administrative
responsibility and responsibility of a public institution when
we carry on innovation processes?

a) To what extent do we experience that we have unclear tasks,
a lack of resources and limited incentives when it comes to
turning research results into innovation processes?
b) To what extent do we experience that there is an unclear
division of roles when it comes to the responsibility to turn
research results into innovation processes?
c) To what extent do we experience that there are unclear
norms and directives concerning the task of turning research
results into innovation processes?
d) To what extent do we experience that the organizational
management of knowledge assets is underdeveloped?
e) To what extent do we experience that there is a lack of
responsibility and support from management?
f ) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
the university administration?
g) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
external actors with regard to utilization in the private interest?
h) To what extent do we experience a lack of training and
education?

Figure 35. Self-assessment of risks related to utilization through innovation

product development or commercial sales. The KMP programme concludes that risk
management should be limited to whether the academic environments should enable
such processes by the holding company and other external players. As noted above,
it is also concluded that risk management should allow the academic environments
and the university to enable researchers to engage in innovation processes. The risks
of an unclear interface between researchers’ activities in public service and their own
private service are particularly evident when working to utilize knowledge assets
through innovation processes.
An important lesson has been the importance of academic environments in assuming
greater responsibility for what was described earlier as project-based innovation
activities. From a risk assessment perspective, operational risks should be clarified in
this respect. Typical circumstances that we identified as important are if the academic
environments:
● evaluate the applicability of research results as ideas
● identify and evaluate potential innovations/innovation processes on the basis
of the ideas that are created
● manage research activities as projects and processes
● develop collaborative relationships with stakeholders that are needed to
develop ideas and drive innovation processes
● drive innovation processes according to the different sub-logics
● collect and manage the control of research results, e.g. through licensing
These circumstances are regarded as areas of operational risks according to our
analyses. Our conclusion is that there is a clear risk of academic environments not
promoting innovation processes. The university has considerable potential for developing its organizational ability in this regard.

145

The ability to consider utilization activities based on public responsibility
The private interest of making money from their own research will always, in some
sense, influence individual researchers and their public responsibility. However, there
is nothing to prevent these two endeavours coinciding. Much of our experience from
the KMP programme also supports this. At the same time, these risks should not be
ignored. On the contrary, it is crucial that they are highlighted as important to manage. Utilization of research results does not always require innovation processes. An
excessive effort to commercialize research results negatively affects the availability of
research results to the general public as well as their applicability to specific stakeholders. Risk management is once again a question of being able to consider the logic
that permits public benefit. You cannot ignore that the fact that the researchers themselves are considered to have the right to decide how their own research results
should be utilized and this can be problematic in this context. Is it obvious and even
reasonable that individual researchers refrain from commercial revenue so that the
university takes the greatest possible public responsibility?
The ability to meet the university’s/government’s interests when developing research
results as innovations
The evaluations of the academic environments in the KMP programme have very
clearly revealed that it is within this third logic that the authority risks primarily
arise. On the whole, the ethical challenges become more tangible.
Conflicts of interest: The risk of conflicts of interest is always more or less present.
Bias and conflicts of interest are, in principle, present when researchers are expected
to own their research results privately while still being engaged in continued research.
Distortion of competition and too extensive governmental support: In addition, there
is the problem of specific interests benefiting from state resources, not least considering that government employees themselves are deemed to have all rights to commercialization. That researchers create joint private companies to utilize research results
does not, as a rule, reduce this risk, probably the opposite.
Limitation of critical independence: Another risk is that there is a detrimental effect
on critical independence. Naturally, there are different views on this, depending on
the research being undertaken and how involved the researchers are in commercial
activities. It is, however, not clear that a researchers focus on innovation processes
risks influencing the research and the quality of education. There are circumstances
that suggest the opposite. Active involvement in and understanding of the practical
challenges in social development may well enhance quality.
Continued research and education are obstructed: Another of the logic’s risk is that
academic environments lose opportunities to conduct further research. This occurs
when knowledge assets are transferred to a company or licensed. A typical risk is
that academic environments lose access to previous research results for future
research purposes. It is key for academic environments to be able to use research
results as background knowledge in cooperative research processes.

146

Lack of access to the academic environment’s infrastructure: This is naturally significant insofar as software, databases and so on constitute infrastructure assets.
Academic environments are dependent upon long-term access to knowledge assets
that can be considered as infrastructure.
Restrictions in utilization of research results as innovation: This logic has a need to
unify control of research results through projects. This requires thorough contractual
management. Once again, it is clear that contract management is a key risk for
authorities.
Does the university enable academic environments to develop research as innovation?
Lessons of the KMP programme indicate that it is reasonable for the university to
take considerably greater responsibility for contributing to innovation processes. This
requires that the university develops its organizational ability. The typical risks identified during the KMP programme are even more clear when seen through this logic.
Unclear tasks and limited incentives: Experience shows that researchers lack incentives for taking responsibility of innovation processes within the scope of their university employment. Nor is it particularly close at hand in the current employeremployee relationship that it will be clarified that innovation is an important part of
the job. However, employees do have an incentive to engage in innovation processes
as part of secondary employment. This does, however, create a very awkward situation for researchers to engage in innovation activities privately. Successful development of commercial innovations in company form is demanding. For this reason,
incentives for conducting innovation processes should be re-evaluated to support the
ability of academic environments to promote utilization. Giving academic environments the financial resources to use social and other innovations and work time to
develop them, is an important first step.
Lack of management support: We have seen that for academic environments to
develop their ability to conduct project-based innovation activities, they need a large
degree of management support. Many of the risks discussed above, particularly the
handling of conflicts of interest, require involvement from managers. Enabling innovation processes under both public and private auspices requires a certain amount
of involvement from managers. When research groups manage to show that they
actually can contribute to the development and improvement of society processes,
they expect management support to make their projects sustainable. Department
head level and university management level need to increase their involvement.
Lack of administrative support: Over the years, the administration has developed a
variety of support forms to stimulate utilization. The development of utilization
through innovation processes, though, is still in its infancy. It is clear that the university needs to be active in developing operational support both within and outside the
public sector. At the present time, academic environments have difficulty obtaining
support from the administration to conduct innovation processes. The KMP
programme’s general conclusion is that development of organizational capacity is
occurring, but that much more can and should be done.

147

Unclear standards: This logic, in particular, needs normative standards. The university needs to develop standards for conflicts of interest, management of infrastructure
assets and so on. As we have stated above, there is need for a comprehensive
approach, a thoughtful approach.
Undeveloped management of knowledge assets: We have seen that knowledge-intensive innovation requires a greater focus on knowledge assets. For the university to
take greater responsibility for promoting utilization without a system of standards
that gives the university the right to research results, it is crucial that the ability to
monitor and, on behalf of employees, manage knowledge assets.
Inability to assess knowledge assets: We have seen that assessing knowledge assets
sets the groundwork for clarifying and implementing innovation projects. At the
same time, the assessment is just as important for managing the impact of the logic,
i.e., the academic environments are responsible for managing knowledge assets
through several different external interfaces. Working with knowledge assets means
not limiting the field to patentable inventions and commercializable products. It
becomes natural to consider other logics when promoting utilization. Furthermore,
it becomes more apparent when commercialization processes risk influencing normal
academic activities. Over time, we have increasingly differentiated between what we
see as infrastructure assets for academic environments, on the one hand, and strategic
assets from a research perspective, on the other.
3.4.5 Risks associated with open platform processes
The logic for utilization we were most interested in was when research results are utilized in open knowledge management processes and platforms. Presumably, the uni-

WHAT OBSTACLES/RISKS EXIST WITH REGARD
TO UTILIZING KNOWLEDGE ASSETS BY MAKING
THEM AVAILABLE IN OPEN CONTRACTUAL
NETWORKS?
1. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the individual capability and competence
to make research results available in open contractual
networks, and to what extent is this important to us?
2. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability within the framework of our
activities to clarify goals and determine which are the most
appropriate utilization activities/logics to meet the goals
and decide what should be done in the public or private
interest?
3. To what extent do we as researchers and academic
environment have the ability to manage the administrative
responsibility and responsibility of a public institution
when making research results available in open contractual
networks?

a) To what extent do we experience that we have unclear tasks,
a lack of resources and limited incentives when it comes to
making research results available in open contractual networks?
b) To what extent do we experience that there is an unclear
division of roles when it comes to the responsibility to make
research results available in open contractual networks?
c) To what extent do we experience that there are unclear
norms and directives concerning the task of making research
results available in open contractual networks?
d) To what extent do we experience that the organizational
management of knowledge assets is underdeveloped?
e) To what extent do we experience that there is a lack of
responsibility and support from management?
f ) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
the university administration?
g) To what extent do we experience a lack of support from
external actors with regard to utilization in the private interest?
h) To what extent do we experience a lack of training and
education?

Figure 36. Self-assessment of risks with utilization through open platforms

148

versity’s lack of organizational skills for promoting this utilization logic risks negatively impacting development of the knowledge society itself. Clearly, there is a need
for driving forces not based on narrow commercial interests. Utilization through
open source code, “creative commons”, “open medicine initiatives” and similar initiatives are examples of new forms for creating public benefit that, in some sense, are
in the interface between the public and private sectors. The university’s ability to participate in the more industrially oriented open innovation processes is fundamental in
this context. Companies are becoming increasingly dependent on being able to share
innovation risk with other stakeholders. Universities have a central role in developing
clusters, consortia and centres in international arenas for research and innovation.
This approach permeates the EU-financed research programmes within the framework for Horizon 2020. The evidence suggests that universities and their researchers
play a crucial part in contributing to the creation of open knowledge management
platforms based on their quest for public responsibility.
The ability to utilize research in open networks/platforms
The overall operational risk for this logic is that research findings are not included in
open contractual networks. It is crucial that the academic environment have access to
contractual networks/platforms. There is obviously a significant difference between
creating a database that is more or less available for others and being part of a more
extensive open initiative. Within the KMP programme, we were only able to begin
assessing which more specific actions/conditions affect this. Overall conditions that
we considered important are whether the academic environments:
● clarifies research results as a background result or project result
● have access to open platforms
● can control which assets are included in which networks/platforms
● are a trustworthy/professional partner in the network/platform
● can determine and regulate the degree of openness
The ability to consider utilization activities based on public responsibility
As noted above, this fourth logic is associated, in some sense, with what we perceive
as a new public responsibility for the university for development taking place within
what we tend to call the “knowledge society”. Exactly how this logic interacts with
the other logics is not yet obvious. Though it is clear they do overlap.
Management of knowledge assets in open networks does not result in adequate transparency: There is a danger of going too far in staking claims to intellectual assets and
to managing knowledge transfer in the form of contractual transactions where
knowledge assets should be generally available in the public domain. At the same
time, management of knowledge assets using this logic can be more effective in
achieving practical accessibility and transparency than open publishing. The risk is
rather that the networks/platforms relevant to the academic environment could be
result in too limited dissemination.
Management of knowledge assets in open networks is not sufficient to enable utiliza-

149

tion: Making knowledge assets available on open networks/platforms may not necessarily result in adequate utilization. As with publication in the public domain, just
because knowledge assets are available to many stakeholders does not necessarily
mean that they will actually be utilized. Steps may need to be taken to make them
more applicable. At the same time, development of knowledge platforms could be an
important way of making them more applicable. This is typically the case with open
source code.
The ability to protect the university’s/government’s interests when providing research
results in open networks/platforms
Since this fourth logic is clearly under development, the exact risks for authorities
have not been obvious. Some reflections, however, are appropriate here.
Promotion of specific knowledge interests: When participating in a network or a
knowledge platform, there can be an expectation that all knowledge assets are provided through that platform or network. Depending on how transparent the specific
platform is, there is a risk of unduly favouring certain stakeholders.
Managing the research and utilization interface: A lesson from this utilization logic is
that it is even more difficult with this logic than other logics to distinguish between
research and utilization processes. For example, if an academic environment develops
a comprehensive database of research results, it often needs to enable and regulate
transparency of both research and utilization processes. Data is made available as
background knowledge for use in research and in various innovation processes.
When analyzed from a more instrumental perspective, we were able to highlight the
risks of inadequate control of contract management within the university for externally-funded research and training activities. Particularly significant is that the risk
of insufficient control of knowledge assets in the form of background rights in
collaborative projects leads to the university breaching its contractual obligations,
thus eroding its credibility.
Protecting the knowledge assets of others: A related risk is that academic environments are unable to manage the knowledge assets of others as expected in the common network/platform. Obviously this is especially challenging if, for example, data
are particularly sensitive and must be handled with confidentiality.
Portfolio management: Purely hypothetically, there is also a risk that the university
contributes to the development of excessive portfolios of knowledge assets, which
generate non-motivated transaction costs. At present, however, this seems relatively
remote.
Does the university make it possible for academic environments to utilize knowledge
assets through open contract processes?
There is strong support for the idea that the university’s organizational ability to
develop and, above all, take an active part in these open knowledge management
platforms is a core responsibility. Any risks associated with organizational inabilities

150

are principle in nature. These could be the university’s ability to take public responsibility and participate in international research contexts. A related conclusion is that
this inability could undermine the university’s competitiveness and reputation on
international research arenas. Similar to the other logics, we have focused the discussion on a number of typical organizational risks:
Unclear tasks and limited incentives: Development of and contribution to open
knowledge platforms and contractual networks are often resource intensive. They
often assume operations to be an integral part of its work. This makes questions of
incentives even more important.
Lack of management support: This logic extensively needs management support.
This often involves more than enabling academics to take responsibility. Developing
knowledge platforms may require developing research infrastructure, as we have
concluded previously. These are reasonably resources that must be dealt with to some
degree by senior management.
Lack of administrative support: This requires participation and expertise on the part
of the administration. Extensive support may be required when academic environments help develop IT infrastructure for managing knowledge assets.
Unclear standards: The various sub-logics for managing knowledge assets in contractual structures are often structured according to differing standards systems/ideologies. Standards associated with commonly shared knowledge, such as creative commons are relatively far-reaching. They place high demands on the development of
standards within the university.
Undeveloped management of knowledge assets: From the university’s perspective, the
academic environments have the main responsibility for collaboration and promoting
utilization. Increasingly, universities are expected to be able to make it clear which
knowledge assets they contribute and how others can use them. They also have to
govern knowledge assets of others, something even more challenging. When there are
many stakeholders involved in collaborative processes, common portfolios of knowledge assets must be developed and managed. The risk is obviously that to do so leads
to the university being seen as unreliable by external research funding bodies, the
public sector and private sector in enforcing the terms of proposed projects. Taken
together, these risks could significantly decrease the university’s ability to protect its
own and its employees’ interests.
Inability to assess knowledge assets: Academic environments participating in various
knowledge platforms assume an increasing ability to assess research results as knowledge assets.

3.5 Conclusions
The analysis of the academic environments resulted in a deeper understanding of
what it means for a university to promote utilization as an integral part of research

151

and education. Our analysis was able to discern a number of utilization logics for the
expectations and conditions that promote utilization within the framework of academic environments. We have defined four logics for an academic environment to
promote utilization and, thus, four logics that the University should position itself
within when developing its organizational ability. Based on how research results can
be managed as knowledge assets, researchers can choose to:
● make research results publicly available
● make the knowledge assets applicable to stakeholders and users
● develop the knowledge assets as innovation processes
● disseminate knowledge assets in open contractual platforms
We conclude that the academic environments expect to be able to promote utilization
according to these four logics. Our continuous assessment of different academic environments allowed us to construct a self-assessment for academic environments. The
assessment resulted in a number of questions that we believe researchers should
address when considering how much they should work to promote utilization and
who is able to do so.
In our analysis of the academic environments, we concluded that the task of promoting utilization as part of the university’s area of organizational responsibility is underdeveloped. This should be seen as a real threat. So we chose to conduct a risk analysis of the operational area with academic environments as the risk environment.
Subsequently, we came to discern a number of different types of risk. We were eventually able to construct a risk model for the university’s ability to promote utilization.
This risk model is based on an analysis of the academic environments’ intellectual
assets. On the basis of this analysis, we designed a risk analysis with the following
steps:
Step 1. Are the academic environments promoting utilization?
To what extent do the academic environments have the ambition and ability to make
knowledge assets:
● generally available
● applicable for certain stakeholder groups
● available as innovation processes
● available in open networks/platforms
The risk analysis should refer to both the willingness and the practical ability to promote utilization.
Step 2. Do the academic environments evaluate and consider different utilization
activities on the basis of public responsibility?
To what extent do the academic environments have the ambition and ability to assess
whether:
● general availability of knowledge assets is sufficient for utilization
● the knowledge assets are only available to a single stakeholder
● applicability of knowledge assets for specific stakeholders is sufficient for
utilization
● innovation activities generate sufficient public benefit

152

● management of knowledge assets in open networks results in adequate

transparency
● management of knowledge assets in open networks is sufficient to enable

utilization
Step 3. Does the academic environment take public authority responsibility when it
promotes utilization?
To what extent does the academic environment have the ambition and ability to safeguard the university’s interests such as:
● having the right to make use of knowledge assets that consist of
infrastructure
● the conditions for controlling knowledge assets
● continued critical independence
● unlimited conditions for continued own research and education
● the absence of conflicts of interest
● the ability to offer knowledge assets as background knowledge
● prevent unethical use of knowledge assets
● not favour certain stakeholders or interests without a reasonable motivation
Step 4. Does the university as an organization make it possible for the academic
environment to promote utilization?
● unclear tasks, limited resources and few incentives for the academics
(researchers and teachers)
● lack of clear division of roles
● lack of responsibility and support from senior management
● unclear standards for promoting utilization
● lack of support from the administration
● poorly developed organizational management of knowledge assets for
utilization
● limited capacity to assess knowledge assets and to try different ways
of utilizing them
All in all, we have developed not only a model to illustrate the risks, but also a risk
management model for the university's utilization efforts. From a KMP perspective,
we have thus laid the foundations for advanced management efforts and advanced
administrative support, primarily from the innovation office.

153

154

University governance and
organizational capabilities

155

4. Responsibilities for
university management
4.1 A public-based responsibility for collaboration
and utilization
Evaluation of what university governance and accountability as a public authority
might reasonably involve vis-a-vis collaboration and promoting the utilization of
research results.
A central evaluation by the KMP programme is what governance and organizational
development the university management should implement to enable academic environments and researchers to collaborate and promote utilization as an integral part
of the university. After a relatively comprehensive analysis of the state governance
system and the situation in the academic environments, we conclude that the university’s organizational ability to cooperate and work for utilization is under-developed
and should be considered an “area of risk”. A next step in the KMP programme is
therefore to assess what can, and should, be done to manage this situation.
Step 1:
Evaluation of what university
governance and accountability
as a public authority might
reasonably involve vis-a-vis
collaboration promoting the
utilization of research results.

How can we help
enable academic managers
to assume responsibility?

How can we
help enable
researchers
to assume
responsibility?

How can we as
university management
initiate and maintain
a process in which the
ability to collaborate and
promote utilization
develops as an
integrated part of
operations?

How can we
help enable
the Innovation
Oﬃce and
university
administration
to assume
responsibility?

How can we allow/enable
external actors to assume
responsibility?

Figure 37. Questions for university management regarding the development of leadership

156

A key lesson is that if the task of promoting utilization is to be integrated into the
university’s operations, it requires a developed university leadership — a leadership
that enables the academic environments and the researchers to take a broader public
responsibility. We refer in particular to the leadership by the academic managers.
Naturally, leadership within the administration are also crucial. Leadership is also
additionally critical when the university is undergoing a process of transformation. It
requires management that can deal with the institutional development of the university’s ability to push for utilization.
The KMP programme has, therefore, focused on assessing which instruments and
processes are available for academic managers and leaders. The focus was on evaluating what an academic manager needs to consider to enable researchers and the academic environments to utilize and manage knowledge assets in collaborative processes. We analyzed available options to develop the leadership on the basis of the situation at the university. Our aim was to develop a simplified “leadership model” that is
primarily addressed to the academic managers, but also to other academic leaders.
4.1.1 Policy making at university level
As previously stated, a basic hypothesis for KMP was that if the university is to be
able to integrate and take organizational responsibility for the mission to collaborate
and utilize research results, this assumes an institutional model under state governance. Accordingly, the assessment in this section is based largely on the analysis of
the state governance (see Chapter 2). We have analyzed the university’s local management in this context.
When focusing on state governance and the development of an institutional model, it
is natural to start from the management responsibility for the authority, i.e. mainly
the Vice-Chancellor’s responsibilities in interaction with the university board. The
university is part of the state, and an authority manager’s actions are part of state
governance. The question is thus how the top level university management can make
it possible for researchers and academic environments to promote the utilization of
research and manage it in collaborative relationships.
Within the KMP programme, we have mainly chosen to regard the control responsibilities as developing an organizational capacity for the promotion of utilization and
collaboration. Our conclusion is that the authority needs to develop all forms of
governance at the university level: governance by objectives, regulatory governance,
programme and project governance, and resource governance.
Governance by objectives: Based its the official mission, the university management is
responsible for making clear what the university wants to achieve through promoting
utilization and collaboration.
Regulatory governance: The university management has responsibility for the development of the overall scheme and the standards for collaboration and utilization.
Programme and project governance: The university management has the responsibili-

157

ty for the development of a system for, and in the specific cases to ensure, how to act
as stakeholder and contractual party in research and utilization projects and programmes.
Resource and result governance: The university management has responsibility for
ensuring that there are resources for collaboration and promotion of utilization, and
ensuring that the resources achieve their intended goals.
We believe that the university management’s responsibilities in this area result from
the existing state governance. When implementing this responsibility, a normative
approach can be used. This chapter attempts to identify this normative approach and
specify how it should be handled by the Vice-chancellor/University Board, in accordance with the concept of autonomy of the university. In particular, we have taken
into account what is needed locally at the University of Gothenburg. At the same
time, we have felt it important to create a basic approach that, as far as possible, is
applicable for Swedish academic conditions in general.
4.1.2 Academic leadership and responsibility
The risk analysis described in the previous chapter is also important for this chapter.
The starting point here was the academic environments. The lesson learned from the
KMP programme is that academic environments need to be developed into a “knowledge management platform”. This will enable them to handle research findings in
both collaborative research and utilization processes. A systematic assessment process
was, as described above, made possible through the analysis of what constitutes
knowledge assets.
An important question in the risk analysis was leadership and concrete actions. We
wanted to understand and formulate specific actions that are significant when the
university’s organizational capability needs to be developed. As noted above, we have
given particular attention to how university management should manage organizational risks such as:
● unclear tasks
● lack of clear division of roles
● lack of responsibility and support from senior management
● unclear standards for promoting utilization
● lack of support from management
● poorly developed organizational management of knowledge assets for
utilization
● limited capacity to evaluate knowledge assets and to analyze different
ways of using them
● limited incentives for academics (researchers and teachers)
The KMP programme has focused on analyzing and discussing how to involve university management in various ways and to establish an assumption of responsibility
at the organizational level. Several meetings have been held with university management to discuss the issue of increased assumption of responsibility.197 On a general
197 See Appendix 1 below for a list of these meetings.

158

level, the discussions, in principle, have always been positive and constructive. When
the discussions focused on more specific management responsibility, we have often
been reminded that it is not necessarily perceived as self-evident that the university
management is responsible for developing the university’s organizational capabilities
— at least not when it comes to promoting utilization of research results. Nor is it
clear what constitutes leadership within the University for this part. As noted, the
university is largely a profession-driven organization, i.e. it is researchers and teachers
who decide what their work will consist of. For better and for worse, the university is
not an organization that easily stimulates leadership.

4.2 Obstacles to an expanded management responsibility
for collaboration and utilization
The EU’s recommendation on the management of intellectuals asset is heavily influenced by the idea that university management should take and apply strategic responsibility. As a first commitment, it is emphasised that Member States must ensure that
all public research organizations participate in knowledge transfer as a strategic mission. It is quite possible to argue that the Swedish Government done so in Section 3
of the Higher Education Act. Managing something as a strategic mission, according
to a Swedish Government model, however, would be extremely demanding. In this
section, we discuss some of the reasoning and discussions about management taking
increased responsibility.
4.2.1 Conflicting university ideas
What does it mean to have strategic responsibility for collaboration and utilization of
research results? That researchers are considered to own their publicly funded
research results in private at the same time as there is an increasing expectation that
universities, as a public authority, have to ensure that the research results serve a
public benefit, is not a simple equation. A vision of the university as an organization
having the ability to take greater social responsibility is, from this point of view, not
without its problems.
An important lesson gained from the KMP programme is that Sweden has a long
tradition of cooperation between its universities and society. This relationship is
explained largely by initiatives and motivations of individual researchers, but also by
the fact that the business community and other community stakeholders have been
willing to take primary responsibility for the utilization of research results. External
stakeholders have been a driving force and have been responsible for several successful initiatives relating to utilization. Internationalization and greater focus on the
importance of knowledge to the economy, in conjunction with efforts to create public
value and welfare, inevitably impose new demands on the university.
The KMP programme has shown that a clear responsibility at the management level
is key to initiate, stimulate and allow the integration of collaborative ability into the
academic environments. Naturally, responsibility for developing the university as an

159

institution lies with its management. A real lesson from the KMP programme, albeit
quite obvious, is that university management must see it as a strategic responsibility
to promote the utilization of research results and to collaborate. At the same, it must
be acknowledged that the university is a complex organization from a management
standpoint. The majority of universities fall under state administration and thus are
governed based on state administrative logic. Moreover, universities are largely collegial organizations, i.e. much of their development occurs in the interaction between
employed researchers and teachers.
With the autonomy reforms, it has certainly become more clear that the University
Board of Directors, Vice-Chancellor and senior management hold the government
responsibility in this regard. The Board currently has so-called “full control” over the
activities of the university. With state administration, power can be said to have shifted from the teaching staff and from the administration to the university management.
At the same time, the university has relatively broad discretion at the local level to
stick to more collegial forms of governance. If you consider the interaction between
the different “spheres of power” in terms of collaboration, it is possible to discern a
number of competing approaches:
● The autonomous university – university’s management and vicechancellor responsible for collaboration and utilization
● The administration university – the state administration takes
responsibility for collaboration and utilization in accordance with the
state governance
● The collegial university – teachers and researchers take a collective
responsibility for collaboration and utilization within the framework
of their public sector responsibilities
● The entrepreneurial university – teachers and researchers take individual
responsibility for collaboration in private in conjunction with external
support structures
In our work in the KMP programme, it has not been clear how to relate to the relatively great uncertainty currently associated with organizational responsibility. In a
situation in which there is uncertainty about the governance situation, it is tempting
to speculate whether the university lacks organizational and structural conditions
that promote utilization. On the one hand, it is organized as a state-run authority
with a strong management and, on the other hand, it is constructed with the academic collegiate as the main “power base”, something that can create uncertainty. To persons from business and industry, the university looks as though it has a structure that
is ill-adapted to dealing with the growing need to operate as a competitive player in
the global arena, with the ability to play an active part in a knowledge-based society.
Experience gained from the KMP programme taught us that this does not need to be
the case at all. It is fully possible to argue that it is precisely the tension between the
different “spheres of power/university ideas” that makes it possible for universities to
play a central part in developing society.
4.2.2 Professor’s privilege as an argument for universities not taking responsibility
An issue that characterized the KMP programme is the extent to which the profes-

160

sor’s privilege (teacher’s exemption) runs counter to an organizational responsibility
for promoting utilization and collaboration. This is because senior academics choose
to refer to the professor’s privilege to avoid responsibility and development work that
is associated with the collaborative mission defined in the Higher Education Act
being integrated into the university’s operations. Analysis of government governance
shows that there is nothing that prevents the university from developing its organizational ability to promote utilization and collaboration. The professor’s privilege only
means that researchers in some sense have to affirm the university’s organizational
responsibility. In some contexts, it will certainly be presumed that the university
makes agreements with researchers carrying out private work.
The conclusion from the KMP programme is that it is the vice-chancellor’s and the
academic managers’ willingness to assume responsibility that is the challenge. In parallel with the analysis of the expectations from the government and the academic
environments, we have had continuous discussions in different management contexts.
The intention throughout the KMP programme has been to involve senior management. Our ambition has also been for managers to determine which environments
should be analyzed and to involve them in the dialogue on how specific knowledge
assets should be managed in the collaboration and utilization processes. The programme has continually evaluated what is required for taking organizational responsibility and how this is reasonably implemented and developed. This dialogue has
provided some useful lessons that we will review and report here.
The KMP programme found that it is natural for academic managers to point to
researchers as being responsible for promoting utilization. Based on the above evaluations, we feel it is not reasonable, fair or justifiable as an authority to put the entire
responsibility on researchers to determine how results from taxpayer investments in
public research should be managed. This is not to say that researchers should not be
able to commercialize their research results or, for that matter, have a clear influence
on them. The point is that managers and administration must take responsibility for
researchers not having to sit with the responsibility for collaboration and utilization,
at the same time as they have their own legitimate private commercial interests to
protect. It requires a public leadership to enable researchers to promote both public
and private utilization.
Another lesson from the KMP programme is that academic managers should avoid
excessively shirking their responsibilities to external structures. An interesting discussion in this context is the recurring debate within the university’s medical faculty, in
which the academic management wants to see a clear innovation system to which
researchers can turn with their ideas. They would like a system with a portal that has
the potential to realise potentially commercial ideas. Whether this system is part of
the university or not seems to be subordinate in the context — as long as it is effective. In practice, this means that the university entrusts to external actors such as
incubators, technology parks, licensing experts and others, to evaluate the risks and
decide on how publicly-funded knowledge assets will be utilized in a responsible way
from a public benefit perspective. The KMP programme showed that this may not
only affect the conditions for the university to conduct collaborative research and
other interactions, but could also restrict the university’s capacity to engage in inter-

161

nal research and education.198 Giving external actors too much control over considerations of how research results should be utilized will affect the university’s autonomy. Again, it does not mean external support structures should not have an important role to play, quite the contrary.
A more comprehensive lesson in some sense is linked to the experience of the professor’s privilege is that there are currently no arrangements for who is responsible for
ensuring collaboration and utilization take place on the basis of public responsibility.
Interesting in this context, is the conclusion made at Linköping University as part of
its risk assessment work in 2012. “A basic observation is that a clear distinction has
still not been made between the responsibilities of the university board with respect
to ensuring that there is an adequate system of organization for internal management
and control, and the responsibilities of the vice-chancellor in terms of ensuring that
internal steering and control function satisfactorily.”199 One possible conclusion from
this general observation is that the main problem is that the university, and especially
its board, have not realized their role of ensuring that there is an organization to
manage the risks associated with the university’s public responsibility.
4.2.3 Collaboration and utilization as visionary rhetoric
A challenge identified in the KMP programme is that visions and strategies tend to be
limited to visionary rhetoric. At present, Gothenburg University has adopted a vision
that places great emphasis on public responsibility. That part of the vision seems to
be the most featured aspect on websites and in other communication. It may be that
the responsibility for coordination and utilization is given attention in a purely communicative context. It is an appealing message that the university sends to the government and society at large.
Another lesson from the KMP programme is that there is a clear risk that the strategic work on collaboration and utilization is reduced to what can be described as simple brand building, nothing else. It is natural for university management and senior
managers to take responsibility for profiling the university as an outward-looking
and responsible public actor. It is, however, decisive in this context that the acknowledgement of responsibility is not limited to this brand-building ambition.
4.2.4 Managers’ collaboration, academic career and side jobs
It has also been learned that university senior management traditionally consists of
academics, i.e. they have essentially previously been engaged in research and education. To move to being a senior manager for such a complex activity as a university is
inevitably a major change, in particular with regard to the sort of operational responsibility that has historically not been included in research and education. It is tempt198 See the risk analysis in chapter 3.
199 https://www.liu.se/om-liu/organisation/us/protokoll-beslut-2013/2013-02-18/1.454634/6
Arbetetmedinternstyrningochkontroll.pdf.

162

ing to minimize management and let the academics look after themselves as far as
possible. In addition, such academics are relatively familiar with research and education. Leadership for different interaction and utilization projects is often something
that is unfamiliar and does not always feel comfortable.
It is certainly not obvious to academic managers when they only represent themselves
(in some form of side job) and when they represent the public authority. Nor is it particularly clear to everyone what it means to work as a representative of an authority.
What does delegated management responsibility mean in this context? When should
you bring up a case within the authority?
4.2.5 The challenge of implementing leadership within the public administrative
model
In the initial stage of the KMP programme, most individuals involved with a background in utilization work were doubtful of the extent to which it is possible to
develop an authority model that can be responsible for utilization of knowledge
assets. A complex bureaucratic government system is at odds with innovation
processes and other utilization activities. For those concerned with utilization, it is
clear that it is largely dependent upon the entrepreneurial driving force of individuals,
of enthusiasts. This, therefore, does not necessarily mean the driving force to make
money, but rather to influence and develop society. The obvious concern is of course
that an ambition to develop the university’s organizational ability counteracts such
individual motivating forces and instead reinforces the prevailing lack of responsibility. It risks strengthening and highlighting the formal conditions for challenging and
even casting suspicion on the initiatives taken in many places.
The experience gained in the KMP programme demonstrates the importance of the
university largely operating within the framework of the public authority model,
developing managerial roles and, among other things, developing its governance in
accordance with administrative law and other regulations. The more the process of
collaboration and utilization is integrated into the university management, the more
natural the development of a collegial responsibility becomes. There is much to indicate that administrative responsibility stimulates both the management and the academics to increased activity in the area. In this context it becomes clear that management responsibility for the university is about how to act on the basis of its role as a)
authority, b) employer and c) contractual party. By focusing on these different roles
or characteristics, it is possible to develop a more structured approach and focus on a
number of comprehensive administrative instruments.
Of particular interest here is governance by objectives as a way of allowing the university to develop its various properties. A central hypothesis of the KMP programme
is that governance by objectives is one of the most important resources in academic
management. Universities are not hierarchical organizations in the usual sense of the
word. As discussed above, academic management assumes various forms of participation and leadership is also so much more than just management. Governance by
objective processes may well be based on comprehensive participation and thus also
be meaningfully within the framework of both management and leadership.

163

4.3 Specification of managerial responsibility
The KMP programme is noted for its work with knowledge assets. Based on our
understanding of how academic environments can use knowledge assets, we evaluated the university’s various processes for leading and developing the university’s activities. What form could management responsibility more specifically take when it
comes to collaboration and promotion of utilization of knowledge assets?
4.3.1 The university’s roles as authority, employer and contractual party
The evaluation of how university management can govern university operations
resulted in an approach focused on different governing roles/properties. How can,
and should, a university engage in governance by objectives, regulatory governance,
programme and project governance, governance of resources? Even for individuals
intimately involved in these questions, it is by no means self-evident how to deal with
institutional development, particularly when wanting a transparent and comprehensible process.
We began with an analysis of what it means to manage and lead a state university.
What do promoting utilization of research results and working in collaboration mean
from an administrative perspective? What responsibility reasonably lies with the
academic manager? Opinions differ even here. What actually do the autonomy
reforms mean relative to the collegiate tradition? Clearly, as the authority, you are
responsible for all forms of governance.
It became obvious that if the university’s responsibility is primarily a matter of
enabling researchers to take public responsibility, this is largely a question of employer responsibility. As noted a number of times previously, the ambition of the KMP
programme is to allow researchers to promote utilization within the academic
environment, as well as in private. Through employers’ responsibility, the academic
manager has the preconditions and obligation to enable and manage employees. The
question is what this means, specifically. How should the academic managers use
labour law instruments in their management?
When it comes to the university’s responsibility to interact and promote utilization, it
is often a matter of acting as a contractual party in external relations. How can the
university develop its role in this context? What does it mean to represent the university in external relations as a manager? How can you use contracts as instruments to
develop management responsibility?
The conclusion is that when evaluating what concrete action the university management should take, it is important to consider the university’s three roles, i.e. the interaction between the university acting as the public authority, employer and contractual
party. The authority has responsibilities specified by government regulations and relevant regulations for the values represented by the of knowledge assets for public
activities. As an employer, the university has the responsibility to manage the business
of the university and to enable workers to manage the knowledge assets they create.
As noted previously, expectations are increasing that university as a contractual party

164

must be able to manage knowledge assets for society’s benefit. The conclusion of the
KMP programme is that this involves developing all three roles when the university
intends to develop its organizational capability to promote utilization and collaboration. Such a process of development is made possible by focusing on knowledge
assets in academic environments.
4.3.2 The university management’s actions for developing an institutional model for
collaboration and utilization
The intention of the KMP programme is to put forward specific proposals for what
the university management should do to develop the university’s organizational
capacity to promote utilization and collaboration. Based on the risk analysis we have
performed above, the intention is to propose a package of measures for risk management. We had learned that measures may be too abstract or, for that matter, too
legalistic if you want to specify what leadership should reasonably consist of. Our
evaluation focused on identifying some key processes and core measures. We realized
that we need a model that captures these key processes/actions — a model that, when
it is implemented, both enables researchers to promote utilization of knowledge
assets and allows the development of the academic management.
Position as an enabler
The key challenge (and also for the KMP programme as a whole) for this evaluation
is to understand how academic environments can be developed as knowledge management platforms; that is, as organizations where researchers can collaborate and
promote utilization as a public organization, while also having the opportunity to
utilize their research results in a private capacity. In accordance with the above, we
believe that academic management is not limited to being a question of leadership
under the public authority model. In terms of collaboration and utilization, it is an
interplay between academic leadership (department head, dean and so on), leadership
in the administration, collegial leadership and also leadership in external support
structures (holding companies and so on).
In the developed model, we have divided up the issue of a developed leadership in
this regard as follows:
● the academic managers’ ability to enable
● the support apparatus’ ability to enable
● the academic collegium’s ability to enable
● external support functions’ ability to enable.
The evaluation came to focus on what tools are available for developing this ability
to enable. We strove to identify necessary governance instruments for enabling development of the overall organizational capacity based on the above division. At this
point, it became clear that we had to take a step back. We asked ourselves what
governance instruments the university management has for ensuring that there is
academic leadership, support activities, academic staff and external support functions
that serve as enablers. When evaluating opportunities for control at the university

165

level, it is natural to discuss what university management should do. Inevitably, much
of the focus lies on the vice-chancellor as manager of the public authority. It is primarily the vice-chancellor who can decide various control measures that, in turn, will
open the way for other governance measures.

Management tools that enable
A collaboration between the University of Gothenburg and Linköping University
was developed within the framework of the KMP programme. An important feature
of this cooperation was to discuss the possibilities and limitations of the various
standard development processes. We concluded that both universities had extensive
experience with the failings that often appear when universities, as authorities,
attempt to develop capacities beyond what individual researchers can do as educators
and carrying out research. At the same time, there was a belief that it is necessary for
there to be a potential for stronger leadership and increased organizational capacity.
We began turning every stones to see what paths the university administration can
choose within a public authority model.
After an extensive evaluation and intensive dialogue about precisely which control
instruments exist, a number of draft measures, or rather normative processes,
emerged:
● Objectives and strategies for collaboration and utilization of research
results
● Policies for collaboration and utilization of research results
● Instructions for researchers and teachers
● Management instructions for collaboration and utilization of research
results
● Instructions for innovation offices
● Instructions/agreements with holding companies and other external
support structures
● The establishment of an academic education unit — an “Innovation
Academy”
Our conclusion was that if you focus on these types of approved documents, this
will initiate a number of development processes for academic leadership. It is the
processes themselves that are important in this context. One process is for the
university management to establish policy documents in collaboration with the
academic staff and the administration. Another process is the normative effect on
the actual operations and organizational development. It was not immediately
obvious how these processes can be viewed as core processes for leadership at
university management level. A university is, as we have pointed out, a professionbased organization where leadership requires participation and influence.
Implementation processes and development of action plans
Within the KMP programme it has been important to try to understand the different

166

normative processes for the management of knowledge assets. A lot of analytical
work has been carried out on how to understand the interplay between different
normative instruments. We asked the general question: How can management use
vision and strategy documents, policy documents and instructions to create action
plans that develop the university’s organizational capacity to promote utilization and
collaboration?
Assessing and understanding these normative processes also gives us the potential for
a normative development of models/suggestions for how university management can
orchestrate the necessary development processes. The idea is to develop models that
can be applied locally at Gothenburg University and also at other Swedish universities. This is why it has been important in the evaluation to analyze past actions and
policy at the University of Gothenburg as well as those at other Swedish universities.200 Since the ambition is for the results of the KMP programme to be, to some
extent, applicable for universities in general, it has also been important to carry out
an assessment at an international level.201
Visions and strategies for collaboration and utilization of research results
— A governance by objectives process
A significant normative process that needs to be evaluated and developed within the
KMP programme is the university’s governance by objectives for collaboration and
utilization. The university needs to develop what is meant by promoting utilization
and what this will result in. The university’s governance by objectives should, reasonably enough, be consistent with state governance by objectives. At the same time, it is
crucial that the university’s governance by objectives is in line with what researchers
and the academic environments see as essential to achieve with their own operations.
Reasonably, governance by objectives is conducted at all levels of the university’s
activities, i.e. it is not just a matter of a question of a process to be managed at university senior management level. Governance by objectives in academic environments
should, therefore, be consistent with governance by objectives at the university level.
This makes it clear that this is a question of developing a university-wide governance
by objective process.
It was natural, in our evaluation process, to take inspiration from governance by
objectives at the of the goals/initiative levels discussed above:
● Which overall goals and societal values are important to aim at?
● What activities are desirable and which more specific results do we want
to achieve?
● How should the university’s operations be developed in terms of
collaborating and promoting utilization?
These questions are relevant for governance by objectives at all levels within the
university. On the basis of these three questions, we believe it is also possible to
evaluate the interaction between governance by objectives at different levels. As we
have stated, the KMP programme chose to take inspiration from the governance by
200 We have reviewed governance by objective documents and policy documents from all Swedish universities.
201 Internationally, we have looked at Copenhagen University, NTNU, Cambridge University and Oxford University.

167

objective process at the university senior management level. By answering these
questions, the aim is to develop a model that can be applied governance by objectives
efforts throughout the university, but which has its origins at the university senior
management level. For the direct control instruments, it has been natural to focus on
the university’s work with its vision and strategy.
Policy for collaboration and utilization of research results
— A norm development process
Another important process is the evaluation and development of the university’s regulatory control. Based on the analysis of both state governance and the situation in
academic environments, we have observed that there is a clear need for developing
norms for the university’s utilization of research results and collaboration. It is
important to develop norms, not least in the development of organizational capacity
itself.
The KMP programme has focused on such issues as:
● What should the university’s action plans (implemented organizations
and systems) for collaboration and utilization look like?
● How should the responsibility for promoting utilization and collaboration
be distributed among players within, and associated with, the
universities?
● What must, must not, and should be done in terms of promoting
utilization of knowledge assets and managing knowledge assets in
collaborative relationships?
● What incentives are needed to take responsibility for development of its
own knowledge assets?
Based on the above, we began a discussion of what norms are needed. It was particularly interesting to evaluate how norms enable the development of different support
systems and different organizational functions, which in turn lay the foundation for
action plans for the management of knowledge assets in collaborative and utilization
processes.
Similar to above, inspiration is taken from university senior management level for
evaluation of what management should do to initialize a norm development process.
It has been natural to focus on the university’s policy/policies for collaboration and
utilization of research results. By focusing on key processes/core actions relating to a
policy of collaboration and utilization, the foundation is laid for a larger institutional
process.
Establishment of an academic player for education, dialogue and criticism
For a programme wanting to evaluate and have a critical dialogue as a basis for university development, clearly this development is a long-term process. This is both an
advantage and disadvantage. It is, of course, important to manage existing risk situations and develop the organizational ability relatively quickly. At the same time, there
is a need for a critical dialogue and questioning. For this reason, the KMP pro-

168

gramme has evaluated the preconditions for and contribute to an independent, yet
related training structure for management and administration that allows us to learn
about the responsibility for collaboration and discuss it critically based on academic
conditions.

4.4 Conclusions
On a general level, our ambition is to develop a model of how university administrators and academic managers should relate to the task of collaborating and promoting
utilization. Our efforts encompassed the academic responsibility as well as the
authority responsibility. Is it possible to develop a model for academic managers to
promote innovation processes and other utilization, and at the same time defend
academic values and the norms on which the public authority model rests?
By evaluating the university's various roles as public authority, employer and contractual party and based on responsibility for the management of knowledge assets, we
were able to clarify some intertwined key processes for academic leadership. First and
foremost, for leadership at the university senior management level, but also at all
other levels - for academic managers, administration and academic staff. We came to
the conclusion that it needed a leadership model that focuses on 1) a risk management process, 2) a governance by objective process, and 3) a governance by norms
process.
As university management,
how can we initiate and maintain
a process in which the ability to
collaborate and promote utilization
develops as an integrated part
of operations?

Risk Management Process
Evaluation and clariﬁcation of the
risks/obstacles that exist when it
comes to our ability to complete
the task/fulﬁl our responsibility
as a public institution.

Governance by Objective Process

Governance by Norms Process

Dialogue-based:
1) Clariﬁcation of our goals,
2) Implementation in action plans,
3) Follow-up (monitoring) of practical
implementation and impact.

Dialogue-based:
1) Clariﬁcation of responsibility,
2) Establishment of norms for
managing knowledge assets, etc.,
3) Follow-up of implementation.

Figure 38. Key processes to enable collaboration and utilization of knowledge assets

169

The model for risk management process was discussed in the previous chapter. This
model helps academic managers understand their own operations. The risk assessment creates a picture of the challenges that exist and, hopefully, a realistic understanding of their own opportunities. It also forms the basis for both the governance
by objective process and the norm development process. Risk assessment can be performed at university senior management level, but it can also take place within a
given academic environment. The same applies to governance by objectives and norm
development processes. The models for the three processes create something of a
toolbox for academic management in promoting the utilization of research results.

170

5. Objectives and strategy
5.1 Governance based on objectives
Evaluation of governance by objectives as a means for university management to
facilitate the integration of collaboration and utilization in academic environments.
An insight gained through the KMP programme’s analysis of state governance and
the risk analyses of academic environments was that governance by objectives is one
of the most important processes of academic leadership. Since universities are public
authorities, it is important to identify and clarify the operational objectives established by the government. According to Section 6 of Sweden’s Government Agencies
Ordinance (2007:515), public authorities are required to continuously develop their
operations to achieve their operational objectives. Moreover, Section 8 of the
Ordinance states that public authorities are required to ensure that their employees
are well acquainted with these operational objectives. How does this affect the task
of promoting utilization? Objectives such as achieving public benefit or, for that
matter, economic growth are likely too abstract and difficult to grasp. Instead, it is
important to emphasize objectives that are reasonably concrete and manageable
for academics and their environments. Only then is it possible to more precisely
determine what organizational capabilities are needed to achieve the operational
objectives.

Risk
Management
Process
Model for
Governance
by Objectives

Governance by Objective Process
1. The process of formulating goals
in visions and strategies
2. The implementation process and
drafting of action plans
3. The follow-up process and
development of indicators of impact

Figure 39. Evaluation of governance by objectives as a tool for university management

171

Consequently, it is important in the KMP programme to evaluate what university
administration can and should consider when establishing and clarifying what it
believes the university should achieve with collaboration and promoting utilization.
In recent years it has become increasingly common for universities to develop visions
and strategies to guide their operations in the same way as businesses do. From a
KMP perspective, these serve as tools for governance by objectives by the authority.
5.1.1 Model for managing collaboration and utilization by objectives
The evaluation of governance by objectives is based both on considerations of state
governance and on what we believe a university needs to consider to manage defined
risk situations in academic environments. We have also evaluated corresponding
activities at other universities and analyzed various governance by objectives instruments.202 Moreover, it has also been important that KMP’s evaluation work be integrated with the university’s strategic work as far as possible. We have undertaken an
evaluation and learning process in parallel with the process described earlier as
Vision 2020. We have been able to determine what should reasonably be considered
in the governance by objectives process itself. Over time, the KMP programme’s work
has also come to influence the development of this governance by objectives, not least
of all by providing basic data.
The KMP programme’s ambition is to develop a governance by objectives “model”
for the university. The evaluation is highly normative. The idea has been to pinpoint
factors that the university should investigate and adopt a position on in developing
its governance by objectives process. The model is intended for use at all organizational levels within the university. We posed the following questions at three different
levels:
● Which overarching objectives and public values are important to pursue
(overarching objectives)?
● Which activities are worthwhile and what more concrete result do we
want to achieve (utilization objectives)?
● How should operations be developed in connection with the task of collaborating and promoting utilization (objectives related to utilization
capabilities)?
Using these questions, an objective-means model can gradually be developed. The
purpose of the model is to pinpoint and call attention to objectives for consideration
and which the organization should consider specifying in more details as relates to its
own operations. The questions help us identify objectives (ends) that are also means.
High expectations are reasonable on an overarching level. Considering the current
position of Swedish universities, we should clarify which overarching objectives
should shape operations and the values on which operations should be based. This is
202 We have examined in detail the governance by objectives approaches applied at Lund, Uppsala, Linköping and
Umeå universities, Chalmers University of Technology, Sweden’s Royal Institute of Technology (KTH), Karolinska
Institutet, the University of Copenhagen, the Norwegian University of Science and Technology (NTNU) and
Cambridge and Oxford universities.

172

CONSIDERATIONS CONCERNING
OBJECTIVES FOR COLLABORATION AND
THE UTILIZATION OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS
1. What are our overarching objectives?
Interest-oriented governance by objectives
• Objectives for the university’s position and
competitiveness
• Objectives for the surrounding society´s development
• Objectives concerning researchers’ private interests
Value-based governance by objectives
• Objectives for ecological, biological and material
value creation
• Objectives for social and humanistic value creation
• Objectives for artistic value creation
• Objectives for economic value creation

true for both the top management
level and other organizational levels. Researchers and the academic
environments should also focus
more on and apply objectivebased management. Questions of
values and public responsibility
should play an active part in this
conversation and operational
planning.

In particular, the university
should clarify more concrete utilization objectives. Currently,
many people seem to associate
2. What are our speciﬁc objectives concerning
promoting utilization with compromoting utilization?
• Objectives for making knowledge assets publicly
mercialization objectives. One of
available
the KMP programme’s primary
• Objectives for making knowledge assets applicable for
stakeholders
tasks has been to demonstrate
• Objectives for developing knowledge assets as
that the task of promoting utilizainnovation processes
tion is based on a number of dif• Objectives for implementing knowledge assets in
open contractual processes
ferent logics. University management should establish objectives
3. What are our objectives concerning developing
that harmonize with all these logour ability to promote utilization?
• Autonomy objectives – to develop the university
ics, from pursuing academic pubas an organization
lication to founding private enter• Support system objectives – to develop the support
system’s capabilities
prises. Detailed specification and
• Ownership responsibility objectives – to develop
achievement of objectives at this
responsibility for knowledge assets
level provides the means to
achieving the overarching objecFigure 40. Model for discussing operational
tives. The very process of specifyobjectives
ing which activities are viewed as
typical in promoting utilization is important in itself. In the end, the individual
researchers are the ones who ensure that these activities are carried out.
Governance on a university level is especially important in this phase. Achievement of
objectives at this level creates the means needed to achieve the objectives at the other
levels. An example of an objective at this level is to develop an innovation office with
the ability, from an operational standpoint, to enable academic environments and
researchers to promote utilization. Naturally, objectives concerning how operations
should be developed are important at all levels of the university. It is important to see
that there is a need for objectives from a number of different aspects.
5.1.2 Vision and strategy as tools for governance by objectives
Certainly, it can be argued that academic environments and academic managers continually discuss various forms of objectives, as described above. Within the KMP programme, however, it has been important to highlight and emphasize governance by

173

objectives as a more structured process. Formalizing governance by objectives is
important in promoting the organization’s ability to enable academic environments
and researchers.
A number of different governance instruments can be used for governance by objectives. In time, vision and strategy documents proved to be the most important instrument. Internationally, universities increasingly emphasize vision and strategy. In principle, this can occur at all levels of a university.
On the other hand, it is not obvious to the degree to which public authorities can
and should pursue their own strategic work. Considering the university’s particular
mission and its pursuit of autonomy, however, it is reasonable to prioritize this objective-means work. Moreover, visions and strategies should be supplemented with other
control instruments, such as operational plans and instructions. As noted earlier,
expectations and requirements for following up results are increasingly common.
Universities will likely increasingly define various indicators for measuring collaboration and utilization, which will have a normative effect as governance by objectives
instruments.203
5.1.3 An enabling governance by objectives process
It was natural for the KMP programme to take its cue from the responsibility for
governance by objectives held by the university administration and department managers. At the same time, it should be remembered that universities to a large extent
are governed by the academic profession and that, hopefully, collegial processes will
always play a central role. Thus, from a KMP perspective, it is important that governance by objectives manifests itself as processes that engage and enable academic
environments.
Vision and strategy work should reasonably be based on an open dialogue. The
establishment of the finalized documents should be preceded by collegial processes.
Moreover, their implementation depends upon collegial processes. Consequently, governance by objectives within a university must be understood as a process in which
university management, academics and the university administration assume major
responsibility for the process and communication.
The KMP programme’s ambition is to help develop how governance by objectives
processes should be handled within a university. We will describe and discuss our
conclusions about this below.
5.1.4 The process at the University of Gothenburg
The University of Gothenburg has recently adopted a new vision, entitled Vision
2020. This document contains both objectives and strategies. It was natural for the
203 See also Chapter 2.

174

KMP programme to be involved in the work that culminated in the vision and in the
subsequent work to translate these abstract objectives into more concrete and timelimited action plans. The University of Gothenburg’s ambition has been to base its
vision and strategy on a comprehensive dialogue. Vision 2020 is the result of such a
dialogue in which almost 1,000 employees and students participated via a long line
of seminars and workshops. Invited guests from other higher education institutions,
both local and international, also participated in the process, as did municipalities,
regional organizations and the business community.
The university’s vision has focused on highlighting the most important issues the university faces going forward. The strategies are intended to help the university pursue
“research that makes a difference, education that breaks new ground, cooperation
that sparks progress and an inspiring work environment”. This statement makes
explicit the intention to include collaboration and utilization in the university’s core
operations.

5.2 The university’s overarching objectives
The initial part of the governance by objectives approach looks at overarching objectives for the university’s operations.204 The KMP programme has focused on clarifying which questions and themes should reasonably be considered at the university
level.205 When developing governance by objectives, it is inevitable to ask “Why?”;
not just why the university should pursue utilization and collaboration, but also why
the university pursues academic activities at all. Separating the overarching objectives
for collaboration and utilization from the overarching objectives for the university as
a whole is no simple task. Once again, it becomes clear why universities should manage collaboration and utilization as integrated aspects of their operations. A dialogue
on objectives and managing operations can take very different directions, depending
on the angle it is approached. At this overarching level, the dialogue also shows why
many within academia feel a certain scepticism towards governance by objectives as a
concept. Will it not lead to short-term financial goals being given precedence over
more fundamental societal objectives for democracy, transparency and welfare, for
example? From a KMP perspective, it has been important to emphasize that gover204 Vision 2020 (GU):‘Quality-driven research, education and cooperation in an inspiring environment, strong social
responsibility and global engagement enable the University of Gothenburg to contribute to a better future.’
http://medarbetarportalen.gu.se/vision2020/?languageId=100001&skipSSOCheck=true&referer=https%3A%2F%2F
www.google.se%2F Vision 2027 (KTH):‘KTH is one of Europe’s leading technical universities. Supreme quality in education, research and outreach, as well as a distinct identity, are formed by the best teachers, researchers and students. KTH is a custodian of the role of technology in society and takes responsibility for its impact: creating innovative solutions to global challenges.’ https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.178308!/Menu/general/columncontent/attachment/v2027en%20slutversion.pdf.
205 Cross-boundary collaboration, internationalization, quality enhancement and leader, teacher and employee
excellence are Lund universities goals. (http://www.lunduniversity.lu.se/sites/www.lunduniversity.lu.se/files/strategic-plan-lund-university.pdf ).
World-leading research, first-class education, benefiting society and the development of the university environment are Uppsala University’s goals. (http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/14/14263_3mal-och-strategier-for-uppsalauniversitet.pdf ). Umeå University’s overall objectives are given as:‘A long-term approach facilitates a high level of
risk-taking, creative environments stimulate dynamic meetings, collaboration creates development and improves
quality.’ (http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/107/107295_umu_visionsprogram_eng.pdf ).

175

nance by objectives involves such risks. However, we do not consider these risks reason enough to not pursue governance by objectives. In fact, quite the opposite: it is a
key reason why open and dialogue-based governance by objectives processes are
important.
5.2.1 Objectives concerning competitiveness and research-based value creation
Overarching governance by objectives should be applied at all levels of a university.
As stated previously, when it comes to overarching governance by objectives, it is not
easy to differentiate governance by objectives for collaboration and utilization work,
specifically, from other types of governance by objectives. At the university level, it is
not unusual for governance by objectives to be discussed from the standpoint of the
university’s position.206 For example, there are visions in which the paramount goal
is for the university to be perceived as holding a strong international position. In its
vision, Chalmers describes its mission as follows: “Through internationally acclaimed
education and research combined with a professional innovation process, Chalmers’
mission is to become one of the world’s most attractive universities”.207
It is common for universities to write that they want to be “world-class”.208
Governance by objectives at an overarching level also tends to be a feature of this
kind of ambition. There is also a risk that visions and strategies will be used to “market” universities as actors in an international and competitive arena.209
In discussing governance by objectives at the university level, it is natural to focus on
dialogues about strengthening competitiveness.210 Just as it is considered important
to strengthen the competitiveness of the business community, it is now considered
important to strengthen the competitiveness of the region, nation, and, in this con206 Umeå University is facing the future with knowledge across borders and boundaries.’
(http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/107/107295_umu_visionsprogram_eng.pdf ).‘Knowledge for a better world,
NTNU Internationally Outstanding.’ (http://www.ntnu.no/info/strategi_ntnu_eng.pdf ).
207 Chalmers – for a Sustainable Future
(http://www.chalmers.se/SiteCollectionDocuments/om%20chalmers%20dokument/PVU%20Visioner%20mm/Chal
mers_vision_engelska.pdf.)
208 See, for example, Lund University’s vision (http://www.lunduniversity.lu.se/about/about-lund-university/mission-vision-and-values) and the Strategy 2012 document from Karolinska Institutet, which states:‘Strategy 2012 is a
further step for Karolinska Institutet towards the realisation of our vision to be one of the leading medical universities in the world.’ () Strategic Plan 2013-2018, Oxford.‘The University of Oxford aims to lead the world in research
and education.’ (http://www.ox.ac.uk/sites/files/oxford/field/field_document/Strategic%20Plan%202013-18.pdf ).
209 Trend and tendencies within innovation and research: In many respects, research today is an international phenomenon. Many topical issues are global in nature, such as climate change, welfare, migration, economics, pandemics, security issues and more. In itself, research recognizes no national boundaries and competition in the field
is now global.’ Linköping University (http://www.liu.se/insidan/strategier/foinnstrategi/1.453414/LiUs_Fo_
InnovationStrategi_20decversion.pdf (Swedish only)). Research and Education Strategy, Karolinska Institutet:‘It is
among stiffening international competition that Swedish medical research and education must assert itself today.
The potential for Sweden’s development in the field of biomedicine is greatly affected by development in the global arena.’ (http://ki.se/sites/default/files/ki_strategi_2009-2012.pdf (Swedish only)).
210 From KTH’s Strategic Plan 2013-2016:‘Swedish universities also need to strengthen their international profiles
and promote their brands to high visibility, not least in order to attract more fee-paying students.’
(http://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.385432!/Menu/general/columncontent/attachment/KTH_Strategic_Plan_2013_16.pdf ).

176

text, especially the university.211
This could include the competitiveINTEREST-ORIENTED GOVERNANCE
ness of promising research groups,
BY OBJECTIVES
research fields, educational proWhat are our objectives for the university’s position
grammes, universities themselves,
and competitiveness?
regional clusters and other initia• Academics – aimed at strengthening the positions
tives in which the university is
of researchers
• Academic environments – aimed at developing strong
involved. Typically, the dialogue
environments
begins with exposure to global
• Networks/clusters – aimed at developing strong
competition. From a more academstructures vis-à-vis society
• The university – aimed at strenghtening the
ic perspective, it may indeed be
university’s standing in a competitive international
easy to dismiss such dialogues,
arena
especially if they do not concern
What are our objectives for the surrounding
strengthening the competitiveness
society´s development?
of the university’s own research or
• Business community – aimed at promoting
the business community
education. At the same time, there
• The region and the local community – aimed at
is reason to question whether the
promoting local and regional development
• The nation and the EU – aimed at promoting national
more academically-oriented objecand European competitiveness
tive of publishing as much as possible in as prestigious a journal as
What are our objectives concerning researchers’
private interests
possible is not the main normative
force propelling the university
towards what can be described as a Figure 41. Interest-oriented governance by objectives
competitiveness ideology. Typical
for this ideology is that the desire to achieve a top position on various ranking lists
becomes the paramount objective. Achieving a high ranking become synonymous
with being a successful university.212 The universities with the most distinguished
researchers, published in the most respected journals, are ipso facto the most successful universities. Increasingly, these rankings also include collaboration and innovation
processes. In light of the normative consequences, there is a clear risk that the desire
to achieve a top ranking at individual and organizational levels will become a very
prominent feature of the university’s governance by objectives strategy.
The KMP programme has focused on identifying and classifying more interest-oriented objectives as overarching objectives. At the same time, it has also been important
to emphasize societal responsibility and a more value-based approach. A recurring
question within the KMP programme is what the university should do to help create
societal value through research results.213 By “value” we do not mean a solely economic value, but a more societal-oriented value. Our use of the term “knowledge
assets” is, in itself, an indication of the ambition to harness research results’ utiliza211 Umeå University describes one of its overarching goals this way:‘We have developed interaction between
research, education, collaboration and innovation that challenges boundaries and plays a crucial role in the region's
development.’ (http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/107/107295_umu_visionsprogram_eng.pdf ).
212 See, for example, the annual international ranking of universities, in which research and citations comprise 60
per cent of the assessment (http://www.timeshighereducation.co.uk/world-university-rankings/2013-14/worldranking).
213 Strategic Plan, Oxford:‘To develop our capacity to generate and share knowledge in the UK, Europe, and globally, ensuring significant contributions to public policy-making and economic growth.’
(//www.ox.ac.uk/sites/files/oxford/field/field_document/Strategic%20Plan%202013-18.pdf ).

177

VALUE-BASED GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES
What are our objectives for ecological,
biological and material value creation?
• Sustainable environment and ecological system
• The sustainable production and conservation of energy
• Sustainable agriculture, forestry and use of
other raw materials
• Pharmaceuticals and healthcare
• Industrial development
• Communications and information infrastructure

tion potential. In our efforts to try
to clarify the university’s responsibility for governance by objectives,
we chose to distinguish between
interest-oriented governance by
objectives and a governance by
objectives intended to create societal value.

The model for value-based governance by objectives is intended as a
framework for identifying which
What are our objectives for social and
humanistic value creation?
overarching objectives should be
• Social sustainability
considered when managing knowl• Welfare development
edge assets. The model is also
• Democracy and openness
• Fair and non-discriminatory social order
intended as a starting point for a
• Culture and education
general dialogue about governance
• Ethics and responsibility
by objectives, rather than as a
What are our objectives for artistic value creation?
comprehensive decision-making
What are our objectives for economic value creation?
tool. Categorizing different types
• Growth
of value creation is not straightfor• Economic development
ward. There are many ways to
• New companies and jobs
approach it. We found it important
to categorize overarching objectives
based on different forms of value
Figure 42. Value-based governance by objectives
creation, since this provides an
overview of the scope of the university’s public responsibility. Because the KMP programme focuses on the management of knowledge assets, it was natural to discuss
value creation from the standpoint of the character and potential uses of knowledge
assets. For example, research results in natural science fields support one kind of
value-creation, while results in the humanities and social sciences support another.
Different kinds of value creation may overlap or, for that matter, may not be interdependent.
5.2.2 Objectives for the university’s position and competitiveness
An organization’s vision often includes a general description of where an organization should be — its position — by a certain point in time.214 As noted earlier, it is
common to base a governance by objectives strategy on an organization’s position in
an international arena or arenas. This involves establishing objectives for the organi-

214 Karin Markides, President and CEO of Chalmers University of Technology, writes in the university’s vision for a
sustainable future:‘It is my firm belief that for the students, colleagues and partners of tomorrow, Chalmers will
become even more attractive than it is today as the stimulating environment becomes yet more open and dynamic. Chalmers, this place where the needs of working life meet the possibilities of know-how, spurs each of us to
make our own unique contribution to a sustainable world.’(http://www.chalmers.se/SiteCollectionDocuments/
om%20chalmers%20dokument/PVU%20Visioner%20mm/Chalmers_vision_engelska.pdf ).

178

zation’s competitive advantage in an arena exposed to international competition.215
Different positions are focused on depending on the level within the university. The
university level uses governance by objectives based on positions in the following
areas:
Academics – aimed at strengthening the positions of researchers and instructors
A common overarching objective is to have internationally recognized, well-reputed
and qualified researchers and instructors.216 Here, the overarching objective is to
support researchers and instructors to allow them to promote utilization and to collaborate in an international arena. Increasingly, it is important to pinpoint areas of
strength where special support can be provided to researchers and instructors.
Academic environments – aimed at creating “complete academic environments”
As noted earlier, it is increasingly common to have the overarching objective of developing strong environments for research, education and utilization/innovation.217 This
could also be a matter of prioritizing within specific fields, research groups, or programmes.
Networks/clusters – aimed at developing strong structures vis-à-vis society
Is is even more common for the university’s overarching objective to have strong
international partnerships, local clusters, innovation systems and the like.218 The university/research group works at both the local level and in an international arena.
Once again, it is often a matter of prioritizing which structures to build and strengthen and which are considered capable of being competitive.

215 Excerpt from NTNU’s strategy:‘NTNU’s distinctive character as a university is a strength. Our objective is to be
internationally outstanding. Our research and education are to be highly regarded in international academic evaluations. In selected areas, we aim to have academic environments that rank among the best in the world.’
(http://www.ntnu.no/info/strategi_ntnu_eng.pdf ).
216 One of the overarching objectives stated in Oxford’s Strategic Plan is as follows:‘To recruit and retain the best
academic staff and ensure that under-represented groups have equality of opportunity in recruitment, personal
development, and career progression in all areas of employment in the University.’ (http://www.ox.ac.uk/sites/
files/oxford/field/field_document/Strategic%20Plan%202013-18.pdf ). Uppsala University describes the following
strategy for improving its research:‘…to recruit renowned researchers and teachers from the national and international arenas, through open posting and recruitment procedures.’ (http://www.uu.se/digitalAssets/3/3144_Goals_
and_strategies.pdf ).
217 One of Umeå University’s overarching objectives is to build creative environments that stimulate dynamic
meetings, described as follows:‘The University is a dynamic meeting place where interdisciplinary knowledge is
generated and disseminated. Creative environments attract students, researchers, teachers and collaborating partners nationally and internationally.’ (http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/107/107295_umu_visionsprogram_eng.pdf ).
218 In its Vision 2027 document, KTH describes one of its objectives this way:‘KTH will be regarded as an attractive
partner in European and international research projects in 2027. The university will have established and consolidated strategic alliances with selected universities.’ (https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.178308!/Menu/general/column-content/attachment/v2027en%20slutversion.pdf ). One of Oxford’s objectives is given as:‘To enhance structures for collaboration across departments, colleges, and the University.’ (http://www.ox.ac.uk/sites/files/oxford/
field/field_document/Strategic%20Plan%202013-18.pdf ).

179

The university – aimed at strengthening the university’s standing in a competitive
international arena
The objective is for the university to position itself as a competitive university. The
objective could also be to strengthen the university as a whole.219 It may also require
prioritizing the research areas, areas of education and fields of collaboration the university wants to achieve a respectable and attractive international position.
Of particular interest in the governance by objectives strategy is how overarching
objectives such as these should be made concrete.220 What does it mean for
researchers, academic environments, innovation systems, or the university to be
world-class and competitive in international research and innovation arenas? The
KMP programme has focused special attention on using governance by objectives to
make concrete goals for developing an academic environment in an international
arena into a complete academic environment. By this, we mean an academic environment with a strong position in research, collaboration and utilization. Based on our
evaluation of Swedish universities’ governance by objectives strategies, we can conclude that making these strategies concrete is often limited to indicating particular
focus areas for development, generally desirable results, values, organizational characteristics and similar goals. From a KMP perspective, the ambition is for governance
by objectives to be made concrete to the extent that it defines and enables the concrete management of research results as knowledge assets.
5.2.3 Objectives for the surrounding society’s development
One clear feature of most universities’ governance by objectives strategies is how to
contribute to positive changes in the surrounding society.221 This involves interestoriented governance by objectives aimed at strengthening the university’s role in relation to various structures/actors. We have been able to discern three main categories
among them:
Business community – aimed at assisting and strengthening the business community
Assisting local, regional and national business communities is a common aim and is a
219 In its strategy, Karolinska Institutet describes its role this way:‘Located in the expansive Stockholm region,
Karolinska Institutet (KI) aims to be Europe’s leading medical university and also to be among the world’s leading
universities. KI intends to develop its role as a national hub for innovation work within the life sciences field. Global
competition gives rise to heightened demands for the effective transfer of research results to practical applications,
both directly in healthcare contexts and in the biomedical industry. University hospitals have a key role to play in
medical research and in innovation within the biomedical sphere.’ (http://ki.se/sites/default/files/ki_strategi_20092012.pdf (Swedish only)).
220 Chalmers is one example of a university that has supplemented its guidelines with a clearer strategy for things
like research infrastructure in order to concretely apply overarching objectives
(https://www.chalmers.se/insidan/SV/utbildning-och-forskning/nyttiggorande/verksamhetsdokument-inom
(Swedish only)).
221 Cambridge’s overarching mission has been worded this way:‘The mission of the University of Cambridge is to
contribute to society through the pursuit of education, learning, and research at the highest international levels of
excellence.’ (https://www.cam.ac.uk/about-the-university/how-the-university-and-colleges-work/the-universitysmission-and- core-values).

180

long-standing tradition. 222 This is primary origin and source of support for the focus
on being competitive. Internationalization presents a challenge to this approach.223
Nowadays, it is often a question of establishing goals for how the university should
contribute to the local/national business community’s competitiveness on the one
hand, and on other the other hand, develop its position as an attractive collaborator
in the eyes of the international business community.
The region and the local community – aimed at promoting local and regional
development
It is increasingly common to focus on contributing to the local region and making it
more attractive.224 The question is whether this objective/vision is not at the heart
of the modern competitiveness ideology. The university establishes objectives for
becoming the hub for regional and local development of the “knowledge city” and
“knowledge region”.
The nation and the EU – aimed at promoting national and European competitiveness
Similar goals can be established at the national and European levels. Universities
should contribute to national or European competitiveness.225
5.2.4 Objectives concerning researchers’ private interests
It is uncommon to highlight researchers’ private interests as explicit overarching
objectives. Nonetheless, the opportunity for university employees to earn money from
222 KTH’s development strategy includes an ambition for the institution’s relationship with the outside world:‘One
key issue [facing the business community] for the future is the supply of competences. In this context there are
considerable opportunities for KTH to cooperate in a more integrated manner in education and research for
increased innovation and competitiveness. This interaction may occur in many ways and on many levels — with
large or small companies, with organisations or agencies at national, regional or local levels.’
(http://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.385432!/Menu/general/columncontent/attachment/KTH_Strategic_Plan_2013_16.pdf ).
223 Today, the majority of universities have an internationalization policy that focuses on international relations and
circumstances. See, for example, Uppsala University’s action plan
(http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/233/233677_3handlings- plan-for-internationalisering--2014.pdf ) and its
Internationalization Programme (http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/23/23992_3program-for- internationalisering.pdf )
as well as Linköping University’s Internationalization Plan for 2013-2020
(https://www.liu.se/io/Strategi/1.488390/Internationaliseringsplan2013-2020.pdf (Swedish Only)).
224 For example, Umeå University’s education and research strategy includes recognizing the university’s role in
life-long learning as an issue to be addressed by Swedish research going forward:‘Universities [and the regional
responsibility] play an important role in the regional growth programmes. Contact and interaction with the region
are enormously important for the prospects of students and doctoral candidates gaining employment. The
resources currently located in the regional and social structural funds should be used to strengthen this opportunity.’ (http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/31/31922_25267_utbildnings-forskningsstrategier-2009-2012.pdf (Swedish
only)).
225 The University of Copenhagen’s 2016 strategy describes its position this way:‘The University of Copenhagen is
poised to increase its significance and importance as a European university. However, it requires a determined
effort to integrate our research even more closely with our education, and to develop closer co-operation both
within the University and with the surrounding world. In this process, we must and will, enhance our research
excellence.’ (http://www.e-pages.dk/ku/611/).

181

and control the proceeds of their own research is an objective that universities tend to
support.226 In vision and strategy contexts, universities tend to emphasize researcher
incentives as being an important tool. This is typically the case in countries where
universities hold the rights to results.227 At Swedish universities, it should be implicitly considered an overarching objective for researchers to be competitive utilizers in a
private capacity.228 This is an objective that should be considered carefully.

5.2.5 Objectives for economic value creation
When discussing the overarching objectives from a value-creation perspective, it is
easy to focus on values of a more economic nature. Emphasizing the desire to contribute to increased growth is certainly not a given at the university level.229
However, this objective is most often present as a more implicit goal. For example, it
is a natural result of more general objectives concerning economic development, the
creation of new enterprises, reduced unemployment, increased economic efficiency
and industrial productivity.
Within the KMP programme it has been important for the dialogue about objectives
related to value creation to extend beyond economic value creation. In focusing on
knowledge assets, it becomes clear that a great deal of value creation occurs outside
the economic perspective.
5.2.6 Objectives for ecological, biological and material value creation
The KMP programme has considered how knowledge assets are utilized and create
value in society. At an overarching level, it has been important to indicate which
societal values to pursue. Based on the natural, engineering and medical sciences, we
226 The following quote is taken from a policy governing intellectual assets created at KTH:‘The basic premise is
that rights to IP that is created as part of education and research should fall to the originator. Originators may be
either students or employees at KTH. For instructors, an expanded right to patentable inventions applies compared
to what otherwise applies in working life. This is due in part to professor’s privilege, and in part to the expansion of
teachers’ rights to include more than just the patentable inventions, as is customary at KTH.’
(https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.571371!/policy_for_intellektuella_tillgangar_skapade_vid_KTH.pdf (Swedish
only)).
227 NTNU, for example, has a ‘policy for the protection and management of intellectual property rights and physical material’ that serves as incentive for researchers by allowing certain exceptions to the university’s ownership
right (traditional academic literature, music and works of art, educational materials and the results of commissioned
research as governed contractually). Other incentives are the right to publish the results and the right to commercialize if the university’s TTO foregoes this option. Even in cases where the university chooses to commercialize, the
researcher retains the right to receive royalties on the result. (https://www.ntnu.no/c/document_library/get_
file?uuid=bf08226e-f18b-4521-9358- 59a0bf5442ba&groupId=51060).
228 In KTH’s policy for intellectual assets created at KTH, the institute writes:‘The creation of intellectual assets (IP) is
a natural result of work done within the academic environment, and KTH wishes to ensure that the rights to such
IP rightfully fall to its originator, at the same time as openness and the continued sharing of knowledge must be
pursued.’ (https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.571371!/policy_for_intellektuella_tillgangar_skapade_vid_KTH.pdf
(Swedish only)).
229 Assuming responsibility’ is an important part of Linköping University’s overarching strategy work. Under this
heading, the university states it aims to ‘contribute to growth and welfare’. (http://www.liu.se/insidan/
strategier/foinnstrategi/1.453414/LiUs_Fo_InnovationStrategi_20decversion.pdf ).

182

have identified certain typical types of value creation to adopt as goals. It became
clear that, in principle, it is possible to establish an infinite number of types and cases
of value creation. Moreover, conceptually, this is difficult to manage because there
are many ways to describe and define overlapping forms of value creation. Our
relative extensive evalution of different university visions etc. resulted in following
characteristiscs:
Sustainable environment and ecological system: A central overarching objective is
how research results can contribute to and facilitate a sustainable ecological system.230 Contribute with research results that, through their utilization, result in the
preservation of biological diversity, for example, is very important. This objective can
reasonably be viewed as something of an overarching objective for the other, more
natural science-oriented objectives.
The sustainable production and conservation of energy: Contribute with research
results that facilitate renewable energy sources and efficient energy use is one overarching objective in place.231
Sustainable agriculture, forestry and use of other raw materials: Another important
overarching objective is to contribute with research results that promote sustainable
agriculture, fishing, forestry and the like.
Pharmaceuticals and healthcare: Another overarching objective is to contribute to the
creation of new pharmaceuticals and forms of healthcare.232 This field has a long
tradition of advanced utilization processes in close interaction with healthcare and
nursing, especially in clinical research and testing.
Industrial development: The overarching objective that research should contribute to
industrial products and processes will always play a key role. Like the objectives
noted above, this may require stimulating a number of different types of utilization
processes — everything from producing new materials like graphene to promoting
more practical product design.233
Communications and information infrastructure: Many different society-wide objec230 In its vision, mission and strategies policy document, Chalmers’ values statement includes the aim of promoting technology for human use built on sustainable systems:‘...our task is to contribute with new knowledge and
ideas to promote ecological, social and economic sustainability – in harmony with human culture and Mother
Nature.’ (http://www.chalmers.se/SiteCollectionDocuments/om%20chalmers%20dokument/PVU%20Visioner%
20mm/Chalmers_vision_engelska.pdf ).
231 NTNU describes one of its social objectives as follows:‘We will engage in solving global challenges in health
and welfare, energy and climate, the environment and use of resources. Our activities will promote human rights
and intercultural dialogue.’ (http://www.ntnu.no/info/strategi_ntnu_eng.pdf ).
232 In its research and education strategy, Karolinska Institutet frames one of its overarching objectives in this way:
‘Improved public health through expanded and improved education in the medical field, the more effective application of research and knowledge in clinical operations and in innovations in the pharmaceutical and medical
technology industries.’ (http://ki.se/sites/default/files/ki_strategi_2009-2012.pdf (Swedish only)).
233 Chalmers describes one approach that is driving development forward to meet society’s changing needs:
‘Together with numerous corporate management teams, Chalmers promotes a broad form of collaboration to create a long and short-term supply of competency and technical solutions.’ (http://www.chalmers.se/SiteCollection
Documents/om%20chalmers%20dokument/PVU%20Visioner%20mm/Chalmers_vision_engelska.pdf ).

183

tives can be envisioned as society develops towards what can be viewed as an information and knowledge-based society. The desire for research to contribute to communications and information systems encompasses at least some of these objectives.234
5.2.7 Objectives for social and humanistic value creation
The KMP programme has also eraluated value creation from the standpoint of
research results in the social sciences and humanities in a corresponding way.
Social sustainability: The objective of contributing to social sustainability encompasses
many different value-creation processes and can be viewed as overarching for a number of the objectives discussed below.235
Welfare development: An important overarching objective is to contribute to welfare
development in society. This can involve various social structures, such as schools,
healthcare and childcare.236
Democracy and openness: An equally important overarching objective is to contribute to a democratic social order and an open society.237 The objective of being
inclusive and promoting participation applies both to society at large and to the university.
Fair and non-discriminatory social order: A related overarching objective is for
research to contribute to an equitable social order and to counteracting different
forms of discrimination.238
234 One of the sections in KTH’s Vision 2027 deals with the surrounding world and describes the institute’s objective for information systems this way:‘Information technology as an integral part of everyday life has altered conditions for university studies fundamentally by 2027. Competition is becoming global when courses, to an ever larger
extent, are offered via cloud computing networks and when teaching materials are becoming omnipresent. E-education is a self-evident part of competitive bids for university studies. There is a special challenge in acquiring and
maintaining a leading position in both ICT research and e-education.’ (https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.178308!/
Menu/general/column-content/attachment/v2027en%20slutversion.pdf ).
235 The University of Copenhagen describes part of its strategy this way: 'Social conditions are reflected in the
political agenda and in the demands placed on universities. These demands include: internationalization, significant
increases in student intake, close relations to other parts of society and demands for greater operational and
administrative efficiency.' (http://www.e-pages.dk/ku/611/).
236 Uppsala University's 2014 operational plan includes the following statement: 'Thanks to its high-quality
research and first-class education, the university is well equipped to contribute to national and global welfare and
to Sweden's development as a nation of knowledge.' (http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/247/247713_3vp2014_
20130617_slutlig.pdf (Swedish only)).
237 Lund University's strategic plan for 2012-2016 describes cross-boundary collaboration as an overarching objective for the benefit of society: 'This cross-boundary collaboration stretches beyond the University to society. We
reach out with knowledge from the University and thus contribute to the development of society. We capture the
needs of society and learn from the experience and perspectives of external parties.' (http://www.lunduniversity.
lu.se/sites/www.lunduniversity.lu.se/files/strategic-plan-lund-university.pdf ).
238 Umeå University's 2020 Vision and Objectives document says the following: 'Umeå University is its staff and
students, and is developed by them. Equality, diversity and equal treatment are thus crucial concepts.'
(http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/107/107295_umu_visionsprogram_eng.pdf ).

184

Culture and education: Another overarching objective closely associated with the
activities of universities is the promotion of education and culture in society.239
Morality and responsibility: The overarching humanistic objective for morality and
responsibility is also an objective that universities should support for the benefit of
society at large, at the same time as it is also a specific objective of the university’s
own work.240
5.2.8 Objectives for artistic value creation
The KMP programme focuses on utilizing research results. Artistic value creation follows a somewhat different logic. Here, it is not a matter of utilizing research results
as knowledge assets. Even so, artistic creations are every bit as much intellectual
assets and play an important role in creating social value. As such, it is important to
highlight aesthetic, literary, performing arts, musical and similar values as overarching objectives in universities’ collaboration and utilization work.241
5.2.9 Overarching objectives for the University of Gothenburg’s activities
Like many other organizations’ visions, the University of Gothenburg’s vision begins
with the ambition to strengthen its position as an actor in an international arena: “To
secure that we have the required autonomy and that we are able to respond to all of
the changes around us, we must clearly define our line of action for the future —
both to ourselves and to our partners. This is the background to Vision 2020”. In
this positioning, the ambition is established that, by 2020, the University of
Gothenburg should have world-leading research environments in all scientific fields.
Additionally, one general objective named is that the university should be characterized by responsible and committed collaboration work by 2020. The vision explains
that this will “have a ripple effect that will facilitate dissemination of knowledge to
the surrounding world, research being put to practical use as well as an inflow of
new ideas and knowledge,” and that this, in turn, will “make the University an
attractive cooperation partner”. The objective of achieving improved competitiveness
recurs in a number of contexts.

239 Linköping University writes in its research and innovation strategy: 'Cultural capital is not just important in seeing and discovering needs and opportunities, but also in recognizing how these can be fulfilled. In this context, we
define the meaning of entrepreneurship as the ability to identify opportunities and to create resources so that these
opportunities may be seized.' (http://www.liu.se/insidan/strategier/foinnstrategi/1.453414/LiUs_Fo_
InnovationStrategi_20decversion.pdf (Swedish only)).
240 In Vision 2027, KTH describes one aspect of the institute's identity this way: 'A positive attitude and an open and
honest exchange of thought and ideas build the foundation of daily operations. Intellectual variety, environmental
responsibility, equal opportunity, collegiality, openness, versatility, quality, ground-breaking thinking and humanity
are characteristics of KTH. They are values that the external world associates with KTH.'
(https://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.178308!/Menu/general/columncontent/attachment/v2027en%20slutversion.pdf ).
241 NTNU includes works of art in its strategy for the future: 'NTNU's research and artistic activities are part of the
international academic community, and all our academic environments have a responsibility to contribute actively
to the development of subject areas and disciplines.' (http://www.ntnu.no/info/strategi_ntnu_eng.pdf ).

185

A fundamental theme that defines Vision 2020 is that of public responsibility
(samhällsansvar). The document’s introduction states that the entire vision and strategy process will be based on an explicit responsibility for promoting social development and be based on a global commitment that provides a constant reminder of the
university’s and its employees’ role in the world. Public responsibility as a fundamental, overarching value recurs throughout the entire vision and strategy. One statement
that reflects this is the following: “We educate democratic citizens with respect for
basic values such as human freedoms and rights. Our civic responsibility also encompasses the environmental profile that characterises the University of Gothenburg.
Sustainable development is important to us; we always consider the long-term social,
economic and ecological consequences and allow them to guide our operations”.
Thus, we can identify at least some general objectives for value creation. In fact, there
are no other explanations of what means/ends make up this overarching objective.
However, an overarching objective for 2020 is given as follows: “In 2020, researchers
from the University of Gothenburg in various disciplines are contributing to solutions
of both regional and global problems. Our programme catalogue is very broad,
reflecting not only the needs of students and the surrounding world but also our
responsibility for lifelong learning and promoting the general level of knowledge in
society. We are engaged in close cooperation with the surrounding society, work for
sustainable development and are an active and appreciated provider of knowledge”.
The vision has the following to say about the university’s involvement in global
issues: “In 2020, the research at the University of Gothenburg is characterised by
global perspectives and attracts leading researchers from around the world. All programmes offer international outlooks and student exchange opportunities. Attractive
highly advanced programmes attract students from all over the world. The University
is a prioritised cooperation partner in international initiatives”.
A particularly interesting aspect of the vision is the objective to build complete academic environments. This objective is, in itself, an objective about organizational
capabilities. It is a tool that facilitates overarching objectives, at the same time as it
has been assigned the character of an overarching objective in the vision. For the
objective to develop complete academic environments as a means for realizing other
overarching objectives: “Complete academic environments create a unified whole that
stimulates dynamic collaboration between education and research on the one hand,
and the business world and community on the other. The environments’ collaboration with the outside world allows new ideas to enjoy wider circulation. This enables
an influx of new ideas and new knowledge that strengthens and renews the disciplinary environments. It also entails an opportunity to continuously improve the quality
of our operations with a view to setting prudent priorities”. The nature of overarching objectives becomes clear when, in the vision, the organization establishes, for
example, the objective of developing broad collaborations with the outside world as
a means to facilitate the creation of complete academic environments: “Strong academic environments require an ability to collaborate with other higher education
institutions. It is important to further develop Gothenburg as a university city together with Chalmers, yet it is also important that the cooperation with other higher education institutions is strengthened not only regionally but also nationally and internationally. Broad cooperation contributes to research and education of high quality”.
In the KMP programme’s experience, the university’s governance by objectives at the

186

overarching level laid, in a number of respects, a good foundation for developing a
more comprehensive governance by objectives process. In particular, this is a result of
the clear focus on well-developed public responsibility and on the role of the complete academic environments.

5.3 Objectives for utilization
A second level of governance by objectives focuses on the more concrete management
of knowledge assets. How should knowledge assets be managed to create value in
line with that discussed here? Within the KMP programme, this involved applying
the four logics within the governance by objectives strategy when promoting utilization:
● Make the knowledge assets publicly available, i.e. part of public domain
● Make the knowledge assets relevant to specific stakeholders
● Develop the knowledge assets as innovation processes
● Implement knowledge assets in open contractual network processes.
The insight gained through the KMP programme is that all four utilization-promotion logics can be viewed as alternative objectives/means for academic environments.
Researchers must decide which logics they will apply to utilize their knowledge
assets. We chose to describe them as logics, specifically, because we realized that they
can be seen as creating value in themselves. As noted earlier in Chapter 3, the KMP
programme’s ambition was to create a governance by objectives model based on the
concrete management of research results as knowledge assets. Our ambition is to create a comprehensive overview of which measures/means result in utilization in accordance with the different logics. All objectives can be quantified, more or less.
5.3.1 Objectives for making knowledge assets publicly available
The first category of objectives for the concrete management of research results
involves making them available to the public, or, in broader terms, to humanity at
large. We were especially interested in pinpointing the concrete means of achieving
the utilization-promotion objective by making the results publicly available. As noted
earlier, each means can be viewed as an objective (end) from a governance by objectives standpoint. The objectives are as follows:
Scientific accessibility
The foremost objective associated with making research results publicly available is
the publication of articles in international journals. Other objectives include the publication of books and reports. The preparation and presentation of information at
conferences is also an objective for making research results publicly available.
Education-based accessibility
Another objective is to promote the public availability of research results through
academic education. Writing text books and producing other teaching aids are relevant objectives for this.

187

Utilization through popular science
Promoting the utilization of research results through popular science publications and
now dissemination of information via the Internet and other digital media are additional objectives. The same is true of open lectures, science festivals, science-based
radio programmes and various TV programmes.

5.3.2 Objectives for making knowledge assets relevant to specific stakeholders
The second category of objectives for making research results relevant and, thus, contributing to examining and solving concrete problems faced by specific stakeholders.
The objective is to make sure that research results are actually applied in practice.
The KMP analysis identified the following means/ends (objectives) within this second
category/logic:

Scientific accessibility for applicability
One means/end is to work to initiate research collaborations and to finance commissioned research. Within the life science/engineering field, the objective may be to
achieve translational/translative research, which strives to turn research results into
applicable solutions.

Education-based accessibility for applicability
Another objective is for education-based accessibility; that is to say, that the university should conduct commissioned education and other targeted educational initiatives
for specific stakeholders. Here, too, there is an objective to apply research results
through various educational aids. Such aids might include manuals, check-lists, support systems and tools.

Project-based accessibility for applicability
Yet another objective is to offer to undertake different forms of investigative and
development commissions. This could be managed through researchers’ expanded
rights to secondary employment. It may also be a matter of promoting implementation through licensing.

5.3.3 Objectives for developing knowledge assets as innovation processes
The third category of objectives is for supporting the realization of research results in
innovations. As discussed earlier, universities are increasingly expected to deliver in this
area. The KMP programme has identified the following means/ends (objectives):

188

Project-based innovation
A key objective is for the university to facilitate project processes that develop social
innovations. This may mean promoting the development of concrete services, but
also of knowledge-intensive product innovations.
License-based innovation
Another objective is for the university to help other actors to conduct innovation
projects initiated by the university’s researchers. Promoting utilization through innovation processes is often a matter of licensing. The objective is for the university to
assume responsibility for developing research results into innovation projects and
then to license the knowledge assets.
Company-based innovation
Yet another objective is for the university to promote the creation of new companies.
This may mean establishing objectives for companies with a certain number of
employees or certain amount of invested capital. Naturally, it can also involve setting
objectives that focus on certain types of companies, such as biotechnology companies
and companies that conduct social innovation activities.
5.3.4 Objectives for implementing knowledge assets in open contractual network
processes
The fourth category/logic is objectives for utilizing research results in “open knowledge structures”. Here, too, we have identified a number of means/ends (sub-objectives):
Research-driven networks
One objective is for the university to be able to develop databases containing research
results and other, more complex collaboration structures in which research results are
utilized.
Industrial networks
Another second objective is to be able to develop open innovation processes together
with industry and the business community.
Commons
Yet another objective is to contribute to the knowledge-based society’s commons. The
aim is for the university to become a bearer of large networks and platforms.

189

5.3.5 The University of Gothenburg’s objectives for utilization
When the university was developing its vision and strategy, it did not explore different kinds of utilization logics. However, both the vision and strategy incorporated a
number of different objectives related to the logics, particularly objectives for making
research results publicly available. A number of documents include the implicit objective of having academic environments that publish extensively in renowned journals.
The following are among the established objectives for more popular science-based
availability: “The importance of the University as a research-based, unbiased source
of knowledge has increased. The University is responsible to ensure [sic] that research
is made accessible to various groups in society. Thus, we shall:
● Strengthen the development of popular scientific research communication
● Increase the access to documented research results through “open access”
publishing and development of an easy access website
● Further advance creative and boundary-crossing meeting places in cooperation with various parts of society.”
In principle, the objectives established here focus on making research results publicly
available, making them relevant to specific groups and designing open platforms to
promote their accessibility. There are also documents that propose promoting accessibility through different education initiatives, such as by offering commissioned education programmes and providing further education for various professions. Clear goals
have also been established for the university’s promotion of utilization through innovation work and entrepreneurship. No more precise objectives are established, however. All in all, we were able to conclude that the vision and strategy work resulted in
the clarification of utilization objectives. We also observed that there is good potential for building on the various logics in the on-going governance by objectives work.

5.4 Objectives for utilization capabilities
As a result of the KMP programme’s work, it became clear that certain ends are also
means for achieving other ends. We were able to identify a third level of objectives
that focuses on the university’s capabilities. The university needs to decide which
objectives need to be met for its own capabilities for fulfilling the utilization objectives in such a way that they, in turn, fulfil the overarching objectives. Thus, establishing objectives at this level is more or less a question of clarifying for the university’s own organization what development needs and ambitions exist. Following our
evaluations, the KMP programme has concluded that the university should focus on:
● Autonomy objectives – Objectives for the university’s organizational
development and capabilities as an organization for managing and guiding utilization and collaboration processes
● Support system objectives – Objectives for the university administration’s,
Innovation Office’s, holding company’s and other support functions’
capabilities for contributing to utilization and collaboration
● Ownership responsibility objectives – Objectives for the university’s capabilities for managing intellectual property rights and for managing
research results as assets.
In the same way, the ambition is to produce a relatively comprehensive overview of

190

which objectives should be considered. The ambition is also for the specific objectives
to be valid and relevant, regardless of what level within the university governance by
objectives is to be implemented, i.e. all the way from the university management level
down to the research group level.
5.4.1 Autonomy objectives
Concerning organizational capabilities, we came to the conclusion that governance
by objectives of organizational development and leadership should be the main focus.
In the dialogue, we were able to pinpoint a number of objectives to pursue:
Complete academic environments
Here, the foremost objective is for academic environments to become complete. The
researchers and teachers, together in “environments”, must be capable of integrating
collaboration and utilization into research and education. An important part of this
objective from a KMP standpoint is that the researchers and teachers should have the
ability to deliberate on and make decisions in accordance with the logic they should
promote for utilizing a specific research result.
Leadership and control
Consequently, another objective is that leadership should be in place that has the
ability to enable researchers and teachers to promote utilization and collaborate and,
in that way, enable the academic environments to become complete.
External relationship management
Another objective important for the idea of the autonomous university is that a clear
system and structure should exist for all external collaboration and utilization
processes. The KMP programme revealed that the objective needs to be to gain an
overview of and, to a certain extent, jointly control external contracts, both written
and oral.
Incentives
A further objective is that there should be clear incentives for researchers and teachers to pursue collaboration and utilization within the framework of their employment.
System of norms for complete academic environments
Another important objective is for the university to develop a system of norms that

191

stimulates and enables researchers and teachers to promote utilization and collaborate.
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that the fulfilment of these objectives simultaneously lays the foundation for the university’s organizational capabilities for promoting the utilization of research results and managing research results in collaborative
relationships. We view this as critical to the fulfilment of the overarching objectives
and utilization objectives. Governance by objectives creates a framework for developing the concrete organization and normative control.

5.4.2 Support system objectives
Another category of objectives explored by the KMP programme are those related to
the university administration’s, Innovation Office’s, holding company’s and other
support functions’ ability to contribute to utilization and collaboration. Clarification
has been repeatedly requested in the KMP programme for who does what within the
support system. The dialogue on how to develop the support system’s capabilities has
been of central importance. The ambition is, of course, to develop the university’s
organizational capabilities. An important conclusion from the KMP programme is
that developing a central support system to which researchers can use, more or less,
to divest themselves of their responsibility for collaboration and utilization should
not be pursued. Primary responsibility should rest with the researchers and teachers
in the academic environments. The objective is instead to develop a support system
that achieves just the opposite of the above scenario. This does not mean that no
responsibility should be assumed by the central administration nor, for that matter,
that the administration should not take over this responsibility in certain cases. We
have also pinpointed a number of goals that we believe are important to the objectives for developing the support system. These are:
Innovation office for value creation in academic environments
The KMP programme strongly believes that an innovation office needs to be able to
facilitate value creation for academic environments. This innovation office should be
able to provide the assistance researchers need to promote utilization based on the
various logics and to fulfil their utilization objectives. Of particularly importance is
the Innovation Office’s ability to promote utilization through innovation processes
and open contractual networks. In this respect, the Innovation Office needs to
assume greater responsibility.
Local administration that facilitates the integration of utilization and collaboration
Researchers’ access to nearby support is an important objective. To be complete, an
academic environment should have access to administrative support for collaboration
and utilization. This has already been achieved to some measure in various information and communication activities.

192

External structures for commercialization
One well-established objective is to have external support structures for commercializing research results. This objective is just as relevant and important from the KMP
programme’s perspective. However, it is important to clearly distinguish between the
university’s public responsibility and the responsibilities of external support structures
in relation to researchers in their private capacities. Based on the local situation at the
University of Gothenburg, it is natural to emphasize the aim to strengthen the holding company, even though it may be equally important to strengthen other actors.
One interesting feature is the ambition to establish and develop entrepreneurs’
schools and other student-oriented initiatives.
Tool box and auxiliary education
Another objective is for both researchers and the administration to have access to
different tools for use in collaboration and utilization activities. These might include
analytical tools, databases, decision-making support systems and more. Another feature is access to different forms of training and further education.
5.4.3 Ownership responsibility objectives
Because the KMP programme’s work is largely based on the management of knowledge assets in academic environments, considerable time has been spent discussing
the university’s role in relation to ownership responsibility. The overarching objective
for ownership responsibility is for the university to be able to act as a responsible and
professional actor from a public perspective with the investments made in research,
in particular. The concept of ownership responsibility is based on the overarching
ambition that the university, to the extent possible, should be capable of enabling
researchers to promote utilization in both their public and private capacities without
the university needing to take over the rights to research results. The university can
assume responsibility for evaluating and ensuring the management of knowledge
assets without needing to hold the intellectual property rights to a research result.
Consequently, the ambition has been to limit and delimit the vision for the university’s assumption of responsibility for managing the rights to research results:
Utilization in academic environments
An initial objective is for researchers and teachers to be able to manage knowledge
assets in both their public and private capacities. This might even be a matter of carrying out innovation projects and licensing as university activities. The ambition should
be for academic environments to be capable of managing portfolios of intellectual
assets.
Infrastructure assets
An important objective is for knowledge assets used as infrastructure in research and

193

education, such as databases and software, to be governed by the academic environment and university.
Knowledge assets for continued research
A further objective is for knowledge assets needed for continued research to be available to the academic environment and university. This also applies to knowledge
assets created through research collaborations with other parties.
Prevention of the immoral use of research results
Another objective is for researchers and the university, to the extent possible, to be
able to prevent clearly immoral forms of commercialization and other utilization.

5.4.4 The University of Gothenburg’s objectives concerning organizational
capabilities
To help the University of Gothenburg achieve its vision, great emphasis has been
placed on integrating research, education, and collaboration and, by doing so, to create complete academic environments. In this instance, objectives for developing a
well-functioning organization that includes a well-developed infrastructure for
research activities are emphasized. Objectives for well-developed leadership, work
methods, and good working conditions are also highlighted. In efforts to achieve
quality research, the ambition to develop tools for identifying weak and strong
research environments is highlighted. In addition, the work done to generate collaborations across organizational boundaries, mutual benefit, and stimulating cooperation
is emphasized as a cornerstone in building complete academic environments. Of particular interest in this context is the objective to develop the responsibility for utilizing research. The vision states: “By identifying the university’s knowledge assets and
evaluating their potential benefit, we will strengthen both our research and innovation efforts. Thus, we shall:
● Focus on management of knowledge assets in relevant research
environments.
● Strengthen the university’s work to put research findings to practical use.
● Work to coordinate and develop innovation support together with
external actors.
● Offer training in innovation and entrepreneurship for both staff and
students”.
The implementation of the University of Gothenburg’s Vision 2020 plan is based on
three-year rolling action plans and one-year operational plans that are followed up.
In this respect, the overarching objectives and strategy are concretized so that they
can be applied in practice. Concerning collaboration, university management sets out
the following in the university’s action plan for 2014-2016: “The university will have
a well-functioning work method and a methodology for knowledge management in

194

complete academic environments.242 This will apply to well-developed management
and governance work and support processes and tools and to a well-developed education package for management, researchers, doctoral students, and salaried employees. Knowledge, methodology, and education for both knowledge-driven
utilization/collaboration and challenge-driven utilization/collaboration will be developed and implemented”. The stated position that “the innovation support will be
coordinated with external actors and the responsibilities of the various parties laid
out,” is especially important. Moreover, it is emphasized that the collaboration work
will count towards academic merit. The action plan is in full accord with the work
that has been carried out within the KMP programme for an organizational assumption of responsibility.
In conclusion, we note that governance by objectives has come quite a way in this
regard. That said, there is still much to be done going forward. However, at present,
the immediate challenge is to fully convert the strategic work into concrete organizational capabilities.

5.5 Conclusions
It was important for the KMP programme to help address the question of how to
implement the governance by objectives process. In time, it became clear to us how a
model could be used to contribute positively to this process. Our evaluation led us to
realize that the governance by objectives model discussed here can be used in four
processes:
● The risk assessment and evaluation of existing governance by objectives
● The process of formulating objectives
● The implementation process and the preparation of action plans
● The follow-up process and development of indicators for “impact”.
The means-end model can be usefully applied when formulating visions and strategies. Strategic considerations and decisions are a means for realizing the vision. At
the same time, they are also objectives. They are deliberations about what should be
achieved to realize the vision. What became clear was that the implementation
process largely concerns establishing goals: What concrete action should we take to
fulfil the vision and the strategy? We realized that different control instruments can
be used in different parts of a governance by objectives process. Through the KMP
programme’s work, it became clear that preparing action plans involves establishing
objectives for how vision and strategy can and should be implemented. We were also
starkly reminded, first and foremost by VINNOVA, that follow-up processes are also
governance by objectives processes. What should be evaluated in following up to
what extent visions, strategy plans and action plans are actually realized? We came to
realize that the model is important in determining “impact” indicators.

242 During the autumn of 2013, a university-wide action plan for the period 2014-2016 was also prepared, as was a
more detailed operational plan for 2014. The collaboration-related planning included here is largely a result of the
work carried out within the KMP programme.

195

The risk-evaluation process
It was natural for the KMP programme to take its cue from the responsibility for
governance by objectives held by the university administration and department managers. Governance by objectives is unquestionably a very important process within
academic leadership. It allows managers to hold a dialogue and achieve consensus,
which is often required if academic activities are to become more than just isolated
efforts and endeavours.
It is always a challenge for managers in academia to understand their own operations. Even if the majority of university department heads, deans, and vice-chancellors are academics, it is still difficult for them to get a good grasp of others’ activities
because these activities are often carried out at a highly abstract professional level
and are characterized by the approaches used in the individuals’ disciplines. As discussed previously, we believe that risk management, if it adopts the academic environments as its starting point, is an important means for academic managers to gain
at least some understanding of the challenges that exist within different parts of the
organization. In doing so, a foundation for governance by objectives is laid.
The process of formulating objectives – vision and strategy
Successful vision and strategy work should include collegial processes. The objectives
established at the managerial level should not only have the support of subordinates,
but also be the same objectives that the academic environments are pursuing in their
own activities. Precisely because the researchers and teachers as individuals and
groups of individuals ultimately decide what academic efforts actually consist of, it is
essential that they also be involved in governance by objectives processes for their
own operations. The more highly-developed the governance by objectives processes
are at the group level, the greater the potential leadership has to enable others.
Visions and strategies employed in academic operations will never be the same as
those used by businesses, however.
The KMP programme’s primary focus is the academic environments’ management of
research results as knowledge assets in collaborations and for utilization. Evaluations
of research results and academic environments generate dialogues about objectives
and strategy.243 Which overarching objectives does the academic environment want
to achieve? How should the academic environment be positioned and which values
should it uphold? Based on these overarching considerations, how should concrete
knowledge assets be utilized in accordance with the different logics, or in other
words, which utilization objectives should be established? How many and which
publications and other communications activities should be pursued? Which collaborations should be developed? What investments are needed? The more an academic
environment pursues governance by objectives in this way, the simpler it will be for
academic managers to pursue governance by objectives that enables. This means that
those working at the managerial level can begin contemplating objectives from the
243 This will be explained in more detail in Chapter 6.

196

standpoint of the knowledge assets held by the researchers. It becomes possible to
evaluate positions of strength at the departmental level, faculty level, etc., facilitating
a dialogue about governance by objectives that enjoys better support from those
involved.
To the extent that the KMP programme succeeds in its aim, governance by objectives
will create significantly greater opportunities in relation to both the concrete work
done within academic environments and to better-developed leadership and management. Irrespective of this development, it is important to hold a dialogue and to come
to a consensus on objectives at the levels discussed earlier. Doing so will initiate a
process. The KMP programme’s realization will mean that this process occurs from
the bottom up and is grounded in the researchers’ research.
Thus, according to the KMP programme’s conclusions, the second phase of the
process involves an interplay between the following:
● Objective-oriented discussions about how to promote the utilization of
concrete knowledge assets and how to manage these cooperatively as an
integrated part of the academic environment’s activities. According to the
KMP programme, the ambition is for the academic environments to
develop a “collaboration and utilization plan”. More information about
this is provided in Part 3.
● Collegial objective-oriented discussions about what we wish to achieve
within the university at the collective level.
● Discussions initiated by managers aimed at establishing the recorded
visions and strategies.
In the objective-oriented discussion, it is a matter of using the model to decide what
constitute means and ends. The more ends are perceived as means, the more reasonable it may be to describe them as features of the strategy.
The implementation process and the preparation of action plans
Of course, the mere fact that a process has been carried out in which visions and
strategies were established does not in itself mean that they will also be realized. This
is especially true when the process has mainly occurred at the overarching university
level. Here, it is important to realize that, in academic contexts, the implementation
of a vision and strategy is very much bound up with collegial processes. Researchers
and teachers must adopt the objectives and implement them in their own operations.
Obviously, this is much easier to achieve if the objectives are a result of researchers’
and teachers’ own deliberations, as is the KMP programme’s aim.
As mentioned earlier, as part of the work to implement Vision 2020 at the University
of Gothenburg, it was decided that action plans should be prepared every three years
and operational plans every year. This was intended to occur at the university management level, the faculty level and the departmental level. This is a question of governance by objectives. The KMP programme determined that it is reasonable to use
action plans/operational plans in a second phase of the governance by objectives
being conducted at the university management level. Here again, this uses a meansend model as a starting point. That said, it is not appropriate to work with the over-

197

arching objectives on an abstract level to any significant degree. If this is to be done
at all, it should concretize, such as by making specifications for environmental objectives or the pursuit of social justice.
The third phase of the governance by objectives process proposed by the KMP programme consists of the following:
● Objective-oriented discussions about how to promote the utilization of
concrete knowledge assets and how to manage these cooperatively as an
integrated part of the academic environment’s activities.
● Collegial objective-oriented discussions about what we wish to achieve
within the university at the collective level.
● Discussions initiated by managers with the aim of preparing formal
action plans.
This is still a matter of achieving an interplay and balance between the governance by
objectives within the academic environments and the governance by objectives at the
university level.
The follow-up process and development of indicators for “impact”
In 2011, the university carried out an integrated evaluation of the collaboration task
with a special focus on the area of innovation and entrepreneurship (IE2011). Since
then, it has been stated in Vision 2020 that the quality of collaboration, in all its
facets, will be continuously evaluated and the results translated into active measures.
A follow-up of IE2011 is planned by 2020. This evaluation is to be more comprehensive in scope and to address the collaboration task in its entirety.
It is easy to assert that governance by objectives requires follow-up. Are we really
succeeding in meeting the established objectives? In a university context, this is by no
means a given. Is it even possible to measure whether researchers and teachers are
upholding a public responsibility based on academic and humanist values? This question has become particularly relevant during the latter stage of the KMP programme.
As noted earlier, VINNOVA and, to a certain extent, the Swedish Research Council
have been tasked with drafting proposals for how Swedish universities should be
evaluated in this respect. Given the circumstances, it seems only natural to immediately devote oneself to identifying different factors to measure. One insight that is not
always obvious in our case is that the very establishment of factors and criteria for
what should be measured will serve as a kind of governance by objectives.
From the standpoint of the KMP programme, the development of the state objective
and resource-based management that VINNOVA, in particular, has been responsible
for, has not been an obvious factor to consider. Early on, the KMP programme concluded that follow-up work and, presumably, the development of criteria should be
included in the university’s governance by objectives strategy. From our standpoint,
however, it was critical that this third phase of the governance by objectives strategy
harmonise with the first two phases. Evaluating something that universities do not
view as an objective or, worse still, something that academics do not even respect
risks disastrous consequences. A follow-up project in harmony with the KMP pro-

198

gramme’s way of thinking should be carried out as an integrated part of the university’s governance by objectives. The greatest challenge at present is ensuring that the
state’s governance by objectives does not result in the establishment of “success indicators” and the like, which, in the universities’ case, exert an undesirable normative
effect. Follow-up activities are governance by objectives that must be based on the
universities’ circumstances and that must enable researchers and the academic environments to develop their public responsibility. At the time this report was being
written, there was a great deal of criticism directed towards VINNOVA’s proposal.
It is still unclear what the final proposal will, in fact, be. Presumably, it is now up to
the universities to determine to what extent this process will result in an enabling
governance by objectives. Or is it?
In the third phase of the KMP programme’s governance by objectives process, the
universities should define what is to be evaluated based on the means-end model.
Here, too, a good interplay between objectives processes in academic environments
and objectives processes at the managerial level is needed. Thus, governance by
objectives according to the KMP programme consists of the following:
● Follow-up discussions about how the utilization of concrete knowledge
assets has been promoted and how these have been managed cooperatively as an integrated part of the academic environment’s activities.
● Collegial objectives-oriented discussions about what should be evaluated
and followed up.
● Discussions initiated by managers aimed at drafting a follow-up plan and
clear criteria specifying how follow-up should be carried out.
We are well aware that the development of a governance by objectives process in line
with the KMP programme’s way of thinking is not something that can be achieved
overnight. At the same time, even now, on-going dialogues are being held about what
the intended outcome should be. The level of ambition does not need to be so high at
the outset. To a large degree, it is a matter of initiating processes and dialogues. The
KMP programme is largely based on the hypothesis that, first and foremost, the innovation office’s ability to evaluate knowledge assets in academic environments, to evaluate what is happening in the surrounding world and, through models, to stimulate
the contemplation of objectives in relation to specific knowledge assets are important
factors in facilitating governance by objectives. More information about tools and
processes for the innovation office can be found in Part 3.

199

6. Policies and norms
6.1 Universities’ norm systems for utilization and collaboration
Evaluation of policies and norms as means for university management to enable the
integration of collaboration and utilization in academic environments.
One of our most important conclusions is that a developed system of norms for collaboration and utilization is required at the university level. We were constantly
reminded of the importance of academic managers’ ability to oversee and manage the
organizational and institutional development process for their own institutions. This
is probably the clearest way for the university’s management to show its commitment
to assuming responsibility for promoting utilization and collaboration.
In the international arena, it has become increasingly common for universities to
develop policies to guide their collaboration and utilization work. Our conclusion is
that university’s management should work actively with these instruments. Indeed, it
constitutes a core element of a leadership process for developing the university’s organizational capabilities and for realizing governance by objectives. We found that this
work can be used to harmonize development at the individual university with what is

RISK MANAGEMENT
PROCESS

Norms

Governance by Norms Process
1. The process of formulating policies,
instructions, etc.
2. The implementation process and
monitoring of developed organizational
capability

Figure 43. Evaluation of normative control as a tool for university managements

200

happening in the European arena, in particular.244 Thus, the university management
and academic managers should initiate a process to establish and further develop
existing policies for collaboration and the utilization of knowledge assets.
6.1.1 Model for developing organizational capabilities in the form of action plans
Our assessment of what we believe a university management should take into consideration when developing the university’s norm system is based both on an analysis of
what the university is required to consider as regards governmental governance, and
on an analysis of what needs to be considered when managing risk situations in academic environments. We have also evaluated activities and analyzed policy instruments at both Swedish and foreign universities.245 As far as possible, it is essential
within the KMP programme to regard and manage evaluations as an integrated part
of universities’ norm-development work.
Thus, the ambition is to create the basis for an institutional development of universities’ collaboration and utilization activities. As mentioned, the programme has
focused heavily on the utilization and management of knowledge assets. Thus, the
intent has been to identify the circumstances that university’s management should
take into consideration when developing policies and other norm-oriented control
instruments concerning their idea- and knowledge-based collaboration. Of particular
importance to the programme is the interaction between these norms and the development of a concrete system for managing knowledge assets.
In a similar way to that described above, the evaluation largely consisted of a normative process that attempted to identify the basic considerations that university management and academic managers should keep in mind. Eventually, we arrived at four
general questions that should be posed:
● What is the concrete procedure for managing knowledge assets at the university, and how can it be developed in accordance with the different
strains of logic regarding utilization?
● How should the organizational responsibility for promoting utilization be
allocated and specified within universities?
● Which general principles should apply regarding the researchers’ management of their knowledge assets?
● How should incentives be designed to encourage researchers and teachers
to promote utilization?
These questions indicate that the institutional development process must be based on
the current situation. The angle of approach is to begin with the current procedure
for managing knowledge assets, and then to evaluate how the procedure can be
244 From an international perspective (in particular in the EU's recommendation) there are increasing
expectations on universities to clarify their position on innovation work and other utilization through their policies.
See Chapter 2.
245 We took a closer look at regulations in place at Lund University, Uppsala University, Linköping University, Umeå
University, Chalmers University of Technology, Sweden's Royal Institute of Technology (KTH), the Karolinska Institute,
the University of Copenhagen, the Norwegian University of Science and Technology, Cambridge University and
Oxford University.

201

developed based on the four strains of utilization logic. The first question lays the
foundation for evaluating the subsequent questions. Once a conclusion has been
reached, we can evaluate: 1) how overall responsibilities should be allocated and clarified; 2) how key principles for managing knowledge assets should be formulated and
developed; and 3) how incentives for assuming responsibility should be developed.
The first question pinpoints what needs to be developed in terms of organizational
capabilities. We chose to focus on processes that should be included in a number of
operational procedures. For each of these, we specify the key processes that should be
institutionalized. Next, we focus on what we perceive to be key elements of the infrastructure that should be developed, whether IT or another type of infrastructure. In a
similar way to that described above, we thus create something of a model to follow
when the university management considers what needs to be done. This evaluation is
based on both the risk analysis discussed in Chapter 3 and on the analysis of state
governance found in Chapter 2. As regards the other three questions, the aim is to
evaluate and specify the necessary norms. In this case, evaluation focuses on the
norms that can facilitate the development of the concrete operational procedures.
As described above, we view the work of developing organizational capabilities as a
long-term process. Formulating a policy means nothing in itself; what matters is initiating and facilitating processes in practice. The success of the academic leadership
thus consists, not of the ability to develop well-written documents, but of the ability
to understand the current institutional situation and to manage a development
process.
6.1.2 Policy as a governance instrument
One primary reason for the increasing expectations placed on universities to develop
policies for managing research results is that this is seen as an important element in
developing an infrastructure and “ecosystem” for innovation. The policy comprises
something of a legal framework. It is viewed as being able to prescribe how utilization should and must occur, what tasks are crucial, and how responsibilities are to be
allocated. Policy can also be important in the organizational development within the
university. Internationally, this often means organizationally developing the university’s knowledge transfer office or innovation office. One key organizational element is
often the procedure for how research results and suchlike are to be reported and
managed within the university. It is important that the policy is compatible with
other state governance.
The KMP programme has emphasized the importance of Swedish universities following international trends in their institutional development. It is not possible to create
a strict national system for managing intellectual assets. To the degree that Swedish
researchers and research groups want to be active in international arenas, they must
be able to manage their own and others’ research results according to the contractual
logic developed in programme- and project-based governance. Considering the nature
of universities as organizations guided by professions, with great international
employee mobility, it is especially important to understand that the local system must
be developed as part of an international system. However, this does not mean that it

202

is not possible to develop a Gothenburg-based/Swedish/Nordic approach. As discussed above, the ambition is to move beyond a development in which knowledge
assets are reported to innovation offices and so on in order to be licensed and otherwise commercialized. The challenge has been to evaluate how policies and suchlike
should be formulated to facilitate a development in which we both enable universities
to take part in international institutional development, and to develop a system that
is compatible with the objectives specified in their own management-by-objectives
processes. This is one reason why we have placed significant emphasis on analyzing
what is happening at other universities.
6.1.3 Implementing the EU’s recommendation
We decided early on to analyze the degree to which it is possible for Swedish universities to implement the EU’s recommendation. After evaluating the governmental governance, it became clear that it is important, if not critical, that Swedish universities
position themselves as “European universities” as far as possible, and adapt to the
existing governance. The major challenge as regards implementing the EU’s recommendation is the prevailing “professors privilege” (teacher’s exemption) in Sweden.
As discussed above, the trend in the EU is for universities to take an ever-greater
responsibility for managing knowledge assets. It is not possible to in Sweden implement the default norm that universities should hold the rights to their own research
results. However, there are opportunities for universities to take a much more active
responsibility in accordance with the more limited norms expressed in the recommendation. At the current time, it is presumably not sufficient for universities to clarify
such norms in their own policies. At least in some situations, it will be expected that
universities will sign agreements with their employees.
The conclusion of our evaluation of the EU’s recommendation is thus that Swedish
universities have relatively good prospects for implementing many of the institutional
solutions proposed in the recommendation. A general policy for utilization and collaboration might very well contain the various principles and policies as components.
Therefore, in accordance with the recommendation, the general policy might contain
sub-policies for:
● Knowledge transfer
● Management of intellectual property (IP)
● Publication and dissemination
● Licensing
● Commissioned research and research collaborations
● Spin-offs and company start-ups
● Distribution of revenue
The more fundamental allocation of responsibility can be decided in the knowledgetransfer policy. The intellectual property policy should contain the university’s principles for managing intellectual assets. The policy regarding the distribution of revenue
primarily concerns developing the principles that govern incentives for researchers.
The more concrete system in line with the different strains of logic for utilization is
determined in the other policies. It is possible that a further policy on open knowledge platforms may be required.

203

6.1.4 The process at the University of Gothenburg
A number of policies have already been developed at the University of Gothenburg.
The university has an IP policy, for example, as well as policies on contract research
and education. For several years, the university has regulated its relationship to its
holding company as regards spin-offs and company start-ups. For some time now, if
no specific instructions were given, in each individual case a dialogue has been held
to address the duties of what was previously called the Research and Innovation
Service, now the Grants and Innovation Office. The regulatory instruments are being
reviewed in connection with the KMP programme, and there is an explicit ambition
to introduce a new, overarching policy with several sub-policies.

6.2 Organizational system for managing knowledge assets
What concrete system exists for managing knowledge assets at universities, and how
can it be developed according to the different strains of utilization logic?
Perhaps the KMP programme’s most basic task is to develop and propose a system
for managing knowledge assets.246 According to our findings, developing this kind of
operative organizational capability should go hand-in-hand with developing concrete
capabilities for managing research results in utilization and collaboration processes;
see Chapter 5.247 However, there is also a need to develop and implement norms that
facilitate the system itself. Our assumption is that academic managers have a particular responsibility, and also opportunity, to develop their leadership as regards the
governance of their institution’s activities. According to our findings, this leadershipbased governance should focus on the interaction between the development of norms
in policies and the concrete development of operational procedures.
6.2.1 Operational procedures for utilization and collaboration
We believe that evaluating which system needs to be developed for managing knowledge assets according to the different strains of utilization logic also provides an
understanding of the norm development required.248 Consequently, the KMP programme has devoted extensive resources to this evaluation. To a large degree, this
evaluation was based on the experience gained from the risk analysis. In addition, it
was conducted in close connection with the development of concrete analysis and
management processes concerning knowledge assets and academic environments. (See
Chapter 5 for more information.) Eventually, we concluded that the organizational
system should be divided into a number of sections, or operational procedures.
246 Cf. VFI 2007:01 Universitetet i kunskapsekonomin [Universities in the Knowledge Economy]. Our evaluation was
partly based on the work carried out by the Center for Intellectual Property at Chalmers and Gothenburg universities.
247 The evaluation in this section is closely linked with that of the evaluation of the concrete management of
knowledge assets in Chapter 5.
248 These efforts focused on the interaction between norm systems and management systems.

204

• What is the speciﬁc procedure for managing knowledge
assets at the university today and how can it be developed
in accordance with the diﬀerent utilization logics?

• System for identifying and evaluating knowledge assets
• System for establishing objectives and strategic
assessments regarding utilization logic

• How should the organizational responsibility to promote
utilization be allocated and speciﬁed within the university?

• System for making knowledge assets publicly available

• How should the university manage knowledge assets and
other intellectual assets?

• System for making knowledge assets applicable for users
and stakeholders

• How should the incentives for researchers and teachers
to promote utilization be designed?

• System for developing knowledge assets for innovations
• System for managing knowledge assets in open research
and innovation platforms

Figure 44. Evaluation to facilitate development of a number of operational procedures

This section describes the findings regarding these operational procedures. We view
operational procedures as a number of processes to be managed in, and in connection
with, the academic environments. These processes are primarily the same ones that
we identified as being most important in the risk analysis – i.e. they follow the conclusions of the different strains of utilization logic. In this evaluation, we placed great
emphasis on considering the current situation, although we first and foremost
worked to determine which processes we believe should be included in future operational procedures.We focused on the need for organizational capabilities, in particular. What kind of infrastructure, in the form of support systems and organizational
functions, is needed to develop the various operational procedures? The ambition
throughout this evaluation was to try to link back to the EU’s recommendation.
6.2.2 General reflections on the current system for utilization and collaboration
The current system does not include an internal system for managing knowledge
assets at Swedish universities. This is often explained as a consequence of the professor’s privilege. However, after careful evaluation, we found that this rationale needs
to be significantly revamped.
In general, universities can be described as something of a smorgasbord system when
it comes to utilization. The norm is that the university’s various research groups and
research processes comprise a kind of smorgasbord, where anyone who is interested
can look for something that appeals to them (an idea with commercial potential) and
offer their professional capacity. The basis of this “system” – or rather project chaos
– is that researchers are free to assign their ideas to anyone they like, and are entitled
to hire whom they like to participate in their collaboration activities. Actors associated with the universities who supply grants to support innovation also tend to adopt a
similar approach. This has resulted in something of a competitive relationship among
internal and external actors. The fact that the researchers themselves pay only very
little for the services carried out for them creates a peculiarly competitive situation
characterized and controlled primarily by those actors who manage to acquire funding, particularly state funding.

205

As mentioned, the Swedish government has indicated that it will introduce a reporting system for ideas, in which researchers will be required (at least to some degree) to
report their research results based on what is commercially valuable and worth protecting by legal means. A reporting system that places this sort of responsibility on
researchers applies normative pressure to universities as organizations to develop
institutional systems specifically for ideas. Such systems can be established without
the universities taking over the rights to the results. It is fully possible for universities
to develop such a system independently, if the national government chooses not to
realize its intention.
In Sweden, external actors have primarily been involved in managing ideas: incubators, innovation portals, entrepreneurial schools, technology parks and other, similar
actors have viewed it as their mission to stimulate researchers to start companies
based on commercially viable ideas. The University of Gothenburg’s holding company was established to assume an ownership role in companies on behalf of the university where this was deemed necessary. However, no clarity has been achieved concerning a model for how this should occur. The establishment of innovation offices
was an initiative on the part of the national government to help support the management of ideas at universities. Here, too, no clear instructions were issued as to how
these innovation offices should pursue their activities.249
As a result, the concept of an innovation system primarily focuses on activities outside the universities’ normal activities. The notion of “the innovation system” is associated with the idea that any research results that are identified as ideas with commercial potential should be refined into commercial operations. This is a system in
which ideas are to be tested in a number of phases. However, in reality, this is more
of a vision than a system. In the worst case, the actors active in the system are primarily focused on obtaining public funding for their own operations, with no real ambition other than to meet the requirements for continued public funding.
The perception that an innovation system exists also tends to result in researchers
preferring a “simple innovation system” with one or a handful of selected actors to
whom they can turn with research results that have commercial potential. This
allows them to limit their utilization activities to simply improving their own credentials in academic journals, while also retaining the opportunity, at least on paper, to
earn significant extra income through no effort of their own. In practice, nearly all
the responsibility lies with the researchers if they want their research to result in a
company. This is particularly true if the company has close ties to research. As a rule,
such establishments require a long-term assumption of responsibility and significant
effort on the part of researchers. For many researchers, the strong focus on ideas also
means that they perceive little connection to the work they do personally, and often
find themselves questioning why the university places so much emphasis on an innovation system.
249 A requirement to report back to the national government was implemented. See Chapter 3.5. Prop. 2014/15:1,
expense area 16, p. 156: 'However, it has emerged from the reporting that some key indicators may need to be clarified or changed. One example is the reporting of the number of ideas, where the definition of an idea differs between innovation offices. This prevents comparisons of the number of ideas generated among universities. Other
key indicators are not considered to reflect the work of the innovation offices and may therefore need to be reviewed. The government intends to return to this issue at a later date.' [translation]

206

At the same time, extensive utilization occurs at universities themselves, which is not
discussed in terms of ideas and innovation activities. One could argue that operational procedures have been developed, in particular in connection with commissioned research, collaborative research and commissioned education. What has been
achieved will be discussed in more detail below.
6.2.3 System for identifying and evaluating knowledge assets
A significant conclusion from our perspective is that a shift in norms is necessary if
universities are to take responsibility for collaboration and the promotion of utilization as an integrated part of their operations. This reasonably leads to a number of
cases of assuming responsibility, which can collectively be described as an operational
procedure for identifying and evaluating knowledge assets.
Many elements of the university-related innovation systems concern access to ideas
and idea flows. The US model, in which researchers are required to report patentable
innovations, has fundamentally shaped the establishment of knowledge transfer
offices and their way of working at the institutional level. The reporting system and
the evaluation associated with it make it natural to speak in terms of ideas. When
innovation offices were established through Sweden’s 2008 research and innovation
bill, it was with the requirement that a similar system be implemented at Swedish
universities. This has not yet occurred, however.
One fundamental element and typical trait of the KMP programme is the view that
academic environments themselves shoulder the primary responsibility for identifying
and evaluating their knowledge assets and how they are positioned in relation to the
external environment. In this context, it is important to analyze the knowledge assets’
potential. There should be routines for utilizing various science indices, patent information, business information and other civic information. The conclusion is that
there should be access to what we have chosen to describe as “innovation information”. Altogether, we have identified the following phases/processes in this operational procedure:
● Identification of knowledge assets
● Analysis of the knowledge assets’ potential from research, utilization,
collaboration and control perspectives
● Analysis of existing and possible claims to IP rights concerning knowledge
assets
● Analysis of the academic environment’s contractual relationships and
transactions of knowledge assets
● Analysis of the academic environment and its position in national and
international arenas for research and innovation
The above processes should be highlighted in the universities’ policies and norm
development. These are processes for which a designated individual should be both
responsible and capable of pursuing. Responsibilities need to be assigned and specified. In addition, there may be a need to develop norms for how the processes
should, and even will be, carried out. The fact that the researchers themselves are
responsible for their knowledge assets does not necessarily mean that they must carry

207

out the analyses. Depending on the environment, different degrees of support are
required. In addition, various types of tools should be available.
One of our findings is that institutional components are also needed in an infrastructure for utilization and collaboration. The programme has focused on developing a
support system for academic environments. After careful consideration, we determined that the interaction between support systems and organizational functions
enables the development of organizational capabilities in what can be described as
operational procedures. For this first procedure, the following components were identified:
● A support system for identifying and analyzing intellectual assets
● A support system for positioning academic environments
Many aspects of the programme have focused on these intended support systems.
Such support systems can contain a number of elements, in turn. The main focus of
the work has been to develop operative and conceptual models for how the five
processes described above can be carried out in practice. (See Chapter 8 for more
information.) Currently the issue is how to allocate responsibility and initiate
processes for these institutional elements, with a focus on support systems and organizational functions. As discussed earlier, this is a long-term managerial responsibility.
In addition, the innovation office can be expected to play a particularly important
role in this context. Developing the operational procedure is generally very much a
matter of developing the innovation office’s role in relation to the academic environments. How reactive or proactive should it be? How should its value propositions to
the academic environments be formulated? There are also other actors who may play
an important role in the analysis work. Gothenburg University Library – as an expert
in bibliometrics – proved to be vital to the KMP programme. The innovation and
entrepreneurial programmes associated with the university were also a key resource
supporting the analysis.
6.2.4 System for establishing objectives and strategic assessments regarding
utilization logic
Another operational procedure that needs to be developed concerns assessments and
decisions about how utilization should occur. The more we worked with the different
strains of utilization logic, the more evident it became that it is crucial to systematically make assessments and decisions about how utilization will actually be achieved.
Essentially, it is a question of making assessments for each individual knowledge
asset. It is reasonable that academic environments should be able to decide which
knowledge assets should be utilized and according to which logic. The EU’s recommendation also emphasizes the importance of balancing different utilization models.
In Sweden, the basic premise is that researchers are responsible for deciding how
their knowledge assets will be utilized. We believe that this is an aspect that needs to
be clarified at the policy level. At the same time, the evaluation and the risk analysis,
in particular, reveal that the necessary assessments should not reasonably be the sole
responsibility of researchers. There is also a need for a system in which researchers,
management and the administration work together to decide how specific knowledge
assets will be utilized.

208

We identified the following phases/processes that should be included in the operational procedure:
● Establishment of objectives in the academic environment for the utilization
of knowledge assets
● Testing of which logic has the greatest potential for promoting the utilization of knowledge assets
● Testing of to what degree utilization activities and, thereby, the management of knowledge assets should be handled under the auspices of the university or privately by researchers
● Assessment and management of risks related to being a government agency
when utilizing knowledge assets – such as transparency and confidentiality,
conflicts of interest, the risks posed to the university’s reputation from secondary employment, competition and ethical challenges
● Ensuring that the management of knowledge assets does not hamper the
development of a research infrastructure, opportunities for continued
research and research collaborations, protectability, and transfer to another
person
It goes without saying that several of these processes cannot be carried out by
researchers on their own. The challenges concerning conflicts of interest, for example,
are particularly apparent when researchers hold the rights to intellect assets in a private capacity. In line with the EU recommendation, it is important that the
Innovation Office and the holding company assist in managing conflicts of interest
that may arise concerning commercial ideas. One conclusion drawn about the situation in Sweden is that it is reasonable that the management of secondary employment
should be developed. Before utilization occurs in a private capacity, a dialogue should
at least have been held with the researcher’s immediate superior about the relevant
research result, how utilization will occur, to what degree it is based on the pursuit of
public responsibility, and how it will affect the university in relation to its on-going
research.
Thus, the academic managers need to be involved, at least to manage risks posed to
the university’s position as a public authority. Several of the processes also require
support from the university administration. Here again, it is important to utilize policies to specify and clarify responsibilities. There is also an obvious need for norm
development here as regards specifying which assessments need to be made.
We identified a number of different needs when evaluating the infrastructure. We
chose to highlight the following institutional components:
● A support system for governance by objectives in academic environments
and making decisions about utilization
● Administrative support, to the degree necessary, for the organization of
the management of intellectual assets in academic environments
In the same way as above, we realized that the innovation office should play an
important role here, too, in contributing to the on-going development work. At the
same time, it is obvious that university managers on different levels should assume
greater responsibility. It is clear that this is a matter of institutional teamwork
between teaching staff, managers and the university administration, both during the

209

development phase and the processes themselves. Decision-making support systems
and other tools should reasonably be designed for use by all of these groups. Case
management is part and parcel of being a public authority, but can be developed as a
tool to stimulate collaboration and utilization.
6.2.5 System for making knowledge assets publicly available
Making knowledge assets publicly available follows a certain logic, which is why universities can and should develop an operational procedure for this logic. One fundamental rule for all universities is that knowledge be made universally available with
no restrictions. The EU’s recommendation emphasizes the importance of universities
contributing to knowledge transfer to the general public through a variety of openaccess initiatives and channels. The challenge is to create an institutional system that
makes it possible to make knowledge assets a part of the public domain. Most people
assume that this system already exists, since publishing is such an important university activity. However, it is important to realize that this kind of institutional system
does not simply arise on its own, nor can public access be assured solely through
publication. Publishing for academic purposes is one thing – making knowledge a
part of the public domain is another.
After evaluating academic environments250, we were able to identify the following as
phases and processes on which an operational procedure should focus:
● Making knowledge assets scientifically available
● Making knowledge assets available through education
● Making knowledge assets available via popular science
As defined in the risk analysis, these processes should facilitate making knowledge
assets available and relevant to as many people as possible. The processes have
already been largely institutionalized within the framework of the university’s core
activities. We have concluded that, at this point in time, institutional development
work should focus on accessibility that is not realized through traditional academic
publishing or education. These days, nearly every institution and other academic
environment has access to communication officers, which can make this task easier.
As regards this procedure, we have concentrated on managing research results as
knowledge assets. One core principle for making knowledge assets publicly available
is that, to the fullest extent possible, they should not be subject to control.251
Essentially, anyone should be able to utilize knowledge assets and also to make them
available to others in various ways. Hence, it is important that no intellectual property rights or other limitations exist that impede their use. As an example, an invention

250 Se Section 3.3.2.
251 From the EU's recommendation, Annex 1, 1.7: 'Develop and publicise a publication/dissemination policy promoting the broad dissemination of research and development results (e.g., through open-access publication), while
accepting possible delay where the protection of intellectual property is envisaged, although this should be kept
to a minimum.'

210

is no longer patentable once it has been published, eliminating claims to intellectual
property rights. Other rules apply to copyright and database protection. Since most
innovations produced in academic contexts are subject to some kind of copyright, it
is possible, in principle, to make copyright claims to them. What is important is that,
as a rule, the copyright does not prevent others from utilizing the research result
itself. This does not apply in cases where the research results themselves comprise
computer software, databases, visualizations and suchlike. In addition, it is important
to remember that copyright can be an incentive for researchers to make their results
available through textbooks, for example. Copyright is a means of making research
results available. (More information can be found below in the description of the system for managing knowledge assets in open research and innovation platforms.)
A large part of the processes for making knowledge assets publicly available can be
managed in academic environments, and this is already being done today. However, it
is possible to enhance this system by developing the innovation office’s operations.
6.2.6 System for making knowledge assets applicable for users and stakeholders
Another operational procedure that should be developed concerns making knowledge
assets relevant to specific users and stakeholders. Promoting utilization in this way
also follows a certain logic. There is great potential for developing this logic through
analyzing and managing knowledge assets. Simply analyzing knowledge assets and
the academic environment’s position reveals both potential partners and what kind of
research might be the subject of the collaboration. Managing research results reveals
a fairly large interface in which researchers and teachers can together design and initiate activities that enable specific users to gain access to and begin utilizing knowledge assets. As discussed previously, most universities have done a lot to develop
processes for commissioned and collaborative research as well as for commissioned
education.
We found that an operational procedure should focus on the following phases and
processes:
● Making knowledge assets available for application through science
● Making knowledge assets available for application through education
● Making knowledge assets available for application through projects
It is clear that professional support is nearly always required in pursuing various
forms of practice-based knowledge transfer. It is extremely important to be able to
offer well-defined support for externally-funded research and education, contract
management and utilization. The closer research processes are to practice, the more
important it is for universities to be aware of various actors’ freedoms to operate. As
regards this particular strain of utilization logic, at least in some cases, it is also
appropriate for universities to assume greater responsibility for the rights to knowledge assets.
In many of the EU-funded research programmes, universities are expected to be
involved in the management of knowledge assets, and also to assume a clear responsibility for managing the rights to background knowledge (background) and project

211

results (foreground). The EU’s recommendation assumes that, as a party in research
collaboration and commissioned research, universities will manage issues regarding
the rights to background and foreground. The principles emphasized here include
that universities should ensure that it is possible to continue research, and also promote the maximum socioeconomic value-creation. As a general observation, we
believe that the more companies and universities that become actors in international
research and innovation arenas, the greater the expectation that universities will
assume direct responsibility for managing which actors will have access to specific
knowledge and on what terms.
The evaluation work regarding infrastructural development allowed us to highlight
the following institutional components:
● Specifying and managing the university’s own and others’ knowledge
assets as background and foreground in various commissioned and
collaborative relationships
● Managing commission and innovation contracts (contract negotiation,
design and management)
Background and foreground can be identified in academic environments with the
support of innovation offices. One key element in an infrastructure for facilitating
applicability is ensuring protectability and, at times, also submitting applications for
things like trademark rights, patents and industrial design rights. As discussed above,
there should be a central function with specialist skills to manage this. It is also
appropriate that a specialist function exists for designing and negotiating contracts.
The University of Gothenburg already has a legal officer at the Grants and
Innovation Office whose job is to assist with the establishment of various contractual
relationships. This position should be further developed and allocated additional
resources.
6.2.7 System for developing knowledge assets as innovations
A third operational procedure that ought to exist at universities concerns how knowledge assets can be developed into innovations. At many universities, the focus thus
far has been on creating an institutional system that makes it possible to “locate” and
commercialize ideas. In Sweden, the focus has largely been on building an institutional system that allows new companies to be developed based on product ideas, while
internationally, the focus has been much more on creating a system for licensing ideas
to the existing business community.
In line with the EU recommendation, universities should establish a system that regulates how employees and students report ideas with commercial potential to innovation offices. If they follow the EU’s recommendation, the universities’ innovation
offices should work to ensure that these ideas result in the maximum socioeconomic
value. In particular, the EU emphasizes the importance of developing one system for
licensing and one for founding companies. At the same time, it clarifies the importance of balancing different models, such as efforts to contribute to a public domain.
In addition, the recommendation indicates that innovation offices must have the
capacity to apply for and manage intellectual property rights.

212

Our work has revealed that there is reason to go beyond the idea logic and to focus
instead on knowledge assets within academic environments. One primary focus of
our work is to evaluate how academic environments can assume greater responsibility for social innovations and other types of project innovations. This does not necessarily mean that universities cannot develop an operational procedure that follows
the EU’s recommendation.
However, when it comes to governmental governance in Sweden, it is important to
keep in mind that it is assumed that the researchers hold the rights to their research
results. This assumption imposes specific requirements. We found that the innovation
office should be tasked with developing its own role of providing support to academic environments while also offering the service of licensing research results. A rational
distribution of roles might involve the innovation office operating in a public capacity, while the holding company works for researchers in their private capacities.
We found that an operational procedure should focus on the following phases and
processes:
● Project-oriented innovation work
● Licensing-oriented innovation work
● Company-oriented innovation work
Experience gained through the programme indicates a great need for innovation
offices to have the capacity to pursue more socially-oriented innovation projects in
collaboration with researchers and under public management. At least some
researchers seem to prefer, where possible, that the university as an organization
assumes greater responsibility in connection with concrete innovations, also. This is
particularly true for innovations that have close ties to research and are developed by
multiple researchers in an academic environment. The desire to maintain an academic
approach seems to be more important, at least in some cases, than the opportunity to
be directly involved in a more commercial process. A system should be developed for
project-oriented innovation activities between academic environments and the innovation office.
We found that entrepreneurial schools can play an important role in contributing to
project-oriented innovation work in academic environments. Some research activities
have been carried out under the programme through students not only evaluating
knowledge assets, but also contributing to the creation of projects. These activities
complement those carried out at the University of Gothenburg, which have focused
more on developing commercial ideas. One general conclusion in this context is that
activities related to student-based entrepreneurial schools should be included in this
operational procedure.
From an international perspective, licensing is one very common method used to promote utilization. The EU recommendation highlights this activity as being very
important. Our conclusion is that there is a clear need for this type of organizational
function at Swedish universities. It should be possible for researchers and academic
environments to allow the university to ensure the utilization of knowledge assets
through licensing. It is highly likely that an evaluation of an academic environment
will reveal that the best way to utilize knowledge assets is through licensing. It is not

213

reasonable to expect that researchers will be able to manage this in a private capacity.
It should be possible to transfer the responsibility for this to the university. Licensing
work could very well be an integrated element of academic environments, but
requires the professional management of the innovation office besides.
The basic premise that the researchers and teachers have the rights to their research
results is interpreted to mean that they are free to engage actors outside the university
to commercialize their innovation. The KMP programme has embraced this principle
in connection with developing the institutional system. In this way, institutional
development in Sweden will differ significantly from that of other European universities. We support the Swedish logic that the responsibility for utilization lies primarily
with researchers, and that it should also be possible to promote utilization in a private capacity.
By facilitating these processes, we also set the stage for the university to assume public responsibility within the framework of its activities. This allows for at least some
harmonization with the European trend. We have paved the way for a Swedish model
for collaboration and utilization that has the potential to be both a lasting and longterm solution.
6.2.8 System for managing knowledge assets in open research and innovation
platforms
The operational procedure that we consider to have the greatest prospective potential
is that which focuses on managing knowledge platforms. The EU recommendation
emphasizes the importance of considering an open innovation approach regarding
universities’ management of intellectual property rights. It also recommends building
up portfolios of IP rights. Our findings show that ideas are becoming increasingly
fragmented and are being viewed less and less as product concepts. In a system where
knowledge assets are utilized in open contractual networks, it is vital to be able to
manage large volumes of knowledge-asset transactions. For successful, externallyoriented academic environments, this translates into a need to build up portfolios of
backgrounds and contractual claims on foreground. This, in turn, requires a fairly
advanced institutional system.
We concluded that an operational procedure should focus on the following phases
and processes:
● Developing and managing open databases and other IT-based platforms
● Participating in open commons
● Participating in open networks
One primary characteristic of this procedure is the organizational ability to assess
and regulate the degree of openness. This concerns the inclusion of knowledge assets
and who should have access to them. Should we create a platform that is open to
the public, to everyone at the university, or to those within a broader collaborative
programme, for example?
While evaluating infrastructural development, we found that it is likely that we will

214

utilize a number of different infrastructure solutions in the future. These should
include decision-making support concerning how to regulate openness and how to
develop, manage and participate in knowledge platforms. The task is to design models for creating and regulating openness using contracts and IT systems, based on the
copyright to research results and databases. It is obvious that the innovation office
has a major responsibility for this work. There is much to suggest that an organizational function for licensing in the public domain, as discussed above, should also
assume special responsibility here.

6.3 Organizational allocation of responsibility
How should the organizational responsibility for promoting utilization be allocated
and specified within universities?
We put much thought and consideration into how the university’s responsibility as a
public authority should be allocated in connection with collaboration and utilization
to enable the development of the operational procedures discussed above. One key
element of this consideration has been our analysis of the governmental governance
as well as actions within and in relation to the academic environments. As mentioned
previously, we have also conducted an extensive review of how norm-creation work
is carried out at other universities. However, our formulation of norms for the organizational assumption of responsibility has been primarily based on our assessment of
the operational procedures. We had already concluded that a well-developed, specified allocation of responsibilities is required. Our evaluation of the operational proce-

ASSIGNMENT OF RESPONSIBILITY AND SPECIFICATION
• The researcher/teacher has the right and the primary public responsibility to
promote the utilization of their knowledge assets as an integrated aspect of their
academic activities as well as a joint/collegial responsibility within academic
environments.
• University managers are responsible for enabling researchers to collaborate and
utilize knowledge assets as an integrated part of their work; for ensuring that
collaboration and utilization occur in harmony with the university’s responsibility
as a public authority and with its academic values; and for ensuring that the
university acts as a professional contracting party in contracts with external players.
• The Innovation Oﬃce has both a reactive and proactive responsibility in relation
to the academic environments to ensure that knowledge assets are utilized and
managed professionally in collaborations, which includes responsibility for
developing a number of organizational functions for things like licensing and
coordinating support systems.
• The holding company is responsible for creating the necessary conditions for,
and oﬀering researchers/teachers the opportunity to, (privately) commercialize
knowledge assets in accordance with the university’s norms, and on the other hand,
for managing key intellectual assets on behalf of the university.
• An academic training unit is responsible for following the work at the university
and ensuring that there are arenas for role-speciﬁc education as well as for critical
dialogue about the university’s work on utilization and collaboration.

Figure 45. Norms for allocating responsibilities

215

dures for managing knowledge assets in academic environments made it possible for
us to develop and discuss concrete proposals for norms. In our assessment, we were
particularly interested in the interplay between the formulation of norms and the
development of the systems. In time, we came to focus on the interplay between
norm development and the development of organizational functions and support
systems.
Once again, the idea is to identify typical norms that a university management must
take into account when developing its ability to promote utilization and collaboration. The challenge is to identify and formulate norms that can be included in a
policy or policies. Implementing these proposed norms may well result in a need to
review the university’s organization.
6.3.1 Norms for promoting complete academic environments
One crucial finding is that the operational procedures should be developed based on
the academic environments, as this is where the responsibility for promoting utilization and collaborating must be integrated. The overarching norm is thus that the academic environments should have the ability to promote utilization and to collaborate
as an integral part of their other activities. It is these environments that must be able
to identify and manage their knowledge assets.
As discussed above, the development of academic environments is dependent on an
interplay between 1) researchers/ teachers, 2) university managers, 3) the university
administration and 4) external experts. Complete academic environments are the
result of establishing norms that clarify each of these actors’ responsibilities. Our
conclusion is that clarifying the above paves the way for the assumption of responsibility at the organizational level.
6.3.2 Researchers’ and teachers’ responsibilities
The researcher/teacher has the right and the primary public responsibility to promote
the utilization of their knowledge assets as an integrated aspect of their academic
activities as well as a joint/collegial responsibility within academic environments.
Based on governance by the Swedish government, it remains reasonable that individual researchers should bear the main responsibility for managing and utilizing knowledge assets. The basic premise should further be that researchers have the opportunity to manage and utilize their knowledge assets in a private capacity. This marks a
deviation from common practice at other European universities and from the EU
recommendation.

Specification of researchers’ and teachers’ responsibilities for promoting utilization as
part of their public employment
It must be clarified that researchers’ primary responsibility for integrating knowledge-

216

The researcher/teacher has the right
and the primary public responsibility
to promote the utilization of their knowledge
assets as an integrated aspect of their academic
activities as well as a joint/collegial responsibility
within academic environments.
• Speciﬁcation of researchers’ and teachers’
responsibilities for promoting utilization as part
of their public employment
• Speciﬁcation of public responsibility
• Speciﬁcation of collegial and collective
responsibility within academic
environments

Figure 46. Specification of the responsibilities of theresearcher/teacher
asset management into universities’ research and educational work exists as part of
their employment at the university. As government employees, researchers must
ensure that the public resources they have utilized result in as much public benefit as
possible. Accordingly, researchers represent the university as a public authority when
participating in collaborations. It should also be clarified that collaboration and utilization should occur based on what are considered to be important academic values
– such as the freedom and critical independence of research.
Thus, it is the researchers’ and teachers’ responsibility to identify their own knowledge assets and consider how to utilize and manage these in collaborations. Holding
private rights to knowledge assets while at the same time bearing public responsibility
for integrating collaborative and utilization activities constitutes a demanding situation for researchers and teachers. It is far from easy to uphold their professional
responsibility to promote the public good, while at the same time protecting their
own legitimate commercial interests. Clarifying the public responsibility of academics
highlights how important it is that managers and university administration possess
requisite knowledge and assume responsibility, not least of all to ensure that
researchers/teachers are not constantly faced with disqualification scenarios and con-

217

flicts of interest. Determining which activities are academic and which constitute secondary employment becomes increasingly difficult the more integrated the commission to collaborate.
Specification of public responsibility
It seems a reasonable basic premise that researchers should have the benefit and
incentive of being able to control the earnings generated by their own research
results. At the same time, it must be clear that public benefit should be the primary
objective. Researchers must accept that commercialization is not a given. Neither
should researchers have the right to compensation for allowing the university to utilize research results as infrastructure for continued research or as background knowledge. If the university wishes to be the principal of a project that utilizes knowledge
assets, the researcher’s claims to these rights should be managed contractually.
Specification of collegial and collective responsibility within academic environments
In addition, we need to clarify that researchers must uphold the public responsibilities
of the academic environment to which they belong. By making it clear that public
responsibility applies for the academic environment as a collective, it becomes natural
to jointly consider and decide how knowledge assets should be utilized.
A dialogue should be held within the academic environment on how to promote utilization jointly. In addition, it should be made clear that evaluating and selecting utilization logics and concrete measures should also be a joint responsibility. Thus, it
becomes clear that it is the academic environment that bears the public responsibility
for promoting utilization. The principle of socioeconomic responsibility as stated in
the EU recommendation can also be implemented: “In order to promote the use of
publicly funded research results and maximize their socio-economic impact, consider
all types of possible exploitation mechanisms (such as licensing or spin-off creation)
and all possible exploitation partners (such as spin-offs or existing companies, other
public research organizations, investors, or innovation support services or agencies),
and select the most appropriate ones.”252 This is particularly important in consideration of the degree to which researchers work in joint research programmes and generate joint research results. The individual researcher’s private interests are secondary to
those of collegium and the university. This means that researchers must defer to
norms concerning the university’s responsibilities of ownership (see below).
6.3.3 Managerial responsibility
University managers are responsible for enabling researchers to collaborate and utilize knowledge assets as an integrated part of their work; for ensuring that collaboration and utilization occur in harmony with the university’s responsibility as a public
252 Principle 8 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.

218

University managers are responsible for enabling
researchers to collaborate and utilize knowledge assets as an
integrated part of their work; for ensuring that collaboration
and utilization occur in harmony with the university’s responsibility
as a public authority and with its academic values; and for ensuring
that the university acts as a professional contracting party in contracts
with external players.
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility to develop the public authority’s
role in integrating the task of collaborating and promoting utilization
into university activities
• Speciﬁcation of universities’ responsibility to develop their
role as an employer to allow employees to promote
utilization and collaborate
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility to develop the role
of contracting party in external collaborative
relationships

Figure 47. Specification of responsibilities for academic managers
authority and with its academic values; and for ensuring that the university acts as a
professional contracting party in contracts with external players.
One finding is that without dedicated management that has the will and ability to
assume responsibility, it is very difficult to integrate the utilization and collaboration
task within the framework of academic environments.
Committed university top management is an absolute requirement for developing
organizational capabilities through the interplay among academic environments,
operational support, leadership and external innovation support. Academic managers
bear the university’s responsibility as a public authority, its responsibility as an
employer and the responsibility to ensure that it acts as a professional contracting
party. This composite responsibility applies to managers at all levels and needs to be
clarified in connection with collaboration and utilization.
Specification of the responsibility to develop the public authority’s role in integrating
the task of collaborating and promoting utilization into university activities
It should be clear that promoting utilization and collaboration as an integrated part

219

of operations is a part of the university’s responsibility as a public authority. Its managers have a responsibility to support the academic environments and the
researchers/teachers. There is no doubt that facilitation is the key issue here. One key
element is thus to participate in prioritizing which support measures will be implemented. Considerations may include to what degree various academic environments
will have access to analyses of knowledge assets, the position of the given academic
environment, relevant external circumstances and suchlike. In addition, there may
be a need to prioritize the allocation of capacity for conducting various utilization
projects. This prioritization should reasonably include a responsibility to secure
resources for the various activities. The EU’s recommendation states that universities
should “ensure that the public research organization has access to or possesses
professional knowledge transfer services including legal, financial, commercial as well
as intellectual property protection and enforcement advisors, in addition to staff with
technical background”.253
Another important responsibility is developing the authority’s procedures concerning
collaboration and utilization. Issues include properly managing public and confidential documents, preventing conflicts of interest from arising, registering and archiving
incoming documents and so on.254 In general, managers must have an overview of
the collaboration and utilization processes in order to understand when they need to
step in and make decisions. A key element in all this is the responsibility for risk
management. The more academic environments can clarify goals and objectives for
their collaborative activities, the greater the managers’ task is to ensure that these
goals are achieved. Managers should also ensure that collaboration and utilization
are managed as administrative tasks where necessary.
We found that the university’s responsibility as a public authority can be broken
down as follows:
● Clarifying the public authority’s responsibility for developing complete
academic environments
● Administering “collaborative cases” (samverkansärenden)
● Managing instances of disqualification, conflicts of interest and ethical
considerations
● Managing knowledge assets based on the university’s role as a public
authority and its ownership principles
Specification of universities’ responsibility to develop their role as an employer to
allow employees to promote utilization and collaborate
It should be obvious that it is part of the university’s responsibility as an employer to
enable researchers and teachers to pursue collaboration and utilization as part of
their employment. When employers specify their employees’ duties, these elements
253 Principle 10 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
254 Ibid., principle 2: A policy 'should provide clear rules for staff and students regarding in particular the disclosure
of new ideas with potential commercial interest, the ownership of research results, record keeping, the management of conflicts of interest and engagement with third parties'.

220

should be clarified. It should also be part of the employer’s responsibility to enable
staff to promote utilization in a private capacity – i.e. as secondary employment. The
task of promoting and regulating secondary employment should also be included in
the employer’s responsibility. For example, the employer should work to prevent significant conflicts of interest from arising in connection with its employees.255
Specification of the responsibility to develop the role of contracting party in external
collaborative relationships
The managers’ responsibility to act as a contracting party, when required, should be
clarified. As discussed earlier, it is increasingly important for universities to be able to
manage knowledge assets in collaborative relationships. It is important that managers
see this as their responsibility in cases of commissioned research and research collaboration, in particular. The 16th principle of the EU recommendation highlights the
responsibility to manage intellectual assets. “IP-related issues should be clarified at
management level and as early as possible in the research project, ideally before it
starts. IP-related issues include allocation of the ownership of intellectual property
which is generated in the framework of the project (hereinafter ‘foreground’), identification of the intellectual property which is possessed by the parties before starting
the project (hereinafter ‘background’) and which is necessary for project execution or
exploitation purposes, access rights to foreground and background for these purposes, and the sharing of revenues.”256
The recommendation is to make it clear that it is a manager’s responsibility, as a
contracting party in various collaborative processes, to safeguard the management of
background and foreground. Our conclusion is that managers must pursue what can
be described as procedures for contract management.
6.3.4 Responsibility for an internal innovation office
The innovation office has both a reactive and proactive responsibility in relation to
the academic environments to ensure that knowledge assets are utilized and managed
professionally in collaborations, which includes responsibility for developing a number of organizational functions for things like licensing and coordinating support
systems.
One of the programme’s most notable findings is that an actor is needed within the
university who works to promote the university’s assumption of public responsibility
and who promotes increased public benefit. The EU recommendation emphasizes the
importance of a “single responsible contact point”.257 The idea is that there should
be an actor specially tasked with managing intellectual assets and knowledge transfer.
255 Principle 2 (ibid.) discusses the responsibility for managing conflicts of interest.
256 Principle 16 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
257 Principle 1, ibid.

221

The Innovation Oﬃce has both a reactive
and proactive responsibility in relation to
the academic environments to ensure that
knowledge assets are utilized and managed
professionally in collaborations, which
includes responsibility for developing a
number of organizational functions for things
like licensing and coordinating support systems.
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility to promote
utilization in the university’s name
• Speciﬁcation of reactive and proactive
responsibilities in connection with academic
environments
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility to provide
a number of organizational functions
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility as a
coordinating actor to develop and provide
a number of support systems

Figure 48. Specification of responsibilities for
the innovation office

At Swedish universities, this actor could usefully be the innovation office (or in the
University of Gothenburg’s case, the Grants and Innovation Office).

Specification of the responsibility to promote utilization in the university’s name
It should be established that the innovation office’s work should target researchers in
their public capacity – i.e., its task is not to represent or assist researchers based on
their private interests (although this does not mean that their private interests should
be ignored). Rather, the innovation office’s job is to create a value proposition for
researchers and academic environments that allows them to assume public responsibility and create public benefit. One important task in this context is promoting the
integration of the commission to collaborate into academic activities.
Specification of reactive and proactive responsibilities in connection with academic
environments
We have concluded that the innovation office should play both reactive and proactive
roles in relation to researchers and academic environments. It should be possible for
all employees to approach the innovation office for a (reactive) response to their
needs. At the same time, the innovation office should assume a more proactive

222

responsibility in cases where it works systematically with specific academic environments. Here, certain norms are required for governing when and how proactive
responsibility should be initiated. Our conclusion is that several different types of
value propositions will be required to accommodate various academic environments.
In line with the discussion above about operational procedures, the innovation
office’s proactive proposition to the academic environments must be sufficiently comprehensive to facilitate all four strains of utilization logic. The EU recommendation
highlights the responsibility to: “Promote the identification, exploitation and, where
appropriate, protection of intellectual property, in line with the strategy and mission
of the public research organization and with a view to maximising socio-economic
benefits. To this end, different strategies may be adopted – possibly differentiated in
the respective scientific/technical areas –, for instance the “public domain” approach
or the “open innovation” approach.”258
The innovation office’s proactive responsibility entails participating actively in the
academic environment’s efforts to promote utilization. One particular challenge is
how the innovation office can stimulate researchers to pursue more social innovation
work based on their academic activities.
Specification of the responsibility to provide a number of organizational functions
This responsibility should include taking a leadership role and responsibility for collaborative and utilization projects under certain circumstances. One important conclusion we have drawn is that the innovation office should be responsible for providing the licensing function regularly found at European universities. The EU recommendation explains that European universities should: “Develop and publicise a
licensing policy, in order to harmonise practices within the public research organization and ensure fairness in all deals. In particular, transfers of ownership of intellectual property owned by the public research organization and the granting of exclusive
licences should be carefully assessed, especially with respect to non-European third
parties. Licences for exploitation purposes should involve adequate compensation,
financial or otherwise.”259
In our evaluation, we found that the innovation office should be tasked with developing a special organizational function to work with licensing in a way similar to other
European universities. It is particularly important to develop a function that analyses
knowledge assets and the positions of the academic environments. This IAM function
includes evaluating the conditions for and need to protect intellectual property rights.
The innovation office should assume responsibility for applying for intellectual property protection on behalf of the university and also for managing intellectual property
portfolios.260
258 Principle 3 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
259 Principle 11, ibid.
260 Cf. Principle 5 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

223

We have determined that an innovation office should organizationally develop:
● A function for IAM in academic environments (including registration
of IPR)
● A function for managing contracts (contract negotiation, design and
management)
● A function for licensing in the public domain (design of value propositions, negotiation, contract preparation, implementation, etc.)
● A function for project management at entrepreneurial schools and in connection with other educational programmes where utilization is promoted
It should be made clear that the innovation office has a special responsibility to support managers in their management of contracts. The responsibility to safeguard the
university’s interests in research collaboration projects is important in this context.
There is a need for a professional actor with the responsibility to protect the university’s interests and values in its relationships with various collaborators.261
Specification of the responsibility as a coordinating actor to develop and provide a
number of support systems
One key conclusion is that the innovation office should be assigned a special responsibility for developing the operational procedures described above. This means that
the office will have a conspicuous responsibility both to drive the various processes
and to develop the infrastructure for collaboration and utilization. This should also
give the innovation office an overall and direct coordinating responsibility in relation
to other supporting actors, such as communications officers, bibliometricians at
university libraries, entrepreneurial schools and suchlike.
In line with the above, the proactive measures should include the following:
● Identifying and analyzing intellectual assets
● Positioning academic environments
● Governance by objectives in academic environments and for decisions
about utilization
● Making knowledge assets available to the general public
● Specifying and managing the university’s own and others’ knowledge
assets as background and foreground in various commission-based and
collaborative relationships
● Project-oriented innovation activities in academic environments
● Licensing in the public interest
● Open research and innovation programmes
Combined, these measures will help develop a Swedish model for a knowledge transfer office.
261 The EU recommendation states that: 'The rules governing collaborative and contract research activities should
be compatible with the mission of each party. They should take into account the level of private funding and be in
accordance with the objectives of the research activities, in particular to maximise the commercial and socio-economic impact of the research, to support the public research organization's objective to attract private research
funding, to maintain an intellectual property position that allows further academic and collaborative research, and
avoid impeding the dissemination of the R&D results.' Principle 15, ibid.

224

6.3.5 Responsibilities of holding companies as incubators linked to universities
On the one hand, holding companies are responsible for creating the necessary
conditions for, and offering researchers/teachers the opportunity to, (privately)
commercialize knowledge assets in accordance with the university’s norms, and on
the other hand, for managing key intellectual assets on behalf of the university.
One of the programme’s findings is that greater clarity is needed regarding role
distribution and the allocation of responsibilities as regards supporting researchers in
public and private capacities, respectively. In relation to researchers, it is important to
be able to distinguish between situations in which the university enables its employees to uphold their responsibilities as public employees, and when it is a matter of
enabling employees to utilize results in a private capacity. Here, the basic premise is
that researchers own the rights to their research results.

•
The holding company is responsible for creating the
necessary conditions for, and oﬀering researchers/teachers
the opportunity to, (privately) commercialize knowledge
assets in accordance with the university’s norms, and on
the other hand, for managing key intellectual assets on
behalf of the university.
• Speciﬁcation of the responsibility to promote researchers’
interest in managing knowledge assets privately
• Speciﬁcation of responsibilities for balancing universities’
interests
• Speciﬁcation of holding companies’ duty to manage
knowledge assets

Figure 49. Specification of responsibilities for an external structure for commercialization
Specification of the responsibility to promote researchers’ interest in managing
knowledge assets privately
To ensure greater clarity, the role of holding companies should be narrowed to
managing the researchers’ interests in a private capacity, only. This will facilitate

225

operations and simplify the development of value propositions. It is also essential that
innovation offices develop the public aspect of the responsibility to promote utilization. At some Swedish universities, the holding company is responsible for developing
an innovation office. In such cases, it is worthwhile considering how to separate
responsibilities as relate to employees in their private capacities and in their role as
public employees. One important principle stated in the EU recommendation is that
universities should “develop and publicise a policy for the creation of spin-offs,
allowing and encouraging the public research organization’s staff to engage in the
creation of spin-offs where appropriate, and clarifying long-term relations between
spin-offs and the public research organization”.262
Against this background, holding companies should focus on developing their company-forming and incubator functions, as described in the EU recommendation. One
particular challenge faced is securing a sufficient capital base for investments in the
employees’ knowledge assets. We have concluded that, as concerns the University of
Gothenburg, the task is primarily to further develop the function that its holding
company has established for funding and incubating research-based companies.
Specification of responsibilities for balancing universities’ interests
Since holding companies are controlled to some degree by the universities, it is
important that they see it as their duty to ensure that researchers’ private interests do
not conflict with the university’s efforts to uphold its public responsibility. Individual
researchers are not forced to engage the university’s holding company, but if they
choose to do so, they must be able to trust that the holding company views it as its
task to maintain an overview of the risks involved. Through clarifying the role distribution between the internal innovation office and the more externally-oriented holding company, there is every reason to believe that the teamwork between the organizations can be strengthened.
Specification of holding companies’ duty to manage knowledge assets
One conclusion we have drawn is that universities are dependent on the development
of their holding companies as holding structures; that is, as holders of the university’s
patents and other intellectual assets, as well as the owner of certain types of operations in which the university’s activities touch on those of the community, such as
platforms for project management for entrepreneurial education programmes. This is
a separate task alongside their main duty to support researchers in their private
capacities.

262 Principle 12 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of
intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

226

6.3.6 Responsibility for an academic unit to provide training and enable
critical dialogue
An academic training unit, the “Innovation Academy”, has responsibility for
following the work at the university and ensuring that there are arenas for rolespecific training, as well as for critical dialogue about the university's work on
utilization and collaboration.
One particular responsibility that needs to be clarified concerns teaching, criticism
and monitoring. We found that universities should task an academic unit with acting
as an innovation academy.
Specification of the responsibility to create arenas for learning, dialogue
and criticism
Without a doubt, the collaboration and utilization field involves many challenges for
universities. In the course of our work, it became clear that there is a need for ongoing dialogue about, and the critical review of, actual collaborative work. If universities are to develop the ability to assume public responsibility, this must permeate
university culture. This requires a continuous academic discussion based on a number
of different perspectives. The EU recommendation expresses a desire to “raise awareness and basic skills regarding intellectual property and knowledge transfer through
training actions for students as well as research staff, and ensure that the staff
responsible for the management of IP/KT have the required skills and receive adequate training”.263
It became clear to us that the arenas for learning, dialogue and criticism should be
academically independent from the university administration and the academic management. We determined that an academic structure is needed that is responsible for
providing these arenas. This structure should be founded on a scientific approach. All
universities have various academic actors and structures that could be assigned this
task. Our conclusion was that it is natural for the innovation office to participate
actively in order to clarify the obvious challenges that need to be managed.
Additionally, it is important that the platform harmonizes with both management’s
and the administration’s development ambitions. We have chosen to call this learning
and education platform the Innovation Academy.
Specification of the responsibility to initiate, secure and provide roel-specific training
and further training
Another of our conclusions is that a crucial part of developing organizational capabilities requires expanded professional skills among those working at the university.
As discussed earlier, researchers and teachers bear the primary responsibility for promoting utilization. It is they who become academic managers. It is far from certain
263 Principle 6 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of
intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

227

that these individuals have the experience and skills needed to know how best to promote utilization within the framework of a public authority. As such, we concluded
that a training programme should be developed that includes doctoral courses, postgraduate courses, courses for innovation advisors and other administrative personnel,
managerial courses and more. The aim is to provide the training needed by a variety
of actors at the university, in part as an obligatory element of their continued professional development.
Specification of the responsibility to monitor, oversee and communicate collaboration
and utilization work
It also became clear to us that there is a need to monitor and keep track of utilization
and collaboration work carried out both within and in connection with the university. It is reasonable that the same independent actor be assigned this responsibility, i.e.
the Innovation Academy.
Additional responsibilities include mapping activities for managing knowledge assets.
One special responsibility might also be to evaluate the consequences or impact of
work being carried out at the university. One possible responsibility might be communicating with external actors in various respects.
The 14th principle of the EU recommendation highlights the responsibility to “monitor intellectual property protection and knowledge transfer activities and related
achievements, and publicise these regularly. The research results of the public
research organization, any related expertise and intellectual property rights should be
made more visible to the private sector, in order to promote their exploitation”.264

6.4 Principles governing universities’ ownership responsibilities
How should universities manage knowledge assets and other intellectual assets?
Working with the operational procedures emphasizes the importance of developing
norms for how universities should manage the idea that their staff hold personal
rights to their own research results. This does not necessarily mean that universities
should not lay claim to the right to utilize the results in their public capacity, however.265 In fact, our work has shown that it is largely in staff’s best interests for universities to assume greater responsibility. It is not reasonable that full responsibility
should rest with the staff. In some cases, it is reasonable that the university should
have the ability to take over responsibility from its employees. To implement norms
for assuming organizational responsibility, universities need to develop their ownership responsibilities, though this does not necessarily mean acquiring the rights to the
results.
264 Principle 14 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
265 See Chapter 2.

228

TEN PRINCIPLES FOR MANAGING KNOWLEDGE ASSETS

1. Utilization of knowledge assets should be based on academic values and a striving
to uphold public responsibility.
2. The basic assumption is that the researcher(s) and teachers(s) who created a
knowledge asset hold the rights to it, which is why they also have the primary
responsibility for promoting its utilization.
3. Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure – that is, items that are used
continuously in an academic environment – must be available to the university.
4. Knowledge assets required for conducting further research or other academic
activities must be available to the university.
5. Knowledge assets must be available and managed as background and foreground
in contracts concerning research collaboration and other types of collaboration.
6. Knowledge assets must be made available to the general public within a reasonable
time frame and to the greatest extent possible. To the extent that patents and
other legal protections are important in ensuring utilization, knowledge assets
may be kept secret.
7. If researchers/teachers agree to promote the utilization of knowledge assets by
developing an innovation project within the framework of activities conducted in
the academic environment, the university will assume the rights to the knowledge
assets to the extent necessary and reasonable for the project’s implementation.
8. Universities are to provide the opportunity for researchers and academic
environments to promote utilization through licensing in the university’s name.
9. The university must support researchers’ utilization of knowledge assets in a
private capacity.
10. Circumstances must allow researchers and the university to prevent knowledge
assets from being utilized in an ethically indefensible way.

Figure 50. Norms for managing research results

6.4.1 Ten principles for governing how universities should manage research results as
knowledge assets
As a result of the relatively extensive learning processes involved in the KMP programme, we came to realize the importance of identifying and establishing norms and
principles concerning universities’ “ownership responsibility”. These norms and principles are vital to clarifying universities’ strategic ambition to assume responsibility.
As we see it, these are crucial to universities’ ability to function as actors in the
European arena (for example) and to implement key aspects of the EU recommendation.
The principles are designed to address the current situation, in which, as a rule,
researchers hold the rights to their knowledge assets in a private capacity. These are
not principles for governing when universities should take over the rights to
researchers’ knowledge assets, however. Rather, they are principles for guiding how
universities can promote utilization and manage collaboration and utilization
processes as an integrated part of their operations, without needing to assume the
rights to the results. If universities do take over the rights to results, this should occur
at the initiative of the staff and academic environments.

229

These principles are intended for use in all contexts involving idea- and knowledgebased collaboration, thereby contributing to the operational development discussed in
Part 3 of this book. The idea is that the principles and the reasoning behind them
should be applied by the university management when formulating a university-wide
policy.
6.4.2 Utilization of knowledge assets in the public interest
Utilization of knowledge assets should be based on academic values and a striving to
uphold public responsibility.
One initial principle is that universities as organizations and their staff should strive
to uphold public responsibility in their utilization of research results. Universities
should promote the practical application of research results and their joint management in collaboration with the community. It is essential to clarify that striving to
uphold public responsibility should be the defining characteristic of universities’ utilization. Thus, the focus should never be on considerations such as the university’s
need for financial resources.266 Nor should it be on individual researchers’ desire to
acquire further credentials or financial gain.
We have concluded that the public-responsibility norm prevents universities from
waiving their responsibilities by referring to the professor’s privilege (teacher’s exemption). For university staff, this entails an additional responsibility to ensure that their
actions are consistent with the requirement to uphold public responsibility.
Utilization in a private capacity must therefore also aim to honour the obligation to
uphold public responsibility. Many times this is obvious. For example, building up a
research-based company is usually an extensive project that requires a large degree of
social involvement. However, this norm requires the university to assess which strain
of utilization logic has the best prospects for creating public benefit.
6.4.3 The researcher has the right and responsibility to utilize their knowledge assets
The basic assumption is that the researcher(s) and teachers(s) who created a knowledge asset hold the rights to it, which is why they also have the primary responsibility
for promoting its utilization.
A second principle is that the individual researcher/teacher is considered to hold the
rights to the knowledge assets they have created. Researchers must have the opportunity to utilize their knowledge assets in a private capacity. At the same time, the
researchers’ primary responsibility for integrating knowledge asset management into
the universities’ research and educational activities exists as part of their employment
at the university. All academic activities should be based on what can be described as
266 The EU recommendation prescribes: 'While proactive IP/KT policy may generate additional revenues for the
public research organization, this should not be considered the prime objective.' Principle 9 in Annex I to the Code
of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.

230

academic values. Thus, it is reasonable that the primary public responsibility be
borne by the researchers.
Holding private rights to knowledge assets while at the same time bearing public
responsibility for integrating collaboration and utilization activities constitutes a very
demanding situation for researchers and teachers. It is far from easy to uphold one’s
professional responsibility for promoting the public good, while at the same time
looking out for one’s own legitimate commercial interests. This places a burden on
university management and administration, not least of all to ensure that
researchers/teachers are not constantly faced with disqualification scenarios and conflicts of interest. Determining which activities are academic and which constitute secondary employment is increasingly difficult the more integrated the commission to
collaborate becomes.
6.4.4 Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure
Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure – that is, items that are used continuously in an academic environment – must be available to the university.
A third principle is that if knowledge assets are of an infrastructural nature, the
university and its staff should be allowed to utilize them. This is especially pertinent
if the knowledge assets were created through the use of public funding. For example,
if researchers and teachers have developed databases, research tools and decisionmaking support systems of such a nature that they must reasonably be viewed as
infrastructure, it should be clear that the academic environment is able to utilize these
assets in the long term. Simply put, they form an infrastructure for research, education or collaboration activities. This principle is considered so obvious that it is not
even mentioned in the international dialogue, but is first raised when interpreting the
professor’s privilege at Swedish universities. Even from a Swedish perspective, there is
reason to consider if it would constitute a breach of the Government Agencies
Ordinance if universities failed to take active responsibility in this regard.
6.4.5 Knowledge assets for continued research
Knowledge assets required for conducting further research or other academic activities must be available to the university.
A fourth principle is that universities’ and their researchers’ and teachers’ ownership
of knowledge assets must not limit the opportunity to carry out further research.
When researchers and teachers have private control over their knowledge assets, it is
important that they do not legally forfeit their opportunity to carry out further
research and other academic activities. Universities and their representatives should
work to ensure that such contractual transactions do not occur, especially in their
own commercial activities within the holding company.
In connection with commissioned and collaborative research, it is equally important
that universities do not transfer knowledge assets to their partners in such a way as

231

impedes further research. From the university’s perspective, the issue mainly concerns
the ability to balance different interests. When determining who should own the
rights to research results in commissioned and collaborative processes, the EU recommendation encourages that decisions should “take into account the level of private
funding and be in accordance with the objectives of the research activities, in particular to maximise the commercial and socio-economic impact of the research, to support the public research organization’s objective to attract private research funding,
to maintain an intellectual property position that allows further academic and collaborative research, and avoid impeding the dissemination of the R&D results.”267
Thus, it is crucial that they, as a rule, reserve the right to carry out further research.
6.4.6 Background knowledge in collaborations
Knowledge assets must be available and managed as background and foreground in
contracts concerning research collaboration and other types of collaboration.
A fifth principle is that knowledge assets created by a university’s researchers should
be available for use as background knowledge in research collaborations and other
types of collaboration. Individual researchers should not have such control over their
knowledge assets that it limits the university’s ability to initiate research collaborations or other academic collaborations. This is especially true when research is carried out using EU framework funding or other public funding. Universities should
assume active responsibility for developing procedures for managing background
knowledge.
Universities are expected to be able to manage their own research results as background and foreground. The EU recommendation establishes several principles for
managing knowledge assets. “In a collaborative research project, ownership of the
foreground should stay with the party that has generated it, but can be allocated to
the different parties on the basis of a contractual agreement concluded in advance,
adequately reflecting the parties’ respective interests, tasks and financial or other contributions to the project. In the case of contract research the foreground generated by
the public research organization is owned by the private-sector party. The ownership
of background should not be affected by the project.”268 Another principle describes
that access rights to knowledge assets should be clarified as early as possible in collaboration processes. “[F]oreground and background should be available, under conditions which should adequately reflect the parties’ respective interests, tasks, and
financial and other contributions to the project”.269 It is unavoidable that, in some
situations, it is easier for everyone involved if the university assumes the rights to the
knowledge assets. However, no matter who holds the rights, it is vital for universities
to be able to manage contracts for all the collaboration and utilization projects in
which they control knowledge assets.
267 Principle 15 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
268 Principle 17, ibid.
269 Principle 18, ibid.

232

6.4.7 The availability and confidentiality of knowledge assets
Knowledge assets must be made available to the general public within a reasonable
time frame and to the greatest extent possible. To the extent that patents and other
legal protections are important in ensuring utilization, knowledge assets may be kept
secret.
A sixth principle is that knowledge assets that are publicly financed should be available to the public, as a general rule. The EU recommendation states that universities
should: “Develop and publicise a publication/dissemination policy promoting the
broad dissemination of research and development results (e.g., through open-access
publication), while accepting possible delay where the protection of intellectual property is envisaged, although this should be kept to a minimum.”270 Thus, research
results should be published as quickly as possible. The only defensible reason for
delaying publication stems from measures necessary for facilitating utilization
processes. For example, it should be possible to keep innovations secret for a reasonable time to allow patent applications to be submitted. Granted, submitting a patent
application does not make knowledge assets available to the public, even when they
are later published. Universities have a special responsibility to ensure that individual
teachers and researchers are capable of balancing the public’s interest in making
knowledge assets publicly available, and their legitimate private interests in treating
these assets as exclusive for commercialization purposes.
6.4.8 Innovation projects within the framework of university activities
If researchers/teachers agree to promote the utilization of knowledge assets by developing an innovation project within the framework of activities conducted in the academic environment, the university will assume the rights to the knowledge assets to
the extent necessary and reasonable for the project’s implementation.
A seventh principle is that universities should be willing to assume responsibility for
the right to knowledge assets if the researchers request this and if it is necessary for
the project’s implementation. Where researchers agree to promote utilization by
developing innovation projects as part of publicly-funded operations, it is reasonable
for the university to assume the rights. The researchers can thus carry out the project
under public management and avoid being involved in a private capacity. In such
cases, it should be natural to allocate more public funds to the project, as conflicts of
interest are drastically minimized. Difficulties associated with tax issues, government
funding and so on become significantly more manageable. It becomes much easier for
the innovation office to assume responsibility for supporting the academic environment. See the next section for a discussion of incentives.

270 Principle 7 in Annex I - Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

233

6.4.9 Licensing in the public interest
Universities are to provide the opportunity for researchers and academic environments to promote utilization through licensing in the university’s name.
An eighth principle is that universities should develop their abilities to pursue licensing. In the international arena, universities are increasingly expected to offer control
of knowledge assets to allow these to be utilized. Licensing as a model for utilization
has been developed at international universities for decades. Universities’ ability to
license is a key element in the EU’s recommendation.271 Especially in certain scientific
fields, such as medicine, biotech, computing and information technology, there is a
long tradition of knowledge transfer through licensing. There is every reason to
believe that this type of utilization will become increasingly important for universities. At the same time, this activity requires professional management and risk assessment. It is reasonable that universities should have the ability to carry out licensing as
an advanced aspect of their public responsibility. Consequently, the primary purpose
of licensing should not be to make as much money as possible. Instead, this option
should be used when it has the best chance of creating public benefit.
We have concluded that the principle should be that universities should formulate a
general value proposition to researchers and academic environments to assume the
rights to knowledge assets for licensing purposes. This value proposition should
include managing assessments of other strains of utilization logic and ensuring the
development of the authority’s procedures. Licensing should thus be integrated into
the university’s operations and also into the planning done in the academic environments. The basic assumption is that researchers and academic environments are free
to engage other actors and to license assets independently in a private capacity. If
they chose to accept the university’s value proposition, they transfer the rights to the
knowledge assets. It should be possible for researchers to raise ethical objections in
this context, as defined in the principle below.
6.4.10 Stimulating private utilization
The university must support researchers’ utilization of knowledge assets in a private
capacity.
A ninth principle is that universities should work to enable researchers to pursue the
utilization of research results as secondary employment. Our investigations have
shown that this can be a demanding process. It is easy to wind up in disqualification
scenarios and conflicts of interest. In addition, it is difficult to facilitate various
research collaboration and utilization processes in the public name in parallel with
private utilization. To make this possible, it is crucial that university managers, in
particular, assume an active responsibility. It is important to be able to balance
researchers’ private interests against the public interest. Even if many researchers
271 Principle 11 in Annex I - Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

234

have good opportunities to promote the public interest, it is important that they feel
they have the support of the university’s management and administration. An important principle stated in the EU recommendation is that universities should develop a
system that “allow[s] and encourage[s] the public research organization’s staff to
engage in the creation of spin-offs where appropriate, and [that] clarif[ies] long-term
relations between spin-offs and the public research organization”.272
One important aspect in enabling researchers to utilize research results in a private
capacity is that universities have funds for stimulating business development. The fact
that this development is commissioned by the university means that it should be
ensured that the private enterprise does not conflict with the university’s or the public’s interests. Holding companies and similar actors have no interest in private profit,
but can work to create public value.
6.4.11 Unethical use of knowledge assets
Circumstances must allow researchers and universities to prevent knowledge assets
from being utilized in an ethically indefensible way.
A tenth principle is that knowledge assets developed at universities by university
employees must be used in an ethical way based on academic values. This is particularly important in connection with knowledge assets that were funded by public
means, but should reasonably apply to all knowledge assets that the university’s
researchers and other employees control. Researchers and universities alike should be
able to intervene if knowledge assets are managed in such a way that ethics are clearly disregarded. It is reasonable that this should apply first when specific actions show
clear deficiencies from an ethical standpoint.
When universities acquire the rights from researchers in order to license knowledge
assets, there should be a means for the researchers to intervene if they feel that the
university’s actions are clearly unethical. Similarly, it should be possible for a university to intervene against employees if they are in control of their assets and are using
them in a way that the university finds to be clearly unethical. In practice, this means
that when universities enter into external agreements concerning utilization, they
should reserve the right to reclaim knowledge assets if they are used, or are perceived
to be used, in a clearly unethical way. From an international perspective, it is common that universities themselves retain the rights to research results and offer licensing agreements that can be terminated on ethical grounds.

6.5 Principles governing incentives for researchers and teachers
What kind of incentives should be offered to researchers and teachers to promote
utilization?
272 Principle 12 in Annex I - Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

235

According to the EU recommendation, incentives should exist for staff to get involved
in managing their ideas. The recommendation also clarifies that incentives do not
solely need to be monetary, but can also involve augmenting a person’s credentials.
The norm established is that universities should: “Provide appropriate incentives to
ensure that all relevant staff play an active role in the implementation of the IP policy. Such incentives should not only be of a financial nature but should also promote
career progression, by considering intellectual property and knowledge transfer
aspects in appraisal procedures, in addition to academic criteria”.273

PRINCIPLES GOVERNING RESEARCHERS’ INCENTIVES
1. It should be possible for researchers and academic environments to acquire
resources, support and time among their duties to promote in various ways the
use of their knowledge assets in the university’s name.
2. When recruiting and promoting researchers and teachers, emphasis should be
placed on their ability to make research results available to the public, to make
research results applicable for users, to manage and conduct innovation projects,
to develop open knowledge platforms and to promote utilization in other ways.
3. Researchers and academic environments that assume special responsibility for
developing knowledge assets for innovation projects run in the name of the
university should be eligible to receive special resources, support and time to do
so within the framework of their duties.
4. If the university assumes the right to a researcher’s knowledge assets to license
them and otherwise utilize them, the researcher has the right to a portion of
the income generated.
5. At the basic level, researchers and teachers have the right to the income generated
when they work to promote the utilization of their knowledge assets in a private
capacity.

Figure 51. Norms for incentives in academic environments

6.5.1 Incentives for developing universities’ assumption of responsibility
The KMP programme has focused on and off on the question of incentives. Our perception is that norms concerning incentives are an important factor in enabling the
development of the operational procedures described above. At the same time, it has
not been completely clear how best to tackle this issue from a normative perspective.
As regards monetary incentives, the situation in Sweden is, once again, completely
different from that of other European universities. In Sweden, the basic assumption is
that researchers have control of their own opportunities for financial returns in connection with their research results. If the university takes over the rights to research
results, this situation changes. The more universities work to utilize knowledge assets,
the more relevant the question of financial incentive becomes. This becomes particularly clear if and when universities act as licensers. Since this is not yet the case, the
question of incentives has not been fully explored here.
273 Principle 4 in Annex I - Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organizations.

236

In the evaluations carried out by academic environments, neither has it been obvious
that financial incentives, or for that matter, the opportunity to obtain greater academic credentials, are necessarily what motivates, or will motivate, researchers to promote utilization. Many seem to consider it important to uphold public responsibility
for its own sake. Many mention the importance of their research contributing to
social development in one way or another as a motivating factor. This does not mean
that financial and credential-based incentives are unimportant; however, our conclusion is that the opportunity to promote public benefit is the greatest incentive. In
addition, we found that opportunities to obtain resources and funding are also
important incentives in this context.
Based on the study we conducted of international circumstances and the dialogue
held at that time, we arrived at five principles for developing researchers’ incentives:
● Supplying public resources to promote the utilization of knowledge assets
in academic environments
● Assigning academic credentials for promoting utilization
● Providing special resources for academic environments that assume
responsibility for developing knowledge assets for innovation projects run
in the name of the university
● Granting rights to a share in royalties and similar incentives when the
university assumes the rights to knowledge assets
● Granting rights to income derived from the utilization of knowledge
assets in a private capacity
6.5.2 Supplying public resources to promote the utilization of knowledge assets in
academic environments
It should be possible for researchers and academic environments to acquire resources,
support and time among their duties to promote in various ways the use of their
knowledge assets in the university’s name.
One initial principle is that it should be possible for researchers and academic environments to promote the utilization of knowledge assets as part of their duties as
public employees. There should be special funds earmarked for this purpose for all
academic environments. Just how more resources are provided to an academic environment ought to be able to be adjusted to suit various faculties and departments.
Both public faculty funding and other resources should be used. What is important
here is that resources are actually used and serve as incentives. There is good reason
to set aside resources for specific utilization activities with clearly specified expectations. Giving every researcher some freedom within their employment to promote
utilization is not always the best way to create incentive. It is reasonable that
researchers who truly desire to create public benefit and make their research results
available to the general public should be those who are given access to the resources.
6.5.3 Assigning academic credentials for promoting utilization
When recruiting and promoting researchers and teachers, emphasis should be placed
on their ability to make research results available to the public, to make research

237

results applicable for specific stakeholders, to manage and conduct innovation projects, to develop open knowledge platforms and to promote utilization in other ways.
A second principle is that researchers should earn academic credentials for promoting
utilization. In practice, this means that when hiring and promoting staff, importance
should be assigned to researchers’ efforts to promote utilization. This already occurs
to some extent, but should be clarified more explicitly. Incentive can be boosted by
detailing in calls for funding what will be emphasized, for example based on the
different strains of utilization logic for knowledge assets. Swedish universities have a
relatively large measure of freedom to implement this type of measure. At the same
time, we must remember that these calls involve academics evaluating the credentials
of other academics, and that it is natural to focus on what is considered to be meritorious from a more strictly scientific perspective.

6.5.4 Providing special resources for innovation projects under public management
Researchers and academic environments that assume special responsibility for developing knowledge assets for innovation projects run in the name of the university
should be eligible to receive special resources, support and time to do so within the
framework of their duties.
A third principle is that there should be special resources available for academic environments that assume responsibility for developing and running various types of
innovation project as part of the university’s operations. Such projects can essentially
be carried out as part of all university activities. We found that a more long-term
assumption of responsibility by the university is often required if this is to serve as a
true incentive. Temporary resources tend to result in frustration and uncertainty.
Even if no long-term resources are available, a long-term commitment from academic
managers to acquire funding, for example by playing an active part in application
processes, can be an important factor in this context.
It is also entirely possible that an innovation project will generate revenue for the
university, even if this is not the intention. Such resources should be available for use
by the academic environment, for example to pay salaries for projects that further
develop the innovation project. In some cases, the project may develop into a licensing project and thus be covered by the fourth principle below.

6.5.5 Share of royalties from university licensing and similar
If the university assumes the right to a researcher’s knowledge assets to license them
and otherwise utilize them, the researcher has the right to a portion of the income
generated.
A fourth principle is that if the university assumes the right to knowledge assets to
license and otherwise utilize them in the university’s name, the researcher has a right
to a share of the royalty or proceeds earned. We took our lead from the international

238

trends and believe that there should be a dispersion between the university, the
academic environment and the individual researchers.
The EU recommendation establishes the principle that there should be “clear principles regarding the sharing of financial returns from knowledge transfer revenues
between the public research organization, the department and the inventors.”274 One
guideline in this context might be to divide such into three equal parts.
6.5.6 Private income through secondary employment
At the basic level, researchers and teachers have the right to the income generated
when they work to promote the utilization of their knowledge assets in a private
capacity.
A fifth principle is that researchers and teachers should be able to make money from
promoting utilization through secondary employment. This might involve creating
various consulting services based on knowledge assets, for example. Another possibility is for employees to start up their own companies, which, as a rule, requires large
investments, but which can also generate substantial profits. A third example is publishing textbooks and the royalties that this generates.
One necessary condition is that such business be conducted outside of their employment at the university. If the university has set aside special resources for writing textbooks, developing software or databases and the like, it is not completely clear that
researchers have the right to license, sell, or provide knowledge assets via consulting
services in the form of secondary employment and to retain all the income. However,
it is important to remember that this situation has existed for a long time. We have
simply defined some other paths for promoting utilization.

6.6 Conclusions
One of the KMP programme’s key findings is that norm development is one of the
very most important processes within academic management and leadership at universities. Our conclusion is that leadership ability concerning norm development,
along with governance by objectives and risk assessment, are all crucial to enabling
academic environments to integrate the task of collaborating and promoting the
utilization of knowledge assets. We believe that focusing on these three processes will
enhance leadership, particularly at the university management level. Doing so will
make clear what needs to be managed in the university’s role as a public authority,
employer and contracting party in collaborative relationships.

274 Principle 13 in Annex I to the Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.

239

A model for the institutional development of universities’ organizational capabilities
for collaborating and promoting utilization
Perhaps our most important task has been to evaluate how to facilitate an institutional development of the ability to promote utilization. There is no denying that this is
a relatively complex situation characterized by incoherent control at the national
government level and a constant flow of new initiatives and projects. Our evaluation
pointed out that the university management has a crucial role to play in facilitating
institutional development. At the same time, we are aware that there is a need to
reduce the complexity of the current situation. As a result, our aim has been to
develop a model for norm development and institutional development.
In its simplest form, the model concerns laying a foundation for one or more policies,
and a number of instructions. In principle, we believe that by building on the norms
discussed regarding roles and responsibilities and managing knowledge assets and
incentives, it is possible to develop a policy that paves the way for a development in
which the commission to collaborate and utilize is integrated into the university’s
primary tasks. In addition, this will also entail implementing the EU recommendation
on knowledge transfer and the management of intellectual assets. We have identified
what we consider to be three types of “core norms”:
● Norms regarding roles and responsibilities
● Norms for managing research results as “transaction objects”
● Norms regarding incentives
Our conclusion is that implementing these core norms is vital to facilitating the integration of the commission to collaborate. However, norms decided on paper have
little effect if they are not applied in practice; they must be both communicated and
viewed as common ideas to be upheld. Our model deals with managing institutional
development processes. In its more complex context, the model concerns how to
pursue a number of “key processes” for achieving institutional development. We have
identified the following processes:
● Risk assessment and the evaluation of existing operational procedures
● Formulating policies and instructions
● Implementing and developing organizational functions and support
systems
● Developing contractual norm structures
We have concluded that an academic leadership is needed that is capable of driving
these processes in order to develop the operational procedures needed to allow academic environments to promote utilization and collaboration.
Risk assessment and the evaluation of existing operational procedures
Our conclusion is that the norm-development process, just like the process for governance by objectives, should be based on the risk assessment process. Going through
the steps of a risk assessment generates an overview of the need for norm development. Our own risk assessment was invaluable to the KMP programme. We feel that
academic managers should conduct risk assessments as a natural, continuous process.

240

In addition, we have concluded that a special evaluation of influences on the development of the operational procedures described above is required.
Formulating policies and instructions
We view policy as a key instrument in establishing a number of core norms. As the
EU recommendation suggests, it may be useful to establish several policies. In addition, we found that there is also a need for a number of instructions. Based on the
comprehensive specification of roles and responsibilities, which we feel should be
part of the policy itself, more detailed instructions can be developed, namely:
● Instructions for researchers and academic environments
● Instructions for managers
● Instructions for the innovation office
One recurring finding is that we are in the midst of a learning process. This is also
true with regard to how a policy should be established. It is a matter of continuously
monitoring directives from the national government and their concrete influence.
Policy development should follow on the heels of a collegial process and critical dialogue. In all likelihood, we are dealing with a process in which the policy will need to
be regularly reviewed. This is definitely the case with the instructions. Our conclusion
is that establishing a policy and instructions are processes that should reasonably be
initiated and managed by the university management and academic managers, while
at the same time being characterized by significant openness and genuine participation. There is also reason to review other control instruments at the university management level from time to time. The delegation schedule is one example. Specifying
responsibilities and role allocation may very well result in some actors requiring
increased authority to represent the university.
Implementing and developing organizational functions and support systems
Again, norms have no effect if they are not communicated and implemented by the
people they concern. Our aim is that the norms should result in the creation of a
number of operational procedures. Our conclusion is that a number of support systems will be required in which the norms are implemented and further developed. We
view these support systems as critical processes for creating the operational procedures.
The university management must be involved if the innovation office is to be able to
coordinate multiple support systems. As described above, a number of different
actors will be involved. Developing effective support systems will be a long-term
process characterized by trial and error.
Developing contractual norm structures
A fourth process concerns developing and implementing norms in contractual contexts. For example, universities’ relationships with their holding companies are regulated via contracts. Universities can also enter into contracts with their holding com-

241

panies concerning assignments to be carried out on their behalf. It may be beneficial
to establish an overall framework agreement in which the university specifies the
expectations it has of its holding company.
Presumably, it will become significantly more common in the future to enter into
agreements with staff regarding the rights to intellectual assets. In this context, it may
be useful to prepare various contract templates for typical situations. Contract templates give staff a clearer idea of whether or not, and to what degree, entering into a
contract is worthwhile.
There is also a need in relation to external partners to clearly delineate how the university wants to develop its collaborative structures, particularly as regards managing
knowledge assets. For example, the university wishes to ensure its ability to continue
its research and that the results will not be used in an unethical way. In the same
way, it may be useful to have contract templates that can be communicated externally.
The university management needs to be involved and to promote these normative
processes in a systematic, long-term manner. Obviously, contracts are the result of
dialogue and perhaps also of negotiation. It is also important to maintain communication with the actors involved when preparing such templates. In the case of templates for staff contracts, it is important that union organizations are involved.

242

7. The Innovation Academy
7.1 Academic training structure for learning, dialogue and critique
Evaluation of what kinds of training, learning, and dialogue are needed to enable
academic environments to collaborate and promote utilization and how these should
be organized.
One conclusion of the KMP programme has been that there should be an academic
unit within Swedish universities that has the mandate to provide training courses,
seminars and related assignments for collaboration and the promotion of utilization.
We propose that the university instructs an academic actor to take on the responsibility for an “innovation academy”. Its mandate should include monitoring and, if necessary, assessing the collaboration and utilization-related activities conducted at and
in association with the university.
Evaluation of the need of learning for utilization, training and critique
One main feature of the KMP programme has been the evaluation of training needs,
the demand for support and presentation of specific proposals and relevant initiatives

An academic training unit (Innovation Academy)
is responsible for following the work at the
university and ensuring that there are arenas for
role-speciﬁc training, as well as for critical dialogue about
the university’s work on utilization and collaboration.
• Responsibility for the creation of arenas for learning,
dialogue and critique.
• Responsibility for initiating, securing and providing
role-speciﬁc training and further training.
• Responsibility for monitoring, overseeing and
communicating collaboration and utilization work.

Figure 52. Clarification of the responsibilities of an academic training structure

243

in the context. We therefore evaluated and discussed the design of various training
initiatives and how they can be integrated into e.g. management training, researcher
education, research management training and training of innovation advisers.275 In
this, the connection to the organizational system forms an important element. A general question that arose was how a strengthened collegial dialogue among researchers
and teachers can be initiated and kept alive. This is particularly true for academics
who are involved, both in terms of research and practically, in collaborative and utilization efforts. A great deal of experimentation has also been conducted during the
course of the programme. Seminars and critical dialogues have been held. A number
of management courses, training for innovation advisors and so on have also taken
place.276
Within the KMP programme, we concluded that there are strong reasons to invest in
a dedicated academic structure for relevant academic programmes. A “training unit”
is needed that is, in principle, academically independently of the administration.
It should use a scientific approach and values, and complement the university's
existing programmes and institutional arrangements. At the same time, it was clear
that there should be, for obvious reasons, close collaboration, especially with the
Innovation Office. The training in question should be based on the tools and models
used in the actual collaboration and utilization work. Those who provide the training, for example, must have the ability to learn about and have the specific knowledge to carry out the analytical work and practical handling that is required. This
work also requires active acquisition of knowledge from the international arena as
well as from Sweden's public and private sectors.
Naturally, the training should be designed in accordance with the university's vision
and strategies, as well as the management and administration's development aspirations. Integrating the training into the already existing system of professional development within the university provides a stronger training portfolio for the
university.277 This applies in particular to training required for developing professional skills, for example, for managers and innovation advisers. Clarification of
what training should be university-wide and what should be the responsibility of a
faculty is a natural process. One challenge is therefore to balance the different knowledge interests and needs, as well as to handle the demand sensitively. At the same
time, the training should not be restricted to any single discipline. Training efforts
must be made available to all of the faculties, as well as to the administration. The
programmes should encourage collaboration between different disciplines and support a multidisciplinary approach.

275 Discussions have been conducted within the KMP programme with stakeholders within and outside the
University of Gothenburg. These have taken place at several levels at the University of Gothenburg, with the vicerectors, deans, education coordinators, head of the section for management and skills development, head of the
unit for Pedagogical Development and Interactive Learning, staff at the Research and Innovation Office, GU Holding
AB, several heads of department, heads of research and researchers, and participants of completed training courses.
276 Some of these training programmes will be touched on throughout this chapter.
277 For example, such an arrangement facilitates skills development for university employees.

244

An academic training unit for utilization and collaboration
An academic training unit, the “Innovation Academy”, has responsibility for following the work at the university and ensuring that there are arenas for role-specific
training, as well as for critical dialogue about the university's work on utilization and
collaboration.
One conclusion of the KMP programme is that university management should formulate an overarching mission statement to realize our proposal:
● Responsibility for the creation of arenas for learning, dialogue and
critique
● Responsibility for initiating, securing and providing role-specific training
and further training
● Responsibility for monitoring, overseeing and communicating
collaboration and utilization work
The KMP programme has focused on evaluating what the above-mentioned responsibilities reasonably should consist of to facilitate achieving the proposal.

7.2 Skills development and critical dialogue
An “innovation academy” will provide venues for learning, dialogue and criticism.
7.2.1 Specification of the responsibility for the creation of arenas for learning,
dialogue and critique
It became clear within the KMP programme that methods and venues are necessary
for ongoing dialogue and critical examination of the specific collaboration work.
Having evaluated this requirement, five forms of learning, dialogue and criticism
have been identified. Consequently, these are what an innovation academy should
primarily be tasked to develop:
● Series of seminars
● Workshops
● Training programmes
● Courses
● External theme days
Each form has its own logic, with respect to how issues of collaboration and utilization are treated. They require their respective versions of educational theory and
scope, as well documentation. The idea is to allow critique and dialogue on the one
hand and, on the other hand, offer courses as an integral part of the university's support systems. This requires an innovation academy with the ability to balance different interests. The university should make it clear that that the task of the training
platform is to enable a critical questioning of the way that collaboration work is conducted. It should also be made clear that the Innovation Academy has a complementary role, mainly to the Innovation Office and parts of the administration when it

245

comes to developing the support system for the academic environments. The task of
the Innovation Academy is to ensure that all activities are based on scientific
grounds.
7.2.2 Seminar for dialogue and critique
The ambition of a seminar series is to create an arena for dialogue and critique. The
seminar series should focus on the university's responsibility for collaboration and
utilization. The main aim should be to create a space for academic reflection and
discussion. Each seminar should aim at an increased understanding and insight into
the field of collaboration and utilization of the existing practice. The seminar should
touch on principle and overarching issues for the university's development in terms of
collaboration and utilization. This provides the prerequisites for challenging and critique, as well as for continuous innovation and exchange of experience. The experience of KMP programme is that it is good to start with descriptions about the activities at one's own or other universities. Various questions of principle can be raised,
grounded on an actual “case study”. This could include:
● What does that mean for the researcher’s responsibility and obligations
that the researcher is considered to have the rights the research results in
his or her private capacity?
● How can and should academic environments develop their responsibility
towards society?
● How far can and should the university go with its responsibility towards
society?
● How do ethical and moral approaches, respectively, stimulate as well as
limit the university’s collaboration and utilization?
● How can managers allow academic environments to take responsibility
for collaboration and utilization?
The seminars can be completely internal or mixed with both internal and external
participants, and may, if appropriate, involve co-organizers. During the course of the
KMP programme, IIS (the Institute for Innovation and Social Change) organized and
coordinated a series of seminars on academic utilization, based on scientific
grounds.278 A number of seminars in the series were held in which various academic
environments presented their work with learning about collaboration and utilization.
Several international players were also invited to present their experiences. Followup discussions took place at each seminar, usually in the form of round table discussions.279 These were to ensure that the outcome of the seminar, such as continued
research and development efforts, are handled by one or more of the seminar's stakeholders.
7.2.3 Workshop for practice-based learning and dialogue
The KMP programme also developed and tested using a workshop. The aim of a
workshop is, quite specifically, to analyze and discuss different practical situations. A
workshop should be characterized by a high degree of interactivity between people
who are expected to be active and work with the practical challenges. The experience

246

of KMP programme is that various levels within the university should organize workshops about university performance management processes and institutional development. A workshop will be an important element in the achievement of a collegial dialogue and constructive discussion about the way forward.
The scope of a workshop can vary. For example, the educational aspects may take
place over a number of days, spread out over a period of time. In addition to a deeper understanding of collaboration and utilization, the focus for this form of workshop is to give students a greater ability in their everyday role to enable collaboration
and utilization to be an integral part of their research and educational activities. For
example, this can include increased expertise on how information from external
sources of knowledge can be used to substantiate and improve decisions.
One target group for the skills development workshop is academic managers, such as
heads of departments and directors of research. This target group can use workshops
to develop their ability — both scientifically and practically — to support utilization
through increased understanding of collaboration and utilization. For example, it
enables knowledge about alternative ways of utilizing on research. This facilitates
work in managerial roles by clarifying which activities are carried out within their
scope of work. This gives managers a practical tool that facilitates their role of leading their activities.
The KMP has conducted training in the form of workshops for academic managers.
Among other things, we have participated in training of university managers, primarily heads of departments and pro-prefects, within the framework of the university's
278 Three examples of completed seminars with subsequent round table discussions:
1:“Addiction and dependency” For the last ten years, researchers at the University of Gothenburg have been working in close collaboration with the healthcare system and other stakeholders in the region on methods and training within substance abuse and dependency care. In this seminar, Professor Claudia Fahlke, from the Department of
Psychology, and her colleagues presented their work and their collaboration model. Barriers to utilization were also
highlighted. What obstacles had to be overcome? Does academia in practice reward and make initiatives of this
kind possible? Around 55 invitees participated in the seminar, both from academia and from society and business.
2: ”Law Clinics as a means for Empowerment”. In South Africa, universities have long played an important part as a
support for vulnerable citizens. Today, these types of social activities form a central mission for the country’s academics. Legal advice through Law Clinics is an example of this. Two very experienced South Africans in the field
participated in the seminar and the round table discussion. Asha Ramgobin is the director of a Law Clinic attached
to the academy, while Peter Vale is a professor of political science with special experience in the commercialization
of academic knowledge in society. Around 60 invitees participated in the seminar, both from academia and from
society and business.
3:“Working together as a counterforce to segregation”. The mission of an institute of higher learning includes the
active promotion of sustainable development; the promotion of good environmental, economic and social welfare
and justice. This mission is reflected in the research and education that Gothenburg University carries out, but also
in the collaboration with other societal actors, including schools, healthcare and cultural life. More specifically, the
seminar and the subsequent round table discussion examined the topic “How does the University of Gothenburg
work for inclusion and social sustainability?”“Vision 2020 and the university as an actor in social change”. The issues
addressed were how the university administers its mission to promote social sustainability and how the university
can be part of the solution in current societal challenges. How, why, when and with whom/what does the collaboration for social sustainability take place? How do we work against segregation? At the seminar, some of the activities at the University of Gothenburg were presented that employ collaboration in an active process of change for
expanded participation, counteracting segregation and working for a sustainable society. Around 95 invitees participated in the seminar, both from academia and from society and business.
279 The seminars have usually lasted 3-4 hours, with a subsequent round table discussion of about 2 hours.

247

management development programme.280 The focus was on enabling greater understanding and skill in dealing with issues of collaboration and utilization. The lesson is
that workshops work very well for building expertise, as they allow for group exercises with intensive interaction between participants and the course leaders.
The experience gained from the training initiatives that took place in 2013 showed
that many managers are in need of and request a lot of knowledge in this area, given
the aim of providing managers a greater ability to manage collaboration and utilization successfully, and not just possess a general understanding of them. One result is
that the managers who underwent the management development programme in 2014
received a total of around four days of training in the field. This was done in workshops and project work, which were collectively conducted over a 9 month period.281 The combination of workshops and project work was intended to give managers the sense that they receive concrete support and input into how collaboration
and utilization can be achieved and support for their daily work. Not least, the project work must be linked to and supported by their actual role and missions.282 One
challenge for this type of skills development is ensuring that the participant is active
during the workshop and actively tackles the project work.
Training for the university's deans has also been conducted within the KMP programme. These occasions have been designed within the framework of the professional development workshops. Among other things, we have discussed experience
that has been gained from the KMP programme.283
7.2.4 Training in developing practical skills
A third form is training to provide practical skills for collaboration and utilization. In
training, the focus is on the individual's ability to perform and manage the actual
processes. For example, this could involve using tools for innovation information,
licensing or business plans. Individual participants are expected to have the ability to
work independently on collaboration and utilization.

280 The section for management and professional development at the human resources unit is responsible for the
management development programme.
281 The managers present their project work to the senior university management and the training officers.
282 In 2014/2015 the project work dealt with collaboration according to the following assignments.“In 2020, the
University of Gothenburg will be characterized by its responsible and committed collaboration work. This will create a ripple effect that (1) spreads knowledge to the surrounding world, (2) utilizes research results and (3) stimulates an influx of new ideas and knowledge. Key issues for managers to answer are A) What do you as a
manager/managers do to promote collaboration in these three respects? To what extent have you succeeded? B)
How do you handle collaboration within the public authority model (case management)? What challenges/barriers/ethical dilemmas have you found in your experience (general level/operational level/individual level)? C) How
can you as a manager/managers contribute to collaboration efforts within your organization to increase/evolve in
line with Vision 2020?”
283 For example, on specific occasions (full-day training) the university's deans have received an in-depth review of
the institutional arrangements for knowledge-driven collaboration and utilization, as well as about the differences
and similarities between the two main collaboration and utilization logics: idea- and knowledge-driven logic and a
social challenge-driven logic. Alternative ways that research findings can be utilized and what risks and opportunities these alternative choices entail have also been discussed.

248

A training package can be made up of a number of training exercises that run continuously over a period of time. A single training session may be between one and two
days long. One target group is the university's innovation advisors. Another target
group is researchers. An example of an exercise that was conducted in cooperation
with the Swedish Patent and Registration office is how patent information and other
information for innovation can be used in academic environments.
A number of training modules have been developed within the KMP programme.
These are aimed at different target groups with a view to strengthening operational
capacity to collaborate and promote utilization:
● Introduction to utilization – utilization logics
● Identification and analysis of intellectual assets
● Searching for and analyzing innovation information
● Strategies for promotion of utilization
● Collaboration ethics
● IPR (Intellectual Property Rights) strategy
● Strategies for applying for research funding
● Design and management of research contracts
● Licensing strategies
● Open access, source and innovation
● Research-based businesses
Developed modules have the common aim of teaching the essence of the practical
skills that are needed for the immediate management of knowledge assets.
7.2.5 Courses for professional development
A fourth form is the course. The goal of these is to take more of a holistic approach
to professional development. Courses can consist of a number of seminars, workshops, training periods etc. As such, courses can be short or long, concentrated or
spread over a long time. One target group for courses is researchers and postgraduate
students. The focus of the course is to give participants a basic understanding and an
increased awareness of the challenges and opportunities related to commercialization
of the participants’ own research. This is made possible, in part, through the large
number of practical exercises given during the course. Exercises are based on one or
more fictitious case studies, as well as on the participants’ own research. After the
students have completed a number of weeks of training, course credits are awarded.
In the autumn of 2013, a pilot course was held within the framework of a master's
programme (equal to 7.5 credits) for students in one of the Gothenburg University's
innovation programmes, ICM, Intellectual Capital Management.284 The course is primarily intended for innovation advisers and others who will be working as experts in
order to utilize on knowledge assets.285 The aim of the course is to provide students
with the skills and tools necessary for practical work in research projects, among
other things, to identify, evaluate and package knowledge assets.
284 Similar training was conducted during the autumn of 2014.
285 Innovation advisors at the University of Gothenburg participated in the course in autumn 2014.

249

7.2.6 External theme days for learning and dialogue
A fifth type of learning is external theme days. The goal of these days is to create systematic contact and dialogue between researchers and external players in society. By
focusing on specific topics such as e.g. sustainable marine environments and personalized care in the public sector, the different players in society and academic
researchers can meet to discuss research and the knowledge assets that the university's researchers can contribute. Theme days can grow out of research that is being
conducted, as well as from the demands and the challenges that exist in society. For
example, the universities of Uppsala and Linköping hold theme days that see strong
participation by companies and government agencies.
Experience shows that an increased utilization of academic knowledge assets requires
clear and well-functioning channels between the university and the stakeholders in
the surrounding community. This would also be one of the conditions for the implementation of the relevant parts of the Vision 2020 at Gothenburg University, “We are
engaged in close cooperation with the surrounding society, work for sustainable
development and are an active and appreciated provider of knowledge”.286

7.3 Training for operational responsibility
Initiation, securing and providing role-specific training are particularly important to
specify when defining the mission of an innovation academy. It should be made clear
that these should be integrated into the formal training structures provided by the
university for different roles.
7.3.1 Specification of the responsibility for initiating, securing and providing
role-specific training and further training
The KMP programme quickly discovered that courses on collaboration and utilization should be offered within the framework of graduate courses and other management training programmes that are part of professional development. The university's
various categories of employees have different roles and needs when it comes to
developing their ability to collaborate and promote utilization of knowledge assets.
The different target groups also have varying opportunities to allocate time for professional development. Each target group requires content that is customized to their
capacities and for their understanding of utilization and collaboration. Training of
286 A number of pilot seminars were organized within the KMP programme, in which we focused on specific
themes and to which we invited international and national players. In collaboration with Linköping University, we
are also considering trying their “Society Quest” which means that the organizers invite external players to gatherings with a specific agenda. The idea is that identified demands for “problem solving” from external players will be
matched with different kinds of knowledge assets that are available at the university. These theme days are, in their
turn, inspired by the AIMday concept at Uppsala University that has been ongoing for several years. The concept
provides an opportunity for academic researchers and organizations in the private and public sectors to network
and exchange knowledge. New insights and new perspectives can be gained on current issues by matching the
organizations’ demand for new knowledge with academic expertise. For more information, please visit www.aimday.se.

250

the different staff groups requires customized educational approaches. Instructors are
taken from both academics and people outside academia, all with extensive experience of promoting utilization.
The University of Gothenburg and other universities offer training and professional
development for various categories of staff. The KMP programme concluded that
every category of staff has training needs.287 The primary target groups of such
training are academic managers and decision makers, research managers, scientists,
innovation advisors and research advisors. We have chosen to categorize training
programmes on the basis of these target groups.
7.3.2 Management training
Another important process in the KMP programme is the evaluation and development of management training.288 The programme determined this should focus on
developing the managerial role to act as 1) government representatives, 2) employer
and 3) a contract party for collaboration and promotion of utilization. Training in
collaboration and utilization should be mandatory for all senior managers. The university should give the Innovation Academy the task of providing a course package
for executives. Classes and workshops for managers should be held in which they
can develop their roles.
To this end, pilot training initiatives have been held in 2013 for academic managers
(primarily heads of departments or equivalent) within the framework of the
Gothenburg University management training programmes.289 The university's administrative managers have also received training in collaboration and utilization.290
A conclusion is to have someone at each department that should be responsible for
training related to collaboration and utilization. Efforts in this direction began in the
spring of 2014. Because responsibility within the University of Gothenburg is generally decentralised to the university's faculties, this role can be important, not least in
gaining support for training initiatives. The plan is for these people to be trained in
collaboration and utilization work within the framework of the Innovation Academy
during 2015.291
287 Participation in the introductory course for new employees began in spring 2014. The main objective is to raise
awareness among all the university’s employees to the university's responsibilities and opportunities for collaboration and utilization.
288 The target group consists of two groups of managers: One group is heads of academic departments and institutions at a university or university college who who manage research and educational activities and managers
responsible for managing and implementing the university’s strategy in their fields, and the other being executives,
such as university management and academic managers responsible for organizational strategy and development
of the university as a whole.
289 Courses are provided by the section for management and professional development at the human
resources unit.
290 An important example is the management programme for administrative managers at the University of
Gothenburg in 2013.
291 The training initiative has been planned in conjunction with the Unit for Pedagogical Development and
Interactive Learning.

251

7.3.3 Postgraduate studies
One element evaluated by the KMP programme was how to develop and include
training for collaboration and utilization in a researcher's career.292 Since the primary
responsibility for promoting utilization lies, reasonably enough, with the researchers,
relatively good instrumental skills and the ability to address ethical considerations are
required. They should have the ability to promote utilization both under the auspices
of the university and privately. The conclusion of the KMP programme is that the
Innovation Academy should have a mandate to develop a training programme that
essentially extends over an entire research career. There should be a mandatory
course for graduate students and a mandatory course for the heads of research. A
number of seminars, workshops and training courses should also be offered. The
Innovation Academy will face the challenge of ensuring that training programmes are
integrated as a natural part of graduate education and in the training of supervisors
and heads of research.
An insight gained as a consequence of the KMP programme is that prospective
researchers should learn at an early stage what collaboration and utilization is all
about. For this reason, it is important that the Innovation Academy is involved in
postgraduate students’ early research studies.293 The main aim is to increase awareness of the university's responsibilities and opportunities in the area of collaboration
and utilization, such as the ways in which the research can be utilized.
In 2013, work began on the development of a graduate course on collaboration and
utilization of research. The aim of the course is to give postgraduate students a basic
understanding and awareness of the challenges and opportunities related to the utilization of the student's own research and the ethical implications of the research and
its utilization. The course focuses on responsibility for their own research results. In a
first phase of development, the course is offered to graduate students in the natural
sciences and health sciences.294 A number of similar course seminars are planned
within the framework of existing graduate courses.295
7.3.4 Training for innovation advisors
A third profession course thoroughly evaluated was that for innovation advisors at

292 The target group consists of individual researchers, researcher groups and students who are taking preparatory
research courses.
293 The introductory course for all new postgraduate students at the University of Gothenburg has proven to be a
good time in which to introduce these issues.
294 During the spring of 2014, a pilot course for a researcher and postgraduate course was held. The pilot course
was directed towards the Sahlgrenska Academy (health/life science) under the designation “Intellectual Property,
the Ethics & the Utilization of Academic Research in Health/Life Sciences”.
295 For example, it was included in the course “Induction Course and Science and Lay-public Communication &
Personal Effectiveness” for researchers and graduate students at the Faculty of Medicine within the framework of
the EU-funded Marie Curie project in the autumn of 2014.

252

the university.296 This evaluation made it apparent that the conditions within an
authority are very special when it comes to promoting utilization. Regardless of the
authority dimension, it was obvious that it is a profession that largely needs to be
developed from scratch. Experiences from the private sector with innovation processes cannot simply be applied to academic environments. Moreover, it is clear that the
step from being an academic who is mainly engaged in publishing and classroom
teaching, to becoming an expert at promoting utilization and acting as an advisor is
quite large.
Within the KMP programme, we felt it was important to have a training programme
that certifies advisors at the university. This programme should be integrated with
career development. Individuals should complete different training modules if they
are to be responsible for different educational modules. The training courses use the
same tools as those used in industry. The training programme should be designed for
researchers and others with external experience in utilization efforts and who will
work as innovation advisors. The EU recommendation notes the responsibility for
ensuring “that the staff responsible for the management of IP/CT have the required
skills and receive adequate training”.297
During 2013-2014 in particular, the University of Gothenburg has focused on designing innovation advisor training.298 We have placed particular attention on how the
University of Gothenburg as an organization needs to know more about how handling and applying market information can influence active management and strategic decision-making at all levels.299 Education in the management of knowledge
assets, both practically and theoretically, has also been a main focus. A number of
pilot trials for this type of training have been conducted. The aim is to provide a
“certification course”. One possible approach is a collaboration between several universities to jointly create a certification process. This can complement work relating
to certification at universities that is ongoing together with others, including the
organization SNITTS.
The conclusion is that the Innovation Academy should be responsible, together with
relevant players within and outside the university, for the development of a training
programme that enables a supportive professional training of innovation advisors.
This should include developing training programmes and creating tools for research
advisors, university lawyers and other players within operational support.
296 The target group consists of professional advisors and support personnel who will help academic managers,
researchers and research groups at universities or university colleges to identify and assess utilization opportunities,
identify and secure appropriate funding for research and navigate innovation processes. These advisors may comprise innovation advisors, research advisors and business consultants.
297 Principle 6 of Annex I Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organisations.
298 For example, during autumn 2013 and autumn 2014 innovation advisors participated in the pilot training during a master's course (equivalent to 7.5 higher education credits) for students in the University of Gothenburg's
Intellectual Capital Management programme (ICM).
299 Another example is that innovation advisors participated in the pilot training in graduate and doctoral courses
in the spring of 2014. The pilot course was directed towards the Sahlgrenska Academy (health/life science) under
the designation “Intellectual Property, the Ethics & the Utilization of Academic Research in Health/Life Sciences”.

253

7.4 Communication, evaluation and follow-up
In its mission, the Innovation Academy, should have a responsibility to continually
follow up and gain knowledge of the processes that occur in collaboration and utilization of knowledge assets at the university.
7.4.1 Specification of the responsibility for monitoring, overseeing and
communicating collaboration and utilization work
When evaluating the design and implementation of the different forms of training, it
became clear that a great deal is required of the academics responsible for this training. These individuals need to be well versed in the collaboration and utilization
work conducted at the university. They also need to master the models and other
tools that are used. Our conclusion, therefore, is that those involved in the
Innovation Academy should naturally have an active role in closely monitoring and
analyzing processes that occur in collaboration and utilization of knowledge assets at
the university. As there is an ambition to live up to the EU recommendation, there
must be those who: “monitor intellectual property protection and knowledge transfer
activities and related achievements, and publicise these regularly. The research results
of the public research organisation, any related expertise and intellectual property
rights should be made more visible to the private sector, in order to promote their
exploitation”.300
The conclusion of the evaluation is that a number of sub-responsibilities can be
defined:
● The responsibility to participate in surveying the activities conducted
within and adjacent to the university with regard to collaboration and
utilization.
● The responsibility to participate in the development of the tool kit and the
support systems needed for collaboration and promotion of utilization of
knowledge assets.
● The responsibility for taking part in communication efforts about
academic environments and their knowledge assets that are claimed by
the university.
● The responsibility to participate in assessing social impact.
By assigning these four areas of responsibility, there are enough interfaces to what is
happening within the university to fulfil the mission of providing adequate training.
Internal work enables development of and strengthening of the external interfaces.
7.4.2 Survey of activities within the university
The task of the Innovation Academy should be, if necessary, to identify the various
activities relating to collaboration and promotion of utilization that are taking place
300 Principle 14 in Annex I Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research
organisations.

254

at the university. We need to have a good understanding of all of university’s utilization promotion efforts. To date no systematic compilation has been made. The better
understanding of what is actually taking place, the better potential for the university
to develop its efforts. Creating a comprehensive knowledge base would benefit the
utilization efforts, and not just in the long-term. This base would likely also facilitate
development and reporting for external players like the Swedish Research Council
and Vinnova.301
The surveying can be more or less systematic. It can involve conducting surveys,
interviews and other actions to follow and gain an overview of what is happening.
Within the framework of the KMP programme, a number of more overarching surveys of collaboration and utilization activities have been conducted at the university.302 Lots of activity takes place without being generally known at the university.
7.4.3 Development of the tool kit and support system
It is important to contribute to the development and review of utilized tools and
models. The KMP programme has conducted extensive work to evaluate how different tools and databases can be used for innovation information. There will be a continuous need and demand for evaluation tools, but also for being able to teach others
to use those tools.
It is particularly important to contribute to the development of internal models and
processes within the university. There is a frequent need to review and discuss the
university's various models for management, administration and innovation advice
for the collaboration and utilization process.
This work included the seminar series “Knowledge-driven Collaboration” in the final
phase of the KMP programme.303 The purpose of this seminar was to document and
discuss the learning and development process from recent years in the context of the
Institute for Innovation and Social Change (IIS) for the development of the university
as a collaborative organization. The seminar series had six primary learning and
development ambitions: knowledge about the challenges of working with collaboration and utilization in the context of complete academic environments; knowledge of
how the university should develop operational support; knowledge of what an institutional model should look like; knowledge of how the university should develop
management support; knowledge of how the university should develop the operational support external to being an authority/the interface to the external innovation
system; and knowledge of how the university should develop its academic abilities
through joint university training programmes.
Participants came from individuals directly or indirectly involved in the development
301 See above regarding resource and performance management and Chapter 2 for programme and project management.
302 For example, a survey has been conducted to identify training activities in the field of innovation and entrepreneurship.
303 The seminar series “Knowledge-driven Collaboration” took place in the autumn of 2013.

255

work in recent years and who have contributed to development of the activity participated in the seminars. This included people who have been and are employed in the
Research and Innovation Office, GU Holding AB and academic representatives within the University of Gothenburg. The workshops have created a better understanding
of how a university can be pro-active player in collaboration. This applies particularly to idea and knowledge-driven collaboration and in part also for a social challengedriven collaboration.
7.4.4 Communication about academic environments and their knowledge assets
As the university develops its work of identifying and evaluating academic environments, the Innovation Academy should have responsibility for helping to communicate this accumulated knowledge. The EU recommendation highlights the importance
of universities more systematically communicating their research results and the intellectual property rights they hold as a way of stimulating utilization.304
As noted previously, the Innovation Academy can play an active role in the organization of external theme days that present information about the university's
researchers and its knowledge assets. Through theme days in combination with other
external dialogue, the Innovation Academy can also take responsibility for communicating knowledge in the other direction, i.e. about what challenges, demands and
interest in collaboration exist in society.
7.4.5 Evaluation of impact on society
A further task may be to initiate and participate in evaluations of how the university
affects society in various respects. As previously discussed, the government and other
public stakeholders are making it increasingly clear that there is an intention to assess
universities in this regard.305 Increasingly, universities are expected to compile data
and analyze their own social impact. An innovation academy can be one of the internal stakeholders to initiate and contribute to such assessments.

7.5 An innovation academy with collaboration coordinators
A central issue in the latter part of the KMP programme was how to organize an
innovation academy. The basic conclusion is that we need a collegial party that can
take active responsibility for ensuring that collaboration occurs based on science and
academic values. At the same time, it is important to develop close collaboration
between the Innovation Office, the Innovation Academy and university management.
An innovation academy in the form of an academic unit supports the mission that
the university's Innovation Office and university management are responsible for.
304 Principle 14 in Annex I Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual
property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organisations.
305 See Section 2.5.4 above.

256

This makes it possible to take responsibility for integration where management,
administration and staff collaborate and join forces.
The next question is how, on the one hand, the Innovation Academy can be academically independent and, on the other hand, how it can work closely with the
Innovation Office and university management. The conclusion is that the unit should
have a relatively large measure of autonomy and be led operationally by academics.
The Innovation Academy should report directly to the university management. To
achieve a proactive Innovation Academy, it will be necessary to continuously add
both knowledge and expertise in collaboration and utilization from all of the university's operations. Such knowledge acquisition facilitates an efficient and reality-based
structure of collaboration and utilization throughout the university.
Furthermore, it is our conclusion that each department — and possibly also at faculty
level — needs a collaboration coordinator. The collaboration coordinator should be
an academic with a special interest in and preference for collaboration issues. It is
quite conceivable that the collaboration coordinator may be a deputy head of department and belong to the department management. The time required by the role is, of
course, dependent on the size of the department and the needs/demands that exist.
Our conclusion is that an innovation academy should have an advisory group of representatives — collaboration coordinators — from each department to make possible
integration of the collaboration work. This will allow the Innovation Academy to be
clearly managed and developed in accordance with actual needs and explicit demand
from within the university.306 Conversely, the collaboration coordinators will play an
active role in the Innovation Academy and can thereby convey information, etc. back
to their own departments.

7.6 Conclusions
After careful consideration, the KMP programme has concluded that universities
should establish training units for collaboration and utilization or build upon their
existing units. The proposed unit, referred to as the Innovation Academy, will conduct its activities in close cooperation with the university management and the
Innovation Office. It should be characterized by academic independence.
An important conclusion of the KMP programme is that an academic training unit is
of central importance in enabling integration of the collaboration mission. As support
for the work of the Innovation Office and the responsibility taken by academic managers, it has a vital role in enabling academic environments to promote utilization
and collaboration. The Innovation Academy should, as far as possible, have peer

306 Within the KMP programme it became clear that there was a need for a collaboration committee that reports
directly to the university management with some decision-making powers to coordinate the work, ensure resource
efficiency and ensure professionalism. See the proposal of creation of the collaboration committee in IE2011 Utredning av samverkansuppgiften vid Göteborgs universitet [translation: Study of the Collaboration Commission
at the University of Gothenburg], which had a special focus on the areas of innovation and entrepreneurship.

257

legitimacy. As an academy, it should have a reference group of collaboration coordinators from all the university's departments and possibly also from the faculties.
Our proposal is that the university management ensure the existence of “an academic
training unit, the Innovation Academy, that has responsibility for following the work
at the university and ensuring that there are arenas for role-specific training, as well
as for critical dialogue about the university's work on utilization and collaboration”.
The conclusion of the KMP programme is that the university management should
formulate an overarching mission statement and specify a number of responsibilities:
● Responsibility for the creation of arenas for learning, dialogue and criticism.
● Responsibility for initiating, securing and providing role-specific training
and further training.
● Responsibility for monitoring, overseeing and communicating collaboration and utilization work.
The unit will gain a complementary and essential role through the assumption of the
three responsibilities. With regard to the responsibility for the creation of arenas for
learning, dialogue and criticism, we evaluated the following forms:
● Series of seminars
● Workshops
● Training programmes
● Courses
● External theme days
Regarding the responsibility for development and provision of role-specific training
and further training, our evaluation focused on the following:
● Management training
● Researcher training
● Training for innovation and research advisors
The experience of the KMP programme is that an innovation academy has a significant impact on actual integration of the collaboration mission. To be able to take
responsibility in the interaction with the Innovation Office and similar units, it is
important to follow their work closely and to participate in it to some degree.
Similarly, it is equally important that representatives from the Innovation Office and
administration are actively involved in the academy and its activities.
It is particularly important that the Innovation Academy should have a mandate to
represent the staff interest and that it should be composed of academics from the university's faculties. As such, it is important that the academy is integrated with the
university's activities and thus complements existing programmes and departmental
arrangements. Organisationally, the academy should have access to an advisory
group or similar that consists of collaboration coordinators from all of the university's departments and report directly to the university management.

258

Management of
research results

259

,

8. IAM for academic
environments
8.1 Support systems and processes for enabling academic
environments to utilize research results
Evaluation of which key processes and operational capability are required for
enabling academic environments to promote utilization and to manage research
results in collaboration activities.
The presumably most important task of the KMP programme has been to evaluate
how to best manage operational collaboration and utilization. This is particularly
true given that the university must take organizational responsibility for integrating
this task within the framework of the academic environments. Significant effort has
gone into evaluating and developing processes and direct tools for utilizing research
results as a step in taking public responsibility. These processes and tools are hoped
to serve as key elements within the requisite support systems. The KMP programme
showed that the Innovation Office has a key role to play in several respects.
Through our evaluation of the operational processes, we have gradually been able
to see how interaction between a reactive and proactive assumption of responsibility on the part of the Innovation Office could pave the way for a Swedish model for
collaboration and utilization.
8.1.1 The Innovation Office and operational capability for collaboration
and utilization
This first chapter in Part 3 aims to provide an overview of how staff working
within the KMP programme have evaluated and drawn conclusions about how we
can develop the university’s operational capability and promote the utilization of
research. We intend to provide an overview of the key operational processes that
can serve as a basis for a model for collaborating and utilizing research results. In
this sense, this chapter can be viewed as an introduction to the presentation given
in Part 3.
We have identified a number of key processes through our evaluation of the university’s operational capabilities. If implemented, we believe these will enable the
organization to better promote the utilization of research results. We have identified
four key processes: 1) claiming intellectual assets, 2) evaluating and positioning
academic environments in relation to the outside world, 3) making decisions about
concrete ways of utilizing and implementing these in the university’s operations,
and 4) governance of knowledge assets, intellectual property rights and contracts
within the university’s organization. The conclusion drawn by the KMP programme
is that a support system is needed for each key process. The four key processes
build on each other, which requires that the support systems be coordinated. For
this reason, the evaluation has been focused on developing procedures, sources of

260

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

information, process support and other models that should serve as fundamental
elements within these support systems. To a large extent, the evaluation has consisted of on-going trial and error in developing procedures and models with normative
functions that allow the four key processes to be realized operationally.
The evaluation of operational capability has focused on distributing responsibilities, establishing principles for managing knowledge assets, establishing principles
for managing incentives and other aspects developed in Part 2. To a large extent,
the KMP programme has focused on the interaction between governmental governance of the universities, public administration of the agency’s operations and
management of research results. According to the conclusions drawn in Chapter 6,
the operational responsibility for promoting utilization within academic environments lies with researchers, both individually and as a collective body. One important conclusion is that academic environments should be required to draw up an
action plan for collaboration and utilization. The Innovation Office’s role in
enabling the management of research results in academic environments, however,
is pivotal for developing the university’s operational capabilities. In relation to
academic environments, how can the office’s supporting role be developed for
promoting utilization and management of research results in research relationships? Over time, it became natural within the KMP programme to focus on the
office’s role as a coordinating actor within the university.
Conclusions from the KMP programme indicate that the Innovation Office has a
special role to play in contributing to the development of the university’s organizational ability to promote utilization. This is achieved through both development of
support systems and through the concrete efforts related to the academic environments. We conclude that if the Innovation Office focuses on a number of proactive
key processes in combination with establishing an Innovation Academy or equivalent, it will be possible to develop the entire university’s organizational ability for
collaboration and utilization. We realized that it was entirely possible for the
Innovation Office to be given the role of developing a government agency-adapted
collaboration model based on the ambition of taking broader public responsibility.
8.1.2 KMP as a lab for developing multiple support systems
The KMP programme has been designed based on the assumption that any system
and procedures used for the operational management of collaboration and utilization programmes and projects must begin with an understanding of what the academic environments are asking for. The programme can even be described as an
experimental lab in which we have evaluated research results and the way they are
handled in various relationships to support the creation of models, processes and
procedures. We have been able to test, evaluate and refine different tools. We have
conducted our experimental efforts in two normative-oriented steps:
● evaluation of how a framework/toolbox for knowledge assets should be
designed to enable academic environments to support utilization and in
other ways manage knowledge assets collaboratively based on an ambition
to take public responsibility;
● evaluation of how a framework for managing knowledge assets can and

261

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

should be converted into concrete elements of a support system for
researchers/academic environments, managers, administrators and others.
When combined, these two steps make it possible to distinguish a number of
proactive key processes that promote organizational development. We realized that
we need support systems that make the proactive key processes possible. Based on
these two steps, we were eventually also able to discern the need for procedures,
process support, tools, information sources, contract templates and IT support as
key elements of the support systems.307
8.1.3 Starting point taken from CIP’s models for the “management of
intellectual assets”
In our evaluation, we have worked with “intellectual assets” as a phenomenon that
has the potential of balancing what can be viewed as public resources with what can
be viewed as private resources. Within the KMP programme, this has largely been a
question of developing the management of research results as public resources.
An important preliminary project conducted prior to the KMP programme
involved the development of concept, methodology, process and suchlike for the
evaluation and management of intellectual assets. This project was undertaken
within the framework of the Center for Intellectual Property (CIP).308 Much of the
operational work has been based on this development work done within the
framework of CIP. To a large extent, the pinpointing of the four key processes is a
direct result of the IAM models developed within CIP over several years.
One important basic premise within CIP is that the management of intellectual assets
is about finding ways to handle the challenges from the transformation to a more
knowledge-driven society and how this affects those working on research and innovation.309 Based on experience gained within CIP, management models that focus on
intellectual assets take on the greatest significance in the concrete handling of the
challenges associated with utilizing research results. Typical challenges encountered
when working with the management of intellectual assets (IAM) include:
● communicating research results to external environments and external
parties
307 See also the conclusions below.
308 Development efforts within CIP have involved a unique interaction between academic and practical work. CIP
was created by the University of Gothenburg and Chalmers University of Technology as a joint academic centre in
1998. Chalmers Industriteknik created a development platform through CIP Professional Services AB. The company
was founded in the autumn of 2006 as the operational branch of CIP. Extensive development efforts have been
conducted within the framework of CIP Professional Services and, over the years, IAM models have been developed
and tested within a large number of primarily private-sector projects, but also public-sector projects.
309 Research conducted within CIP largely focuses on intellectual property and its impact on society. Our work
concerning the objects protected by intellectual property laws also made it clear to us that a development in
which we increasingly employ a framework for IAM is not wholly unproblematic. Simply by objectifying knowledge
processes, we tend to introduce a commercial (private) logic. This is not necessarily desirable within scientific and
academic organizations. At the same time, it was obvious that this development is occurring even without the use
of IAM frameworks. For us, the challenge was thus to develop an IAM framework that has the potential to create
value based on societal logic.

262

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

● managing and governing research processes
● developing and managing research collaboration and utilization processes
● managing and conducting innovation processes
● developing and managing open knowledge platforms
● safeguarding public assets and ensuring welfare development through

knowledge processes
● clarifying value propositions concerning knowledge; licensing and otherwise

undertaking knowledge-based operational development
● financing and investing in research and knowledge-intensive innovation.

Development work conducted within CIP is based on a continual interplay between
operational management of the practical challenges faced by knowledge-based organizations, theoretical reflection and the development of the models and processes to be
used.310 These efforts incorporate the ambition for the models to capture the actual
and practical complexity and to be scientific grounded, while also being effective and
user-friendly. The models have been designed in stages and tested in both the knowledge-based commercial sector and the public sector.311 This is something that we
have developed further within the KMP programme.
The KMP programme’s operational work was based on the toolbox developed
within CIP. The programme wanted to test, adapt and develop management of
knowledge assets and intellectual property assets based on the aspiration of
achieving social benefit adapted for universities.312
8.1.4 Support systems for four proactive processes
This third part of the KMP programme looks at the Innovation Office as a way of
enabling academic environments to integrate the promotion of utilization and collaboration with their primary missions of research and education. This is primarily
achieved by providing four support systems linked to four interrelated main
processes. To pinpoint these, we have developed an IAM framework. The frame310 As such, a critical element in the development of CIP’s IAM framework is the theoretical work. The IAM framework is cross-disciplinary in nature and has its origins in sociology theory, economic theory and legal theory. The
theories have been tried and developed when the framework has been used within a large number of companies
and other knowledge-oriented organizations. At the basic level, the framework is based on the idea of intellectual
asset as a social construction that must be able to be translated in its interaction with the real processes of which is
consists.
311 Over the years, CIP Professional Services, in particular, has completed more than 100 different projects concerning the management of intellectual assets. Valuable experience was gained when we worked on the special challenges found in large EU-financed research programmes, such as the framework programmes Innovative Medicine
and KIC (Knowledge and Innovation Clusters). That said, our work within more commercially-oriented knowledgebased organizations has been at least as illuminating. The transformation of the business world also has an impact
on publicly financed organizations.
312 When formulating the KMP programme, the programme was discussed in relation to VINNOVA as a proof of
concept of the IAM framework at the university level. Concrete pilot projects were to be evaluated and managed
based on the IAM framework. This allowed IAM’s potential in relation to universities to be discussed in concrete
terms. One question of particular interest was which learning and development processes could be put in place.
The focus was on the IAM framework’s practicality for developing universities as organizations and the integration
of collaboration and utilization into academic activities.

263

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

work is designed to normatively initiate the following in academic environments:
1) the process of claiming intellectual assets, 2) the process of evaluating and positioning academic environments in relation to the outside world, 3) the process of
making decisions about concrete utilization efforts and implementing these in the
university’s operations and 4) the process of organizing knowledge assets, intellectual property rights and contracts within the university’s organisation. These
processes comprise the core of a KMP model produced for the university with the
explicit ambition of assuming responsibility for utilization as an integrated part of
academic activities.
The framework is designed to define in a pedagogical way the process support
and models needed to enable the Innovation Office to provide support systems for
the four key processes. The IAM framework lays the foundation for the proactive
key processes that can contribute to the development of the university’s organizational capability.
The evaluation of academic environments (as presented primarily in chapters 3 and
5) logically leads to the realization that there is a clear need of an overarching
action plan for collaboration and utilization in academic environments. The development of support systems is based on a similar action plan. It is in this plan that
the academic environment formulates its opinions, needs and level of demand for
support (see also Section 8.2).

CLAIM

DECIDE

Support system for identifying, analyzing
and claiming knowledge assets and
intellectual property assets

Support system for decisionmaking in utilization and
collaboration contexts

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Support system for
positioning academic
environments

Support system for organizing
knowledge assets in
academic environments

Figure 53. Support systems within the KMP programme

264

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

A pivotal conclusion of the KMP programme is that the interaction between the
Innovation Office, the academic heads and an Innovation Academy largely make
up the three pillars of an organizational system in which the task of promoting
utilization and collaboration is an integral part of operations within academic
environments (see Section 8.3). To make this interaction work within operational
work, we need procedures stipulating how the different processes should be carried
out and responsibility apportioned. As such, this procedure became a key element
in each respective support system.
It was clearly apparent that the implementation of the four processes would require
abundant access to external information. Thanks to a special collaborative project
between, the Institute for Innovation and Social Change, the university’s library
and the Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV), we realized that significant
potential for generating data on which to base decisions and other information that
would enable academic environments to work in support of utilization (Section
8.4). It was also clear that information sources are an important element within the
support system.

8.2 Action plan for initiating collaboration and utilization
in academic environments
8.2.1 Obligation to prepare action plans
As noted previously, learning and development work within KMP focuses on
researchers’ shared need to be able to integrate collaboration and utilization activities. The ambition is for the academic environments’ needs and level of demand to
define which “operational key processes” should be developed.
One important conclusion drawn from the evaluation work in Chapter 3 is that all
academic environments should prepare an action plan for collaboration and utilization as an integral part of their activities.313 This plan should lay the foundation
for how academic environments develop their organizational capability and how
they should make use of various support functions and training programmes. It
could reasonably also serve as a basis on which the Innovation Office could design
its proactive support and for how the Innovation Academy tailors its educational
efforts. In this context, the action plan can be viewed as the academic environment’s expectations for how the interaction between its own environment and the
rest of the university should be developed.
Accordingly, we believe that an academic environment that aspires to be complete
should include a section in its action plan that focuses on collaboration and utilization as an integral part of research activities and an equivalent section concerning
educational activities. Within the KMP programme, we have primarily focused on
the former.
Another key conclusion is that there should be a designated person within the aca313 Academic environments within the University of Gothenburg will need to prepare four-year action plans and
annual operational plans.

265

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

demic environment with special responsibility for ensuring that collaboration and
promoting utilization are integrated into its operations. This person will be responsible for ensuring that the faculty members handle the task and that an action plan
is prepared. It would be advantageous if this individual also acted as the liaison
with the Innovation Academy and Innovation Office.
In accordance with the conclusions specified in Part 2, we believe that academic
environments should prepare an action plan for collaboration and utilization consisting of three main parts.314

Part 1. Overarching objectives,
values and interests

Part 2. Concrete
utilization ambitions
according to the logics

Part 3. Securing resources
and other operational
planning

Figure 54. Action plan for collaboration and utilization
8.2.2 Overarching governance by objectives in academic environments
The first part of the action plan should specify the values and objectives the academic environment strives to attain. What will be achieved through research on a
general plane? How should you view the university’s and national government’s
governance by objectives? Among other things, the environment’s staff should
decide how it views the overarching governance by objectives as laid out in
Sweden’s Higher Education Act (§5). The academic environment can design and
establish its plan within the existing external frameworks.
Overarching values
A plan should also contain reflections on which research-specific objectives and
values are to be pursued. What public value is generated by a concrete research
result? In our opinion, all research benefits from just such a self-examining, critical
dialogue.
314 See chapters 3 and 5, in particular.

266

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

OVERARCHING OBJECTIVES FOR COLLABORATION
AND THE UTILIZATION OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS
Which overarching values should we strive to uphold?
• Objectives concerning ecological, biological and material value creation.
• Objectives concerning social and humanistic value creation.
• Objectives concerning artistic value creation.
• Objectives concerning economic value creation.
What position do we adopt towards the objectives/obligations
established in the Swedish Higher Education Act?
• Promoting sustainable development to ensure current and future
generations a sound, healthy environment, economic and social
welfare and justice.
• Promoting and upholding equal opportunity for women and men.
• Promoting an understanding of other countries and of international relations.
• Promoting and broadening staﬀ recruitment within academia.
How should we satisfy various interests?
• External social interests.
• External private interests.
• Central university interests.
• Interests within the academic environment.
• Individual researchers’ private interests.

Figure 55. Part one of an action plan for collaboration and utilization

External interests
Other, similar considerations are what public interests do you want to meet
through research in the academic environment. Considerations related to contributing to personalized healthcare or fairer legal proceedings can, in principle, be
described as both values and interests. As far as interests are concerned, it is a matter of attending to the interest of county councils, courts and others for betterdeveloped operations. We believe that it is often appropriate to begin such considerations from the viewpoint of values and interests.
Internal interests
An academic environment should also consider what it wishes to achieve from an
internal standpoint. In what ways does it wish to strengthen itself and the university
as a whole? Quite often, considerations such as these are not the most central focus.
Nonetheless, it is important to identify and acknowledge these because, to some
degree, they will always be present and, to a certain extent, will also be determining
factors.
Values established by Sweden’s Higher Education Act
Likewise, it is important that the academic environment both notes and considers
the values laid out in Sweden’s Higher Education Act (Högskolelagen). According
the Act, all academic activity must be characterized by certain values. Thus, all
academic environments should take in to consideration how research and utiliza-

267

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

tion can promote a healthy environment, welfare, justice, gender equality, international understanding and broader recruiting.
8.2.3 Concrete ambitions according to the various types of utilization logic
Furthermore, the action plan should contain a second part in which the academic
environment formulates its general ambitions regarding utilization. One of the KMP
programme’s key conclusions is that utilization ambitions should be defined explicitly in accordance with the four types of utilization logic.
The concrete ambitions can be defined and formulated based on the above. For
many academic environments, it is a matter of deciding to what extent utilization
should occur in accordance with all four strains of logic. It would be reasonable
for the action plan to include an attempt to quantify different activities that the
academic environment intends to undertake in the coming years.

8.2.4 Securing resources and other operational planning
The action plan should also include a third part that focuses on resource allocation for work concerning collaboration and utilization. In this regard, one of the

To what extent should we
make results publicly
available through:

To what extent should we
make results available to
users through:

To what extent should we
utilize the result through
innovation processes:

1. Scientiﬁc
availability
a) Scientiﬁc articles?
b) Books?
c) Reports?
d) Conference
presentations?

1. Scientiﬁc
availability
a) Commissioned research?
b) Collaborative research?

1. Project-based innovation
a) Social innovations?
b) Service innovations?
c) Product innovations, such
as research tools,
diagnostic tools etc.?

2. Education-based
availability
a) Lectures, seminars etc.,
where research results are
published?
b) Textbooks and other
educational materials?
3. Popular science-related
availability
a) Popular science
books?
b) Debate articles and
scope of participation in
public dialogue?
c) Websites etc.?
d) Posts about the research
result in social media?

2. Education-based
availability
a) Occupational training?
b) Degree projects?
c) Commissioned
education?
d) Handbooks, instructions,
manuals etc.?

2. Licensing-based
innovation
3. Company-based
innovation

3. Project-based
availability
a) Development projects?
b) Partnerships?
c) Licensing and
consulting services?
d) Lobbying?

Figure 56. Part two of an action plan for collaboration and utilization

268

To what extent should we
make results available in
contractual networks
through:
1. Research-driven networks
a) Open databases
containing research
results?
2. Industrial networks
a) Open innovation
processes?
b) Common standards?
c) Industrial development
clusters?
3. Commons
a) Open source code
platforms?
b) Creative commons?
c) Crowd-sourcing?

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

most critical factors is determining which person(s) will assume responsibility for
ensuring that the established ambitions are realized. Experience gained through
the KMP programme suggests that the main responsible person(s) and the person(s) responsible for special sub-tasks be clearly defined. Even if the ambition is
for collaboration and utilization to be a collegial process within the academic
environment, it is still important to plan in detail who is responsible for what;
that is, the distribution of responsibilities. In this respect, the manager’s responsibility is pivotal. Similarly, it is important that the environment’s administrative
capacity and support capability are taken into consideration and planned.
Within the KMP programme, we have identified a number of fundamental considerations that all academic environments need to review. In each specific case, additional
considerations will no doubt also be required.

Have we ensured (and if not - how can we ensure) that we can fulﬁll our plans?
• Speciﬁed and distributed responsibilities
• Need of ﬁnancial resources
• Need of human resources
• Decision-making and support from the management
• Support from the administration
• Advice and support from the Innovation Oﬃce
• Support from external actors
• Education and training from the Innovation Academy

Figure 57. Part three of an action plan for collaboration and utilization

8.3 The Innovation Office and operational procedures governing the
university’s promotion of utilization
8.3.1 The Innovation Office’s role in integrating collaboration and utilization into the
academic environments
One constant feature of the KMP programme is its focus on the Innovation
Office’s role as an interface with researchers in their public roles. In this context,
we came to realize our advantage in that the University of Gothenburg had already
organized us as the Grants and Innovation Office. It has long been natural for us
to think in terms of clear value propositions for academic environments. We had
determined that a Swedish model for innovation offices might reasonably focus on
aiding academic environments in accepting public responsibility. As such, it was
natural for us to think in terms of an overarching concept in relation to academic
environments’ needs and level of demand. We realized that, in practice, making
possible just such a distribution of responsibility would require clear procedures to
guide our work. Our conclusion was that these procedures should be designed
based on clearly defined roles, among which an innovation office should be given a
relatively extensive mandate.
As stated in Part 2, the KMP programme’s conclusion is that the Innovation

269

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Office’s activities should be based on a number of developed and clearly defined
responsibilities:
● the responsibility to promote utilization under the auspices of the university
● the responsibility to provide both reactive and proactive support to academic
environments
● as a coordinating actor, the responsibility to develop and provide a number
of support systems
● the responsibility to ensure the existence of a number of necessary organizational functions for collaboration and utilization.
As part of our evaluation, we analyzed and discussed how the Innovation Office’s
responsibility in these respects should be concretely specified in a number of procedures.
8.3.2 The promotion of utilization under the auspices of the university
One key challenge that has been highlighted many times and that arises when the
Innovation Office interacts with academic environments and researchers in their
capacity as public servants is that researchers are seen to hold personal rights to
research results. At the same time, many utilization-related activities are neither
based on, nor relate to, patentable inventions. A research position naturally
includes lots of work and efforts related to collaboration and utilization.
Within the KMP programme we felt it was important, even critical, for the
Innovation Office to be able to identify and manage intellectual assets together
with researchers and academic environments. This joint effort is the basis for the
organizational capacity for collaboration and utilization. The Innovation Office has
a clear role which allows it to strengthen the academic environments and their
capacity as research and education providers. The more the Innovation Office uses
its ability to manage knowledge assets together with academic environments, the
clearer it becomes that, ultimately, utilization and research results are about creating public benefit. As such, it is not simply one individual research result that is to
be commercialized, but the entire portfolio of knowledge assets that should create
as much public value and benefit as possible. In this way, the Innovation Office can
assume the pivotal role of developing the university’s ability to take on greater public and academic responsibility.
One key conclusion is that the procedures that define how to develop the operational work should be based on claiming intellectual assets. These procedures are
crucial for the operational implementation of the ten principles for the university’s
management of knowledge assets:
1. Utilization of knowledge assets should be based on academic values and
a striving to uphold public responsibility.
2. The basic assumption is that the researcher(s) and teacher(s) who created
a knowledge asset hold the rights to it, which is why they also have the
primary responsibility for promoting its utilization.
3. Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure, that is, things that are
used continuously in the academic environment, must be available to
the university.

270

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

4. Knowledge assets required for conducting further research or other
academic activities must be available to the university.
5. Knowledge assets must be available and managed as background knowledge and foreground in contracts concerning research collaboration and
other types of collaboration.
6. Knowledge assets must be made available to the general public within a
reasonable time frame and to the greatest extent possible. To the extent
that patents and other legal protections are important in ensuring utilization, knowledge assets may be kept secret.
7. If the researchers/teachers agree to promote the utilization of knowledge
assets by developing an innovation project within the framework of activities conducted in the academic environment, the university will assume the
rights to knowledge assets to the extent necessary and reasonable for the
project’s implementation.
8. The university is to provide the opportunity for researchers and academic
environments to promote utilization through licensing in its name.
9. The university must support researchers’ utilization of knowledge assets in
a private capacity.
10. Circumstances must allow the researchers and the university to prevent
knowledge assets from being utilized in an ethically indefensible way.
It is equally important that the procedures state that developed principles for the
researchers’ incentives are applied in practice:
1. It should be possible for researchers and academic environments to acquire
resources, support and time among their duties to promote in various
ways the use of their knowledge assets in the university’s name.
2. When recruiting and promoting researchers and teachers, emphasis should
be placed on their ability to make research results available to the public,
to make research results applicable for users, to manage and conduct
innovation projects, to develop open knowledge platforms and to promote
utilization in other ways.
3. Researchers and academic environments that assume special responsibility
for developing knowledge assets for innovation projects run in the name
of the university should be eligible to receive special resources, support
and time to do so within their work duties.
4. If the university assumes the right to a researcher’s knowledge assets to
license them and otherwise utilize them, the researcher has the right to a
portion of the income generated.
5. At the basic level, researchers and teachers have the right to the income
generated when they work to promote the utilization of their knowledge
assets in a private capacity.
Against this backdrop, the design of operational procedures has focused principally on developing processes for the more proactive support of academic environments. At the same time, it is clear that it is hardly practically feasible to conduct
a proactive examination of all of the university’s academic environments. For this
reason, a proactive approach must be paired with researchers having independent
responsibility for their intellectual assets, as has previously been the case.

271

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

8.3.3 Reactive and proactive support for researchers and academic environments
One fundamental conclusion of the KMP programme is that Swedish innovation
offices should have both reactive and proactive responsibilities for managing
researchers’ and teachers’ knowledge assets within the framework of their positions. It is also important that there is a clear interface when it comes to the university’s responsibility for enabling utilization in a private capacity. Managers within
academia have a particular responsibility in this regard. For example, a discussion
is likely between researchers and their superiors about which research results that
are involved in a specific secondary employment and how public responsibility is
ensured in each individual case.
Reactive management of individual teachers’/researchers´ innovations
Based on the aforementioned conclusions, we can begin to consider how a system
and procedures for reactive support should be initiated, designed and established.
Procedures and principles need to be developed for operational activities. The
guiding principle should be that individual researchers and teachers have the right
to receive support for utilization efforts to be undertaken within the framework of
their employment. In principle, the Innovation Office should be tasked with providing advice and support to all researchers and teachers at the university. This can
apply to matters related to all forms of innovation work. Together with the
researcher (and possibly also in consultation with the individual’s superior), the
Innovation Office must decide what it can and should do. It may be relevant to
involve stakeholders from the researcher’s host department or the research group.
In cases of more an extensive planned or on-going project, it is reasonable to
include a discussion of the division of costs and other resources. In the case of the
formation of a company or other aspects of a more commercial nature where the
researcher plans to the activity to be a “secondary occupation”, the Innovation
Office and the researcher should contact the holding company together.
Researchers are free to contact the Innovation Office if they wish to do so. In
certain cases, however, researchers may be obliged to contact the Innovation
Office. For example, this should be the case for external collaboration contracts
or other agreements in which knowledge assets are treated as part of the position.
In such cases, the Innovation Office may play an auditing and supportive role.
Academic managers should also be liable to report external collaboration contracts
or other contracts that involve knowledge assets.
Proactive support for academic environments
The proper design of proactive support provided to academic environments has
been a major part of the KMP programme. The idea was to identify a number of
main categories of “needs” and “demand” profiles. Based on these, we can then
develop proposals for operational support and their scope in the next step. Using
the following categories, it is possible to design different procedures according to
existing needs and demand. We concluded that it is useful to categorize academic
environments according to the following:

272

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

● Academic environments strategic for the university (A Environment)
● Academic environments with strategic utilization projects (B Environment)
● Collaboration and utilization environments (C Environment)

The KMP programme has extensively tested, critiqued and discussed this categorization. The idea is that each category should have a certain value proposition. It
is noteworthy that each category of environment has a specific system for initiating and carrying out the work Obviously, the university as an organization needs
to take the greatest operational responsibility for the academic environment strategic for the university.
University-strategic environment – An academic environment that requires the university to take continuous systematic responsibility for managing knowledge asset
rights (Environment A): This is an environment where the university organization
adopts active, direct and long-term responsibility for innovation work. This responsibility is active in the sense that the Innovation Office continually monitors what is
happening in the academic environment. It is direct in the sense that the Innovation
Office carries out concrete utilization and collaboration and utilization processes.
Moreover, the assumed responsibility is long-term. It is important to specify just
how long term it is.
Strategic collaboration and utilization environment – An academic environment
with extensive responsibility for collaboration and utilization (B Environment): An
environment where the university organization assumes a more limited responsibility for managing innovation. This may mean being actively and directly involved in
certain respects.
Collaboration and utilization environment – An academic environment with a
need for certain advisory services (C Environment): An environment that manages
collaborative activities independently, though with certain, limited support. The
Innovation Office can and should offer professional development and general support for the principally independent management of utilization and collaboration
and utilization processes.
Within the KMP programme we have considered these categories from every angle,
although we are well aware that this classification cannot be strictly upheld as is. At
the same time, it is obvious that continual, proactive responsibility for the entire
university is not feasible due to a lack of resources. Top priority is for the university
to be able to develop its operational organizational capabilities where most needed.
In other words, prioritization is needed. This resulted in developing a general procedure for researchers and collaboration and utilization environments. In addition, we
designed a special procedure for academic environments with strategic utilization
projects and one for academic environments strategic for the university.
8.3.4 The Innovation Office’s coordinating role
One of the most notable of the KMP programme’s conclusions is that strong leadership is needed if the university is to be able to integrate the mission of innova-

273

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

tion and promoting utilization. Much evidence suggests that a clearly defined role
is needed at the vice-chancellor’s level. Moreover, the Innovation Office will likely
play the most central role. This means that the office will have a leading responsibility both to drive the various processes and to develop the infrastructure for collaboration and utilization. It is also important that an innovation office be part of
the university’s internal administration. This makes it much easier for the
Innovation Office to assume a coordinator’s role in relation to other supporting
stakeholders, such as education providers, communications officers, the university
library’s bibliometricians, entrepreneurs’ schools, holding companies and other
external structures. An important element in the developed procedures is the clear
definition of roles and establishment of the Innovation Office’s coordinating role.
Interaction between the Innovation Office and an academic education provider
(Innovation Academy)
Another important element in the developed procedures is the clarification of the
interaction between the innovation stakeholder and the Innovation Academy. A key
conclusion is that the support systems are largely built on the interaction between
the Innovation Office and an academic education structure – an Innovation
Academy. The academic environments should be able to discuss matters of utilization in seminars, participate in role-specific training courses in which their responsibilities are clarified and participate in training programmes where they acquire
practical skills for using different tools.
Interaction between an internal innovation office and an external
holding company
Another relationship that should be highlighted is that between the internal
Innovation Office and the external holding company. Certainly, an innovation
office can be organized in various ways. The conclusion from in Part 2 of our
presentation was that it is important to differentiate between the responsibility to
promote utilization under the auspices of the university and the researchers promoting utilization in a private capacity. An external structure should assume
responsibility for supporting researchers in their private capacity, while the
Innovation Office supports researchers and the academic environments within the
framework of the university’s activities. In the case of on-going work, it is not
always easy to differentiate between these responsibilities and there is a need for
operational procedures in this context. Moreover, the university also needs a holding company to be able to manage intellectual property rights etc.
Interaction between the Innovation Office and entrepreneurs’ schools
An additional interaction of significance is that between the Innovation Office and
the Master’s programmes in entrepreneurship. This applies especially to the
Intellectual Capital Management (ICM) programme, which is part of both
Chalmers University of Technology’s School of Entrepreneurship and the entrepreneurs’ school at the Sahlgrenska Academy. Entrepreneurial programmes have

274

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

proven to be an important resource for carrying out utilization projects. There is
great potential in the interaction between the Innovation Office and similar programmes with practical elements. This interaction needs to be clearly defined in the
procedures.
Interaction among the Innovation Office, university administration and the
Innovation Academy
The most important operational interaction is that between the Innovation Office,
the university administration and the Innovation Academy. As the university
assumes greater responsibility for the knowledge assets financed through public
funds, for example, the university’s administration will be expected to be involved
operationally. A number of controversial decisions will need to be made on occasion. This is especially true in phases where operations are in transition. The operational involvement of the university administration will need to be developed over
time and specified in detail in the procedures.
8.3.5 The Innovation Office’s internal organizational functions
The Innovation Office’s responsibilities should also include assuming a more prominent responsibility for collaboration and utilization projects in certain circumstances. An important conclusion by the KMP programme is that the Innovation
Office should be tasked with a similar licensing function as is generally found at
other European universities. The programme’s evaluation shows that the Innovation
Office should establish a special organizational function that handles licensing in
the interests of the public.
Especially important for the KMP programme is the development of a function
intended to analyze knowledge assets and the academic environments’ position.
This IAM function also involves evaluating the potential and need for intellectual
property protection. The Innovation Office should assume responsibility for applying for intellectual property protection on behalf of the university and also manage
intellectual property portfolios.
Ultimately, the KMP programme’s conclusion is that an innovation office should
develop the following internal organizational functions:
● a function for IAM in academic environments (including registration of IPR)
● a function for managing commission and innovation contracts (contract
negotiation, design and management)
● a function for licensing for public benefit (formulation of value propositions,
negotiation, contract preparation, implementation etc.)
● a function for project management at entrepreneurs’ schools and in connection with other educational programmes where utilization is promoted.
It should be made clear that the Innovation Office has a special responsibility to support managers in their management of contracts. The responsibility for safeguarding
the university’s interests in research collaboration projects is important in this con-

275

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

text. There is a need for a professional actor with the responsibility and ability to
protect the university’s interests and values in its relationships with various external
collaborators.

8.4 Sources of external information
8.4.1 Evaluation of access to various information services and sources
It quickly became clear that much of the evaluation work done within the KMP
programme would revolve around various analyses of knowledge assets and academic environments. We realized that it was critical for many of the support systems to have access to information sources and to external search and information
services. This is true for the Innovation Office, the Innovation Academy and the
academic environments. From the outset, we understood the importance of evaluating different forms of information that can be used by research and innovation
advisors on the one hand, and by researchers and academic environments on the
other. Subsequently, we conducted a survey to determine how bibliometric research
information, patent information and other innovation-related information can be
used.
Our survey has provided an initial picture of which sources and information servic-

RESEARCH INFORMATION

PATENT INFORMATION

CIVIC AND BUSINESS INFORMATION

Oﬀer from public actors who
provide a free service (example)

Oﬀer from public actors who
provide a free service (example)

Oﬀer from public actors who
provide a free service (example)

WorldWideScience Alliance
(WorldWideScience)
US Health Department
(Entrez/PubMed/Medline)
National university libraries
(Databases)

USPTO
(Patft)
EPO
(Esp@cenet)
WIPO
(Patentscope)

Public institutions Universities
(public reports)
(public websites)
(public conferences)
(public debates)
(public databases)

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a free service (example)

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a free service (example)

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a free service (example)

Google
(Google Scholar)

Google
(Google Patents)
CAMBIA
(The Lens (formerly Patent Lens))

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a paid service (example)

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a paid service (example)

Oﬀer from private actors who
provide a paid service (example)

Thomson Reuters
(Web of Science)
ELSEVIER
(SCOPUS)

Thomson Reuters
(Thomson Innovation)
Orbit
(Questel)
Minesoft/RWS
(PatBase)

Companies
(e.g., databases/search tools/analysis
support) (reports/conferences)
Mass media
(print media)
(broadcasting media)
(digital media)
(news blogs)

Figure 58. Chart of information services

276

Companies
(Annual financial reports and
public business information)
Mass media
Non-proﬁt organizations/associations
(e.g., knowledge platform Wikipedia)
Social networks
(e.g., business network LinkedIn)

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

es are available to innovation advisors and academic environments at the
University of Gothenburg.
An overview of existing information categories was obtained by categorizing external information as shown in Figure 58. Sources were divided into public and private sources that offer free and/or paid services. The chart shows sources of information offering services in more than one information category, which must be
considered relevant for the KMP programme and the development of the IAM
framework. An analysis of available information sources shows that paid services
are significantly more reliable and accurate than free sources.315
The KMP programme found significant need for decision-making data and associated information by governmental agencies when it comes to research and utilization. Our conclusion was that the State needs to further develop its internal information management.
8.4.2 Pilot project with the Gothenburg University Library and the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office (PRV) on research and innovation-related information
A joint development project between the Swedish Patent and Registration Office
(PRV) and the University of Gothenburg316 was initiated to investigate and develop
how patent information can be used in state-run knowledge-based organizations.
The main purpose of this project was to examine how patent information, together
with research and civic information, can be used to develop solid decision-making
data for use in state-run academic organizations. The ambition was to work jointly
to promote the establishment of a state-run programme for the increased utilization
of public research and development of academic environments. The primary target
group was innovation offices and innovation advisors.317 We were particularly
interested in how the Innovation Office can use research, patent and civic information in its work to support academic environments. It was also interesting to evaluate how different information sources can be used by individuals in academia and
by management. What types of decision-making data do individual researchers need
and what do managers need when they weigh considerations for knowledge development projects?
315 One example is searches in free patent databases where the details of a search are saved and made available
to the provider of the information service
316 The University of Gothenburg’s Institute for Innovation and Social Change (IIS) initiated the project. IIS was
responsible for such aspects as conducting a survey to identify actors, products and the range of services on offer
within the field of patent information, the documentation of the pilot project’s development and the establishment of postgraduate programmes for the management and application of patent information. The Grants and
Innovation Office (FIK) assumed operational responsibility for the projects implemented at the University of
Gothenburg and was also the initiator and one of the formal principles of the pilot project. FIK worked alongside
PRV on evaluation and development processes for research projects with the aim of evaluating PRV’s existing
needs for products and services. The university library was also involved in the project. The library’s role was to evaluate and develop ways of using bibliometric analysis. GU Holding AB also participated and worked on evaluation
and development processes in research and commercialization projects together with FIK and PRV.
317 PRV had the central role in the project. They have contributed through their range of products and services,
training models, expertise on intellectual property rights, management and application of patent information, and
sources of patent information.

277

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

We carried out the following as part of the project:
● An analysis of existing options/benchmarking: A review of information
sources and search and information services currently available and that are
used in both the private and public sectors.
● An evaluation of the academic environments: A more detailed evaluation of
what is used in research environments and what should reasonably be possible to use in relation to existing options.
● An opportunity analysis for Innovation Offices: An evaluation of how an
innovation office can develop its value propositions in collaboration with
PRV and other providers of external information.
In parallel with cooperating with PRV, we also conducted a scientific information
development project together with Gothenburg University Library. As with patent
information, we realized that there is a need for a state-run programme for tool
development concerning bibliometric information management for academic environments on the one hand and for research and innovation advisors on the other.
Our main focus was using bibliometric methods to produce new models that could
meet the demand for information, which we were able to identify within the framework of the KMP programme. We hope to contribute to the development of tools
for use in operational work within academic environments and that these tools can
be combined with other search and information analysis tools and analysis services.
8.4.3 Survey of sources and range of services offered by the university library and PRV
As a first step, we identified the type of sources and information services the university library and PRV, respectively, can offer.
The Gothenburg University Library
The university library’s general aim of supporting research, education and
advanced studies at the University of Gothenburg involves substantial responsibility for providing information. Information is provided both in hard-copy and digital forms.318
In our survey, we chose to divide the library’s range of information services into
two categories. The first is research and other external information for independent
knowledge retrieval at the scientific level. The university library considers its princi318 Through two of its own databases, the university library provides access to publications and works from the
university’s many activities. Gothenburg University Publications (GUP) contains the university’s aggregate publications categorized by organizational affiliation or individual author. The database contains published works from
2004 and later. The Gothenburg University Publications Electronic Archive (GUPEA) contains works published electronically by authors and other types of originators working at the university. Student papers are also archived in
GUPEA. The GUP and GUPEA databases are optimized for search and are freely available to web-based search
engines. The university library also provides paid database services allowing access to research information, such as
PubMed, SCOPUS and Web of Science. Databases containing civic and business information are also provided.
University employees can access these paid-service databases by using their library card. The university library does
not have rights of use for any paid-service database related to patent information. University staff and students
have to access patent databases provided free of charge by national and international patent offices and other
intellectual property rights organizations on their own initiative. The above databases, combined with information
provided physically through books, collections of articles, encyclopaedia etc., show the university library to be a
provider of information sources relevant to the work done by innovation advisors and academic environments

278

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

pal task to train university employees to navigate within the range of information it
provides. This training takes the form of courses in which participants gain a
knowledge of which information and search tools the library offers. The library
offers web-based training for university employees and, where time permits, also
for the general public.
In the second category, the university library is commissioned internally to produce
decision-making data based on bibliometric research information. The development
project’s practical work used this category as a starting point.319 The project initiated in 2013 focused on developing tools for the management and application of bibliometric information about scientific publications. This project’s main purpose was
to produce new tools and methods that can be adapted to the need for tools and
information among innovation advisors and researchers. The objective was to
design tools that can be used in operational activities and be combined with other
information analysis tools and services.320
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that the university library has an important
role to play in providing access to information sources and services as part of the
support systems being developed. There is a need for close collaboration between
the Innovation Office and the university library in this respect.
The Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV)
Determining PRV’s sources was based on its role as Sweden’s national authority for
patent, trademark and design protection. As a public authority, PRV must ensure
that it has the requisite competence, access to information and tools needed to
complete its mission satisfactorily. To this end, PRV has built up a collection of
high-quality intellectual property rights sources. These information sources concern
both patent information321 and other, non-patent-related reference material.322
319 To gain an accurate picture of the university library’s organizational relationship with the KMP programme’s
practical work on research and innovation information, we pay particular attention to the organizational unit that
the work primarily concerns, the Digital Services unit. This unit is divided into four teams. The Publishing and
Bibliometric Services team has been directly affected by the practical development efforts (see also chapters 9 and
10). This team’s everyday work focuses primarily on producing bibliometric information as support material for
decision-making at the university administration, faculty and departmental management levels within the
University of Gothenburg. The aim is to produce support material that visualizes search results in various decisionmaking processes. Where time permits, similar services are performed for individual employees undertaking work
on behalf of the university.
320 See also sections 9.6 and 10.4.
321 PRV works with a number of patent databases covering various kinds of patent documentation. Some of these
contain full-text versions of patent literature, while others contain only translated summaries. These databases may
be specialized, covering patent literature from specific geographic areas, time periods, technical fields etc. Their
common denominator is that they principally contain patent literature that, in some form, is either published
patent applications and/or granted patents. Some examples of the patent databases PRV uses are Epodoc, World
Patents Index and EUREG. These are not available to the public. The publicly available databases used are
Esp@acenet and Patentscope, which are provided by the European Patent Office (EPO) and World of Intellectual
Property Organization (WIPO), respectively.
322 PRV has also built up a large source database of non-patent-related literature that, in combination with patent
literature, is the source for searches in the subject area. This database’s sources consist of databases covering the
fields of chemistry, electronic physics and mechanics and that contain scientific publications and articles in a large
number of sub-fields. Moreover, PRV has its own library containing older letters patent and the National Library of
Sweden also serves as a reference library.

279

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

All in all, PRV demonstrates both breadth and depth in its range of information
sources.
In parallel with the duties PRV carries out in its role as a public authority, it also
houses a part that focuses on offering advanced search services323 to both the public
and private sectors. It should be clearly stated, however, that PRV does not provide
business consultancy services. It only performs searches based on well-defined
orders. Its search services are based on the sources and tools that PRV uses in its
work as a public authority. As such, PRV provides information services on a commission basis through which a client can analyse whether an invention can be considered patentable, as well as receive an analysis of a specific technical field, technology trends, actors within a given field of technology etc.324
Finally, it should be noted that PRV provides self-search services for the general
public through e-services. These are known as “information services”. Registered
applications and intellectual property rights held in the respective fields can be
found through patent, brand and design databases, for example. PRV’s public document archives, library catalogue and newspaper Swedish Patent Gazette can be
accessed online.
We conclude that PRV and its range of services can play a key role in developing
the support systems for utilizing research results at the university, even if its
sources and services primarily relate to fields like technology, medicine, the natural
sciences and design. We believe, however, that collaboration between the
Innovation Office and PRV could lay the foundation for determining how to use
research and innovation information in a systematic way. A similar structure could
then be developed for other sources and information services.
8.4.4 Division of responsibility for collection and analysis of external information
One important issue for us to examine is who will do what related to the retrieval
of information and the analysis of the information obtained. We also noted a development process in this regard. Access to this type of information is a key element in
the Innovation Office’s proactive work to support academic environments. In the
long term, however, it is plausible that academic environments will assume relatively
extensive independent responsibility. During the establishment phase, though, the
Innovation Office will likely need to assume the bulk of the responsibility.
We also concluded that the university library and PRV could play a role in the support system, not least of all as providers of various materials to support analysis.
During the establishment phase, the university library’s and PRV’s roles should
include developing the Innovation Office’s ability to use external information and,

323 Some examples of such search services are novelty searches, prior art, patent mapping, freedom to operate
searches and validity searches.
324 These services and the results of the evaluation within the pilot project will be presented in more detail in sections 9.6 and 10.4.

280

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

presumably, also for the academic environments to use this information. It seems
reasonable that the university library and PRV will primarily provide support materials based on well-defined orders placed with their search services. It is up to innovation advisors and others in the academic environment to analyze results together
with other data.
We realized that we need to develop and implement training initiatives if academic
environments are going to be able to manage external information. Concretely, this
means that advisors, research managers, researchers and other will be trained in
the field to obtain the insight, knowledge and ability needed to manage and apply
external information in their individual fields. It was obvious that this need differs
between different levels and types of work within the university. We realized there
is a need for a training platform, the Innovation Academy, to assume special
responsibility for training and learning. It is plausible that the university library,
PRV and even the Innovation Office actively participate as both instructors and
students.

8.5 Conclusions
The intent of the KMP programme is for the operational work related to collaboration and utilization to take place within the academic environments as an integrated part of operations. The hope is that the researchers and the academic environments will be able to assume a public responsibility.
A Swedish model for knowledge-based collaboration
The KMP programme is ambitious in its nature. It has attempted to adopt a holistic
approach and evaluate the potential and opportunity for establishing a Swedish
model for collaboration and the utilization of research results. This holistic
approach has been critical to the programme’s ability to discern what is possible
within the framework of a “state university” that is currently working within the
framework of an increasingly international system for managing and utilizing
research results. Swedish universities are governed through the Swedish state.
Moreover, in the future, they will be influenced by the international governance
currently being developed, whether they like it or not. Our conclusion is that room
should be made to develop a more Swedish, or perhaps even Northern European,
approach.
If we consider international development on a more operation-based plane, there is
no doubt that the US approach, in which researchers are obliged to report research
results to innovation offices (knowledge transfer organizations), has gained a strong
following. This has laid the foundation for an approach in which it is increasingly
natural for universities to develop a system for assuming organizational responsibility for intellectual assets.
In the KMP programme, we have shown that it is possible – perhaps even beneficial
– for Swedish universities to work within the framework of a public authority

281

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

model. It is possible to develop a responsibility for organization in spite the existence of what is known as “professor’s privilege/teacher’s exemption”. Undoubtedly,
there exists normative space for the universities to stake their claim to be able to use
research results. There is also good potential for arriving at an agreement with
researchers about how the university will assume operational responsibility in concrete examples. The general conclusion is that an IAM-based work method will
pave the way for the university to assume an integrated responsibility based on the
goal of upholding public responsibility. An IAM-based method involves the
Innovation Office assuming responsibilities that, to a large degree, innovation
offices at other European and international universities have. The Innovation Office
can develop into a stakeholder that represents the university in various collaboration and utilization projects. At the same time, more extensive responsibility is
assumed in which the Innovation Office, together primarily with an innovation
academy or equivalent, contributes to the integration of the mission to collaborate
and the strengthening of academic environments.
IAM framework for enabling four normative key processes
A general assumption that has shaped the entire KMP programme is that the management of knowledge assets and other intellectual assets is crucial to integrating
research, education, collaboration and utilization. We saw this as a possible way
for the university to assume increased responsibility for innovation in a system
where academic exception is considered valid. Experience from preliminary studies
suggests that a project on knowledge assets would encourage researchers and other
university representatives to better understand what public responsibility based on
publicly-financed research results might involve. Just the fact that the Innovation
Office devotes itself to the proactive identification of knowledge assets has a stimulating and enabling effect on the academic environments. We realized the importance of building on this insight.
As such, the KMP programme aimed to evaluate which operational regulatory
instruments enable the integration of collaboration/utilization with the primary
task of research/education. We had previously established that models for managing knowledge assets and other intellectual assets can be used as tools for a host
of different functions within academic activities, e.g. in open access management,
project management, research collaboration, licensing, social innovation activities
and more. Within the KMP programme, it was clear that IAM is as much about
how to manage research processes as it is about managing utilization processes.
During our evaluations, it became obvious that there are clear differences in how
much an academic environment should devote itself to more comprehensive management of knowledge assets. For example, the differences in how the natural sciences and social sciences should manage these assets became apparent. Certainly,
we could see that all academic environments pursue the utilization of research
results to some degree and to the management of research results in collaboration
and utilization processes. Thus, all academic environments need IAM, even
though there are large differences in the extent of their need.
The KMP programme concluded that the support provided by the Innovation

282

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Office in promoting utilization of research results should be based on the support
processes included in the IAM framework discussed above. Accordingly, the
Innovation Office should offer four support systems. Admittedly, it is fully possible to
think in terms of an even more comprehensive support system. However, we came to
realize the importance, at least in the development phase, of separating the four systems. Each support system represents a specific, proactive work method in relation to
academic environments. Each system is intended to initiate a “key process” related to
innovation and promoting utilization within the framework of academic environments.
Distinctive for the IAM framework as a support system is exactly the fact that it is
based on the goal of promoting utilization as an integrated part of operational
work. Thus, it is not a support system that is primarily intended to uncover new
products, services or other ideas, even if this might very likely be one of the results.
Instead, it is principally a matter of developing a support system where academic
environments identify and administer research results that both represent and have
public value. The Innovation Office’s work with knowledge assets can create a
proactive process in relation to the academic environments, which gradually develop their organizational abilities to manage their research results. In the utilization
context, the prevailing “idea logic” is thus supplemented with a logic based on
intellectual assets.
An additional ambition of the KMP programme is to develop a support system
intended to create a process in which academic environments position themselves
and develop as collaborative actors in research and utilization arenas. This support
system is based on a logic that focuses on the academic environment in relation to
the surrounding world. Here, it is a matter of enabling academic environments to
position themselves to external research, external research collaboration or other
external collaboration and utilization processes in a structured way. Like the support system for making claims, a support system for positioning promotes a proactive development of organization ability within academic environments. The KMP
programme’s conclusion is that this support system, together with the support system for claiming intellectual assets, creates a more complete approach to collaboration and utilization within academic environments.
Once these two support systems have been implemented, a third support system
could be developed for making decisions about operational utilization and collaboration. Here, too, this support system should proactively stimulate academic environments to implement their action plans based on their concrete knowledge
assets. This involves enabling a process in which researchers and academic managers make decisions about and conduct concrete utilization activities within the
framework of responsibility as an authority. This means developing a support system with clearly-defined roles about collaboration and utilization activities within
the framework of academic activities. To a certain extent, it is the Innovation
Office that will have the ability to make decisions, e.g. when it comes to licensing
in the name of the public. The intention is for the support system to enable utilization decisions that are based on both the power as a public authority and upholding public responsibility.

283

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The fourth support system builds on the others and focuses on how knowledge
assets, intellectual property assets, contracts and other institutional creations
should be managed within the framework of the university’s activities in the long
term. Here, it is a question of developing the administrative management of intellectual assets.
Action plan to pave the way for these processes in the academic environment
Through the parallel evaluation processes discussed earlier in Part 2, we have been
able to determine that there are a number of processes that every academic environment should pursue in relation to collaboration and utilization:
● Dialogue on overarching objectives for the academic environment;
● Dialogue on the self-evaluation of the academic environment’s utilization
activities;
● Risk assessment and risk management.
Based on the general models presented here, we believe that the academic environment can and should adopt a collegial and dialogue-based approach to developing
its public responsibility. Depending on the academic environment’s ambitions and
existing processes, it it also possible to assess to what degree it should pursue IAM.
An academic environment can gain an understanding of what it should probably
do. As far as possible, it is important that academic environments make their ambitions concrete in a general action plan for utilization and innovation. This make
explicit the individual academic environment’s need and demand for support and an
advanced organizational capability.
As the action plan is developed, the importance of designating a specific person
with special responsibility for collaboration and promoting utilization will likely
become apparent. The point is that ensuring these efforts are part of a collegial
process that is integrated into daily activities has to be a defined responsibility of a
specific person. As this person is also the designated contact in interactions with
the Innovation Office, the Innovation Academy and, not least of all, the university
administration, we are laying the institutional foundation for the four key processes.
IAM framework with normative elements create four support systems
The KMP programme’s evaluation has focused on how the four key processes represented and prescribed by the IAM framework can be initiated. Through operative
management and critical reflection, we were gradually able to identify elements
that we believe should be included in the support systems. It has been a matter of
evaluating and testing which “institutional building blocks” are required for the
Swedish model.
It took a relatively long time to arrive at what we now view as the support system’s
main elements: 1) procedures for how the four key processes – to claim, position,
decide and organize – should be carried out; 2) models (decision-making support)
for which steps the processes should include; 3) other models for use as tools in

284

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

this work; 4) framework agreements and contract templates and; 5) information
sources and IT support. For us, these are crucial aspects of all support systems.
These elements within the support system link the operational work of promoting
utilization with the development of the university’s organizational capabilities as
discussed in Part 2.
CLAIM

DECI
DE

PROCESS
SUPPORT

POSIT
PO

PROCEDURES

ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION
AND UTILIZATION

MODELS
AND TOOLS

CONTRACT
TEMPLATES

IT
SOURCES

IT SUPPORT

Figure 59. Main elements of the support systems
Hence, the IAM framework contains four support systems, or alternatively, one
support system comprising four parts. The design of each support system is based
on a number of normative main elements. By implementing these in operational
management, four proactive key processes are generated that integrate the task of
promoting utilization into the academic environments’ activities. For each support
system, we have pinpointed a number of main elements:
Action plan for collaboration and utilization: The starting point is the academic
environment. As we have noted previously, we believe that all academic environments should establish an action plan that includes the environment’s goals and
also addresses possible risks. This plan serves an important purpose as underlying
support for all the processes defined in the framework. It will provide a basis for
the way academic environments claim intellectual assets, positions themselves,
make decisions about knowledge assets and handle these assets in a concrete way.
The obligation to prepare an action plan both sets the stage and stakes out the
course for development, in which the task of promoting utilization and innovation
will be integrated into the academic environment.

285

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures: It is the procedures that determine what is expected of the Innovation
Office and the academic environments. These define various responsibilities and
specify the circumstances in which different academic environments may receive
support from the Innovation Office. The procedures clarify how academic environments can claim, position, decide and manage. For each main process there is a
description of how models, contract templates, IT systems etc. can be used.
Combined, the procedures create an organizational system for operational work.
Process support: We have designed process support for each of the four main
processes. This lays the foundation for how the process can and should be conducted. It creates a structure for how the operational work can and should be implemented within the university as an organization. As a support model, the idea is to
create a core in a framework to related to when performing operational tasks,
rather than to lay out exactly how the processes should be designed and implemented This process support is more or less relevant in its application depending on the
prevailing circumstances, in as much as that demand and needs vary.
Models and tools: The tools models focus on certain important parts of the various processes where there is a clear need for operational capabilities. To a large
degree, it is a matter of conceptual models with a clear practical application.
Models exert a normative effect when various actors within the university adopt a
view of them as being key tools. For this reason, development work within the
KMP programme has focused on a handful of particularly important normative
processes.
Contract templates: The contract templates are a special category of tools. The
ambition is for there to be models/templates for use as guides for the various utilization activities when considering how an activity will be undertaken from an
operational standpoint. This is an obvious case in which, from the university’s
standpoint, there is a need for models that exert a normative effect on the academic environments. Through the templates, an understanding is gained of what things
should typically be considered when planning to develop a contractual relationship.
Sources: As stated, there is a major need and demand for access to sources from
which to retrieve supporting data and other information for decision-making purposes. The ambition is to make these sources explicit for the various processes.
IT support: The responsibility assigned the academic environments and the relatively advanced division of responsibility among the university’s various actors
results in a clear need for IT support.
The support systems have been designed based on the range of various services
offered to the academic environments by the Innovation Office. Many of these
tools and even the process support have been designed with the academic environments in mind. To varying degrees, they are also intended for use by researchers in
academic environments, by innovation advisors, corporate lawyers and by academic managers. However, staff should turn to the Innovation Office to secure support.
It can also be about creating opportunities to receive support from entrepreneurs’

286

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

schools, the university library and others. In this context, the educational initiative
and the more academically-inclined dialogues offered within the framework of
what is called the “Innovation Academy” are also of major importance. The
Innovation Academy has an important role to play in educating people about and
continuously critically analyzing the support systems, their components and how
they function in practice.

287

9. Claiming intellectual assets
9.1 Support system for claiming knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets
Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for identifying, analyzing
and claiming knowledge assets and intellectual property assets.
At the core of the KMP programme is the ability to identify and analyze research
results as intellectual assets.325 This ability lays the foundation for collaboration
based on ideas and knowledge. In principle, this entails identifying and deciding
which research results create value. Research results are claimed as objects, which,
in turn, can be controlled and transferred to other parties. The KMP programme
views this claim-staking process as a fundamental part of a proactive approach for
innovation offices.
It has been important in the KMP programme to try to determine what the evaluation and management of intellectual assets can mean for an academic organization.
At the forefront were the questions of how to manage research results and knowl-

CLAIM

DECIDE

Support system for identifying,
analyzing and claiming knowledge
assets and intellectual property
assets

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 60. Support system for claiming intellectual assets
325 In relation to the other support systems, this is primarily what the KMP programme has focused on. A great
deal of experimentation has been done.

288

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

edge assets and how to prepare for a new university model for collaboration and
utilization based on expanded public responsibility. We have worked with “intellectual assets” as a phenomenon while attempting to balance what can be viewed as
public resources with what can be viewed as private resources. The KMP programme has largely been about introducing an approach through which we manage
research results in order to create public resources.
It was obvious from the programme’s outset that the potential is huge. Gradually,
we determine how essential the management of intellectual assets is and will be in
the future for the development and management of collaboration and utilization
processes, but also of research and education processes. In our evaluation, we
identified the following processes:
● identification and claiming of knowledge assets
● analysis of the knowledge assets’ potential from research, utilization,
innovation and control perspectives
● analysis of existing and possible claims to rights and other claims to the
knowledge assets
● claiming intellectual property assets
A conclusion from the KMP programme is that these processes should be carried
out in academic environments on a regular basis. Far from every environment has

Process support
for
claiming
knowledge
assets

Tools for
categorizing
intellectual assets

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Procedures for
claiming
intellectual
assets

ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION
AND UTILIZATION

Sources of
research
and innovationrelated
information

CLAIM

Tools for
‘degunking’
knowledge assets
and managing
IPR claims

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets
and agreements
and managing
analytical
information

Figure 61. Elements of the support system for claiming knowledge assets

289

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

the same needs, however, and the needs that do exist can differ markedly. Thus,
procedures should be in place for identifying, claiming and analyzing whom the
processes are designed for and adapting them to suit various needs.
From an evaluation standpoint, we viewed it as important to develop tools for identifying, claiming and analyzing intellectual assets in academic organizations.
Specifically, this involved producing conceptual models that can be used by both
innovation advisors and researchers. The question of developing how the models
can be implemented as processes was also addressed. One principal task that arose
was to develop an overarching process support for the actual claim-staking process.
In this context, it became clear that there is a need for access to information
sources. We also realized the necessity of including IT support in the support system
for the portfolio management of knowledge assets, among other things.
The IAM framework for this first support system as refined within KMP includes the
following elements:
Action plan for collaboration and utilization: The support system has been developed based on the assumption that academic environments are responsible for
preparing an action plan for collaboration and utilization. This plan will indicate
what demand for support exists in the academic environment. This will serve as
the basis for which desired support measures can be initiated in the environment.326 In accordance with our proposal, an individual is designated at each
department with responsibility for ensuring that the plan is developed through a
collegial process. This appointed person will also serve as a contact in the department’s interaction with the Innovation Office and Innovation Academy. The action
plan will be supplemented with an asset list (IA list), road map for positioning and
concrete decisions etc. as the interaction develops.
Procedures for claiming intellectual assets: A key part of the evaluation is determining how to design procedures for the claiming of intellectual assets. This is the basis
for the “proactive system” of how the university promotes utilization within academic environments. It became clear that multiple procedures are required, depending on the need for support and demand that exists in the academic environments.
These procedures serve an important function in actualizing the norms and principles
established for role assignment, the management of knowledge assets and incentives
for researchers.
Process support for claiming knowledge assets: The support system in this case
focuses on finding for academic environments an appropriate process of claiming
knowledge assets. This process comprises the core of the support system and the
ambition is that every involved party should be able to relate their work to it.
Tools for categorization of intellectual assets: For obvious reasons, the model with
the greatest impact for the KMP programme deals with the categorization of intellectual assets. As a tool, it exerts a major normative effect because it explicitly
326 Elements that should probably be included in an action plan are discussed above in Section 8.2

290

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

specifies what research results typically constitute assets. It covers not just how to
categorize knowledge assets, but also emphasizes the intellectual property assets
and two categorizations based on how research results are managed in contractual
relationships and within the academic environment, respectively. Within the support system, it is intended to lay a common foundation for how to handle research
results in collaboration and utilization processes.
Tools for “degunking” knowledge assets, managing claims to rights and other
claims: The management of various claims to knowledge assets is another tool
very important for the KMP programme. This is especially important since the
rights to research results are largely held by stakeholders external to the university. This tool defines a number of processes that need to be continually applied in
academic environments. It also makes tangible operational process for claiming
and managing research results as intellectual assets.
Sources for research and innovation information: An important element in a support system is access to information sources and services that enable both
researchers and the Innovation Office to analyze research results. This is important
in the claiming of both knowledge assets and intellectual property assets.
IT support for documenting knowledge assets and managing analysis information:
The need for IT support has been understood since the KMP programme’s inception. The challenges of managing public documents and other public information
has resulted in the postponed until a later time.
All in all, it can be said that the KMP programme’s development work in this area
has been characterized by the conviction that identifying and evaluating research
results in the academic environment, rather than searching for ideas and patentable
inventions, is an approach best suited to Swedish conditions. It opens the way for
a more academic approach to collaboration and utilization. The Innovation Office
needs to develop reactive and proactive models for knowledge management and
transfer to the surrounding community. Developing and evaluating the various elements of the support system has taken many years. We have continuously tested,
criticized and refined our own models in existing projects and environments. We
are well aware that there is a need for further development and also for a running
critique of what has been achieved thus far.

9.2 Procedures for claiming intellectual assets
9.2.1 Evaluating which procedures to develop
It has been important to develop a number of procedures that specify the process
of how the university should claim knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets. Here, procedures refer to norms for the relevant support system. In the
KMP programme, we have focused on procedures for the Innovation Office, that is
to say, not for the university as an authority in its entirety. For claiming assets, the
procedures can be best constructed based on an IAM function/unit at the
Innovation Office.

291

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The work to investigate the need for procedures has been based on how the interaction between the academic environments and the Innovation Office should be
designed and carried out. As noted previously, the procedures are intended to
enable the implementation of the norms and suchlike identified during the evaluations in Part 2. Implementation is achieved by using the claim-staking process and
associated tools discussed. The KMP programme’s ambition has not been to formulate finalized procedures, but to attempt to specify a number of
principles/norms based on which procedures should be developed.
Differing procedures depending on the need for claiming knowledge assets
The KMP model for the utilization of research results depends on procedures for
claiming knowledge assets in academic environments. Instead of procedures stating
how researchers should report patentable inventions and ideas of commercial interest, the ambition is to develop proactive and reactive support systems, respectively,
for academic environments. We have determined that it is very important for
researchers and academic environments to receive advice and support concerning
utilization and innovation management related to research results and knowledge
assets as an integrated part of operations. Due to a lack of resources, it is not possible for an innovation office to manage claim-staking processes for all of the university’s academic environments. At the same time, there are relatively large differences in the level of need and demand for support among these environments.
Experience gained through the KMP programme suggests that it is possible to
develop this capability in academic environments by applying supporting models
and analytical tools. However, for some environments where more extensive management is needed, it is reasonable for the Innovation Office to assume greater
responsibility. Within the KMP programme it has been important to develop different procedures to suit the level of need and demand within the academic environ-

Tools for
categorizing
intellectual assets

Procedures
for claiming
intellectual
assets.
Sources of
research
and innovationrelated
information

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets
and agreements
and managing
analytical
information

Figure 62. Procedures for claiming intellectual assets

292

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Tools for
‘degunking’
knowledge assets
and managing
rights claims

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ment. This has been a matter of pinpointing a number of typical management
methods and principles for these.
Categorizing academic environments based on the need to stake claims
As discussed earlier, in an early phase of the KMP programme we began trying to
categorize academic environments based on their need for support in utilization
and innovation management. Our understanding is that academic environments
can be divided among the following categories:
● Academic environments strategic for the university (A Environment)
● Academic environments with strategic utilization projects (B Environment)
● Collaboration and utilization environments (C Environment)
We base the design of the various procedures on these categorizations. We realized
that the principal need is for a general procedure for managing research results. In
our estimation, this general procedure should address researchers and academic
environments in general. In addition to this procedure, we also identified the need
for two special procedures: one for innovation environments and one for environments for which owners have responsibility. We also recognized the importance of
having a special procedure for those cases where the university has taken over
research results for licensing purposes.
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

MANAGE

ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT
Operational
Responsibility

• Who are responsible for overseeing the process?
• How is operational responsibility for the various tasks divided
among the researchers, the Innovation Oﬃce and other actors?
• How should the various actors’ responsibilities be initiated?

Advice

• Who can provide advice and support?
• What kind of advice should be provided?
• How should advice and support be provided?
• How and when should advice/support be initiated?
• Which tools, models, contract templates and so on
do researchers and the academic environment
have access to?
• Which information sources and IT support do researchers and
the academic environment have access to?

Education

• Who can provide education and training?
• What kind of education and training should be provided?
• How are education and training conducted?
• How and when will education and training be initiated?

Figure 63. Questions as support when developing procedures
Over time, we identified a number of questions that the evaluation work began
focusing on answering. These questions can be used for all support systems.
Starting from these questions, we then established a number of principles on
which procedures should be based.

293

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

9.2.2 General procedures for researchers and academic environments when claiming
intellectual assets
One of the KMP programme’s greatest challenges was determining how the
“proactive” work for the innovation offices should be developed. We concluded
that we needed to introduce a work method where academic environments view it
as natural to contemplate which research resources they have created and that, in
some sense, should be utilized and managed in collaboration and utilization
processes. This can entail researchers and academic environments turning to the

GENERAL PROCEDURE FOR CLAIMING
INTELLECTUAL ASSETS

• The researchers and the academic environment have a collegial
responsibility, based on their action plan for innovation and utilization,
to identify, evaluate and claim intellectual assets, i.e. both knowledge assets
and intellectual property assets. However, the basic assumption is that it is
the researchers themselves who are responsible for making decisions about
whether or not this are needed.
• The academic environments should appoint a person to manage the
integration of the task of promoting utilization and innovation, who is also
responsible for the claim-staking processes.
• The head of department or a speciﬁc appointed academic manager is
responsible for the academic environment meeting contractual obligations
regarding intellectual assets.
• Researchers should be able to contact the Innovation Oﬃce for support
when analyzing intellectual assets.
• The Innovation Oﬃce should regularly conduct outreach eﬀorts to
demonstrate the relevance of staking intellectual assets claims.
• An academic environment and the Innovation Oﬃce can agree on how to
identifying and evaluating its intellectual assets.
• The academic environment is responsible for continuously updating
and maintaining its IA portfolio.
• Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Oﬃce should
provide access to tools, models and information sources for the
identiﬁcation and analysis of intellectual assets.
• The Innovation Academy should oﬀer customized training for individual
researchers and academic environments concerning the identiﬁcation,
analysis and claiming of intellectual assets.
• An academic environment’s researchers and the manager
are responsible for documenting, archiving and managing
conﬁdentiality requirements related to information about
intellectual assets.
• If researchers enter into an agreement to assign the intellectual
asset to the university, the Innovation Oﬃce assumes responsibility
for the claiming process.

Figure 64. General procedure for academic environments

294

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Innovation Office. It could also mean that it is possible to determine when the
Innovation Office needs to take more extensive responsibility.
The responsibility for identifying research results and for utilizing and managing
them collaboratively lies with the academic environment and the researchers
By default, the researchers and the academic environments are responsible for
deciding the extent of the need there is to identify and evaluate research results as
knowledge assets. In our view, each academic environment is responsible for
preparing an action plan for collaboration and utilization. This action plan will
define how to assess the need for making claims.
As noted earlier, needs will differ and depend on the particular academic environment. The researchers and the academic environments are also responsible for
determining the need to clarify and evaluate which intellectual property assets exist
in the academic environment. In line with the conclusions drawn above regarding
role allocation, it is important that researchers recognize their collegial responsibility, i.e. that managing knowledge assets and intellectual property assets is the
responsibility of the academic environment as a collective body. Furthermore, public responsibility must form the basis for assuming responsibility.
Person responsible for innovation and collaboration for an academic environment
One key norm is that a designated person must be responsible for integrating the
collaboration and utilization mission into the academic environment. This person is
required to encourage and enable collegial responsibility within the academic environment. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration has a coordinating role. This person serves as the liaison in the environment’s interaction with the
Innovation Office and Innovation Academy. It is preferable, but not critical, that
the person responsible for innovation and collaboration be delegated managerial
powers.
The academic manager is responsible for the academic environment meeting
contractual obligations for claims
To the extent that researchers participate in research collaborations and suchlike
that include an obligation to manage research results as knowledge assets, that is,
typically as background knowledge and project results, the managers of the academic environments must ensure that this is done in accordance with contractual
obligations.
Another norm concerns special contractual obligations related to clarifying knowledge assets. Where applicable, the academic environment must place special emphasis on ensuring that it fulfils these obligations. The managers of academic environments are responsible for ensuring that the university’s obligations as a party to a
contract are fulfilled. Doing so requires a clear procedure in which affected

295

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

researchers and department heads engage in an ongoing discussion about what is
needed for these obligations to be, or be able to be, met.
Researchers should be able to contact the Innovation Office for support
when analyzing knowledge assets
Most important in this context is the possibility for researchers to contact the
Innovation Office for advice. This advice may relate to how to use tools, models
and information sources. It might also concern specific issues to for which the
researcher could potentially be able to perform the actual analysis independently. It
is especially important that a procedure clearly defines a system for answering
questions and gaining access to support measures.
The Innovation Office should regularly conduct outreach efforts to demonstrate
the relevance of staking intellectual assets claims
The Innovation Office should continuously carry on outreach efforts to demonstrate the importance of identifying and claiming intellectual assets. Ordinarily, this
should occur when a special need exists, such as financing processes, research collaboration and utilization processes and other collaboration processes.

An academic environment and the Innovation Office can agree on how to identifying and evaluating its intellectual assets
Where a greater need for advice and support exists, it should be possible for the
academic environment to come to an agreement with the Innovation Office about
assuming responsibility. In such cases, the environment should be classified as a support environment (C Environment). The academic environment can agree with the
Innovation Office to allow staff from the Innovation Office to manage the identification and analysis of the research results as knowledge assets. Naturally, this
requires that the Innovation Office has, or can acquire, resources for the purpose.
The academic environment is responsible for continuously
updating and maintaining its IA portfolio
An important norm concerns the academic environment assuming long-term responsibility for maintaining and updating the IA portfolio. This is a tool that creates a
“portfolio overview” and that enables the research staff to assume collective responsibility. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration has a special
responsibility in this respect. It is a matter of ensuring that the academic environment has the necessary control over the intellectual assets. This includes the ability
to use infrastructure and opportunities for continued research.
Responsibility for collaboration and utilization becomes clear when there is an IA
portfolio to maintain and update. The IA portfolio represents the resources for
which the academic environment is responsible. Doing so requires collective partici-

296

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

pation by the academic environment’s staff. The responsibility for coordination
becomes concrete.
Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Office should provide access
to tools, models and information sources for the identification and analysis of
knowledge assets
An important norm in this respect concerns the Innovation Office and other actors
responsible for the support system ensuring that there are suitable tools, models and
information sources for researchers to use. A system needs to be developed in which
researchers can gain easy access to specific tools. Moreover, instructions and other
materials will likely be needed to enable researchers to use tools and sources.
The Innovation Academy should offer customized training for individual researchers
and academic environments concerning the identification, analysis and claiming of
intellectual assets
Researchers should have access to training about the identification and evaluation
of intellectual assets. As has been suggested previously, an innovation academy
should be established to offer this type of training for university staff responsible
for these areas. For some, an introductory course might suffice, while others may
require multiple training modules to allow them to conduct more comprehensive
analyses. The Innovation Academy has special responsibility for ensuring that person responsible for innovation and collaborations are suitably trained. There
should also be training initiatives aimed at the academic environment as a whole,
e.g. group-based training for academic environments. A clear system is needed for
determining how different people and environments can gain access to training on
identifying and evaluating research results.
An academic environment’s researchers and manager are responsible for
documenting, archiving and managing confidentiality related to information about
intellectual assets
The researchers are responsible for ensuring that the information generated is managed according to the applicable rules and the authority’s responsibility. Here, the
academic environment’s manager has a special responsibility as representative of
the public authority. This responsibility includes documentation, archiving and
managing confidentiality.
If researchers choose to utilize the value propositions from the innovation office
concerning university licensing, the Innovation Office assumes responsibility for
the claiming process
As noted earlier, a key element of the KMP programme is that the university
should offer to assume the rights to intellectual assets from researchers for licens-

297

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ing purposes. If employees choose to assign knowledge assets, the Innovation
Office will assume primary responsibility for staking claims.

9.2.3 Special procedure for academic environments with extensive collaboration and
utilization projects
The KMP programme sees a need for special procedures for environments that we
categorize as academic environments with strategic utilization projects (B Environments). As discussed in detail in Chapter 8, this is an environment for which the
university as an organization assumes responsibility for collaboration and utilization. In this case, the procedure we propose is a concrete result of the evaluation of
how the Innovation Office’s proactive work should be designed. The ambition is to
pave the way for an innovation office with a proactive ability to enter academic
environments with a substantial need for involvement on the part of the authority,
i.e. environments with extensive societal responsibility and involvement in collaboration. The proactive side is manifested concretely in the Innovation Office’s
assumption of special responsibility for identifying and evaluating knowledge
assets and intellectual property assets in the environment.
It is reasonable that the decision to classify an academic environment with strategic utilization projects (B Environment) can be made by the Innovation Office’s
manager in consultation with representatives from the relevant academic environment (person responsible for innovation and collaboration). As discussed in
Chapter 8, a running dialogue between the Innovation Office and managers at
various levels within the faculties is needed. Financing should be settled as much
as possible before making decisions. This can be achieved by the academic environment allocating resources, through external financing or through the university’s allocating resources centrally. To some extent, the Innovation Office should
also have resources to allocate.

In collaboration and utilzation environments, researchers have a collective
responsibility to identify knowledge assets
When an academic environment is involved in several different research collaborations and other collaboration and utilization processes simultaneously, the environment’s staff must take their collective responsibility for managing research results
very seriously. In accordance with the general procedure, the academic environment
has a special person responsible for innovation and collaboration who coordinates
this collegial responsibility. This person ensures that an action plan is prepared and
is used as a basis for the collegial claim-staking process.
In general, we were able to determine that the greater the amount of useful research
results held by an active academic environment, the more important it is to have a
common overview. In keeping with the discussion above, and not least of all in
light of the professor’s privilege, it is essential to have a norm concerning the collegial responsibility for identifying the environment’s knowledge assets.

298

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

SPECIAL PROCEDURES FOR CLAIMING
INTELLECTUAL ASSETS IN
STRATEGIC COLLABORATION
AND UTILIZATION ENVIRONMENTS

*If an academic environment carries on extensive innovation and
utilization processes, it is possible for it to be classiﬁed as
Strategic Collaboration and Utilization Environment (B Environment).
This means that the Innovation Oﬃce will assume a more proactive
responsibility for claiming knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets in the environment.
• In these environments, researchers have a collective responsibility
to identify intellectual assets.
• The Innovation Oﬃce assumes responsibility for the process of
analyzing intellectual assets and preparing an asset list.
• The Innovation Oﬃce assumes responsibility for evaluating intellectual
property assets and assessing the need for control.
• The Innovation Oﬃce should contribute to evaluating and clarifying
which researchers have generated which research results and which
claims to the rights exist.
• The academic environment is responsible for continuously updating
and maintaining the IA portfolio.
• Researchers are responsible for registering intellectual property rights.
• Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Oﬃce should
more systematically ensure access to tools, models, information sources
and support for the identiﬁcation and analysis of knowledge assets.
• The Innovation Academy should conduct more systematic training
for the academic environments that regularly claim knowledge assets
and intellectual property assets.
• The Innovation Oﬃce supports the academic environment’s
documentation, archiving and management of conﬁdentiality
related to information about knowledge assets.

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Figure 65. Special procedure for strategic collaboration and utilization environments

The Innovation Office assumes responsibility for the process of analyzing
knowledge assets and preparing an asset list
A key principle/norm is the Innovation Office’s responsibility for ensuring that the
academic environments have an overview of their research results. Established procedures specifying how innovation advisors and others should carry out interviews
and other information gathering activities are needed.

299

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The Innovation Office assumes responsibility for evaluating intellectual property
assets and assessing the need for control
For relevant environments, it is reasonable that the Innovation Office bears responsibility for evaluating and clarifying what control it is possible and appropriate to exercise over the knowledge assets. Here, too, it is important that a similar norm is translated into concrete management practice. The Innovation Office can and should contribute by preparing a list of intellectual property assets.

The Innovation Office should contribute to evaluating and clarifying which
researchers have generated which research results and which claims to the rights
exist
In relation to innovation environments, the Innovation Office should be responsible for determining which actors have claims on the knowledge assets identified
and for ensuring that it is possible for the academic environment to make decisions
about and manage the knowledge assets. It is important to have a procedure for
clarifying which claims to rights and other assets exist within academic environments. Doing so usually requires a professional analysis.

The academic environment is responsible for continuously updating and maintaining
the IA portfolio
In academic environments with strategic utilization projects, it is especially important that the responsibility for maintaining and updating the IA portfolio prepared
is collective. The person responsible for utilization and collaboration plays a decisive role in ensuring that the Innovation Office’s evaluation is actually put to use
and, moreover, continuously updated. Responsibility for ensuring that the academic
environment has the necessary control over the intellectual assets becomes even
more important.

Researchers are responsible for registering intellectual property rights
The experienced norm is as discussed that researchers own the rights to their
research results. As such, it is reasonable for the researchers to apply for patents
privately and in other ways stake legal claims to their knowledge assets. They are
also responsible for assessing what needs exist. If it is in the university’s interests
for the researchers to have intellectual property protection in place, it is reasonable
that the Innovation Office provide assistance. However, it is still the researchers
who are responsible for financing and for the actual handling of the application.
If the employees choose to allow the university to take over the rights to the intellectual assets, this changes the situation. In such cases, it is reasonable that the university assumes responsibility for financing the intellectual property protection (see
also Chapter 11).

300

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Office should more systematically ensure access to tools, models, information sources and support for the
identification and analysis of knowledge assets
The general procedures specify that the Innovation Office and other actors responsible for the support system need to ensure that there are suitable tools, models and
information sources for researchers to use. The Innovation Office and Innovation
Academy share joint responsibility for implementing a system through which
researchers are able to gain easy access to specific tools for the academic environments with strategic utilization projects.

The Innovation Academy should conduct more systematic training for the academic
environments that regularly claim knowledge assets and intellectual property assets
Concerning the academic environments with strategic utilization projects, the
Innovation Academy should be involved in the planning of a more systematic training initiative. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration within the
academic environment should come to an agreement with the Innovation Academy
on how training should be formulated over time. This should include role-specific
training, training in how to use specific tools in combination, and seminars.
The Innovation Office supports the academic environment’s documentation,
archiving and management of confidentiality related to information about
knowledge assets
The group of researchers and the Innovation Office jointly share responsibility for
ensuring documentation and archiving of registered claims. Academic environments with extensive collaboration projects may need more systematic management of these. For this reason, it is reasonable that the Innovation Office assumes
a greater responsibility.
9.2.4 Special procedure for academic environments where the university is responsible for managing knowledge assets in collaboration and utilization programmes
The KMP programme has concluded that a special procedure is needed for the
claiming and analysis of knowledge assets in academic environments strategic for
the university (A Environments), that is, where the university as an organization
assumes active, direct and long-term responsibility for collaborative efforts. Typical
for these environments is that the university takes on the responsibility to govern
research results and the rights to these results. This responsibility is delivered upon
by the Innovation Office, which continually monitors what is happening in the
academic environment. It is direct in the sense that it is the Innovation Office that
carries out concrete utilization and collaboration and utilization processes.
Moreover, the assumed responsibility is long-term. It is important to try to specify
in detail just how far into the future the responsibility extends. The head of department or faculty (or person with delegated authority to make such decisions) that

301

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

hosts the environment decides whether to become an environment that has the
responsibility to control and govern research results. This decision should be made
in consultation with the manager of the Innovation Office or the person to whom
authority has been delegated. Financing for the planned activity should be settled
as much as possible before making decisions.
The Innovation Office assumes an even greater responsibility for claiming intellectual assets in academic environments strategic for the university (A Environments).
The default is for these to be managed in the name of the university. The Innovation Office analyzes and categorizes the knowledge assets and prepares one or
more asset portfolios if this proves to be expedient. Up to this point, responsibility
does not differ greatly from the procedures for academic environments with strate-

SPECIAL PROCEDURES FOR CLAIMING
KNOWLEDGE ASSETS IN
UNIVERSITY STRATEGIC ENVIRONMENTS

*In certain circumstances, an academic environment can be classiﬁed
as an University Strategic Environment (A Environment).
A distinctive feature of this kind of environment is
that the university as an organization assumes an active, direct and
long-term responsibility for claiming intellectual assets.
• In these environments, researchers have a collective responsibility
to identify knowledge assets.
• The Innovation Oﬃce assumes responsibility for the process of
analyzing knowledge assets and preparing an asset list.
• The Innovation Oﬃce assumes responsibility for evaluating intellectual
property assets and assessing the need for control.
• The Innovation Oﬃce should contribute to evaluating and clarifying
which researchers have generated which research results and which
claims of intellectual property rights exists.
• The academic environment is proactivly responsible for continuously
updating and maintaining the IA portfolio.
• Researchers are responsible for registering intellectual property rights.
• Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Oﬃce should
more systematically ensure access to tools, models, information sources
and support for the identiﬁcation and analysis of knowledge assets.
• The Innovation Academy should conduct more systematic training for
the academic environments that regularly claim knowledge assets and
intellectual property assets.
• The Innovation Oﬃce supports the academic
environment’s documentation, archiving and management
of conﬁdentiality related to information about knowledge
assets.

Figure 66. Special procedure for university-strategic environments

302

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

gic utilization projects. The only real difference is that the Innovation Office also
assumes responsibility for the ongoing review and management of the IA portfolio
and, thereby, the intellectual asset portfolio. This, in itself, entails assuming significant responsibility. Doing so requires a procedure in which the Innovation Office
has a regular presence in the academic environment. The Innovation Office could
have a specific employee assigned for the relevant environment. This employee may
devote more or less time to the task, depending on the circumstances that apply.

9.3 Process support for claiming knowledge assets
9.3.1 Evaluation of the capture process in academic environments
The most noteworthy evaluation within the KMP programme concerns the
process of identifying and evaluating research results and how this can and should
be done in academic environments. Chapter 3 describes the process of claiming
intellectual assets as a way of evaluating academic environments. We have extensively tested and evaluated the IAM framework in a number of projects. One of
the purposes of this work has been to evaluate the efficacy of these types of tools
based on existing needs within the support system. This section is intended to provide an overall picture of the process and of certain considerations that it is based on.
At the core of our proposal for a support system lies a model for a claiming
process. From the Innovation Office’s perspective, this process defines the proactive approach to collaboration and the work to promote utilization. The process
clarifies which research results must be managed in collaboration and utilization
processes and which are important to utilize.

Tools for
categorizing
intellectual assets

Process support
for claiming
knowledge assets.

Sources of
research
and innovationrelated
information

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Tools for
‘degunking’
knowledge assets
and managing
rights claims

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets
and agreements
and managing
analytical
information

Figure 67. Model for process support when claiming knowledge assets

303

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

PROCESS SUPPORT
FOR CLAIMING KNOWLEDGE
ASSETS

Claim
research
value

Identify
research
results

Claim
control
position

Claim
utility

Create
asset
list
CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Figure 68. Claiming process for knowledge assets
The starting point for the process is the “cloud” of research results that exists in the
academic environment. The process begins by identifying what constitutes research
results and ends with the preparation of an asset list. The model stipulates a number
of steps to carry out. Each step is part of the process of collecting supporting data
for creating a list of clearly defined and evaluated assets.
Using a somewhat more sophisticated approach to intellectual assets makes evident
that precisely defining the knowledge and the intellectual property assets requires
some creativity. It is one thing to identify in more general terms what makes a
research result interesting, and another to clearly define and categorize knowledge
and intellectual property assets. The ambition to define and categorize requires an
analysis. The claiming process can be viewed as a semantic clarification and evaluation and to some extent even as a creative process.
The best semantic approach to claiming research results is by no means obvious.
Naturally, claiming research results of interest requires extensive knowledge, not
only of the specific research projects, but also of what other researchers have perforrmed.

304

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The semantic claiming of an object has a strong communicative power and character. As such, a claiming process should be based on analysis and reflection.
Innovation offices supporting academic environments should conduct both source
analyses and interviews based on a number of set and carefully prepared questions. The sources used should be defined for each step. In certain contexts, it is
important to go through these steps carefully and to use detailed follow-up analyses. In other cases, the steps constitute more of a conceptual model that should be
related to when determining in a more schematic way which research results
should be managed for the academic environment.
9.3.2 Identification of knowledge assets
The first step in a claim-staking process is to identify the knowledge assets. In principle, this involves an initial objectification of what is thought to create value and
as having value creation potential. Identifying research results as knowledge assets
involves two approaches:
1) identifying knowledge assets through an understanding of what the research
results are, and based on general ideas about what is and can become valuecreating and;
2) identifying knowledge assets by applying a system of different categories and
definitions of these assets.
Both approaches are important in this first step. It is important to keep in mind
that it is always a matter of pinpointing what has the potential to create value.327

IDENTIFY RESEARCH RESULTS AND CONDUCT
AN INITIAL CATEGORIZATION OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS
The identiﬁcation process consists of two steps:
Describe research results
First and foremost, this is a matter of identifying and
capturing what constitutes the important research results.
Apply asset categories
Identify research results based on the categorization
of knowledge assets:
• Data
• Database
• Data Correlation
• Theoretical framework
• Solution
• Visualization
• Instruction
• Software
• Narrative
• Creation
* This application creates a hypothetical asset list to use
in the on-going claim-staking process.

The identiﬁcation process is facilitated by two
conceptual evaluation processes:
Background, aims and application
The ﬁrst process aims to clarify:
• What are we trying to accomplish in the group?
• What are our research questions and how do we divide
them into sub-questions?
• What underlying needs and demand are behind our
research?
• What application do we believe our research has?
Activities within the research group
The second process aims to create an overview of the
activities within the group:
• What are our objective and plans?
• Which are our key publications?
• How do we describe our research in funding
applications?
• Do we have any patent applications
IDENTIFY
or patents in which we describe
RESEARCH RESULTS
results?

Figure 69. Identifying research results
327 For example, see the blog at: http://blog.iamanager.se/5-techniques-for-identifying-intellectual-assets/

305

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

At the same time, a framework of various categories is clearly needed to determine
what can typically be considered as assets.
Identifying research results based on an understanding of what could conceivably
be, or may become, value-creating
The most important element in the identification process is to gain an understanding of what constitutes the most important research result. In principle, this
involves pinpointing what research result the academic environment considers
important to utilize or, in some other way, to manage in collaborative relationships. To facilitate this process, we have identified a number of typical steps and
questions that can be used. One initial step is to hold a dialogue about background, objectives and application. Questions for discussion might include:
● What are we trying to achieve through our research?
● What are our research questions?
● What underlying needs and demand justify our research?
● How far have we progressed in our research process?
● What application do we consider that our research typically can and should
have?
A second step, which is not easily separated from the first, is to hold an in-depth
dialogue within the group about the work being done. Some examples of questions
to raise in this case are:
● What concrete research is now being conducted and will be conducted in
the future within the environment?
● Which key publications do we intend to use for reporting our results?
● How do we describe our research in project reports and in financing
applications?
● How do we describe our research results in patent applications, contracts
and other policy documents?
This dialogue enables researchers to together identify important knowledge assets
beyond just from a strict research perspective. If the person responsible for the
identification process works at the Innovation Office and does not have sufficient
knowledge about the academic environment, it is important to that this person
acquire a good understanding of what the research consists of before beginning a
dialogue with the researchers. More concretely, the identification process itself is
conducted through systematic interviews with researchers and through analyses of
publications and other source materials.
Identifying knowledge assets by applying a system of different categories and
definitions of knowledge assets
On one level, identifying the intellectual asset is first and foremost a semantic exercise. We attach a descriptive attribute to that which we perceive to be a research
result, after which we describe it as precisely and concisely as possible. There is no
denying that doing so requires certain abilities, semantic abilities. The majority of
us require tools to assist us with the exercise. The KMP programme’s multi-year

306

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

evaluation has revealed the importance of access to a tool for categorizing research
results. A model that categorizes research results creates a powerful, proactive tool
for cataloguing and understanding academic environments. Objectification is made
easier by applying the actual categories to a certain academic environment and its
assets. Within the KMP programme we have developed the following categories
(see also the next section):
● Data
● Database
● Observation
● Theoretical framework
● Technical solution
● Visualization
● Instruction
● Software
● Narrative
● Creation
Using these categories as a basis, a more or less systematized asset list can be prepared. It is important to be aware that this categorization is only an aid. Our ambition has been to develop categories that can be used to the greatest extent possible.
We realize that they involve a certain bias. Thus far, it has been more natural in
scientific, medical and technical contexts to approach research results as knowledge-based objects. It is especially important that the Innovation Office be aware of
this. It is imperative to attempt to understand the research group’s taxonomy early
on, as using a common terminology greatly expedites the establishment of a useful
identification and classification process.
Identifying actors involved
A key element in the identification process is identifying which researchers are
behind the relevant knowledge assets. Which researchers create the research result?
It is also important to identify which researchers have enough knowledge about the
research to be able to explain and apply the research result. Which researchers are
carriers of the knowledge assets, so to speak?
9.3.3 Claiming scientific value
As such, a claiming process can be viewed as a semantic process by which a
research result is objectified. It is a matter of assigning the object a designation
(descriptive attribute), describing the result itself and possibly also categorizing it.
The description is most important. This is what makes the knowledge asset manageable. If, for example, a certain research result is to be assigned to a collaborative research parties as background knowledge, it needs to be clear exactly what is
to be communicated from a scientific perspective.
In an academic context, it is obvious that a description is based first and foremost
on the scientific process. When viewed as a process, claiming knowledge assets will

307

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

always be based on more or less extensive scientific understanding/analysis. Thus,
within the framework developed, we realized the importance of combining a
description of a knowledge asset based on its scientific value with an analysis of the
research result based on a number of assessment parameters.

CLARIFY AND ANALYZE THE
RESEARCH VALUE OF THE RESULTS
Describe the research results based on
their scientiﬁc character
Describe the knowledge assets based on their nature
as research results. Questions to consider:
• What are the main research challenges and to what
extent can the knowledge asset be described as a
building block that has been developed and used to
handle the challenges?
• If we plot the internal research work on a timeline,
how has our research evolved and how important is
each knowledge asset?
• What research do other research groups conduct,
what are their results and what distinguishes our
knowledge assets?

Specify the research-related value of the results
• How unique and important is the research result/
knowledge asset from a scientiﬁc perspective?
• What value does the knowledge asset have in
further research?
• What is the value of the knowledge asset in
establishing research collaborations?
• What is the value of the knowledge asset in
developing the research group’s qualiﬁcations, etc.?
• What is the value of the knowledge asset in securing
future research funding?

• How is the research area developing, what can we
expect in terms of future signiﬁcant results and how
important are our knowledge assets in this process?

CLAIM RESEARCH
VALUE

Figure 70. Claiming scientific value
Description of the research results based on scientific character
A key element in the claiming process is describing knowledge assets based on
their character as scientific results. As previously noted, this can be more or less
critical depending on the need for detailed specification. From the evaluations we
performed we have been able to pinpoint a number of questions that reveal important characteristics relevant to the description. One typical question is: what are
the main research-related challenges and how can the knowledge assets be understood as building blocks that have emerged and are used to handle these challenges?
Another relevant question if we consider internal research on a time axis is: how
has the research developed and how important is each respective knowledge asset
in this process? As previously stated, it is always useful to situate one’s own
research in relation to third-parties’ research when describing its scientific character
and value. What research are other groups conducting, what results have they generated and what distinguishes our knowledge assets from theirs? Considering other
research makes it possible to discuss how the research field is developing. This
allows us to reason and reflect on the importance of our own research results in
future scientific development.

308

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Defining the research value of the results
When describing the research result’s scientific character and value, it is logical to
also do an assessment based on several questions. One key question in this context
is how scientifically unique and significant the research result is. A related question
is how valuable a specific research result is to one’s own continued research.
Equally important is determining how valuable the research result is in establishing
research collaboration relationships. It is impossible not to ask to what degree one’s
own academic qualifications benefit. Naturally, the result’s value for securing future
research funding is also of interest. These questions are all parameters that can be
used when grading the knowledge asset. Overall, this provides an overview of the
portfolio of specific knowledge assets (see below concerning IA portfolios).
Evaluating researchers and their claims
An additional parallel process when claiming and analyzing the knowledge asset
based on its scientific value is the more detailed examination of the researchers’
creative contributions.328 A detailed understanding of who is responsible for which
creative efforts is often desirable and important. This lays the foundation for,
among other things, establishing who should be viewed as the inventors. While
discussing and analyzing concrete scientific contributions, the individuals made
them should be clarified.
9.3.4 Staking a claim to the research result’s utility
Another important step in the claiming process is describing the research result
from a utility and usage standpoint. How can it be used and what benefit does it
offer? This description explains the research result in more detail and provides
important nuances about the research. Ultimately, the utility aspect is part of what
makes up the knowledge asset. Once again, this approach is more natural in connection with technical, medical and scientific research. Within the sphere of the
natural sciences, there is now a relatively well-established tradition of devoting
resources to the “verification” and “valorization” of research results from a utility
perspective. Within medical research, for example, “translational medicine” is an
established term which focuses on use and benefit. The KMP programme’s evaluation shows that this approach is suitable for all research areas. All research results
have a utility aspect based on some form or logic. In other words, benefit and use
can be described for a specific research result regardless of the nature of the field.
Similarly, to the research value discussion, analyzing the perceived degree of benefit
value is logical when describing utility. It is also feasible to prepare a number of
questions that make it possibly to assign the specific research result a rough grade
for its importance. Once again, it should be emphasized that this is done primarily
328 For a more detailed discussion, see Section 9.5.

309

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLARIFY AND ANALYZE THE RESEARCH RESULTS’ AREAS
OF APPLICATION AND UTILITY
Describe the research results’ areas of
application and utility
Describe the knowledge assets based on their nature as
phenomena that can be utilized. Questions to consider:
• What are the research’s areas of application, what
are the beneﬁts and what does each knowledge
asset contribute?
• What speciﬁc processes, activities, products, services,
etc., can we envisage that the research enables and
what is the speciﬁc contribution made by each
knowledge asset?
• What speciﬁc processes, operations, etc. exist today
and what is the ‘gap’ that prevents our knowledge
assets from being utilized?
• What alternative solutions, processes, etc., is research
being conducted on, how close are these to being
implemented and how does this aﬀect the importance
of our knowledge assets?
• What risks and negative consequences are associated
with the utilization of our knowledge assets?

Specify the research result’s utility value
• How unique and important is the research result/
knowledge asset in creating social beneﬁt?
• How extensive is the need for development before
the knowledge asset can be utilized?
• How important is it that the knowledge asset is
utilized by transferring it to speciﬁc stake holders?
• How important is it that the knowledge asset is
included in an innovation process in order to be
utilized, i.e. it is not suﬃcient for it to be published, etc.?
• What preconditions exist for the researchers to be
able to commercialize the knowledge assets?

CLAIM
UTILITY

Figure 71. Claiming benefit

to gain a better understanding of the research result as a knowledge asset. It is not
about establishing its value in a economic sense.
Description of the research result’s areas of application and utility
In the same way as for scientific value, it may be appropriate to pose a number of
questions that generate supporting data on which to base a description. In simple
terms, the description of use and utility should include the new and valuable effects
that can be achieved by making use of the research result based on its researchrelated description. Thus, a possible first question is which areas of application the
research result has and what the positive effects derived from it are or are expected
to be. Another, more specific approach is to focus on the more concrete applications. Which concrete processes, activities, products, services and so on can the
research result make possible? We have also been able to establish that a comparison with what already exists is very important in facilitating a description of what
is unique about one’s own knowledge asset. One pertinent question is which concrete processes, activities and so on exist at present and what gap currently prevents
our knowledge assets from being used. No less important is the question of which
alternative solutions, processes and so on are being researched, how close these are
to implementation, and how this affects the relevance of our existing knowledge
assets. Moreover, it is appropriate to discuss the possible negative consequences and
risks of applying research results. What risks and negative consequences do we see
in connection with the utilization of our knowledge assets? All in all, the task is to
semantically concretize/claim the research result from a utilization perspective.

310

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Detailing the research result’s “utility value”
When claiming knowledge assets, their value should be analyzed. This can be done
through two processes that support one another. To a greater or lesser degree, the
process of analyzing and defining utility value requires some form of external analysis. A person from the innovation office needs to interview the people within the
academic environment and analyze separate, external knowledge sources. Some
examples of questions that can be used as parameters in the analysis of utility value
follow:
● How unique and important is the research result/are the knowledge assets in
generating societal value/public benefit?
● What additional development is required to be able to utilize the knowledge
asset?
● How important is it that the knowledge asset be utilized through its transfer
to direct, specific recipients?
● How important is it that the knowledge asset be included in an innovation
process for it to be utilized (i.e., publication is insufficient)?
In this respect, the analyses allow the knowledge assets to be graded in relation to
one another. From a portfolio standpoint, this provides an overview of the
research result that will assist the academic environment in its decision-making
process.
Determining which stakeholders exist for the research result
There is also reason to analyze claims to research results when claiming benefit.
Stakeholders should be identified who have not been involved in the actual
research, but who may nevertheless have some kind of claim to or interest in
the research result. Doing so facilitates many of the deliberations that need to be
undertaken.
9.3.5 Claiming control of the research result
A fourth step is claiming research results as a control position. Experience has
shown that the “control” of the research result is an aspect of the knowledge asset
that needs to be described. Similarly to what has been previously described, the
process consists of three parallel elements: 1) a description of possible control
claims 2) an evaluation of “degree of control” and 3) the determining of who has
control claims.
Describing the research result from a control position
The main task here is to describe the research result based on opportunities for control. Within the framework of the KMP programme, we have analyzed what we
mean by “control”. In academic contexts, the need for control differs from that
needed by a company active in the product development field, for example. It is true

311

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLARIFY AND ANALYZE THE
RESEARCH RESULTS’ CONTROL POSITION
Describe the research results’
control position

Specify the need for and degree of control
over the research results

Describe the knowledge assets based on the need for
objectification and the opportunities for control.
Questions to consider:

• To what extent is it important to have control over
knowledge assets in order to make their utilization
possible?
• To what extent can we utilize knowledge assets
without risking infringing on others’ rights
(freedom to operate)?
• How strong/comprehensive are control positions or
possible control positions based on:
• IPR
• secrecy
• management of contractual relationships
• IT systems
• dependence on individuals.
• To what extent can we clarify who holds relevant IPRs?

• Which knowledge assets are patentable, subject to
copyright protection, or otherwise controlled by
intellectual property laws?
• Can we dispose of knowledge assets without risking
infringing on others’ intellectual property?
• Regarding the knowledge assets, is it important and
possible to argue that they include secrets and are
subject to conﬁdentiality?
• Can we govern and manage the control of knowledge
assets using contracts?
• Is it possible to control knowledge assets through
databases, systems and other technological solutions?
• Does the opportunity to utilize depend on researchers
supplying the knowledge assets themselves?
• Does utilizing knowledge assets require receiving
permission from others?

CLAIM CONTROL
POSITION

Figure 72. Claiming a control position

that it may be important in an academic context to enable another stakeholder to
protect research results linked to manufacturing products. On the other hand, the
ability to control the publication of research results is always relevant. For example,
we make regular use of copyright claims when publishing books and articles. In this
respect, the KMP programme looked at how knowledge assets in academic environments are and can be covered by:
● control based on intellectual property rights
● control based on confidentiality
● control based on relationships
● control based on technology
● control based on dependence on an individual
For control based on intellectual property rights, we can ask whether the research
result is patentable, covered by copyright protection, or can in some other way be
controlled through intellectual property rights. The control-related analysis allows
us to identify intellectual property assets such as copyrighted works, patentable
inventions, designs eligible for protection and more. We can also ask whether control knowledge of assets is possible without risking infringing on others’ intellectual
property rights; that is, whether or not we might end up in a state of dependence on
another’s party’s intellectual property rights. For control based on copyright, we
should distinguish between situations where the copyright enables control over the
research result itself, and when it only enables control over a means of communicating research results. The copyright to a scientific article does not prevent others
from using the research result therein. The situation is different when the research
result is computer software. We can use the copyright to direct the use of the software, even in research contexts.

312

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

A less relevant and uncommon form of control in academic contexts is control
based on confidentiality. Keeping research results confidential has always been an
important form of control in private business. In the case of publicly-financed
research, it is only in exceptional cases that this form of control becomes relevant.
An example of this would be research cooperation with external parties where
there is a clear need for confidentiality. Naturally, until a patent application has
been filed, confidentiality is critical.
Less obvious, but still of major importance in academic contexts, is the relationship-based form of control. We ask ourselves whether we can influence and manage control of the research result through contracts. Does the research result constitute background knowledge and project results in contractual relationships?
This offers both opportunities and limitations: Contract documents in themselves
are a form of control and, thereby, the ability to define research results as subject
to contractual transactions is itself a form of control.
Of equal interest in the academic context is the technology-based form of control.
Is the research result included in digital databases or other IT systems? In principle, all forms of research result can be controlled using various technical media. It
is this opportunity for control that, to a large extent, has paved the way for the
much discussed fourth logic of promoting utilization.
Another form of control of interest in the academic context is the control that
exists because research results simply cannot be conveyed without the participation
of the researchers involved. In such situations, research results can be described as
human capital, that is to say, closely associated with individuals and their abilities.
This form of control also gives rise to both opportunities and limitations. When
viewed in light of the ambition to disseminate knowledge as widely as possible, this
very likely creates limitations.
Consequently, research result can be described as protectable under intellectual
property law, confidential, contractually regulated background knowledge and
other objects controlled by contracts, components of technical systems or human
capital.
Detailing the degree of control over the research result
The degree of control should also be analyzed and determined. Here, too, it is a matter of creating parameters that determine the knowledge asset list in an illustrative
way. Here also, there are various questions on which this can be based. We have
found that relevant questions might include the following:
● To what degree is it important to have control over the knowledge assets to
enable their intended utilization?
● To what degree can we control the knowledge assets without risking infringing on another’s rights (freedom to operate)?
● How “strong/comprehensive” are the control positions or possible control
positions based on:
● intellectual property rights

313

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

confidentiality
the management of contractual relationships
● IT systems
● dependence on individuals.
● To what degree is it clear what claims to rights exist?
●
●

Hence, the overview this provides supplements the understanding gained through
a concise description. As noted, it is important to emphasize that it is not relevant
to conduct this type of analysis for every environment.
Evaluating legal claims of various stakeholders
The third parallel sub-process concerns identifying who are the legal owners of
existing and potential intellectual property rights. The basic premise here is that it is
the person who generated the research result who has the right to apply for a
patent, hold the copyright and so on. The determination of existing stakeholders
may show that research financiers, partners or others may have taken over the
rights. Another interesting aspect to assess is who may claim that they have some
form of licence to use intellectual property assets.
9.3.6 Preparing an asset list
According to this model, the final step involves the process of preparing an asset
list. The idea is to gather the information generated during the first four steps and
to make it usable. As noted earlier, one of the KMP programme’s main ambitions is
to enable staff to assume collegial responsibility for collaboration and utilization.
The programme’s evaluation has shown that an intellectual asset (IA) portfolio has
enormous potential in this respect. The asset list can be viewed as an inventory of
common research results within a specific academic environment.
ID

Category

Objectification

Scientific Result

Social Benefit

Control

IA01

Categorization
of the
knowledge asset

Description of the
research result as
an object

Description of the
result based on its
scientiﬁc value

Description of the
applications
and utility of the
research result

Description of the
result based on the
possibilities to
control it

IA02

IA04

IA03

Data correlations

IA04

Theoretical
framework

CREATE
ASSET LIST

Figure 73. Asset list
Similar to a warehouse, this inventory of research results lays the foundation for
manageability. To that extent, the inventory list has a normative function as relates
to the perception of the assets. The research group gains an overview of the
research results. The asset list clarifies the research group’s research results by pro-

314

ID
IA01

Objectification
Research
information

Scientific
PatentResult
information

A method for determining if a patient who
is not undergoing
statin therapy risks
suﬀering an acute
myocardial infarction
by analyzing lipid
– lipid concentrations

• New and
unpublished method
• Enables further
research on acute
myocardial infarction

Category
Solution

Social
Benefit
• Potential to diagnose
early and thus reduce
mortality caused
by acute myocardial
infarction

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Control
• Patent application
submitted
• Published

• Reduced
healthcare costs

IA02

Observation

Observations about the
relationship between an
individual’s cholesterol
levels and the applicability of the biomarker
method (IA01)

• New suggestions
for studies of the
relationship between
cholesterol levels and
acute myocardial
infarction

• Increased
eﬀectiveness in IA01
and, thereby, reduced
mortality and
healthcare costs

• Trade secret

IA03

Instruction

Instruction (SOP) about
steps for applying IA01

• Limited
scientiﬁc
value per se

• Prerequisite for IA01

• Published

IAn

...

...

...

...

...

Figure 74. Example of an asset list
viding a high-definition picture of the research and a detailed description of the
research’s intellectual property components. Preparing the list is a dialogue-based
process within the academic environment.329
Steps for creating an overview document
Information about knowledge assets is entered on the IA portfolio in a way that
provides a simple overview. Based on the categorization made, we build up a
description based on the various steps for making claims. Each knowledge asset is
described in terms of its scientific character, public benefit and control. The list
makes it possible to manage each individual knowledge asset, but also the portfolio of knowledge assets in its entirety. Clarity is key. Concise descriptions provide
the required simplicity. At the same time, the knowledge assets are also made concrete. References to more detailed descriptions can and should be added.
“Tagging” knowledge assets
The list will be even more useful when the knowledge assets are related to other
information gathered during the evaluation. This is known as “tagging”. The more
detailed the information about the knowledge assets, the greater the potential for
successfully managing each asset and the portfolio as a whole. The KMP programme, we gradually developed a number of tags that may prove extremely useful. One of these is describing the extent to which knowledge assets are used as
background knowledge and/or constitute project results in knowledge develop329 Again, it is important to emphasize that far from all academic environments have a need for such detailed lists
of knowledge assets as discussed here. It may well suffice to have more schematically-compiled descriptions of the
academic environment's research results. In other contexts, it may be appropriate to adopt specific parts of what is
suggested here.

315

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ID

Background Knowledge (BK)
and Project Results (PR)

Link to IPR
The intellectual
property assets that
include the results

The collaborations/
contracts where
the results are
background knowledge respectively
project results

IA01

Use in the Environment

Link to Utilization

To what degree are
the research results
infrastructure and
repeatedly used
in the environment

Speciﬁcation of
utilization based on
utilization logic

IA02
CREATE
ASSET LIST

IA03
IA04

Figure 75. Asset list with “tags”
ment projects. Another is describing how the knowledge asset is used in the academic environment. For example, is the knowledge asset an infrastructure asset;
that is, a resource used in day-to-day research activities? Another “tag” describes
how the knowledge asset is utilized. This information can be added relatively easily by stating the chosen utilization logic with more concrete information.
Furthermore, information should be added about the link between the various
knowledge assets and intellectual property assets. To gain an overview, it may be
enough to add cross references between claimed knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets. More detailed evaluations can be made available through these references.
The IA portfolio provides a simple overview of both what can be described as the
Background Knowledge (BK) and
Link to IPR Research information
Use in the Environment
Patent
Project Results
(PR) information

ID
IA01

IA02

Patent application:
Family US2014/0303011A1
(IP01)

Trade secret IP07

• BK in collaboration with
the University of
Phoenix

• Comprises a research
object in itself

• PR in the SAM Project
ﬁnanced by VINNOVA

• Basis for use in
generating new
research results for acute
myocardial infarction

• PR in the SAM Project
ﬁnanced by VINNOVA

• New proposals for
studies of the
relationship
between

Link to Utilization
• Has been published and
has the potential for
additional knowledge
dissemination through
publication
• Potential for innovation
projects through
licensing or
• Potential for additional
knowledge dissemination
through publication
• Potential for innovation
projects

IA03

IA04

...

...

• BK in collaboration with
the University of
Phoenix
vPR in the SAM Project

• Used to ensure
quality in research

...

...

Figure 76. Example of an asset list with “tags”

316

• Limited scientiﬁc
value per se

• Published

...

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

asset level and the portfolio level. In the former, we can register how the asset is
used and its importance for the academic environment. It provides an overview of
whether (and if so, how) the asset is covered by contracts and subject to intellectual
property law. The portfolio level provides a collected picture of how the academic
environment’s research results are used. It makes clear which results have become
particularly important. This makes it easier to conduct activities collegially and also
to make prioritizations.

“Tagging” connections to individuals
The asset list should also contain information the connections between specific
knowledge assets and various actors. For each knowledge asset, information
should be entered about who generated the research result. When relevant, details
should also be added about individuals who have such in-depth knowledge of the
Actors with
Utilization Rights

ID

Creators

Carriers

Right Holders

IA01

The individuals
that created the
research results

The individuals
that have
internalized the
result and can be
part in the utilization

The persons that can
claim intellectual
property right to the
research results

The persons that
are entitled to
exploit research
results

Level of
Uncertainty
How certain or
uncertain are the
various claims that
have been made
and may be made

IA02
CREATE ASSET LIST

IA03
IA04

Figure 77. Asset list with “personal tags”
ID

Creators

IA01

• Prof. Anna Hydén

Actors with
Utilization Rights

Carriers
Research information

Rights
Holders
Patent
information

• Prof. Anna Hydén

• Prof. Anna Hydén

• Prof. Anna Hydén

• PhD Olof Wessman

• PhD Olof Wessman

• PhD Olof Wessman
*University of Phoenix

IA02

• Prof. Anna Hydén

• Prof. Anna Hydén

• Unclear

• PhD Joseﬁn Strömberg • PhD Olof Wessman

• PhD Olof Wessman

• PhD Joseﬁn Strömberg • PhD Olof Wessman

• High level of certainty:
Based on interviews
with researchers
• No legal or contractual
analysis has been
conducted
• Agreement in place
with UoP
• Low level of uncertainty:
Based on interviews
with researchers.
Situation unclear.

• PhD Joseﬁn Strömberg

• PhD Joseﬁn Strömberg

IA03

• Prof. Anna Hydén

Level of Uncertainty

...

• PhD Joseﬁn Strömberg

• No limitations
(public)

• Low level of
uncertainty given
publication

Figure 78. Example of an asset list with “personal tags”

317

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

research result that they are able to convey and apply it in practice. If the knowledge asset includes an intellectual property asset, it is also useful to know who
holds this right (title). It is also useful to know which stakeholders have permission to utilize the knowledge assets and in what ways. This may involve specifying
different forms of licences; what it relates to (e.g., for research or also for utilization) and whether it is in any way exclusive.
It is generally important to clarify how well substantiate the information is.
Often, there are not only differing, but even contradictory opinions. It is important to indicate in the asset list whether the supporting data is well substantiated
or not.
ID

Prof. AnnaResearch
Hydén information

PhD Olof Wessman

PhD Josefin Strömberg

IA01
IA02
IA03
IA04
IA05
IA06
IA07
IA08
IA09
IA10

Figure 79. Examples of asset bearers
The asset list allows us to clearly see which people are associated with the asset.
The portfolio allows us to clearly see which researchers have contributed and in
what way. We gain an overview of various rights claims to the knowledge assets
and who has been granted the right to use these. This highlights how an IA portfolio can be an active document in strategy and decision-making contexts.
Portfolio overview based on “value analyses”
The IA list generates decision data that has been collected on value levels and control levels. Setting up our evaluated parameters on different axes easily reveals a
great deal of knowledge about our portfolio.330 By switching between various
assessments and contrasting them with one another, we gain supporting data for
330 The practical work with the model grades the outcomes of the various assessments. Based on these numerical
grades, we can then create various visualizations.

318

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 80. Example of a portfolio evaluation based on value and control (The dots
represent specific knowledge assets)

Value potential for utilization in
licensing relationship 1

IA02

IA01

IA14

High

IA03

IA12
IA08

IA06

IA05

Medium

SMSA project
DISA project
Low

Low

Medium

High

Value potential for
publication

Figure 81. Example of an evaluation in which publication and research opportunities
related to IA08 and IA05 should be specifically managed when licensing the DILA project

319

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Value potential for utilization in
licensing relationship 1

Should be

Published

Part of
WO2014046871
A1 (IP02)

IA14

High

IA03

IA12
IA08

• Database
• Copyright

IA05

Medium

• Non-patentable type
• Managed as
trade secret
SMSA project
DISA project

Low

Non-patentable

Potentially
patentable

Patent-based
Patent application Patent application control
submitted
approved

Figure 82. Example of an evaluation in which the biomechanic control system IA14 should
possibly be patented
determining the best way to plan research, what research we should seek funding
for, the approach we should have for control claims, and when we need to act collectively. We can also visualize research results based on the potential for their utilization. The visualization of the control situation can be used in decision making
on how assets can be utilized.

9.4 Tools for categorizing intellectual assets
9.4.1 Evaluation of categorization model when claiming intellectual assets
The KMP programme viewed the claiming process as a proactive process that
defined the transition to a system where academic environments manage collaboration and utilization as a process integrated with their ordinary activities. In this
context, we were able to determine that claiming research results based on a model
for categorizing knowledge assets has a significant normative effect and is a powerful tool. Even prior to the KMP programme’s inception, we declared our belief
that a categorization model is fundamental for an innovation office that intends to
assume more proactive responsibility with academic environments.331 We understood that the model has a strong normative effect, and we took pains to stress
that it must be built on a solid foundation.

331 After a number of preliminary pilot projects with parties from the CIP, and in parallel with the KMP programme,
Innovationskontor Väst chose to create a model for categorizing intellectual assets (IA Inventory).

320

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Process support
for
claiming
knowledge
assets

Process support

Tools for
‘degunking’
knowledge assets
and managing
rights claims

ACTION PLAN FOR
INNOVATION AND
UTILIZATION

Tools for
categorizing
intellectual assets.

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets
and agreements
and managing
analytical
information

Figure 83. Tools for categorizing intellectual assets

For this reason, we worked hard to design a tool with useful categories. The primary focus has been to identify functional categorizations, many of which have
been tested over several years within the sphere of the Center for Intellectual
Property (CIP).332 Initially, we viewed the KMP programme as a kind of “proof of
concept” within public research. The KMP programme wanted to test and, when
necessary, adapt this tool to make it useful for both academics and utilization
experts within the university.
Intellectual assets in the interaction between social and private resources
One possibility (and challenge) with intellectual assets is the concept’s normative
effect in the interface between different forms of resources. Applying intellectual
property rights, such as copyright, patents and so on, means that research results
are transferred to what can be described the framework of “civil law”. We lay claim
to research results as copyrighted works, patentable inventions, protectable designs
and suchlike. Researchers and others are obliged to think in terms of contractual
relationships and transactions when gaining access to research results in the form of
books, teaching aids, databases and so on. This gives rise to opportunities to create
value, but also presents challenges. To be sure, university staff are somewhat accustomed to managing these opportunities and challenges. The phenomenon whereby

332 This began by attempting to make the concept of know-how more concrete and useful. This concept was typically used when developing licences and other knowledge assets not clearly intellectual property assets. After several years of experimentation, we were able to figure out how the concept of know-how could be developed as
more precise intellectual assets.

321

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

teachers assign publishing rights for text books to commercial publishing firms,
who then sell them to libraries and students, is generally viewed as positive.
Admittedly, there is disagreement about the appropriateness of assigning rights for
scientific articles and the like to commercial publishers since the publishers’ high
prices limit significant use by the general public. So as academics, we have some
experience managing the balance between private and public interests.
The phenomenon of packaging research results as products, services, and even ideas
has a clear normative effect when it comes to viewing these as a resource to be managed in transactions intended for “private benefit” in a broad sense. By developing
concepts related to knowledge assets and intellectual assets, we create a much more
comprehensive toolbox that enables new ways of balancing these competing interests.
The interaction between what we view as knowledge assets and what constitutes
intellectual property assets is of particular interest here. Our development efforts
stem from the idea that the more we categorize knowledge assets to show the public
benefit of the research results (a public resource), the more natural it is to expand
pubic responsibility for collaboration and utilization. At the same time, using the
concept is, in itself, an acknowledgement of the importance of using more “civil law
instruments” in the public domain. It is also an acknowledgement that striving for
private benefit is legitimate when attempting to assume a broader public responsibility.
Four levels of intellectual assets
In our efforts to develop a tool that will enable academic environments to manage
research results as public resources, we came to realize that research results should
be categorized on four levels. By doing so, we can achieve maximum impact without making the tool too complex to use. The four perspectives described below
have laid the foundation for the tool’s design.

LEVEL 1: VALUE-CREATING
RESEARCH RESULTS

Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on its
nature and value

LEVEL 2: PROTECTED AND
PROTECTABLE RESEARCH RESULTS

Categorizing how research results can be claimed as
intellectual property assets

LEVEL 3: RESEARCH RESULTS
IN COLLABORATION

Categorizing how research results can be claimed and based on how they
are used and created in collaborations

LEVEL 4: RESEARCH RESULTS
IN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT

Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on their importance
for the academic activities

Figure 84. Categorizing research results

322

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The first level focuses on research results as having academic value. Primarily,
research results are objectified based on their research-related character and value.
The task of categorizing research results in this way was a major challenge and
served as the foundation for our work with intellectual assets as a whole. The second level focuses on categorizing knowledge assets based on the intellectual property rights can be realized. This categorization uses a number of legal criteria that
define what constitutes a protectable object. The third level of categorization focuses on how knowledge assets are used as objects in contractual transactions. This
categorization is also based on what can be described as a legal outlook. Within
programme and project management, in particular, categories and concepts have
been developed that are used in contractual contexts. Categorization from the
fourth perspective focuses on how knowledge assets are used in academic environments.
The challenge with this development work, especially with categorization at the
first level, is the desire to be able to switch between the intellectual asset as an
“object” and its true nature as a communicative action. Managing intellectual phenomena as objects is not a simple undertaking. They are, after all, intellectual in
nature. It is also not always practical to try to objectify knowledge processes.
Doing so can results in unnecessary bureaucracy. What is obvious is that the categorization of intellectual assets makes them concrete and it should be done carefully.
9.4.2 Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on its nature and value
This is the first level and, as noted, also the most challenging categorization. This
is true for both the design of the categories and their application to a specific
academic environment’s research results. Firstly, it is a matter of clarifying what is
meant by knowledge assets. Objectifying all research results is both impracticable
and irrelevant. This should only be done when there is a need and when it is
appropriate.
Criteria for classification as a knowledge asset
One of the KMP programme’s greatest challenges over time has been to develop
practical, useful criteria for determining what should be treated as knowledge
assets. The linchpin for all use of knowledge assets is the ability to capture the
interplay between value and control. Consequently, the ambition is that the tool
for categorizing knowledge assets should enable users to use research results that
are controllable and valuable. After several years spent evaluating how IAM can
be used in various contexts, we were able to determine that, as far as possible, a
categorization of knowledge assets should make research results:
● easily reviewable within the academic environment
● communicable to the outside world
● manageable in the interaction between teaching staff, administrators, management and researchers acting in a private capacity
● assignable to another party or actor in research collaboration efforts and in
utilization processes
● able to be narrowly defined as values in different forms of reporting

323

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Thus, a tool for categorizing research results should preferably make it possible to
objectify knowledge assets based on these five characteristics. It should be possible
to gain a coordinated overview of what constitutes the research results. It should
be possible to communicate individual research results and the more comprehensive portfolio of results in a clear manner. A greater challenge is the requirement
that the categorization should make research results manageable and able to be
administered within the academic environment. Even more challenging is enabling
the transfer of research results to a third party based on contractual relations. It
should be clear what is included in the contractual transaction and what is convertible to profit, that is, research results are actually be transferred to third-parties.
Finally, it should also be possible to specifically define the research result as an
asset. By this we mean that research results are public property, i.e. they are an
object with an identifiable public benefit that can be defined. This makes it possible
to think and reason in terms of economic value.
These five characteristics or qualities have served as the basis for categorization during the development work. In this context, the criteria can be viewed as a two-edged
sword. On the one hand, we believe assessing how well a specific research result
meets the criteria determines whether it should be managed as a knowledge asset.
On the other hand, the application of the criteria makes it possible to distinguish
and define separate categories of knowledge assets. For us, it was important for the
definition of each category to allow the identification of the research results that
meet the criteria, whenever possible. At the same time, it is inescapable that the person applying the categories must decide, in each instance, whether the specific claim
meets the criteria and is otherwise appropriate in the context.
In addition, the categories on the whole should enable a general approach to a
large number of research results. That is to say, by applying the categories, it
should be possible to place the research results alongside each other. Using the categories generates an overview of an environment’s own research results. A single
research result should not be described as more than one asset. Even using this
approach, it will not be possible to fully achieve the goal. The individuals applying
the categorization must always use their analytical and creative abilities to ensure a
reasonable classification. Ordinarily, this requires some degree of training.
Determining categories
In the KMP programme, we have considered it important to base our work on a
complete university; that is, a university that conducts research in all scientific
fields. Creating a number of categories that are considered relevant for researchers
in all of the university’s scientific fields, however, is no easy task. As noted earlier,
prioritizing an engineering and natural science approach is more or less unavoidable when wanting to claim knowledge assets. It has been important for us to
acknowledge this and to deal with the development work based on this understanding, while not letting go of the ambition to make the categories relevant to as
many fields as possible.
Another important factor is avoiding too many categories. The categories selected

324

LEVEL 1: VALUE-CREATING
RESEARCH RESULTS

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Categorizing how research results can be claimed
based on its nature and value

DATA

Research results in the form
of unstructured data

SOLUTION

Research results in the form of an
engineered solution to a problem

DATABASE

Research results in the form of a
structured and searchable dataset

VISUALIZATION

Research results in the form of a
visual presentation

OBSERVATION

Research results in the form of an
empirical conclusion

INSTRUCTION

Research results in the form of a
description of how a task
should be performed

THEORETICAL
FRAMEWORK

Research results in the form of a
general theory

SOFTWARE

Research results in the form of
data code

NARRATIV

Research results in the form of a
narrative

CREATION

Artistic achievement

Figure 85. Categorizing research results as knowledge assets

must be practically applicable in as many environments as possible. Our evaluation
over a number of years has resulted in ten categories that are relatively universal.
Using these categories as a tool, we believe that it should be possible for the majority of academic environments to claim the research results they feel should be managed as knowledge assets. There is nothing to prevent the development of additional subcategories, however. This may be relevant when many of an environment’s
research results fall into the same category, for example. Categorization does not
always provide a sufficiently simple overview, or, put another way, a “high-definition” picture of an environment’s research portfolio. As noted above, it is important
to avoid listing the same research result under multiple categories.
In this context, we should emphasize that categorization is simply a tool for facilitating an overview. It is the user who faces the challenge of identifying and claiming
research results. Ultimately, the user must always ensure that research results can be
easily reviewed and are communicable, manageable, transferable and able to be narrowly defined. This tool is intended to make this possible.

325

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Data
One initial category is research results in the form of raw data. Here, research results
are like collections of information The data are the result of some form of empirical
study or inventory. This category is relatively common in connection with contractual
collaborations. As knowledge assets, they are relatively easily managed as they are
generally closely linked to some form of documentation. Objectification is connected
with the documented, though unstructured, collection of raw data. The documentation and the collection itself render the knowledge asset controllable.

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

DATA
Research results in the form
of unstructured data
Description

Keywords

Unstructured information, raw data, which can be
utilized for future knowledge development

Data, input, output, results, measurement, experiment,
note, journal, documentation

Figure 86. Data as a category of knowledge assets
In principle, all scientific fields have examples of the data category. These might
include results from statistical measurements, scientific experiments, clinical tests and
interviews. Given the large amount of data generated by multiple research studies, it

DATA

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form
of unstructured data
Example

Figure 87. Example of data

326

• Survey data collected in 2008 on well-being among primary care
workers
• Data on blood sugar levels in infants aged 0-6 months
collected as part of clinical phase 1 study
• Data from pressure measurements concerning the sulphite
pulp process’ various stages during paper production

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

is often useful to sort data into subcategories to improve the ability to gain an
overview and to facilitate communication about the data. For clinical studies, a more
detailed classification can be made under the categories control data, effect data and
health economics data, for example.
Database
A second category is databases. The difference between the data and database categories is that we view the latter as an organized and searchable object. Here, too,
we are dealing with concrete research results. From a functional viewpoint, the
database is an object that can be made real both physically and virtually. As a
category, it is even more manageable and transferable than the data category.
Organization and searchability allow an overview and make communication
possible. The database is also an intellectual property asset, as it is subject to
special legal protection. However, we distinguish between the database as a functional phenomenon and a legally protected object, that is, as an intellectual property asset. (More about the intellectual property asset can be found in the following
section). As a functional phenomenon, it is controllable in itself. For IT-based databases, access can be controlled technically, e.g. by requiring a password or similar.

DATABASE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a structured and
searchable dataset
Description

Keywords

Structured and searchable data, which is collected,
organized and available in a systematic way

Electronic database, table, spreadsheet, matrices

Figure 88. Database as a category of knowledge assets
The database is a category of knowledge asset that can exist within all research
areas and is relevant to the entire university. In a number of research fields, databases can provide a means by which to develop and refine multiple research projects. In several cases, database assets constitute important infrastructure that make
possible additional research projects and collaboration. A key issue when managing databases is the circumstances under which the information is to be made
available to third parties. For example, in some research fields, there are increasing
demands that databases connected with research results are to be made public. At
the same time, databases can comprise a key competitive advantage for a group of
researchers.

327

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

DATABASE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a structured
and searchable dataset
Example

• Database containing reference values for determining
diabetes types using a diagnostic method
• Database containing the last ten years’ annual ﬁnancial
reports for Swedish service companies with 10-50 employees
• Database concerning average income, psychological illness
and physical activityfor Swedish citizens aged 18-65 years

Figure 89. Example of database
Observation
The “observation” category is more elusive. This category deals with conclusions,
observations, correlations and the like that are based on some form of actual study.
Typically, observations are empirical phenomena that vary depending on the
research field. One type of observation is results that, in themselves, open the way
for new hypotheses to be tested and more closely investigated. In other cases,
observations consist of support and optimizations for solutions. The observation
category can also include knowledge generated through long series of practical
development/research efforts and, in principle, can be characterized as experience.

OBSERVATION

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of an
empirical conclusion
Description

Keywords

Conclusions based on empirical data collections and
various analytical processes

Discoveries, cause-eﬀect relationships, correlations,
trends, problems, needs, optimizations

Figure 90. Observation as a category of knowledge assets
In several respects, this category can be said to include more refined research
results. As a category, it lacks a clear link to concrete physical or virtual material
and is more abstract in nature. Relatively early on in our evaluation work we realized the need for a category that we chose to call data correlations. When thinking

328

OBSERVATION

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of an
empirical conclusion

Example

• Observation that the angle of a module attachment
creates maximal leverage at 47 degrees
• Observation that the combination of dendrite cell-based
vaccination and Lemtrada signiﬁcantly reduces leukaemia
• Observation that pike in Swedish lakes have decreased in
average length by ﬁve centimetres over the past ten years

Figure 91. Example of observation
of the complete university, we realized that observation is more practical and can be
used to identify many valuable research results. We saw a clear need for a category
in this context. At the same time, it is important to realize that almost any result
could be included in this type of category. Ultimately, it should be applied in situations where it is appropriate. The observation should be well defined and as concrete as possible for it to be perceived as objectified and controllable.
Accordingly, manageability and transferability are also not so clear-cut when it
comes to objectifying an observation. In this case, it is more a matter of knowledge
transfer. Each discipline has its own forms of observation.
Theoretical framework
Another similar category that is more abstract and difficult to manage is what we
call theoretical framework. We recognized the need for this category early on. It

THEORETICAL FRAMEWORK

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a general theory
Description

Theories which describe phenomenon,
causes and relationships

Keywords

Theory, model, scheme, framework, dependency

Figure 92. Theoretical framework as a category of knowledge assets

329

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

helps define what creates scientific value and is interesting from a utilization perspective. The category is not as clear-cut as some others in terms of manageability
and transferability. Objectification is linked to the knowledge itself. There are no
artefacts, material or virtual, to relate to.
Like observation, theoretical framework can be used for large numbers of different
research results. Here, the category is applied to the research results for which
objectification is important in enabling utilization or, alternatively, management in
collaboration relationships.
To the degree that theoretical frameworks are claimed as assets in academic environments, they often establish a basic approach to the research, which gives the
research group a unique point of entry to a field of research. Thus, the theory itself
can be worth publishing (for example), but can also serve as a foundation or instrument from which to create new assets.

THEORETICAL FRAMEWORK

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of
a general theory

Example

• A theory about how the body decreases trypsin supply to
the digestive system during stress
• An organizational theory with the potential to increase
eﬃciency when producing software
• A theory about how maths learning is aﬀected by
perceived roles between teacher and student

Figure 93. Example of theoretical framework
A key typical issue connected with theoretical frameworks is how they can be
established and verified in a broader research context. It is not unusual to create
assets and practical tools to increase the wider adoption of a theory, particularly
when the theory can be difficult to transfer and narrowly define. For example,
groups of researchers can create software, models and procedures as implementations of the theory and, in this way, have it packaged in a second step.

Solution
An asset category that is of fundamental relevance for utilization is the solution.
Once researchers have created and engineered a solution to a problem, it is natural
to think in terms of ideas. In principle, we believe that solutions arise as research
results within all scientific disciplines. The technical element makes the knowledge
asset feel and be perceived as more concrete. It makes reasoning easier in terms of
manageability and transferability.

330

SOLUTION

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of an
engineered solution to a problem
Description

A creative and on a scientiﬁc base made possible solution
to a scientiﬁc problem

Keywords

Invention, process, composition, solution, technology,
design, construction, conﬁguration

Figure 94. Solution as a category of knowledge assets
It is natural, of course, that technical solutions and inventions come to mind.
Within the framework of our evaluation work, we have focused a great deal on
technical solutions. When categorizing solutions, we have focused on three aspects
that can be said to define the asset. A solution typically consists of 1) a structure/
process that results in 2) a number of functions in its surroundings that ultimately
solve 3) one or more problems that create value to a greater or lesser degree.
Unlike other assets, the solution is thus always closely linked to one or more specific problems and can therefore always be evaluated based on its value in a specific context.
Some standard examples are technical inventions, pharmaceuticals and treatments,
but we can also think in terms of more social and institutional solutions. For the
latter, this could be solutions related to increased ecological sustainability or a
more developed social insurance system. The degree to which scientific work
should involve creating and developing new solutions varies between the sciences.

SOLUTION

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of an
engineered solution to a problem

Example

• A method for cleaning and automatically correcting
data from air pollution measurements using reference
measurements
• A method for measuring the eﬃcacy of sterilization
during ultra-high temperature treatment using
luminescent material
• A person-centred organizational solution for reducing
healthcare costs and increasing patient satisfaction

Figure 95. Example of technical solution

331

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Visualization
Research results as visualization is one of the more concrete categories related to
manageability and transferability. This category is related to the technical solution
category. Models, prototypes, sketches, drawings and the like all involve an element
of design. This category is intended to relate to a tangible research result and not
just to its presentation. Naturally, observations and theoretical frameworks, too,
can be visualized. This category could also be applied when visualization adds a
particular value. The fact that there is often a clear link to some kind of artefact
makes objectification more natural.

VISUALIZATION

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a
visual presentation
Description

Static or dynamic visual presentation that goes
beyond a typical drawing

Keywords

Design, drawing, visualization, prototype, diagram,
illustration, simulation, model, display

Figure 96. Visualization as a category of knowledge assets
In some scientific traditions it is common to view visualization as a clear research
result, while in others it is viewed as a means to convey research results.

VISUALIZATION
Research results in the form of a
visual presentation

Example

• Simulation model showing the eﬀect of congestion
charges on tram traﬃc in Gothenburg
• Prototype of a new navigation tool for tablets
designed for paralytics
• Photo documentation of a previously unknown
comet in the outer solar system

Figure 97. Example of visualization

332

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Instruction
An additional category that might overlap the others in some respects, but that
nonetheless deserves to be treated as a category in its own right, is instructions. This
refers to concrete instructions about how to carry out certain activities. This category is among those for which objectification is not as obvious and, therefore, requires
a bit more consideration. It is important that the instructions go beyond concretizing how research results are to be made transferable. At times and for certain recipients, a technical solution can be communicated as instructions. If so, the instructions are the actual research results. Admittedly, in certain contexts, the extent to
which research results should be categorized as a technical solution or instructions
can be a personal preference. However, of primary importance is that categorization
occurs. Naturally, valuable research results are not multiplied simply by making it
possible to categorize them in different ways. As long as it is clear and does not
become redundant, there is nothing to prevent research results from being described

INSTRUCTION

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a description
of how a task should be performed
Description

Instructions that provide practical guidance on
how to carry out certain activities

Keywords

Algorithm, instruction, script, recipe, guideline,
manual, routine

Figure 98. Instructions as a category of knowledge assets

INSTRUCTION
Research results in the form of a description
of how a task should be performed

Example

• Standard procedure for producing photographic prints
by applying a number of layers of nitrate and oils
• Algorithm for the continuous optimization of
acoustic source ﬁltering
• Manual detailing steps to be followed when
inserting a modiﬁed hip implant

Figure 99. Example of instructions

333

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

as both a technical solution and instructions. Still, as noted earlier, in the specific
setting the assets will be placed alongside one another without overlap.
We can picture a number of research results with their form of instruction. In the
social sciences, instructions are often associated with the normative; that is, not so
unlike a technical solution. At the same time, just like technical solutions, instructions can be a clear conclusion to an empirical study.
By our definition, instructions can be intended for people, but also for machines.
Typical instructions for machines may be algorithms that, in turn, are implemented
in software. Instructions often play a key role in complex research fields and where
reproducibility is required. Thus, instructions can constitute platforms for standard
procedures and best practices as well as a basis for certifications.
Software
One category that risks overlapping the others is software. This category is likely too
imprecise for software researchers. Subcategories clearly need to be designed for
those situations. Other categories can also be useful. For the great majority of disciplines, software is a tool for conveying research results. This is very valuable in
itself, and software deserves its own category. Naturally, a computer program can
serve as a solution and, by nature, is also instructions. Once again, the most useful
category needs to be chosen. The connection to code and an executable program
makes the category tangible for objectification purposes. It is relatively easy to condense into an overview and to communicate research results.
Within the social sciences and humanities, where the need to objectify research
results is always important, it immediately becomes much more natural to think in
terms of software and databases. It becomes more concrete to possess objects of

SOFTWARE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of data code
Description

Computing: An implemented and organized set of
data and automated operations that perform certain tasks

Keywords

Programs, applications, systems, platforms,
libraries, scripts

Figure 100. Software as a category of knowledge assets

334

SOFTWARE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of data code

Example

• Software for implementing an algorithm for the
continuous optimization of acoustic source
ﬁltering (C++)
• A computer script that translates between LCR
and XML databases
• Software in the form of an application that collects
stress data from users (Android, iPhone, Windows)

Figure 101. Example of software
seemingly immediate value. All branches of science can create software as part of
their research. In certain contexts, the program itself is the scientific result. Often,
the underlying content is the research result. To that extent, overlap will always
occur. This is particularly true of the categories technical solution, instructions and
narrative.
When required, the category can be broken down into the sub-categories of procedures, modules, systems and architecture. There is often a need to visually present
software in the form of layers and clearly defined code modules.
Narrative
The narrative category has its origins in the humanities, but is generally applicable
to all disciplines. It is one of the more abstract categories that can be applied to
multiple phenomena. For us, the narrative is a concrete story. Everywhere there are

NARRATIVE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a narrative
Description

An coordinated case study, empirically demonstrable
account or narrative

Keywords

Interviews, studies of original sources, historical
reﬂections, literature

Figure 102. Narrative as a category of knowledge assets

335

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

NARRATIVE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Research results in the form of a narrative

Example

• Summary of the intelligence service’s actions and
decisions in the three weeks following the 1981
submarine crisis
• Compilation of interviews with Volvo staﬀ who were
involved in negotiations concerning Ford’s takeover
of Volvo in 1999

Figure 103. Example of narrative
different stories. For example, as a method, the interview creates stories. It is
important to be careful when applying this category and objectifying research
results, as is the case for the other, more abstract categories.
Obviously, there are multiple kinds of narratives that need to be conveyed and, in
that way, also utilized. In certain cases, a narrative can even serve as a foundation
for new innovations. The social sciences and humanities are overflowing with
narratives. In some sense, all research can be seen as a narrative. There is a risk
that the category will become nondescript if its application is not limited to more
substantial stories. Likewise, it could benefit from subcategories.
Creation
Artistic creativity is a part of the university and there is an obvious need for at

CREATION
Artistic achievement
Description

A creative and artistic creation produced as part of
academic activities

Keywords

Music, set design, artwork, drama, painting

Figure 104. Creation as a category of knowledge assets

336

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CREATION

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Artistic achievement

Example

• A musical work that is continuously modiﬁed and
developed as a result of cosmic radiation
• A pattern design based on a number of overlapping
layers of shiny and matte textile materials
• A virtual installation in which the viewer experiences
impossible and irrational geometries

Figure 105. Example of creation
least one category that is directly linked to the arts. Without diminishing this need,
a number of the other categories can also be applied to the arts. The creation category has obvious sub-categories. Artistic creativity is closely associated with the
artistic work as an intellectual property asset. Its objectification is usually clear and
comprehensible. Clear examples of different forms of artistic creation can be identified simply by reviewing how an arts faculty is organized. Naturally, other disciplines can achieve what can be classified as artistic creations in their academic
work.
Degrees of Reification
An important point to keep in mind when categorizing and claiming knowledge
assets is that they are intellectual in nature and are based on the understanding and
knowledge of individuals. In certain contexts, there is a well-established consensus
about what constitutes a research result. In other cases, differing understandings and
perceptions may exist. It is important that this is acknowledged when making assessments and is reflected in reporting.
The ambition for tools for claiming intellectual assets is to capture their unique
character as knowledge phenomena. Although we designed these tools to make
this possible, much is still required of the user. As stated earlier, there is a manifest
risk that users will view knowledge assets as existing objects in themselves. A
recurring discussion about degrees of reification thus reminds us of the assets’
intellectual nature.
9.4.3 Categorizing how research results can be claimed as intellectual property assets
The second level (part 2) on the tool shelf deals with claiming research results as
intellectual property assets. We can discern a number of asset categories by better
understanding the different forms of intellectual property protection. Applying the
criteria for protectability enables a legal objectification of research results. We can

337

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

identify patentable inventions, copyrighted works, protected databases and more.
In simple terms, it is a matter of establishing which knowledge assets are also
intellectual property assets. This second level of categories is applied to knowledge
assets that were categorized in the first level.
Applying these categories generates new assets; that is, intellectual property assets.
Managing the interplay between what can be viewed as value-creating objects and
legal objects (i.e., the interplay between knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets) is extremely important in developing both an individual and an organizational capability for cooperating and promoting utilization.
Intellectual property objectification as a basis for categorization
Intellectual property objectification is based on existing laws.333 Each country uses
its own legislation as its starting point and, in spite of extensive international
efforts to establish minimum levels and to harmonize, there continue to be national
differences in defining what is protectable and what is not. Accordingly, an indepth knowledge of the world’s intellectual property rights systems is needed when
claiming research results as intellectual property assets. To make claims for intellectual property assets with any confidence, it is important to have access to international experts in the field. One of our goals with the tools being considered here,
however, is that they also provide guidance to those who are not experts on intellectual property law. It is important that researchers understand which research
results/knowledge assets can and should be managed as intellectual property assets,
particularly in their interactions with the Innovation Office.
It is entirely possible to claim one’s own intellectual property asset as long as it is
understood that the claims is based on assumptions. The use of the model is sufficient for creating supporting data, which can be developed in more detail, taking
legal considerations into account when necessary. In concrete situations, such as
when intending to apply for protection or enter a contract, it is reasonable to have
specialists in intellectual property law to conduct a more stringent legal analysis.
That intellectual property law systems differ between nations presents a particular
challenge. From an asset perspective, one holds assets and potential assets in all
countries with intellectual property law systems. Take patentable inventions as an
example. In reality, this deals with what is a patentable invention in relation to

333 That is not to say that this is wholly unproblematic. Within legal discourse, there has long been well-founded
scepticism about objectifying objects for the purpose of claiming intellectual property rights. For example, do we
need to talk about copyrighted works, patentable inventions and protectable designs as objects? Is it not enough
to view copyrights, patents and design rights as objects? The question is especially relevant with assigning rights,
financial transactions and insolvency. From a more practical management perspective, however, it is hardly controversial. The KMP programme wants to create a useful tool that makes it possible to manage research results from
an intellectual property rights perspective. Identifying what constitutes patentable inventions, protectable designs
and copyrighted works is relevant from a practical legal perspective. How one then chooses to formulate contracts
and reason in a concrete case of insolvency is another matter.

338

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

each different country’s patent system. At least in theory, we are required to manage as many patentable inventions as there are patent systems. The same is true of
other intellectual property law systems. This means that we are compelled to simplify to produce a tool that is practicably manageable.
In our tool, we base our approach on a number of “meta objects” such as intellectual property assets. That is to say, we relate to a patentable invention, a copyrighted work, a protected and protectable design and so on. In practice, we approach a
patentable invention as an object that can generate a number of additional intellectual property assets in the form of national patent applications and patents through
international application processes. The various patent applications and, later, also
the patents, are intellectual property assets linked to the patentable invention as a
meta object. We have made the corresponding simplification to all categories of
intellectual property assets to promote manageability.
The model is limited to the intellectual property rights that are most relevant in a
Swedish context and, to facilitate matters, we have adopted the criteria established
in Swedish legislation as our starting point. That is not to say that it is necessarily
most advantageous for a Swedish research group to focus on Swedish intellectual
property assets. When a project is considering an intellectual property rights strate-

LEVEL 2: PROTECTED AND
PROTECTABLE RESEARCH RESULTS

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Categorizing how research results can be
claimed as intellectual property assets

INVENTION

Patentable invention, patent
applications and patents

TRADEMARK

Registerable trademarks, established
trademarks, trademark registration
applications and trademark rights

DESIGNS

Protectable designs, protected designs,
applications for design protection and
registering design protection

TOPOGRAPHY

Protected topographies and
topography rights for semiconductors

ARTISTIC AND
LITERARY
WORK

Copyright protected works of art
and literature and copyrights

PLANT VARIETY

Protectable plant species
and plant breeders’ rights

DATABASE

Protected databases and database rights

TRADE SECRET

Protectable information, both
documented and undocumented

Figure 106. Categorizing knowledge assets as protected and protectable

339

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

gy for managing and developing its portfolio of assets in the international arena,
considerations of the Swedish system are unlikely to be the most important. In a
concrete project, it is not always sufficient to focus solely on the most central intellectual property rights that exist in a Swedish legal setting. For example, it may be
relevant to apply for certain countries’ specialized intellectual property rights protection, such as the German and Austrian utility models (Gebrauchsmuster).
We have also chosen to include trade secret protection in the model which, from a
legal standpoint, is not viewed as an intellectual property right. Here again, it is a
matter of designing a tool that is useful and comprehensible for people who work
with collaboration and utilization in academic environments.
Invention – patentable invention, patent applications and patents
The meta object is the invention as a patentable, patent pending and patented phenomenon. Accordingly, the specification of a research result as a patentable invention occurs by applying the criteria established in each country’s/region’s respective
patent system. From a litigation standpoint, it can be said that a patentable invention is the item a patent is granted for by the patent office and that which can be
upheld as a patent in the national legal proceedings in which a patent infringement
is alleged. A patentable invention is patentable until a patent is pending and later
granted. As stated, this takes place in an international arena, which is why, ultimately, a relatively large number of individual patents can be granted in relation to
a single patentable invention. In our model, we view the patentable invention, all
patent applications and patents granted as intellectual property assets that must be
managed.
As noted earlier, for practical reasons, we use Swedish patent legislation as our
starting point. The assessment of what constitutes a patentable invention can be
carried out in two steps. First, the concept of invention needs to be applied. Under
Sweden’s Patents Act (patentlagen), a research result is patentable if it can be used
in an industrial setting (§1). This requirement has been further clarified by the
stipulation that an invention must be of a technical nature, have a technical effect
and be reproducible. The law also includes the additional clarification that an
invention is never solely:
● a discovery, scientific theory or mathematical method
● an artistic creation
● a plan, rule or method for intellectual activity, for games or for business
activity or a computer program, or
● a presentation of information.
Based on the categorization of intellectual assets, we can conclude that primarily
research results in the solution category may constitute patentable inventions. The
constructive element must be present. For example, Sweden’s Patents Act explains
that the human body in its various phases of formation and development, like the
simple discovery of one of its components, including a gene sequence or partial
sequence of a gene, do not constitute a patentable invention. On the other hand, if
a person isolates a component of the human body or, in some other way by means

340

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

of a technical procedure manufactures a component, including a gene sequence or a
partial sequence of a gene, this may constitute a patentable invention.334
The second step is to apply what are known as the patentability criteria. According
to Sweden’s Patents Acts (§2), an invention is patentable if it is new and essentially
different from what was known prior to the day the patent application was lodged.
The novelty requirement has two aspects. The first is that no one has arrived at the
same result previously and made it publically available. The second is that neither
the applicant, nor someone else who has been made a party to the research result
in confidence, has made it publically available. Once application processes have
begun and patent claims have been drafted, the specific intellectual property assets
will be developed within the framework of the respective patent systems. The
patent claim approved by the specific patent office defines the patented invention
as an intellectual property asset.
Designs — protectable designs, protected designs, applications for design protection
and registering design protection
Another key category concerns design. In a similar way as for patentable inventions,
here we adopt as our starting point the protectable design as a quasi-object. Each
respective legal system defines what constitutes a legally protectable design right.
We approach the protectable design as a quasi-object and ask ourselves in which
country we want to seek protection. Applications for registering design protection
and approved registrations are intellectual property assets. In Sweden, registration
applications are submitted to the Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV). For
designs, it is also possible to have a non-registration-based protection, which is also
viewed as an intellectual property asset. Of course, it is more natural to approach
applications and approved registrations as intellectual property assets that need to
be managed. Even if it is found to be the case that design protection not based on
registration is in effect, there is still merit in making the item an explicit asset.
In Article 1 of Sweden’s Design Protection Act (mönsterskyddslagen), a design is
defined as “the appearance of the whole or a part of a product resulting from the
features of the details of the product or of the details of the ornamentation of the
product, in particular as regards the lines, contours, colours, shapes, textures or
materials.” In turn, a product is defined as “any industrial or handicraft item,
including parts intended to be assembled into a complex product, packaging, get-

334 It should be mentioned in this context that patents are not granted for inventions whose use is contrary to
public order or moral norms. For example, methods for the reproductive cloning of human beings and the industrial use of human embryos can be viewed as conflicting with moral norms. The same applies to methods through
which changes to genes in animals cause the animal to suffer where no appreciable medical advantages for
humans or animals can be claimed. Neither are patents granted for methods that comprise biological processes for
producing plants and animals. However, it should be noted that a patent may be granted for a genetically engineered method for increasing meat production in cattle. The reason for this is that the method is based on a microbiological process that is not unique to one specific animal species. The same principle applies to innovation
processes related to plant breeding, with exceptions for the production of plant varieties. For more information on
intellectual property rights protection for plant varieties, see the paragraph below.

341

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

up, graphic symbols and typographic type-faces, but excluding computer programs.” According to the Act, only a design that is new and has an “individual
character” is protectable (§2).
Consequently, primarily knowledge assets are categorized as visualizations that
lend themselves to categorization as designs. Knowledge assets that fall under the
creation category can doubtlessly also come to be considered as legally-protectable
designs.
Artistic and literary work — copyright protected works of art and literature and
copyrights
The category is defined by the Swedish Act on Copyright in Literary and Artistic
Works. In this case we are dealing with an intellectual property right that does not
depend on registration. We view the copyrighted work as a meta object. In practice,
copyrighted works are ordinarily covered by copyright law in accordance with
national legislation. To simplify, a copyrighted work is an intellectual property asset
that is subject to a host of national copyrights that also form intellectual property
assets. As explained earlier, it is far from natural in all cases to manage non-registration-based intellectual property rights as assets. Often, it can also be sufficient to
identify and manage the meta objects themselves as assets. That is to say, we identify what we perceive to constitute works subject to copyright.
In accordance with Swedish law, the objects protected under copyright legislation
are works of literature and art. Article 1 of the Act explains that “anyone who has
created a literary or artistic work shall have copyright in that work regardless of
whether it is:
● a fictional or descriptive representation in writing or speech
● a computer programme
● a musical or dramatic work
● a cinematographic work
● a photographic work or another work of fine art
● a work of architecture or applied art
● a work expressed in some other manner.”
The Article explains further that literary works also include maps and “other works
of a descriptive nature executed as drawings, engravings, or in a three-dimensional
form.” In Swedish case law, an understanding has developed that to be classified as
a work, an item must have a certain originality, individuality and independence.
With the exception of what is considered to be applied art, current criteria can be
considered to be relatively undemanding. Much of what is categorized as knowledge assets can be covered by copyright in some sense. As concerns categories like
computer software, creation, narrative and visualization, it is likely that the research
result in itself is covered by copyright; that is to say, the knowledge assets are considered to be literary or artistic works. This means that others may not use them
without the permission of the copyright holder. For categories like data, observation, theoretical framework, solution and instruction, copyright law does not ordinarily offer protection in itself, i.e. research results as such are not considered to

342

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

constitute works. It is true that publications and suchlike through which research
results are conveyed will undoubtedly be viewed as works. This means that others
may not control the publication without permission, although they are free to use
data, solutions and more that are conveyed through it.
Database — protected databases and database rights
As mentioned, databases are both a knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets. In Sweden, databases are protected as a copyright-related right under the
Act on Copyright in Literary and Artistic Works (§49). This states that a person
who has compiled a catalogue, table, or another similar production in which a
large amount of information has been compiled or which is the result of a significant investment has the exclusive right to produce copies of the work and to make
it available to the public. It is reasonable to conclude that items categorized as a
knowledge asset will also come to be viewed as an intellectual asset.
Topography — protected topographies and topography rights for semiconductors
Another category among intellectual property assets is protected semiconductor
topography. According to the model, both protected topography and the right to the
topography are intellectual property assets. In a similar way, we approach a protectable topography as a meta object. To simplify we categorize in accordance with
Swedish law. The protection applies without the need for registration and, according
to the model, constitutes an intellectual property asset. The same applies for all other
countries with non-registration-based topography protection.
According to the law, the protected object is a topography that is the result of its
creator’s own intellectual effort and that is not commonplace in the semiconductor
industry. It is further prescribed that if a topography consists of components that
are commonplace within the semiconductor industry, it is only protected if the
combination of components fulfils the conditions. As knowledge assets, in their
technical application, topographies should primarily be categorized as solutions.
For that matter, the design itself could be categorized as a visualization.
Plant variety — protectable plant species and plant breeders’ rights
Another category concerns protectable and protected plant varieties. A special form
of protection applies to plant varieties, known as the plant breeders’ rights. Plant
breeders’ rights can potentially be awarded for all new plant species and hybrids. In
Sweden, protection is gained through registration with the Swedish Board of
Agriculture. As with patents, international protection involves securing a number of
national and regional plant breeders’ rights for a new plant variety. In the same way
as for other categories, we approach the plant variety as a meta object. It is an intellectual property asset. It is also the plant breeders’ rights that are registered.
The Swedish Act (Chapter 1, §3) defines a plant variety as “a plant grouping within one and the same botanical entity of the lowest known rank, where this grouping can:

343

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

● be defined by the expression of characteristics resulting from a given geno-

type or combination of genotypes
● [be] distinguished from any other plant grouping by the expression of at

least one of the said characteristics, and
● [be] considered as a unit with regard to its suitability for being propagated

unchanged.”
The plant variety must have an approved name or designation to attain to a protected status. The law (Chapter 3, §1) explains that for a plant variety to be entitled to protection it must be new, distinct, uniform with respect to its essential
characteristics and stable. For obvious reasons, the application of this principle
within the university is limited to certain scientific contexts.
Trademark — registerable trademarks, established trademarks,
trademark registration applications and trademark rights
The protected and protectable trademark is an intellectual property asset of limited
significance in terms of research results. It is not an intellectual property asset that
overlaps knowledge assets in the same way as other intellectual property assets do.
A trademark is a controllable or controlled symbol. For the university itself and for
specific operations, a trademark can be very important. In this case, however, it is
not a matter of controlling specific research results.
According to Sweden’s Trademark Act (varumärkeslagen), a trademark may consist of “any signs capable of being represented graphically, particularly words,
including personal names, figurative elements, letters, numerals, and the shape of
goods or of their packaging, provided that the signs are distinctive”.
Trade secret – protectable information, both documented and undocumented
As note, we have chosen to categorize trade secrets as intellectual property assets.
This is not an uncomplicated matter, however. Trade secret protection does not entail
a sole right as it does for other intellectual property assets. Trade secrets can be
viewed as protected objects and, moreover, certain actions related to them can be limited. This is sufficient reason for us not to treat trade secrets as their own separate
category of assets. In this case also, we approach trade secrets as meta objects.
According to Swedish legislation, a trade secret is defined as information concerning
business conditions or industrial relations of a person conducting business or industrial activities. In order to fulfill the criteria for trade secrets the information must be
managed as a secret and that a disclosure of which would be destined to cause damage to the holder of the information in terms of competition.
The law further stipulates that information comprises both information documented
in some form, including drawings, models and other similar technical prototypes, and
the individual persons´ knowledge and insight about specific circumstances even
where it has not been documented in some form.

344

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The potential for categorizing research results as trade secrets appear to be very limited, given that research is most often financed using tax money, is conducted by a
state-run body where the principle of the disclosure of public documents applies, and
the fact that striving to make research results available to the public is an explicitly
stated value within academia. Here, it is important to keep professor’s privilege in
mind, in accordance with which, research results are privately owned by researchers,
as trade secrets are by private companies.
9.4.4 Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on how they are used
and created in collaborations
A third level of categorization concerns how knowledge assets have been created and
used in collaborative relationships. This involves categorizing knowledge assets as
background knowledge and project results. This provides an overview of contractual
claims to research results in collaborative relationships. If we have created a research
result within a collaborative relationship, it is classified as a project result. If we use
our own knowledge assets and intellectual property assets within a collaborative relationship, this is classified as background knowledge. The same knowledge asset can
constitute background knowledge in more than one relationship. At the same time,
background knowledge and project results are defined in respective contractual relationships. Consequently, these assets also are legal objects in so far as they are contractual claims. It is important to be aware that research collaboration programmes
and suchlike, in particular, may have different definitions of what constitutes project

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

LEVEL 3: RESEARCH RESULTS
IN COLLABORATION

Categorizing how research results can be claimed based on
how they are used and created in collaborations

BACKGROUND
KNOWLEDGE

Own research result included as part of a speciﬁc collaborative relationship
for use by another party subject to certain terms of use

PROJECT RESULTS

Own research result that has been created, or will be created, in a speciﬁc
research relationship and that is managed in relation to other parties
by means of contracts

OTHER’S BACKGROUND
KNOWLEDGE

Another party's research result, included as part of a speciﬁc collaborative
relationship for our use subject to certain terms of use

OTHER’S PROJECT
RESULTS

Another party's research result that has been created, or will be created,
in a speciﬁc research relationship and that is managed in relation to
other parties by means of contracts

Figure 107. Categorizing knowledge assets as background knowledge and project results

345

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

results and background knowledge, respectively. Based on the categorization of
knowledge assets and intellectual property assets, we believe that it is entirely possible to comply with the majority of these definitions. That is to say, it is sufficient to
determine whether claimed knowledge assets and intellectual property assets constitute background knowledge or project results.
Hence, this categorization is also legal in nature given that it is largely shaped by
the governmental programme governance and the project contracts in force.
Background knowledge
In an academic environment it is important to have an overview of which research
results and other knowledge are included in and transferred as part of the environment’s collaborative relationships. According to the model, proprietary research
results included in a research collaboration project should be categorized as background knowledge. On what terms other actors may use such research results
should also be specified. This provides an overview of the terms on which a person
can use research results as background knowledge in other relationships.
From a purely practical standpoint, it is a matter of beginning from the first and
second principal categorizations (i.e., claimed knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets) and clarifying which of these is included in a specific collaborative
project. In certain cases it is more relevant to focus on intellectual property assets,
while in other contexts, it involves starting from the latter categorization of knowledge assets. This is often determined by the programme and project governance
related to the case at hand.
One important conclusion drawn by the KMP programme is that academic environments should claim their own research results as background knowledge in all
collaborative relationships. This should also be done in collaborative relationships
that do not require it based on the project’s management and even when the partners themselves do not require it. This is especially crucial if the project result is
controlled by another actor. If what constitutes background knowledge has not
been clearly defined, there is a distinct risk that it may come to be viewed as a project result.
Project results
Knowledge-oriented collaboration projects commonly lead to new results. Research
results that are generated within this kind of collaborative relationship should be
categorized as controlled research results. In the specific collaborative relationship,
the categorization is future-oriented and concerns prospective research results.
Once research results are achieved within the framework of this collaboration,
these can then be used, and possibly also controlled, by others in line with the
terms decided in the relevant contractual relationship.
In the same way as above, knowledge assets and intellectual property assets are cate-

346

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

gorized as project results. Moreover, the specific terms on which others may use
research results should be stated.
Others’ background knowledge
It is also important to clearly specify what constitutes the background knowledge
of others. If we have access to a specific research result within a collaborative
relationship, we need to know if it is classified as another’s background knowledge and on what terms we may use it.
Others’ project results
Likewise, we also need to know if a specific research result is another’s project
result. Here, too, it is a matter of having a clear understanding of how it may be
used. However, there is nothing to prevent partners in a collaborative relationship
from agreeing that one party should have the rights to the result. This is not especially common in the Swedish context, however.
9.4.5 Categorizing research results can be claimied based on their importance
for the academic activities
The fourth level concerns categorizing research results based on their importance
to the joint academic environment. This involves categorizing research results
based on whether they relate to infrastructure or results used in research collabora-

LEVEL 4: RESEARCH RESULTS
IN THE ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENT

Categorizing how research results can be claimed
based ont their importance for the academic activities

INFRASTRUCTURE ASSET

Research result that is continuously used in the academic
environment for research, etc.

STRATEGIC ASSET

Research result that is used in joint research collaborations and
other collaboration activities

VALUABLE ASSET

Other research result that is signiﬁcant

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Figure 108. Knowledge assets based on their importance in academic environments

347

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

tion projects, or are otherwise of major importance. We have an overview of our
knowledge assets, intellectual property assets and portfolio of background knowledge and project results, respectively. According to the model, we now ask ourselves to what degree these constitute infrastructure assets, strategic assets or valuable assets.

Infrastructure assets
The nature of some knowledge assets makes them necessary for an environment’s
own activities in either the short or long term. Databases, software and other
knowledge assets that are used to facilitate an environment’s own research should
not be assigned to another party or be subject to uncontrolled management. One
might consider this to be so obvious that it could not be a problem in reality.
Experience gained from the KMP programme suggest just the opposite, however.
There is a great need to raise awareness of how specific knowledge assets constitute

GOArt at the University of Gothenburg
In 1999, GOArt was established; a centre for interdisciplinary studies of organs
at the University of Gothenburg. Its objective is to conduct research that integrates
the musician, instrument and music. Today, GOArt’s research covers a broad area,
from materials research and original source studies to psychoacoustics and
musical interpretation.The musical organ plays a central role within GOArt and
has been studied in detail from artistic, technical, sociological and historical
perspectives. GOArt’s objective is to create an international research platform
that contributes to openness within the ﬁeld as well as a close exchange with
educational institutions. In addition to a number of publications and research
projects, GOArt’s research group has created a portfolio of intellectual assets that
should be managed with regard to utilization.

ASSET PORTFOLIO AND INFRASTRUCTURE:
A number of studies have been conducted under the auspices of GOArt.
Among other things, organs have been reconstructed, which has generated
knowledge assets concerning historical production processes, choices of material
and more. In connection with a mapping exercise, 15 knowledge assets were
claimed. Among these, a database containing a large amount of information on
organs was highlighted as being particularly important. The organ database
currently contains information on over 200 historic organs, 870 archived
documents and data on 1,900 people. Access to the database is legally regulated.
It is protected by copyright and has also been managed as background
knowledge in a wide range of projects. For example, after further development,
the organ database was used as a background asset when Uppsala Library
organized the Düben Collection of Music manuscript catalogue.
As such, the opportunity to access, manage and develop the database is a basic
precondition for GOArt. It is valuable in connection with future research within
the group, in building relationships with other research groups and, not least of
all, in creating a unique educational environment. Furthermore, together with the
copyright, the database is a requirement for oﬀering controlled openness within
the ﬁeld. If the database is not actively managed or moved from the academic
environment, both GOArt and the University of Gothenburg risk losing signiﬁcant
value in several areas, and thus, also intellectual infrastructure

Figure 109. Example of infrastructure assets

348

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

infrastructure. The need is so clear that it is our firm opinion that research results
used in this way should and must be categorized as infrastructure assets. It then
becomes clear that knowledge assets are important to the academic environment
itself and should be tended jointly.

Strategic asset
Even if a knowledge asset is not used continuously for internal operations, it may
still be very important for the academic environment. This is typically the case
when knowledge assets are used as background knowledge in research collaboration projects with other parties. In cases where a knowledge asset is important as
background knowledge in collaboration and utilization processes, it should be categorized as a strategic asset. This categorization shows that here, too, it is a matter
of a knowledge asset that needs to be tended collegially.

Valuable asset
Research results normally important to manage in collaboration and utilization
processes are categorized as valuable assets. This does not necessarily mean identifying assets that have an economic value.
Overall, this categorization entails gaining an overview of which knowledge assets
that are especially important to manage on behalf of and within the academic
environment, and which assets can be utilized without the need to safeguard the
environment’s own use.

9.5 Tools for the organizational control of claims to knowledge
assets
9.5.1 Evaluation of a model for the organizational control of research results
When claiming research results as intellectual assets, it becomes clear that there is
a need for a more long-term organizational capability. One fundamental challenge
for all academic environments beyond the ambition of making all research results
publicly accessible is creating a proactive control over an environment’s own
knowledge portfolio. Based on processes needed to claim research results, we realized a model is needed that lays the foundation for a number of fundamental control systems (clearance systems) when it comes to claiming research results. We
believe these systems must be part of an organizational capability for claiming
research results as knowledge assets. This is a capability that can and should be
developed through proactive teamwork between the academic environments and
the Innovation Office in line with the procedures discussed earlier. In this respect,
we believe that the model can be fundamentally important to an innovation office
with a proactive responsibility for integrating the responsibility to collaborate.

349

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Proactive management of claims
A critical insight from our development work is that claim-staking processes for
intellectual assets are a matter of making claims. The research result is a claim in
itself.335 This is even more true for that which is a specific intellectual property
asset and that which is an infrastructure asset. The model for claiming processes
presented earlier can be viewed as a model for managing requirements when objectifying knowledge assets. Moreover, the entire support system for claiming knowledge assets in academic environments revolves around establishing a proactivity
that enables an integrated approach to collaboration and utilization.
In addition to formulating and managing claims to intellectual assets in accordance
with the four levels discussed, we came to realize that there is also a need to proactively manage additional claims within the claim-staking process. It became evident
early on that the organizational management of claims concerning who has the
right to research results is of critical importance. This is particularly true in light of
the relatively difficult situation resulting from the professor’s privilege. We also
found that the organizational management of confidentiality is also very important.
It also became clear that academia must increasingly manage its own and other’s
claims to relationships of dependence; that is, claims in which a particular research
result is based on another party’s protected research result (intellectual property
asset).
A model for “clearing claims” on three levels
Operative evaluation work done within the KMP programme was based on a logic
associated with the claiming of intellectual property assets. Much of our understanding of how one can and should work with knowledge assets is based on how
intellectual property rights can be used in management. The dynamic between what
can be viewed as knowledge assets and intellectual property assets forms the foundation of the entire operational evaluation work done within the KMP programme.
This is not especially remarkable given the fact that it concerns the organizational
and contractual management of research results.
We realized that there is a need for a model that describes how the Innovation
Office, in partnership with academic environments, should manage claims to rights
in themselves, confidentiality claims and claims to relationships of dependence. Our
conclusion was that a similar model is an important contribution to an innovation
office’s proactive work for academic environments. Our evaluation work resulted in
a simplified but manageable model for promoting organizational capability on three
levels.
The evaluation gave rise to a model in which we focused on claims. In the practical
analysis, it is a matter of clarifying which claims to the knowledge asset and intellec335 It is increasingly common to discuss how research results need to be validated and/or verified based both on
how well supported they are from a scientific standpoint and on their proven benefit from a social perspective.

350

LEVEL 3: DEPENDENCY CLEARANCE

Management of claims to relationships of dependence

LEVEL 2: NOVELTY AND
CONFIDENTIALITY CLEARANCE

Management of novelty claims and confidentiality

LEVEL 1: ‘DEGUNKING’
CLEARANCE OF CLAIMS

‘Degunking’ and organizational title clearance

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

Figure 110. Model for organizational control over knowledge assets
tual property asset, respectively, exist and then managing these from an organizational standpoint. All three levels become easier to manage if claims are clarified
proactively. Discussing and perhaps also clarifying in a contract in advance just who
has the rights to research results makes staking claims so much simpler than trying
to handle the matter after the fact. This is particularly true when managing novelty
and confidentiality. It is not possible to ensure secrecy after the fact. A similar line
of reasoning can be applied to relationships of dependence. Intellectual property
rights infringements cannot be undone.
Identify, evaluate, manage and organize claims
This model is based on the idea of proactive interaction between identification,
evaluation, management and organization in academic environments. Through the
Innovation Office’s initiation of a process for identifying and evaluating existing
claims to intellectual assets, a process is initiated to determine how the academic
environment should organize claimsprocesses going forward. For example, when
an innovation office evaluates who holds the rights to the academic environment’s
intellectual property assets, a process is initiated to determine how academic environments should manage and organize rights claims in the future. In this context, a
systematic “tagging” of various claims in relation to specific intellectual assets contained in an IA portfolio can be useful.336
Hence, proactive efforts from the Innovation Office’s side make proactive action
within the academic environment possible. This takes place in accordance with the
procedures discussed above. The interaction between the academic environment,
the Innovation Office and Innovation Academy (or equivalent) enables a learning
and development process with a focus on organizational capability.

336 See above in Section 9.3.

351

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

9.5.2 “Degunking” and organizational title clearance
One vital feature of a claim-staking process concerning intellectual assets is knowing who created the knowledge assets, who has claims to the intellectual property
assets, and who has the right to access and use the assets. For the KMP programme, these are fundamental data, which is why they were included in the evaluation work at an early stage. Experience has taught us that these processes are by
no means easy to manage, especially after the fact; that is, at a point in time when
the actual creation processes and possibly even implementation processes have
already been carried out. Often, it is unclear just who has contributed and what
they have contributed with. Contractual claims can be tacit and implicit. If it has
not been proactively clarified which claims exist and should be accepted, the situation often becomes what we term “gunky”. We do not have a clear picture of who
controls what.
Moreover, the fact that knowledge projects often involve some form of international participation means that there may be a lack of certainty about which rules
should apply. In our eyes, this is a typical example of an area where the Innovation
Office can make significant contributions by adopting a proactive approach.
Claims to weak and strong rights
One of the central aims of the work with knowledge assets was to create a way of
managing what can be characterized as “weak” rights claims. Intellectual property
rights can be described as “strong” rights claims because they create an exclusive
right to exclude others from certain activities. In cases where there was no intellectual property right but a need to produce claims nevertheless, the term “knowhow” was often used. Claiming that you are the inventor of a patentable invention
is a legal claim, but a claim to being the creator of “know-how”, which is not part
of an intellectual property asset, would not constitute a legal claim. In practice,
however, such claims are often made in contractual relationships. For example, it
is not unusual for licensing agreements concerning know-how to be entered into.
In this way, the latter is given legitimacy in both contractual relationships and hierarchies. We realized that it is more reasonable to distinguish between stronger
rights claims that result from intellectual property legislation on the one hand and,
on the other, weaker rights claims which, in principle, can be invoked in contractual relationships and within various associations.
Research results are increasingly managed as objects within and in relation to collaborative transactions. This occurs regardless of whether the knowledge assets are
included in intellectual property assets or not. We felt it was obvious that it is not
sufficient to focus solely on know-how in these contexts. A more refined approach
to knowledge assets is required. Being cognizant of the existence of weaker rights
claims laid the foundation for our understanding of what can constitute knowledge
assets (the five criteria), but also of how these should be categorized in relation to
one another.
Our evaluation resulted in a model that focuses on three kinds of claim: 1) strong

352

Title claims to
intellectual
property
assets

Title claims to
knowledge
assets

Claims to use
intellectual
property
assets and
knowledge
assets

• Who claims to have contributed to the
intellectual property asset?
• Who claims to have taken control of the asset
contractually, and, thus, also of the intellectual
property right?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

• Who claims to have contributed to
the research result?
• Who claims to have taken control of the result
through a contract?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

• Who claims the right to access the assets?
• Who claims the right to use the assets for:
• Research
• Commercialization
• Who claims the right to modify and develop
the assets?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

Figure 111. Claims to intellectual assets

rights claims to intellectual property assets, 2) weak rights claims to knowledge
assets and 3) claims to the right to use knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets.
Title claims to intellectual property assets
Instead of trying to decipher who holds the right to a specific intellectual property
asset, we chose to reformulate the question and focus on who had laid, or could
possibly lay, claim to holding the rights to it. By doing so, any conflicting claims
could be identified, as these must be managed. Even more important is the understanding that claims can be either more or less well-founded. For example, we can
establish that a certain claim may exist, but that no one has analyzed in detail just
who did what and in which relationships.
As such, the starting point is to conduct some form of proactive claim-staking
process for the intellectual property assets in the academic environment. This
might involve one individual asset, but should preferably involve a more comprehensive analysis of the academic environment’s assets in general. In line with the
process model described earlier, an initial step is to define the claims that have
been made or could be made. We ask ourselves which individuals consider them-

353

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

selves to be the relevant assets’ originators.337 Subsequently, we also ask which
individuals consider that they have assumed the rights from the originators.
A second step in the process is to evaluate how well founded the claims are.”338
Depending on the particular environment’s explicit circumstances, a more or less
comprehensive evaluation of existing claims may be in order. In some contexts, the
objective can be limited to eliminating claims that clearly have no legitimate basis.
At other times, the objective can be to eliminate all conflicting claims and any prevailing uncertainty. One determining factor is how long one can and is willing to go
when it comes to evaluating research and collaboration and utilization processes.
An evaluation may very well result in the identification of more possible claims. It
may prove to be that there are more stakeholders etc. who are relevant in the context.
Title claims to knowledge assets
In our development efforts, we came to realize the importance of focusing not only
on who may stake intellectual property claims as rights holders, but also of starting
our approach from the continued functional control of knowledge assets. Using the
specific knowledge asset and the knowledge process as a starting point, we felt it
was important to determine who are “creators” of knowledge assets as opposed to
limiting ourselves to intellectual property assets only. The majority of all claims
emanate from the claim of being a creator, particularly intellectual property rightsbased claims, but also contractual and weaker rights claims.
In a similar way as for intellectual property rights, we now begin by identifying
who the creators of the knowledge assets are. Furthermore, in practice, it is more
natural to begin with identification based on knowledge assets and then to move
on to intellectual property assets. Following this, we attempt to identify claims
from having assumed the rights to assets through explicit or implicit contractual
relationships. Here, too, the second step is to evaluate the claims. This is a matter
of evaluating what has happened concretely from research and relationship standpoints. Here again, knowledge of the specific legal situation is needed. In certain
cases and as a result of contracts, there are clearly established and recorded norms
for managing background knowledge and project results.

Claims to use intellectual property assets and knowledge assets
After having gained a picture of who hold the rights to the intellectual property
assets and knowledge assets, the questions is who has claims to use the assets.
337 Within intellectual property law, tradition dictates that a distinction be made between the protection of intellectual achievements distinctive marks. The protection of intellectual achievements has its origins in the individual's
creative effort. All claims must be able to be traced back to the creative effort. It must be possible to trace the right
to patentable inventions back to the inventor and the copyright to artistic and literary works back to the
artist/author. The situation concerning trademarks is different. For example, the right to use a trademark is held by
the legal person by whom the symbol is used to distinguish their products and services.
338 See above in Section 2.3.

354

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Here, we focus on the interplay between knowledge assets and intellectual property
assets. Naturally, this is based on anyone is free to use all the research results they
have access to, to the extent that no intellectual property assets or contractual obligations are involved. That said, it is not certain that a person will have access to all
research results. It is one thing to eventually have access to an article in a publication and another to have access to all data, observations, instructions and other
research results.
Accordingly, one initial step is to identify who has contractual claims to the right
to access specific research results (access rights). This may involve obligations to
adopt a number of measures and to actually transfer knowledge assets.
Automatically giving other researchers access to research data that one has collected, documented and structured is far from a given in every case. As explained earlier, open access is not simply a matter of unrestricted access to publications. In
this context, it is of interest to know which requirements can be imposed concerning open access beyond those that arise from contractual agreements (see also
Section 9.5.3). As above, it is important to evaluate a claim once it has been identified.
A second step is to identify who has contractual claims to the right to use the
research result. It is one thing to have access to specific knowledge assets, but
another to be able to use them. Here, we distinguish between claims to the right to
use knowledge assets in utilization activities in general and claims to the right to
use them in research and development processes. If a person has been granted
access to a knowledge asset, is it not then more or less a given that they should be
allowed to use it for research purposes? One might think so. Still, focusing on the
database as an asset, it is not obvious how it could even be used for research purposes. No experiment-related exception, like that in the Patents Act, exists for the
database as intellectual property asset. However, in general, it is reasonable that a
person should be able to use the knowledge assets they have access to in their own
research. Identified claims may be evaluated to differing degrees based on the relevant context.
Claims to the right to use knowledge assets in operational activities can also be
limited in several ways and bound by various conditions. It is conceivable to have
different conditions in research collaboration agreements for commercial use compared to those for use in certain public activities. In this instance, it is important to
distinguish between claims to the right to use knowledge assets yourself in your
own practical work and claims to the right to allow others to use knowledge assets
(i.e. to sub-license).
A third step is to identify existing claims to the right to modify and develop knowledge assets. Here it is important to differentiate between research and development
in which the knowledge asset is shared collectively. For example, in the case of software, a right of access does not mean that a person also has permission to add or
change its code. Accordingly, it is important to distinguish between claims related
to the right to use software for one’s own research and claims to the right to conduct research on the programme itself and to make changes, such as modifications.

355

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

In the same way as described earlier, this assessment involves forming an opinion
on how well founded the various claims are. This requires an understanding of
what has occurred in practice as well as an understanding of the legal situation in
the particular context.
Organizational overview of the academic environment and proactive
management of rights claims
One important takeaway from the KMP programme is that identifying and evaluating claims to knowledge assets and intellectual property assets is an effective way
for an innovation office to gain an overview of an academic environment and its
work. In this way, it becomes a proactive means to enable academic environments
to assume and uphold a joint, collegial responsibility. Mapping and evaluating
claims creates a portfolio of research results in the academic environment and a
portfolio of which researchers are behind these results. Likewise, it also becomes
clear which researchers work together within the environment. An overview of
researchers’ external relationships is also generated. Moreover, it provides a basic
picture of the degree of knowledge-related “gunkiness” that exists and to what
extent knowledge asset management will be required in various relationships.
More important still is that the mapping should reveal the impact of the academic
environment’s organization of current claims. One common result of “degunked”
an academic environment is collective insight into the importance of avoided similar gunkiness in the future. Thus, it becomes natural to assume a greater collective

Figure 112. Mapping different claims

356

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

responsibility for establishing how claims concerning the academic environment’s
knowledge assets should be handled.
9.5.3 Management of novelty claims and confidentiality
A process with a fundamental impact on control over an environment’s own knowledge portfolio concerns how to manage demands that knowledge assets be kept
confidential or are of such a nature that they must be handled with special care.
Here, too, we based our approach on considerations related to intellectual property
assets. We have pinpointed three kinds of claim.

Novelty
claims vs.
public
availability

Demands
for access
to public
documents
and confidentiality

Requirements
for special
management
due to
sensitivity

• Which claims can be made that intellectual
property assets fulﬁl novelty requirement/can be
viewed as publicly available, respectively?

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

• Which claims can be made that knowledge
assets constitute public documents/are
subject to conﬁdentiality?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

• Which other claims can be made that knowledge assets
must be managed in a special way due to their
sensitive nature?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

Figure 113. Novelty and confidentiality clearance

Novelty claims vs. public availability
For a knowledge asset to be patentable, it must first be novel. In practice, this most
often applies within technical and natural science fields. If anyone within the organization concerned makes knowledge publicly available, it is no longer novel and a
claim to patentability can be rendered invalid by anyone who is aware that the
knowledge has been made public. Confidential handling is also required for trade
secrets.

357

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

As such, one important task for the Innovation Office is to assist in identifying and
evaluating claims that intellectual assets have been made publicly available, where
this is relevant. By proactively focusing on the intellectual property right and the
management of novelty and confidentiality, a foundation is laid for developing the
organizational capabilities of academic environments.
An evaluation of a claim of novelty requires that it is possible to gather information about other actors’ activities within the relevant field of knowledge and also
information about how the invention has been managed by researchers and other
who have had access to it. This is typically something that needs to be organized
within the academic environment. At least in the case of certain academic environments, they need the organizational capability to be able to make conscious decisions about when research results should be made publicly available. For certain
environments, there is undoubtedly also a need for the organizational capability to
assess novelty based on what others have achieved in their research. In this case
what is known as prior art analysis comes into play, whereby novelty is analyzed
(see more below). A special challenge facing Swedish research organizations stems
from the regulation concerning access to public documents.
Demands for access to public documents and confidentiality
A pertinent claim on knowledge assets is that they should be viewed as public
documents and, as such, be made available to anyone who requests access. It is
not clear just when various knowledge assets should be viewed as public documents. As stated earlier, they must first be “established”. If they are still considered to be supporting material for work activities, then they are not public documents. There is an obvious need to identify and evaluate which among, when and
how an academic environment’s knowledge assets become public documents. This
is typically a service that innovation offices and other administrators can and
should provide. Proactive work requires an organizational capability to be able to
manage knowledge assets correctly, similarly to what is noted above.
This becomes even clearer when identifying and evaluating claims to knowledge
assets, even when they are to be viewed as public documents, particularly when
they are covered by confidentiality. There are many knowledge assets that need to
be kept secret for various reasons, such as patient safety, personal integrity and
defence. Together with other administrators, the Innovation Office has an important proactive role to play here in developing the organizational capability for
managing confidential knowledge assets.
Requirements for special management due to sensitivity
There are also other claims to knowledge assets that need to be identified and
evaluated. For example, research results such as animal models, gene banks and
the like require special management. Research based on sensitive personal information must be approved in accordance with Sweden’s Ethical Review of
Research Involving Humans (2003:460). Generally speaking, there is a need to
identify and evaluate what can be described as sensitive research results.

358

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Overview of the academic environment and proactive management of confidentiality
and other claims
In our view, the absence of organizational governance over how knowledge is presented, conveyed, published and so on is an expression of the fact it is not reasonable to place responsibility on academics for managing the research results on their
own. If university management nor the support functions have no knowledge of or
control over who conveys what, it is difficult to fulfil expectations related to managing confidential knowledge assets. Identifying and evaluating different claims creates an overview of which knowledge assets need to be managed collegially in various ways. The innovation office’s proactive support systems related to the claimstaking process have good potential for helping to develop a long-term organizational capability, especially within the academic environments where there is an
obvious need and demand.
9.5.4 Management of claims to relationships of dependence
An additional service that the Innovation Office should develop and provide concerns the identification and evaluation of relationships of dependence. The fact that
a knowledge-based organization, such as an academic research group, does not
conduct commercial activity does not always mean that it has freedom to operate.
Clear restrictions may exist not only in connection with collaboration and utilization, but also in relation to research and education.

Claims of
dependence
on intellectual
property
assets

• To what extent are our knowledge assets covered
by others’ intellectual property rights?
• To what extent do we, as an organization,
have freedom to operate and when may we
need to seek authorization?

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

Claims of
dependence
on other
knowledge
assets

Claims of
dependence
on
individuals

• To what extent does the ability to utilize depend on other
knowledge assets?
• To what extent do we, as an organization, have freedom
to operate and when might we need to
seek authorization?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

• To what extent does the ability to utilize assets depend
on researchers’ participation?
• To what extent do researchers participate and to what extent
will we need to ensure their participation?
• How well veriﬁed are these claims?

Figure 114. Dependence clearance

359

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Claims of dependence on intellectual property assets
Intellectual property law is also our starting point when dealing with dependency
claims. Even when the assets have been created internally within the knowledgebased organization, other actors may have previously been granted patents wide
ranging enough that the knowledge organization may not utilize its own assets.
Knowledge development is often cumulative, with new knowledge based on previous, controlled knowledge. The result is that, without a permit/license from the
patent holder, the patent is infringed upon when a knowledge organization uses its
own knowledge assets.339 For example, when research groups patent research tools,
there may be clear claims for research activities infringing these patents. Most countries, however, assume a freedom to operate exists in connection with research,
regardless of any patents. That said, developments in recent years have shown that
this cannot be taken for granted.
In research contexts where the knowledge assets of others are used and developed
more concretely, there is a greater risk of ending up in a relationship of dependence. For example, this is the case when a group of researchers uses and develops
software or a database. The same risk exists when using the narratives and creations of others. As a rule, when using someone else’s intellectual property assets as
elements of one’s own knowledge assets, using one’s own research result may risk
infringing intellectual property rights. Thus, one is dependent on permission from
the owner of the intellectual property asset.
Given this situation, the Innovation Office needs to provide the service of identifying and evaluating claims of relationships of dependence within the support system. Providing the service of evaluating the freedom to operate is most important
in technical, medical and other natural science fields. That is not to say this may
not also be important in other research fields. Analyses become increasingly important the more the university pursues utilization processes in which recipients of
knowledge assets expect to be free to use them. As noted, it is important that we
are able to use others’ intellectual property asset without permission in research
contexts (e.g. for experiments).
Within the KMP programme, particular importance has been attached to evaluating what is needed to allow the Innovations Office to conduct freedom-to-operate
analyses. The tool’s framework is intended to clarify claims that affect opportunities to utilize assets. We have been able to determine that there are a number of
useful support tools already available. We have also been able to ascertain that it is
important to work closely with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV)
and also the university library (read more in next section). Evaluating how these
proactive services can enable the development of the organizational capability in
339 Analyses of relationships of dependence and freedom to operate are not necessarily easy to conduct in practice. Interpreting scope of intellectual property rights is by no means an exact science, and it is not always easy to
predict how courts will decide. There are also those who recommend avoiding performing these types of analyses,
as they can increase the damages payable when dealing with infringement processes at a later time. However,
there is much to suggest that knowledge-based organizations should also be organizationally proactive when it
comes to managing others' claims. The better the overview, the greater the control over one's own knowledge
portfolio and, thereby, also the potential for manoeuvring.

360

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

academic environments is of particular interest. Many academic environments need
to think in terms of freedom to operate. In the same way as above, we can argue
that ignorance about the varying degrees of freedom to operate is, in itself, is
because environments often lack control over their own knowledge portfolios.
Claims of dependency on other knowledge assets
It is important to identify and evaluate the contractual dependencies that exist. As
noted earlier, it is increasingly important to have a clear grasp of how much you
are using others’ background knowledge and project results in your own research.
If you have a research result based on someone else’s knowledge assets and a
research collaboration contract is in force, a dependency exists that is defined contractually. Thus, the specifications of the collaborative relationship define the
boundaries of the freedom to operate. Identifying and analyzing claims in this
instance is largely synonymous with evaluating utilization rights claims. (See
Section 9.5.3 above.)
Freedom-to-operate analyses conducted as part of an innovation office’s support
programme should include identifying and evaluating contractual claims. This is a
supplementary evaluation that contributes to a comprehensive whole. Identifying
claims in collaboration and utilization processes reveals how different research
results are built on one another, facilitating an analysis of dependency in relation
to other intellectual property assets.
Claims of dependency on individuals
An additional supplementary aspect of identifying and evaluating relationships of
dependency is what can be described as dependence on individuals. As discussed
in the description of the claim-staking process, it is also important to identify the
people who have internalized the research results so that they can use it and disseminate it. We have chosen to call these individuals “carriers”. In certain cases,
knowledge assets cannot be transferred to others unless these carriers are involved
in the process. We feel this involves dependence on an individual.
An innovation office that provides support for claim-staking processes should also
offer to identify and evaluate dependencies on individuals. Ultimately, this knowledge can have a stimulating effect on academic environments.
Organizational overview of the academic environment and proactive
management of dependency claims
The Innovation Office’s support programme for identifying and evaluating relationships of dependence points to the importance of academic environments’ developing an organizational capability to manage these, but also the importance of the
environment’s identifying these on an ongoing basis. The overview of the various
claims allows for a improved self-awareness on the part of the academic environ-

361

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ment. For example, an evaluation of freedom to operate paves the way for an
understanding of how different actors develop control positions in research and
innovation arenas.

9.6 Sources of research and innovation-related information
9.6.1 Evaluation of available sources and expertise
A key conclusion drawn by the KMP programme is that access to systematized
information about the surrounding world is a central feature in a support system
for claim-staking processes. Certainly, the need for information about the outside
world is greater in connection with the support system for positioning academic
environments. For the process of claiming intellectual assets, information is needed
for assessing the result of one’s own research as a public resource. The assessment
of what constitutes an intellectual asset will always need to be based on some form
of external analysis. Consequently, information sources that provide knowledge
about how important one’s own research result is are typically of interest. Another
example is information sources and services that facilitate the assessment of the
degree to which a research result is new and unique in relation to what has been
achieved previously.
Because the process of claiming intellectual assets has developed from an understanding of how to claim intellectual property assets, it was natural to build on the
knowledge sources used for this. For users of patent information, it is now well
established that these information sources are not limited to providing guidance on
what one can apply for a patent for, or the extent to which one risks committing a
patent infringement.
From an early stage, patent information can be used to evaluate research results as

Process support when
positioning
academic
environments.

Procedures for
positioning
academic
environments.

Sources of
research and
innovation-related
information.
ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION AND
UTILIZATION

IT support
for documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts and managing
analytical data.

Figure 115. Sources of research and innovation-related information

362

CLAIM

DECIDE
DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE
ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

knowledge assets. Bibliometric analysis of patent information can be used as a tool
for producing research information. Similarly, the bibliometric analysis of research
information can be applied to produce supporting data about assets that should be
controlled in various ways. Thus, within the framework of the KMP programme,
we focused on how research information and patent information constitute supplementary sources when enabling claiming processes.
9.6.2 Research information for claiming intellectual assets
It is obvious that access to research information is valuable when evaluating an
important research result. Through our collaboration with the university library, it
became clear that a number of methods and sources now exist that can facilitate
evaluation. Bibliometric searches are commonplace when analyzing scientific publications. For example, searches are performed through quantitative studies of publications within a chosen field of research. Different types of information can be
obtained depending on how the search process is structured. For example, through
bibliometric searches on joint publication and citations, various indicators linked to
the research’s quantity and quality can be established. In this way, statistics can be
gathered on how great an impact certain publications have had and which links
may exist between different publications, authors and subject areas.
For innovation advisors, bibliometric research information can be used during
claiming processes to gain a understanding of the research field. Using a couple of
key publications within the chosen research field, bibliometric search methods and
tools can generate an overview. Ordinarily, public and private databases are used
that contain scientific information focused on international multidisciplinary citation databases. The KMP programme’s evaluation showed that the university library
can and should be given a central role in providing bibliometric analyses as supporting data for claiming knowledge assets and intellectual property assets.
9.6.3 Patent information for evaluating research results as assets
Our collaboration with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office (PRV) used its
ordinary range of services directed at businesses as a starting point from which to
investigate how we could develop an existing range of services adapted to the university as a state agency. We also wanted to develop the patent-information services to include intellectual property assets in general. The ambition was to evaluate
the logic behind current services to see how it could be developed and supplemented with other information to become more comprehensive research and innovation-related information. For claiming intellectual assets, we focused on the services offered by PRV as listed below.
PRV’s range of services has been divided into three categories:
1. Search services that evaluate novelty and inventive step, i.e.
patentability
2. Search services that evaluate the risk of infringing on another’s
intellectual property rights

363

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

3. Search services that map technology fields, technological development,
actors in the engineering industry etc.
Services that evaluate novelty and inventive step
A patentable invention must meet the requirements for absolute novelty and the
inventive step. More concretely, this means that the invention may neither be generally known on the day when the patent application is lodged nor be identical to
prior art. Searches for any such novelty obstacles are conducted by PRV through
multiple search services. Below are two examples taken from among the agency’s
commissioned work.
● Prior art
● Novelty Search
PRV’s Prior Art service provides an overview of the current status of certain technology and technological advancements within a predefined given field. The
results of a search like this show generally available technology that is relevant to
the invention, taking into consideration the requirements for absolute novelty and
the inventive step. The analytical data indicates whether the invention can be
claimed as a patentable invention. The primary information sources are patent
databases and other, non-patent-related literature in the form of scientific publications and technology periodicals.
The basic objective of the Novelty Search service is to find documents that contest
novelty or the inventive step in relation to the invention described in the patent
application. Once the search has achieved its purpose, it is terminated. This search
relatively quickly provides supporting data on which to define an invention as a
potential intellectual property asset. International patent databases and non-patentrelated literature in the form of scientific and technical periodicals are used for as
sources of information. PRV’s collection of older letters patent is also included in
the search.
The common denominator for both services is that all relevant documents concerning the specified technology field are included in the searches, regardless of when
they were published. Compared with the Novelty Search service, the Prior Art
service stands out as the more comprehensive of the two.340

340 In Prior Art searches, a large technology field is searched together with any other aspects of the invention. The
consequences of this is that the basis for review, which includes both a problem formulation and a proposed solution, is described on a broader, more conceptual level, which, in itself, requires more extensive search efforts to
ensure satisfactory results. Conversely, novelty searches are based on a well-specified basis consisting of the invention packaged as an independent patent claim or a well-defined problem formulation together with a verified
solution.

364

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The potential of novelty searches and prior-art analyses for
claiming knowledge assets
Using patent information services like the Novelty Search provides an understanding of a research result’s originality. The Prior Art service further visualizes the typical assets within a certain technical field. Analyses based on prior art can be used
as supporting data in gaining an understanding of what constitutes a knowledge
asset, its utility and possible control claims.
As part of the KMP programme, PRV used an IA portfolio as a basis for searches
for the first time. The intention was to evaluate an academic environment’s potential for staking claims. This involved a number of challenges, given the fundamental differences between the various organizations’ work methods.341 One insight
from the programme is how strongly patent information and patent information
services can contribute to a more reliable and effective claim-staking process in
academic environments. The greatest development potential is in identifying how
to make a portfolio of knowledge assets searchable within the framework of PRV’s
existing range of services.
Services that evaluate the risk of intellectual property rights infringement
PRV also offers services that forecast a specific invention’s possible infringement
on third-party patent rights. Even when an invention is considered to be
patentable, it may still risk infringing on a third-party’s rights, depending on how
the field of technology is structured. If this is the case and based on an
asset/resource perspective, it means that the asset has a relationship of dependence
with a third-party’s intellectual property asset. The KMP programme has focused
on the following services in this regard:
● Analysis of Freedom to Operate (FTO Analysis)
● Validity Search
To ensure that an invention does not infringe on existing patent rights, an FTO
Analysis is performed. This service provides a good indication of the risk of potential
infringement and an overview of which rights may affect the use and utilization of
the relevant invention. No assessment of actual infringement is carried out, however.
Unlike in the Novelty Search, FTO searches continue until all relevant documents
have been found, that is, all patents that the invention risks infringing upon. The
purpose of an FTO Analysis may be to evaluate the preconditions for utilizing an

341 Our examination did not ask so much which service or search strategy should be used. Rather, it simply looked
at how supporting data from the claim-staking process could be rendered searchable among PRV's range of products and services. Historically, classes and search terms have been central in every kind of patent information
search. The IA portfolio and technology tree from the claim-staking process did not provide the level of detail that
PRV is accustomed to. The material was adequate for providing an overview of the technology's assets and position, but differs too greatly from the traditional approach to the patentability criteria of novelty and the inventive
step.

365

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

invention within a geographic area. Thus, it is of interest to study existing patent
rights within the relevant geographic area. The search strategy used should define
broad patent claims based on the specific characteristics of the invention
described.342
On occasion, there are grounds for carrying out a supplementary examination,
known as a Validity Search, of the patent application or granted patent. For example, this examination may evaluate the strength of a granted patent by validating
the patent’s status. Information sources used for validity searches consist of patent
documents with filing dates prior to the priority date and non-patent-related literature published before the priority date for the patent document that forms the basis
for the examination.
The FTO Analysis is based on search criteria similar to those used in the Novelty
Search, i.e. the invention is packaged as an independent patent claim or a welldefined problem formulation and solution. Validity searches focus on the contents
of the patent claims in the relevant patent document and on finding additional
documents that were not found, for example, during the Novelty Search. Validity
searches cover a broader area by comparison and also include literature that may
not have been searched earlier.
Potential of FTO analysis and validity searches for claiming knowledge assets
Both the FTO Analysis and Validity Search provide information important to
forming an understanding of the value of knowledge assets and of which paths to
utilization are available for one’s own research. The analyses are key supporting
data during the claims phase, particularly in combination with other research and
utilization-related information.
9.6.4 Patent information as support during clearance processes
Accordingly, patent information can serve as a framework in the support structure
for information sources and information services. In addition, work should begin
with the clearance tools discussed earlier. Focusing on research results as an internal resource base in the claim-staking process is natural. At the same time, this
needs to be managed based on both internal and external claims.
Patent information as support for clearing claims
By determining the inventors of the patent or patent application clarifies who initially held claims to the knowledge asset claimed under intellectual property law
342 For example, if an invention contains iron as a specific feature, the search strategy could search for the broader
term 'metal' to ensure that related areas are covered. The information sources used in FTO analyses are patent databases containing European and US patents.

366

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

and thereby allows us to identify who can be considered bearers of important
knowledge about the asset. Similarly, the information about the patent’s owner
provides a basis for clearing title claims.
Patent information and patent information services as support for novelty and
confidentiality clearing
Technological development is a rapid and dynamic process that needs to be monitored closely and analyzed at each critical decision-making junction to establish
what is considered to be novel and generally available. The patent information
services Novelty Search and Prior Art provide insight into what is generally available at a certain point in time. With the help of the above-noted services and an
experienced patent engineer, knowledge assets can be provided with a well-founded
prognosis concerning their patentability. Once a knowledge asset is deemed to be
new and to differ from prior art, it needs to be managed confidentially to ensure
that future opportunities to receive a patent are preserved.
Patent information and patent information services as support for dependency
clearing
When evaluating positions of dependence, it is critical to establish whether utilizing
one’s own knowledge asset is dependent on another rights holder’s consent.
Through an FTO Analysis, a qualitative assessment is performed of the scope of
protection of related technology fields. Where a knowledge asset is considered to
risk infringing on a third-party’s patent rights, either the creator of the knowledge
asset or the person to whom the right of ownership has been transferred should
consider the potential relationship of dependence. A second step in the dependencyclearing process is to review the strength of the right that may possibly be the subject of infringement, i.e. a Validity Search. The result of the latter gives an indication of the strength of the protection provided by intellectual property law.
Combined, these two services provide an overview of the scope of protection and
strength of the previously claimed intellectual property asset. The analyzed data
either supports or undermines the potential relationship of dependence when utilizing one’s own knowledge asset.
The outcome of these two information analyses supports the strategic considerations relevant during the necessary dependency clearance. In cases where the
analyses show that a knowledge asset lies within the scope of protection of existing patent rights, there is reason to consider whether a license should be obtained.

9.7 Conclusions
A support system for claiming intellectual assets lays the foundation for an institutional system that integrates collaboration and promotes utilization in academic
environments. Through the Innovation Office’s development of a proactive work
method, a collegial process is put into place within academic environments. The

367

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

interaction with the Innovation Academy makes the claiming process a learning
and development process. The university library, PRV and others should participate
and provide reliable information that supports this approach. Entrepreneurs’
schools and other practice-oriented education programmes may be relevant
resources in the claiming processes. Procedures ensure that the various actors develop a collaborative relationship that is adapted to suit the academic environment’s
needs and demands.
A further conclusion drawn by the KMP programme is that the support system
should include a number of models and conceptual tools. For institutional development to occur, it is important to use a number of tools and that these are promoted by the Innovation Office using presentations, critical reviews and dialogues
with the Innovation Academy serving as a hub. Over time, we came to realize
that there is a need for a process tool, a categorization model and a model for
managing different claims. Together, these have proven of significant potential,
not least of all in the ability to gain an overview of the interplay between research
results as specific objects and as a collective portfolio. This overview creates many
opportunities for the practical management of not only collaboration and utilization, but also of research processes themselves. In our evaluation, we came to the
conclusion that when these tools are combined, they serve as the foundation for a
proactive model for the Innovation Office.

368

10. Positioning an
academic environment
10.1 Support system for positioning an academic environment
Evaluation of a support system for positioning research groups/researchers and
portfolios of knowledge assets in international research and innovation arenas.
A key element of the KMP programme is the evaluation of how the university as an
organization can assist academic environments from an operational standpoint in
positioning themselves in national and international research, collaboration and utilization arenas. It was particularly interesting for us to evaluate how to chart
research, collaboration and utilization processes using external information. This
allowed us to collect data for determining how academic environments can position
themselves in international research arenas. This data supplements IA portfolios
and the like when academic environments are working to integrate collaboration
and promoting utilization. We consider the positioning process, in the same way as
the process to claim knowledge assets, as fundamental to the Innovation Office’s
proactive approach. Similarly, this is about identification and evaluation. In this
instance, however, understanding the external research landscape and other relevant
external circumstances allow identification and evaluation of an environment’s own
position.
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Support system for positioning
academic environments

Figure 116. Support system for positioning academic environments

369

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

It became apparent in the KMP programme that it is not always useful to begin a
utilization promotion project with a claiming process for knowledge assets. In most
cases, it is more relevant to focus a proactive approach on what is happening in the
outside world. Initially, this might involve investigating which other actors are pursuing comparable research, collaboration and utilization activities. While the claiming process begins with an internal and resource-based analysis of an environment’s
own assets, the positioning process is based on an analysis of external research
landscapes and utilization landscapes.343 This enables academic environments to
assess and determine their own position. Seeking answers to questions about an
environment’s research, collaboration and utilization position is very important in
stimulating efforts to promote utilization at the operational level.
A separate support system for the work with academic environments is needed
because of its specialized logic and a well-adapted approach. This logic results
from long-term development work aimed specifically at enabling a greater societal
responsibility by research organizations. Instead of the conventional focus on the

Process support
for positioning
academic
environments

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures for
positioning
academic
environments

ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION
AND UTILIZATION

IT
Sources of
research and
innovation-related
information

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts and
managing analytical
information

Figure 117. Features of the support system for positioning academic environments
343 As noted, the claim-staking process involves identifying and evaluating which resources/values an academic
environment has created and so on, while the positioning process involves identifying and evaluating the position
the academic environment has developed through this. This approach focuses on what the world looks like and
how the positions of others have been developed. From a theoretical standpoint, these are two sides of the same
coin. An IA portfolio can be understood as both a portfolio of resources and as a position in a landscape. This logic
is well-developed for managing patent information. We use patent information to evaluate the invention as a
patentable or patented resource, at the same time as we analyze how the approved patent creates exclusive positions that allow us to respond to violations by other parties.

370

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

utilization of ideas, it emphasises the academic environment as an actor with a
position and the ability to act in relation to the surrounding world. So our starting
point is the environment’s research position in the relevant research and utilization
field, both globally and internationally. We then review positions related to
research collaboration, research financing, utilization and other collaboration. It is
especially important to focus on how the academic environment’s position can be
developed through a collaboration and/or utilization project. The logic uses the
fact that there are a number of actors, both internationally and nationally, who
actively develop their positions and actually conduct various collaboration and utilization processes. This allows us to create an overview of utilization and collaboration based on the ability of an academic environment to integrate its collaboration project with its research efforts.
As with the claiming process, positioning is important in initiating a process for
developing the academic environment’s organizational capability for collaboration
and utilization. Positioning and claiming are two strongly complementary and
mutually reinforcing processes. Once an academic environment has claimed and
evaluated its intellectual assets while clarifying its research position, we enhance our
ability to strategically deliberate and make operation-related decisions. The KMP
programme concluded that a supplementary support system for positioning academic environments is needed alongside the support system for claiming intellectual
assets.
The programme also refined an IAM framework for this positioning support system
that includes the following stages:
Action plan for collaboration and utilization: Similar to the process of claiming
knowledge assets, this effort is based on the action plan that we believe all academic
environments should prepare (see chapters 5 and 8).
Procedures for positioning academic environments: These procedures provide the
foundation for the support system’s design and implementation. They should primarily be designed based on those used for the claiming process. These are two complementary, proactive systems that should be structured according to similar principles and logic whenever possible.
Process support for positioning academic environments: This support system
revolves around a process for determining how to implement the evaluation of and
support for positioning academic environments. Once again, the goal is to create a
process that gives academic environments, the Innovation Office and others a frame
of reference for their efforts to strengthen academic environments.
Sources of research and innovation-related information: Research and innovationrelated information are particularly needed for this support system. The better the
access to information sources, the greater the likelihood that the support system
will have a significant impact. It is crucial that academics have easy access to
information that makes conducting their work easier. Our collaboration with PRV
was intended to set the stage for managing more extensive external information at
universities.

371

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

IT support for the documentation and management of analysis data: There is a clear
need for IT support when positioning. A development project needs to be initiated
and implemented based on cooperative work among several parties.
Extensive work developing and evaluating the various features went into developing
this support system. The developed system model was tested, criticized and refined at
the project level. Even so, continued development is needed, as is continued critical
assessment of what has been achieved thus far.

10.2 Procedures for positioning academic environments
10.2.1 Evaluating which procedures to develop
The KMP programme has emphasized managing the claim-staking and positioning
processes in parallel. A similar logic should be applied to the interaction between
the academic environments and the Innovation Office and its development. As
noted earlier, “procedures” refers to norms for the support system. The procedures
for the positioning process can be developed based on an IAM function/unit at the
Innovation Office.
Just as the procedures for with the claim-staking process do, the procedures for
positioning academic environments set the stage for an organizational system for
collaboration and utilization. In other words, we build on the Innovation Office’s
reactive support function so that researchers and academic environments can
receive advice and support when it comes to positioning their operations. Due to a
lack of resources, however, it is not feasible for an innovation office to manage
these processes for all of the university’s academic environments. Even so, there are

Procedures for
positioning
academic
environments.

research and
innovation-related
information

documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts and
managing analytical
information

Figure 118. Procedures for positioning academic environments

372

CLAIM
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

likely relatively large differences in the levels of need and demand for support. Far
from all academic environments require extensive evaluation of their positions.
Furthermore, experience gained through the KMP programme shows that, when
positioning academic environments, it is possible to develop their abilities and to
conduct various analyses using supporting models and analytical tools. However,
for some environments where more extensive management is needed, the
Innovation Office should be prepared to participate actively and to assume greater
responsibility.
Categorizing academic environments require for the most part the same considerations and inventories when claiming and positioning, respectively. However, we have
not seen the same need for special procedures for the academic environments with
strategic utilization projects (B environments) and for the academic environments
strategic for the university (A environments) as for the process to claim knowledge
assets. In time, there may well prove to be a need for this.
The KMP programme has not attempted to produce a finished procedure that is
carved in stone, but rather to specify a number of principles from which the procedure can be developed.
10.2.2 General routine for researchers and academic environments concerning
positioning academic environments
Similar to the claim-staking process, we have arrived at a number of principles
from which we believe that the procedures for the positioning support should be
developed.
Responsibility for evaluating and positioning academic environments lies with
each academic environment and its researchers
By default, researchers and academic environments are responsible for deciding the
extent to which they need to evaluate their position in the research and utilization
landscapes. Each academic environment needs to prepare an action plan for collaboration and utilization. Evaluation of the environment’s position and the subsequent drafting of a road map largely involve concretizing and operationalizing the
action plan.
Person responsible for innovation and collaboration for an academic environment
As discussed in Chapter 9, a key norm is designating a person as responsible for
integrating the collaboration and utilization tasks into the academic environment.
This person needs to encourage and enable collegial responsibility within the academic environment. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration is also
responsible for coordination. This person serves as the liaison in the environment’s
interaction with the Innovation Office and Innovation Academy.

373

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

GENERAL PROCEDURES FOR RESEARCHERS
AND ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENTS RELATED
TO THE POSITIONING OF ACADEMIC
ENVIRONMENTS

• The researchers and the academic environment have a collegial
responsibility, based on their action plan for collaboration and utilization,
to evaluate their position in the knowledge ﬁelds and develop a
road map. The basic assumption is that it is the researchers themselves
who are responsible for deciding whether or not this is needed
• Academic environments should appoint a person to manage the
integration of the task of promoting utilization and collaboration,
who is also responsible for the positioning process
• Researchers should be able to turn to the Innovation Oﬃce for
assistance when analyzing positions in international ﬁelds of
knowledge and their own position
• The Innovation Oﬃce should regularly conduct outreach activities that
demonstrate the relevance of positioning academic environments
• An academic environment can come to an agreement with the
Innovation Oﬃce to evaluate its position
• The academic environment is responsible for realizing, following up
and updating the road map
• Together with the Innovation Academy the Innovation Oﬃce should
provide access to tools, models and information sources and IT
support for the evaluation and positioning of academic environments
• The Innovation Academy should oﬀer brief training modules and
more comprehensive courses for individual researchers and others
who request them
CLAIM
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 119. General procedure for academic environments

Researchers should be able to turn to the Innovation Office for assistance when
analyzing positions in international fields of knowledge and their own position
Most importantly, researchers can contact the Innovation Office for advice. This
advice may relate to how to use tools, models and information sources. It might also
involve receiving help with specific matters where the researcher has a good opportunity to perform the actual analysis independently. This makes it especially important that a procedure clearly defines a system for having questions answered and
other support measures.

374

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The Innovation Office should regularly conduct outreach activities that
demonstrate the relevance of positioning academic environments
The Innovation Office should continuously conduct outreach activities that demonstrate the importance of evaluating an environment’s position in relation to the outside world and of drafting a road map. Ordinarily, this should occur when a special
need exists, such as research financing processes, research collaboration and utilization processes and other collaboration processes.
An academic environment can come to an agreement with the Innovation Office
to evaluate its position
Where a greater need for advice and support exists, it should be possible for the
academic environment to come to an agreement with the Innovation Office about
the office assuming responsibility. In these cases, the environment should be classified as a support environment. An academic environment can come to an agreement
with the Innovation Office that staff from the Innovation Office will assume
responsibility for assessment and for preparing a road map. The agreement should
be made in accordance with the responsibilities connected with the various environments discussed earlier (A, B, C environments).
The academic environment is responsible for realizing, following up and updating
the road map
It is important that the academic environment assumes long-term responsibility for
maintaining and updating the prepared road map. This is also a tool for creating an
overview and enabling staff to assume collective responsibility. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration has a special responsibility in this respect. At
the same time, it is important that there is collective participation by the academic
environment’s staff.
Together with the Innovation Academy the Innovation Office should provide access
to tools, models and information sources and IT support for the evaluation and
positioning of academic environments
It is also important that the Innovation Office and other actors responsible for the
support system ensure that there are suitable tools, models and information sources
for researchers to use. A system needs to be developed for providing researchers
easy access to useful tools. It is especially important that the university library’s,
PRV’s and others’ services are included among these. Instructions and other materials will be needed to enable researchers to use tools and sources.
The Innovation Academy should offer brief training modules and more
comprehensive courses for individual researchers and others who request them
Like the claim-staking process, there should be opportunities for researchers to

375

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

gain access to training. The Innovation Academy should be able to offer this type
of training to various actors at the university. Training initiatives aimed at the academic environment as a whole should also be in place, e.g. group-based training
for academic environments. A clear system is needed for determining how different people and environments can gain access to training for the identification and
evaluation of research results. The Innovation Academy has a special responsibility
for ensuring that the person responsible for innovation and collaboration has a
suitable knowledge base.

10.3 Process support when positioning academic environments
10.3.1 Evaluation of the positioning process
Central to the assessment of support systems is creating a model for describing and
analyzing the research and utilization landscapes of the surrounding world, which,
in turn, allows academic environments and other actors to position themselves. The
ambition is to develop a process for supporting academic environments based on the
relevant external research landscape. From the Innovation Office’s perspective, the
ambition is to develop a proactive process for integrating collaboration and utilization activities. How can the Innovation Office provide analysis tools, information
sources and advisory services that strengthen academic environments? It is also
interesting to consider how these activities should be coordinated with various training initiatives. In our evaluation we have tested how process support for positioning
academic environments can result in an increased organizational capability through
interaction between academic environments, the Innovation Office and the
Innovation Academy.

CLAIM
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Process support
when positioning
academic
environments.

research and
innovation-related
information

documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts and
managing analytical
information

Figure 120. Process support when positioning academic environments

376

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Once again, our starting point is the academic environment and the researchers’
plan for promoting utilization and for cooperating, as specified and summarized in
the action plan. In its turn, the latter is connected with the ambitions concerning the
research itself. Naturally, efforts to support academic environments in their positioning should always be adapted to match the purely scientific and research-related
ambitions.
We have implemented a number of sub-projects in which the positioning process
has been tested and evaluated. When carrying out external analyses, it is critical to
have access to useful information sources and analysis tools. One principal aim of
our collaboration with PRV and Gothenburg University Library was to evaluate
which analytical data can be produced relatively quickly and cost-effectively (see
Section 10.4).
Most of the assessment done within the KMP programme has focused on identifying relevant questions and aspects for closer analysis. The ambition was to set up
questions that shed light on one’s own and other relevant actors’ positions in relation to existing research and utilization landscapes. This assessment resulted in a

PROCESS SUPPORT FOR POSITIONING
ACADEMIC ENVIRONMENTS

Knowledge tree

Utilization map

Research map

Road map

Control map

CLAIM
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 121. Positioning process

377

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

GENERAL QUESTIONS RELATED TO POSITIONING

Which knowledge ﬁelds, i.e. research areas and
utilization areas, are relevant for our academic
environment?
1. What distinctive characteristics do the
knowledge ﬁelds have?
• Scope of research activities?
• Level of value creation and potential value creation?
• Maturity level in relation to research and utilization?
• Control levels?
2. Which diﬀerent positions, relations,
programmes, etc. exist in the diﬀerent
knowledge ﬁelds?

3. Which positions do we hold in the various
knowledge ﬁelds?
• Portfolio of research results and other IA?
• Individual and organizational capabilities in relation
to research and utilization?
• Relationships and collaborations?
• Utilization projects?
• Funding?
4. How can we strengthen our position?
• Portfolio of research results and other IA?
• Individual and organizational capabilities in relation
to research and utilization?
• Relationships and collaborations?
• Utilization projects?
• Funding?

QUESTIONS

Figure 122. Overarching questions
model based on a large number of questions to be evaluated using several clearlydefined steps. In each step, we review and answer a number of questions that provide an overview of what external landscapes look like in terms of research, collaboration and utilization. In our model, these overviews are depicted in the form
of a number of maps that reflect the real-world situation and that should be
updated as time passes.
The positioning also takes its starting point in the cloud of research results that
exist in the academic environment. The process begins by preparing a knowledge
tree and concludes with the formulation of a road map for the academic environment. Essentially, the knowledge tree is a tool born from long-running development work aimed at making positions comprehensible, communicable and, above
all, manageable. The idea is for the tree to provide a focused overview of both
research areas and utilization areas relevant to the context. The tree creates an
analytical structure adapted to suit the specific academic environment. A similar
structure is needed because evaluating what constitutes relevant external information for an academic environment often includes reviewing enormous amounts of
potentially relevant information. By applying the tree to the external landscape, we
can evaluate our position with greater precision and also demarcate the supporting
material needed to develop it. Based on an established position, in the next step we
can assess our portfolio of intellectual assets in terms of its strengths and weaknesses.
Of course, it is not necessary to slavishly go through every step and answer every
question, as circumstances will vary from case to case. The model is primarily
intended to offer a framework for thought. As mentioned, depending on the envi-

378

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ronment, it will be either more or less relevant to apply the model in full. It should
chiefly be viewed as a complement to the process support developed for claiming
intellectual assets. As previously stated, in utilization contexts we deviate from a
logic in which we base our approach on which research result comprises interesting
ideas that can be utilized (an “idea logic”). Instead, we think in terms of how the
academic environment should manage and utilize its position in research, research
collaborations and in various utilization processes (an “environment logic”.) As previously noted, the combination of environment logic and the asset logic forms a
whole when it comes to integrating the task of promoting utilization into an academic environment’s activities.
From a methodological standpoint, the approach is to conduct both source analyses
and interviews based on a number of questions. Like the claim-staking process, this
requires teamwork between the Innovation Office and the relevant academic environment. This teamwork will have to vary in form and intensity depending on the
academic environment.
10.3.2 Identify knowledge fields and create a knowledge tree
The first step of the process is defining and determining relevant research and utilization areas needed for constructing we have chosen to call a knowledge tree. This generates a two-dimensional overview of the arena(s) in which the academic environment exists and acts. The true challenge lies in demarcating knowledge fields that
simultaneously capture what is relevant from a research perspective and a utilization
perspective, respectively. The intention is to map a “landscape” consisting of a number of “fields” in which the academic environment can position itself and formulate a
“road map”.
In our model, two different kinds of questions emerge. The first kind is questions
that are directly associated with defining/creating the knowledge tree. The second
includes questions that create various types of supporting data. We have pinpointed the following relevant questions for constructing a knowledge tree: 1) What is
the relevant research and utilization area? 2) How can we understand the overarching research and utilization map containing various knowledge fields? 3) How are
the different knowledge fields positioned in relation to one another, both hierarchically and vertically? Answering these questions allows the development of a knowledge tree.
To allow us to answers these questions, we have formulated some auxiliary steps.
Assess what we consider relevant research and utilization to clarify knowledge fields
The environment’s own research can be used to understand what constitutes relevant knowledge fields. Which does the academic environment consider to be relevant research areas in the case(s) in question? Here, we can establish both a strictly
intradisciplinary as well as a more interdisciplinary perspective depending on the
case. Based on this understanding, we can then ask ourselves how different ways

379

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
BACKGROUND:
Various forms of breast cancer require oestrogen to grow and spread in
the body. For several years, these forms of breast cancer have been treated using
things like medications that bond with cancer cells’ estrogen receptors (ERs).
By binding to ET, the medications produced block estrogen from reaching the
cell, and thus prevent growth. Initially, we believed that there was only one ER
that aﬀected the cell in connection with estrogen. However, in the mid-1990s
another receptor called ERβ was identiﬁed (and the former was thus renamed
ERa). Earlier observations showed that, when normal cells transformed into
cancer cells, ERa increased while ERβ decreased.
When the research group took over, its task was to investigate ERβ’s role in
breast cancer.
A number of studies revealed that ERβ negatively regulated ERβ’s
transcription activity. As such, the research indicated that ERβ agonists could
be investigated for breast cancer treatment, based on the hypothesis that
promoting ERβ leads to diminished tumours.
CHALLENGES AND THE NEXT STEP:
The results have been published and attracted great interest and the research
group now needs to make a number of decisions about the next step. The group
needs to decide the research’s focus, which includes relevant questions and
studies for the next step. They are also interested in utilization and in how to
ensure that the results will be managed strategically. In light of the questions
raised, the research group collaborates with the Innovation Oﬃce to acquire an
understanding of external circumstances and address the challenges identiﬁed.
THE CASE STUDY:
The process for positioning academic environments will applied on the case in the
following ﬁgures: 126, 128, 129, 130, 134, 135.
(Disclaimer: This case study and associated examples should be understood as being
highly simplified and are intended only to exemplify and elucidate methodology.
The material is inspired by actual circumstances, but contains major fictitious
elements. No decisions should be made based on this material.)

Figure 123. A case study
research results can be and are actually used in society. Can we pinpoint specific
utilization areas? We can also ask what different innovation processes are taking
place in the field and will likely exist in the future. It is also useful to evaluate how
different research areas relate to various opportunities for utilization. A key question then becomes to what degree competing research results or alternative solutions exist.
In cases where an innovation office or similar support-provider assists an academic
environment, it is important to begin by understanding what researchers in the environment are working on. What are the overarching research questions? What do
the researchers want to achieve by their research? This type of information can
often be obtained by reviewing general descriptions and applications for research
funding. The KMP programme learned that it is now possible to gain a relatively
good overview of research areas through bibliometric analyses based on a number
of key publications. The Innovation Office should be given the opportunity and

380

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

IDENTIFY KNOWLEDGE FIELDS AND CREATE A KNOWLEDGE TREE

1. Deﬁne the overall knowledge ﬁeld
• Which is the relevant research and utilization area?
2. Prepare a knowledge tree containing
knowledge ﬁelds
• How can we understand the overall research and
utilization map containing the various knowledge ﬁelds?
3. Characterize the knowledge ﬁelds based on to
what extent they are complementary or
interchangeable
• What relationship do the knowledge ﬁelds have to
one another?

1. Evaluate what we believe to be relevant
research and innovation in order to clarify
the knowledge ﬁelds
• What is happening from a research perspective, both
within individual disciplines and in cross-disciplinary
settings?
• Which diﬀerent areas of application etc., are being
developed for research results and how are the results
utilized in social processes?
• Which diﬀerent innovation processes exist and can be
assumed to exist in the future?
• To what extent do competing research results/
alternative solutions, etc. exist?
2. Evaluate the relationships between diﬀerent
research processes and innovation processes
• How can we understand the overall research and
utilization map containing the diﬀerent knowledge ﬁelds?
3. Question and reassess
• As we evaluate over time, how can we
develop our understanding of the
division of the knowledge ﬁelds

KNOWLEDGE
TREE

Figure 124. Preparing a knowledge tree
resources to produce the required supporting data to gain insight into and understanding the relevant utilization area. Ultimately, a common understanding of both
research areas and utilization areas needs to be developed.
Evaluate how different research processes and innovation processes relate to one
another
An additional analytical step is to create an overview of how different research fields
relate to one another from a utilization perspective. If we relate the research results in
different areas to various specific utilization areas, what do the knowledge fields look
like then? Can we see the outline of how research results form fields in relation to
one another? Which fields can be described as overarching, and in what ways can
various fields be subordinated to others? An important question is the extent to
which the research results from different fields complement each other, or whether
they are interchangeable; that is, whether they are simply alternative solutions based
on a certain utilization perspective.
Create a knowledge tree with knowledge fields
Once we have obtained this overarching insight into and understanding of how the
research area interacts with various utilization areas, it is possible to draft an initial
knowledge tree. Experience from the KMP programme shows that the following
steps can be used in the construction process:
1. pinpointing relevant intradisciplinary areas

381

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Knowledge
area

Sub-area

Sub-area

Sub-area

Sub-area

Sub-area

Figure 125. A knowledge tree with fields and sub-fields

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
Breast cancer
treatment

Surgery

Endocrine
therapy

Hormone
antagonist

Hormones

Anti-estrogen

Aromatase

inhibitors

Other

ERa

ERβ

...

Human
ERβ

Epigenetic
regulation of
ERβ

ERβ protein
and disease

...

Fields based on
alternative
treatment
methods for
breast cancer

Researchbased
knowledge ﬁelds

...

The knowledge tree above details alternative ﬁelds relevant to the treatment of
breast cancer. The ﬁrst three levels deal with alternative treatment areas,
with a focus on anti-estrogen endocrine therapy. The two latter ﬁelds follow a logic based
on research areas; more precisely the alternative receptors being investigated with
possible sub-ﬁelds. Some examples of sub-ﬁelds for ERβ might be various ERβ interactions
with diﬀerent proteins.

Figure 126. Example of a knowledge tree with fields and sub-fields

382

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

2. pinpointing interdisciplinary areas
3. pinpointing collaboration areas
4. pinpointing utilization areas.
5. overall appraisal and drafting of the knowledge tree
From this inventory, an overarching knowledge field is determined, which is subsequently broken down into different subordinated fields/areas. We contemplate a
possible sub-area logic based on both scientific and utilization perspectives. We
also classify the identified knowledge fields according to whether they are complementary or interchangeable.
The exact details of how an academic environment should go about constructing a
knowledge are not set in stone. There is a great deal of room for deliberations and
also a clear need for advice and support from the Innovation Office. A knowledge
tree is hardly static, and it needs to be shaped and developed over time. It is
important to continuously question and re-examine how we identify relevant
knowledge fields and, thereby, also the knowledge tree’s construction and components. Obviously, it is not always necessary to construct a knowledge tree at all. In
certain cases, it may be completely adequate to have a general overview of the relevant research and utilization landscape.
10.3.3 Evaluate research fields and research position
Once a knowledge tree with knowledge fields is in place, a number of different
maps/landscape descriptions can be created. The first of these is what we refer to as
the research map. This is the starting point for a more in-depth analysis of what dis-

EVALUATE RESEARCH FIELDS AND RESEARCH POSITION

1. What characterizes the knowledge ﬁelds
from a research perspective?
• Scope of research activities?
• Scientiﬁc importance of the research result?
• Degree of scientiﬁc maturity, e.g. as concerns verifying
research results?
• Scope of research funding (public and private)?

3. What is our research position within
the respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• What is our portfolio of research results and other IA?
• What individual and organizational capabilities do we
have for conducting research and collaborative research?
• What research relationships and collaborations do we enjoy?
• What research funding do we receive?

2. Who are the most important research actors
and what positions do they hold within the
respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• Key research environments and their research
positions within the respective ﬁelds?
• Important research collaborations and the shared
positions these allow?
• Important research consortia, research platforms
and their positions?

4. How can we use and strengthen our research
position within the respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• How can we strengthen our IA portfolio?
• How can we develop our research capabilities?
• How can we strengthen our research relationships
and collaborations?
• How can we secure more research funding?

RESEARCH MAP

Figure 127. Evaluation of research areas and research position

383

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

tinguishes the knowledge fields from a research perspective and of the academic
environment’s research position in relation to other actor’s research positions.
What distinguishes knowledge fields from a research perspective?
First and foremost, we are interested in a deeper understanding of knowledge fields
from a research perspective. Which research activities are being conducted within
the field and the various sub-fields? It is also of interest to gain an understanding of
how unique and central the research result is within the various areas from a strictly
scientific perspective. Another question is how well established the different knowledge fields/sub-fields are from a research perspective. Has the research result been
verified in the different fields? How large are the research investments in the respective knowledge fields? To what extent have public and private research sources of
funding, respectively, allocated resources to various fields?

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
WHICH ARE THE FIELD’S RESEARCH-RELATED FOCUS AREAS?
The example below shows an extract from an analysis of the ‘human ERβ’ ﬁeld.
The researchers and innovation advisors conduct similar analyses of another set of
research ﬁelds to create an overview of relevant activities.

ERβ

Human
ERβ

Epigenetic
regulation of
ERβ

ERβ protein
and disease

Research Focus

...

Primary Results

Key Researchers

Relationship between polymorphic sites in the ESR2 (ERβ)
gene and breast cancer risk

• Yu et al.
• Bechman et al.

• Thus far, results are uncertain
and no clear relationship has
been found.

Which are the main
research groups?

• Cyrile et al.

• Initial results indicate that
such a relationship exists.

How do the
main research
groups collaborate?

• Antonellis et al.
• Aminev et al.
• Cisse et al.

• Studies have failed to identify
a relationship between ESR2
and breast cancer.

...

...

...

After a similar analysis of a number of ﬁelds selected in addition to human ERβ, it became clear that there is a
great need for standardized protocols and selective antibodies in order to detect ERβ. Based on
information published about antibodies, ERβ and breast cancer, a number of research groups are mapped.

Figure 128. Example of an analysis of a knowledge field

384

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

By formulating and answering these and similar questions, an overview of the
research landscape can be obtained. We can compare the different knowledge fields
from a research perspective.

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
WHICH ARE THE MAIN RESEARCH GROUPS?
The initial analysis of the research ﬁeld’s focus areas shows that one key challenge is producing
and evaluating antibodies that are speciﬁc to ERβ. Studies show that, in most cases, antibodies
that bond with ERβ also bond with ERa, which limits both researchers’ ability to develop their
understanding and the potential use of ERβ in combating breast cancer. Thus, with the
objective of developing antibodies, a search is conducted based on published materials
collected earlier to identify leading researchers in the ﬁeld. The search is limited to the past
ﬁve years, as the main interest is in active researchers in the ﬁeld. The analysis is also
supplemented with a number of generalInternet searches and by a few brief, verifying phone
calls placed to experts in the ﬁeld.
ERβ

Human
ERβ

Epigenetic
regulation of
ERβ

ERβ protein
and disease

ERβ
antibodies

...

The review reveals three main groups that have focused on the area in the last ﬁve
years. One group is based at Yale University and focuses mainly on evaluating and testing
diﬀerent antibodies’ eﬀect on ERβ. Another group in the US, at Mayo Clinic, focuses on
manufacturing new and speciﬁc antibodies. Further analysis reveals that a research group in
Madrid also has a similar focus and actively produces new antibodies for comparable purposes.
Site: Yale University
Researchers: Welsh et al.
Relevant focus:
Comparison of diﬀerent
antibodies’ eﬀect on ERβ
and ERa.

Site: Mayo Clinic
Researchers: Wu et al.
Relevant focus:
Testing and manufacture of
more speciﬁc antibodies
for ERβ.

Site: Complutense University
of Madrid
Researchers: Ferrer et al.
Relevant focus:
Testing and manufacture of
morespeciﬁc antibodies
for ERβ.

Figure 129. Example of an analysis of relevant research groups

385

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

EXAMPLE: STUDY AV ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
HOW DO THE MAIN RESEARCH GROUPS COLLABORATE?
To gain a better overview of the main research groups’ positions, an analysis is performed
of their collaboration and control. The ﬁrst step is to examine joint publications and
interviews to generate an overview of the status of collaboration related to knowledge
development. Then, mainly based on public sources, the existence of any formal agreements
between the parties is investigated (e.g., licensing agreements or suppliers’ agreements).
Lastly, physical transactions, e.g. of antibodies, and joint publications and patent applications
are also investigated. The evaluation is summarized in a preliminary map that presents the
various groups’ positions in visual form.

• Joint publication on new antibodies
• A joint patent application for a new antibody
• Agreements in place. Details unclear.

Wu
et al.

ATEC

Welsh
et al.

• ATEC supplier of
tested antibodies.
• IP situation unclear. Agreements
in place.

= No. relevant publications
Ferrer
et al.

• No patent applications
for antibodies

= Joint publications
= Identiﬁed agreements
= Physical transactions

After performing a closer analysis based on material from publications, the Internet and
interviews (for example), ATEC emerges as a key private actor. ATEC is the principal supplier of
antibodies to Welsh et al. and a joint suppliers’ agreement is in place. ATEC also collaborates
with Wu et al. They have co-published information about new antibodies and submitted a
joint patent application. It has not been possible to identify any collaboration initiatives
related to the Ferrer et al. research group, neither any patent applications.

Figure 130. Example of an analysis of how research groups cooperate
Wich are the most important research-related actors and what position do they
occupy within the respective knowledge fields?
The second step is to investigate and determine who are the most prominent
research-related actors and their respective positions within the various knowledge
fields. We pinpoint the important research environments within the knowledge
fields.
It is also important to map which actors cooperate with whom within each knowledge field. What relationships are developed and which transactions of research
results occur within the fields? We also want to determine the extent to which struc-

386

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

tural cooperative solutions have been developed within the different knowledge
fields. Have research consortia and other research platforms emerged, for example?
We can also ask which positions similar collaboration structures have within different areas.
Obtaining answers to these questions should provide relatively good insight into the
specific academic environment’s surrounding environment from a research perspective. Depending on the supporting information’s level of detail, overviews of changes
over time and trends can also be created.
What is our research position within the respective knowledge fields?
Once an overview of the research landscape has been obtained, our own position
becomes evident. It is in the third step that we attempt to assess and evaluate our
own portfolio of knowledge assets and its importance in determining our position
in relevant knowledge fields. We can also estimate our position based on our relative strength in publishing research results. We can also assess our position based on
our relative ability to attract different forms of research financing. It is especially
useful to assess our position from the standpoint of our own relative ability to conduct innovation projects and to be active in different research platforms.
Combined, the claiming process for knowledge assets described earlier and the
evaluation process concerning position discussed here provide an excellent
overview of our own operations. We can profit from a more contrast-rich and systematically constructed picture of how strong our academic environment’s research
is. For example, we can begin to draw conclusions about our international position
in research from an academic point of view. It also becomes possible to think in
terms of competitiveness and vulnerability.
How can we strengthen and develop our research position within relevant
knowledge fields?
When using the above analytical steps, it is important that we methodically developed supporting data to enable a systematic discussion of how we can strengthen
our position in research, research financing, publishing and research collaboration.
We can also consider in which research fields we need a stronger position. Which
research requires more financing and better collaborative relationships? We can
consider recruitment needs and the need for access to other actors’ portfolios of
research data and other knowledge assets.
10.3.4 Evaluating utilization areas and utilization-related position
A second map or landscape overview concerns knowledge fields from a utilization
perspective — a utilization map. This kind of map is intended to allow the academic environment to understand and determine its position in relation to the surrounding world’s utilization processes.

387

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

30
Knowledge ﬁeld
70

50
140

70
Sub-area

Sub-area

53

Sub-area

85
Area A

10

Area B
80

83

87

78
Area C

Sub-area

Sub-area
2002
2006
2010
2014
Number of new companies per year and area

Figure 131. Example of the characterization of commercialization activities within different
knowledge areas, who cooperate and where they are active

What characterizes the knowledge fields from a utilization standpoint?
Like the research map, it is suitable here to begin with an evaluation of the knowledge fields themselves from a utilization perspective. How is utilization performed in
the various knowledge fields? What is the scope of different utilization activities? It
is of particular interest to evaluate within which knowledge fields societal value is
actually created, i.e. where societal and other challenges are solved. Just as interesting, of course, is what risks and other aspects are associated with the utilization of
different research results. Admittedly, it is not easy to map and determine degrees of

EVALUATE UTILIZATION AREAS AND UTILIZATION POSITION

1. What characterizes the knowledge ﬁelds from
a utilization perspective?
• Scope of utilization activities?
• Degree of value creation and potential value creation?
• Maturity level in relation to utilization?
• The existence of diﬀerent utilization logics?
2. Which are the most important utilization actors
and what positions do they hold within the
respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• Which actors utilize research results and what are
their positions?
• What transactions and relationships exist between
diﬀerent actors?
• How does utilization occur – value
creation constellations between actors?

3. What is our utilization position within the
respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• What is our portfolio of research results and IA that
can be utilized?
• What individual and organizational capabilities do we
have for promoting utilization?
• What advanced utilization relationships and external
collaborations do we enjoy?
• What funding do we receive for promoting utilization?
4. How can we exploit and strengthen our utilization
position within the respective knowledge ﬁelds?
• How can we strengthen our IA portfolio?
• How can we develop our capabilities for
promoting utilization?
• How can we strengthen our utilization
relationships and external collaborations?
• How can we receive more funding
for promoting utilization?
UTILIZATION MAP

Figure 132. Evaluation of utilization areas and utilization position

388

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

value-creation, much less potential degrees of value-creation. Another relevant question is the level of maturity within the different knowledge fields. Are we in an early
stage of the implementation process for various research results, or is it a mature
area where primarily only fine adjustments are needed?
Who are the foremost utilization actors and what position do they have
within each knowledge field?
Once the various knowledge fields have been mapped, the actors pursuing different
forms of utilization can then be pinpointed, just as was done with the research map.
For example, we can determine which actors collaborate within the different knowledge fields. What relationships and transactions exist? What does the potential
value chain within the specific knowledge fields look like? This kind of information
highlights what is needed for a specific research result to be utilized. Naturally
enough, it is of interest to know what positions other actors have in the different
knowledge fields. Which actors are best placed to ensure that their results or solutions, specifically, are those that generate public value and handle societal challenges?
What is our utilization position within each knowledge field?
Once we gain a deeper understanding of the surrounding world, we can assess our
own position in relation to utilization. We can combine the above approach with
IA claims to develop an overview of our portfolio in relation to other actors’ portfolios. We will assess according to which logics we utilize research results.344 We
can then more easily gauge our own collaborative position. Is it strong or weak?
Does the academic environment have the organizational capability needed to be
able to promote utilization at all in light of the prevailing value constellations? It is
also crucial to evaluate our own financing. In reality, do we have, or do we expect
to obtain sufficient financing to be able to promote utilization in the way intended?

How can we utilize and develop our research position within each knowledge field?
An advanced analysis of the utilization map may lead to deliberations about how
the academic environment can and should strengthen its position. For example,
how can the environment improve its portfolio of knowledge assets and, thereby,
create better potential for utilization? Just as relevant is determining how the environment’s organizational capability can be developed. Of course, it is natural to
contemplate how we can develop our collaboration position in relation to utilization. Should we develop our collaboration with certain public or private actors?
Here again, the question of how we can and should ensure the necessary financing
becomes relevant.

344 See further in the following chapter 11 and chapter 3 above.

389

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

10.3.5 Evaluating the IP landscape and control position
A third map is the the control map. It is intended to help us understand our own
position based on the nature of various control claims. The KMP programme
placed special emphasis specifically on evaluating the importance of control over
knowledge assets when promoting utilization and collaboration. As noted earlier,
control is also important in helping make research results openly available.
What characterizes the knowledge fields from a control perspective?
Similar to the other two maps, we begin by characterizing the different knowledge
fields by taking into consideration a control perspective. We can then ask ourselves
the extent to which the knowledge fields are influenced by the fact that knowledge
assets are generally available. We can then also investigate the extent to which the
fields are covered by patents and other intellectual property rights. To what degree
are the knowledge assets within the different fields subject to confidentiality? By
answering these and similar questions, a certain understanding of what characterizes each individual field is achieved.
If we determine that a large number of patents and other intellectual property
rights exist, it may be appropriate to conduct more detailed analyses. This is particularly important from a freedom to operate perspective.
It is also important to evaluate the degree to which there are open utilization
models within a certain field, such as open source. This factor affects the concrete
control situation within the individual field.

EVALUATING IP LANDSCAPE AND CONTROL POSITIONS
1. What characterizes the knowledge ﬁelds from a
control perspective?
• To what extent are the knowledge ﬁelds completely,
open i.e. part of the public domain?
• To what extent is the knowledge ﬁeld subject to patent
and other intellectual property rights claims?
• To what extent are open utilization models used, e.g.
open-source?
2. Which actors hold the most important control
positions and what do these involve within each
knowledge respective ﬁeld?
• Which actors control the knowledge ﬁeld?
• Which transactions and cooperation exist in
connection with the control of the knowledge ﬁeld?
• Do any patent pools or other IPR platforms exist?
• How important are intellectual property rights and
other controls i value-creation processes?

3. What control position do we hold in each respective
knowledge ﬁeld?
• Which IPR assets do we have and how strong are they?
• Do we have control over who holds the rights to the
result?
• Which other control position do we hold?
• What freedom to operate do we have in connection
with research and promoting utilization?
• How have we utilized our control position in
developing relationships, collaborative partnerships
and utilization processes?
4. How can we utilize and develop our
control position?
• How can we utilized our control position to strengthen
our research position?

CONTROL MAP

Figure 133. Evaluation of the IP landscape and control position

390

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
EVALUATION OF UTILIZATION FIELDS AND UTILIZATION POSITION
The investigation of utilization related to ERβ focuses on three sub-areas: Data about
publications, collaborations and innovative initiatives identiﬁed are compiled to create an
overview of how knowledge within the various ﬁelds is utilized. A number of interviews
with researchers and industry representatives are also conducted to verify the observations
gained from other information sources.
Aromatase
inhibitor

ERa

ERβ

...

Human
ERβ

Epigenetic
regulation
av ERβ

ERβ protein
and disease

ERβ
antibodies

• Publication
is the
main
utilization.

• Publication
is the
main
utilization.

• Few
publications
in the ﬁeld.

• Provides
a basic
understanding
of diagnosis
and
personalized
treatment.

• A number of
research
groups are
collaborating
to map
epigenetic
eﬀects on
ERβ.

• Publication
is the
main
utilization.
Published
in recent years
and on a
limited
scale.
• Relatively little
activity.

...

• Collaboration
between
researchers
and industry
identiﬁed.
• A number of
antibodies
for sale, none
particularly
ERβ-speciﬁc.
Publicly available
Relevant for consumers
Innovation processes
Contractual networks
= Identiﬁed activity
= Activity not identiﬁed

One conclusion drawn from the analysis is that ERβ antibodies are the most active ﬁeld based
on current innovation processes. In addition to collaboration between industry and academia,
antibodies can also be purchased. The ﬁeld has a low level of maturity, however, and clinical
implementations of the knowledge are still a long way oﬀ. Instead, the antibodies are only
oﬀered as research tools at present. Highly selective ERβ antibodies are still lacking and are
judged to be in demand. Other ﬁelds are dominated by a strong focus onpublications,
where the focus has mainly been on human ERβ and the epigenetic regulation of ERβ.

Figure 134. Example of an analysis of utilization areas

391

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

EXAMPLE: STUDY OF ERβ’S ROLE IN BREAST CANCER
EVALUATION OF CONTROL POSITIONS
A landscape analysis based on patent documents provides an overview of closely-related technical ﬁelds
and their relevant actors over time. Through searches based on citations and keywords, a number of
closely-related areas have been identiﬁed below. The data visualizes various areas related to ERβ and the
positions each of the areas has relative to one another.

The same data can identify actors within a certain area and their position on the map. The actors’ analysis
provides an overview of which actors hold a speciﬁc control position by virtue of their patent rights.
Furthermore, collaborations and clusters can be identiﬁed and positioned by analyzing the joint publication
of patents. By analyzing the number of patents published over a certain period, activity can also be
measured. The example below shows that Eli Lilly is very active in patenting ERβ in the prostate cancer ﬁeld.

Figure 135
Example of an analysis
of control positions

392

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Which actors hold the most important control positions and what do these entail?
A subsequent second step is to identify which actors hold the concrete control positions. First and foremost, this involves establishing which actors hold control positions. Following that, it may be relevant to evaluate the control positions themselves.
As noted, the existence of patent pools, open commons and open source communities is of interest. It is also important to acquire an understanding of cooperation
and transactions related to intellectual assets from a defined control perspective. In
this context, it is important to acquire knowledge and an understanding of the
importance of intellectual property rights and other controls in relevant value-creation processes.
What is our control position within each knowledge field?
Once we have a well-founded overview of the external control map, our own position can be evaluated. What does our position look like from the standpoint of our
intellectual property assets? To what extent have we created control positions in
various fields through our collaborative work? Do we have the right to utilize others’ intellectual property assets as a result of research collaboration processes? If so,
how is our freedom to operate impacted when promoting utilization?

How can we utilize and develop our control position?
The above evaluations culminate in the question of how we can and should develop
our control position and how we can utilize our own control positions to strengthen our research position. Should we apply for intellectual property rights protection
to a greater degree and, if so, in which areas? Is it important to have a confidentiality-based control? Should we establish better strategic alliances within certain
knowledge fields in order to achieve a relational control? Whether or not we will
attempt to do so depends on what we will achieve in relation to our action plan,
however. According to which logic do we plan to promote utilization? The control
position will be used in different ways, depending on how we plan to promote utilization. In certain cases, it is also important to strengthen the control functions to
achieve effective research collaboration.

10.3.6 Road map for the academic environment
The purpose of the three maps is for them to collectively give the academic environment an overview of its own position — or rather, positions — in relation to the
surrounding world. The more an environment works on matters of position, the
more useful the maps of the research and utilization landscape will become. If we
evaluate positions in knowledge fields, it becomes clear that research and utilization
cannot easily be kept separate. An evaluation of an academic environment should
result in a road map; that is, in an updated action plan. This should include conclu-

393

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Knowledge
ﬁeld

Sub-area

Sub-area

Sub-area

Value: Area 2

Sub-area

Sub-area

Value: Area 1

Figure 136. Example of an analysis of the development of a control position in relation to
complementary knowledge areas (1 and 2). The research environment (D) has a strong
control position in Area 1, but a relatively weak position in the important complementary
Area 2. By evaluating our own IA portfolio, we can identify opportunities for creating
strategic alliances with strong actors (A, B, C) within Area 2 by offering access to selected
intellectual assets in exchange for access to the actors’ (A, B, C) intellectual assets.

1) Research position
Speciﬁcation of:
a) Research needs and research questions
b) Need for research data and infrastructure
– what, internal & external, from whom, etc.
c) Recruitment needs
d) Collaboration needs
– which environments and persons,
in what way, etc.
e) Needs for funding
– how much, internal & external, where
externally, apply jointly with whom, etc.

Road Map for
Research and
Utilization

2) Utilization position
Speciﬁcation of:
a) Publishing
– where/journals, scope,
joint publication, etc.
b) Collaboration
– whom, where, commissions, model for
IA transfer
c) Innovation opportunities and projects
d) Open innovation projects
e) Commons and open platforms
f ) Needs for funding
– how much, internal & external, where
externally, with whom, etc.

3) Control position
Speciﬁcation of:
a) Own IPR needs
– for what, geographically, chosen path, etc.
b) Need for access to others’ IPR
c) Need for contractual control of network management of IA
– what, with whom, how, etc.
d) Need for technical control
– control of databases, infrastructure, etc.
e) Needs for funding
– how much, internal & external, here externally,
with whom, etc

Figure 137. All components of the road map

394

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

sions about how we should manage and develop our research, utilization, and control positions.
The KMP programme’s primary focus was considerations about utilization. The
road map is important, however, as it reaffirms the importance of considering utilization a collegial process within the academic environment.

10.4 Sources of research and innovation-related information
10.4.1 Evaluating sources, services and expertise
Access to reliable and useful information services and sources is critical when identifying knowledge fields and preparing maps of research and utilization landscapes.
In fact, the degree of access determines what can reasonably and possibly be
achieved with external analysis. If too great an effort is required to gather informational materials, it becomes infeasible. The better the sources and services, the
greater the opportunity the Innovation Office has to develop the proactive support
system.
In the KMP programme, we were impressed by what can be achieved by using
patent information for positioning processes. We tried to see to how patent information can be complemented with other information when identifying and evaluating the positioning of research and utilization. A number of different sources and
services were identified, such as databases, search tools, and analytical services.
Both public and private actors provide these sources and services. The public
actors345 primarily provide databases and search tools, while the private actors

CLAIM
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures for
positioning
academic
environments.

Process support when
positioning
academic
environments.

ACTION PLAN FOR

COLLABORATIONof
AND
Sources
UTILIZATION
research and
innovation-related
information.
IT support
for documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts and managing
analytical data.

Figure 138. Sources of research and innovation-related information
345 The relevant public actors have been discussed in Chapter 8.4.

395

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

also provide software tools with user-friendly interfaces and analysis support. The
university library’s work in pilot project346 should be specifically noted. See the
brief summary below. Similarly, PRV’s Patent Mapping (patentlandskapsanalys)
search service has also been assessed.347 PRV’s search service Preliminary
Patentability Report (preliminär patenterbarhetsbedömning)348 has been added in
the current chapter’s positioning work.
Thomson Reuters349 and Orbit350 are two private actors that have been surveyed
when looking at the range of products and services. Orbit offers a well-developed
tool for searching patent databases in Questel, as does Thomson Reuters through
its Thomson Innovation tool.
In addition to patent databases and search tools, Thomson Reuters also offer other
services351 that can be used for positioning analyses. As noted, the service is a comprehensive solution based on patent information, but also on non-patent-related literature in the form of scientific literature and business information, search tools and an
analytical service. Our mapping reveals that Thomson Reuters also offers access to
additional business and news information sources. A deeper understanding of actors’
positions can be obtained through social information, as can the opportunity to read
trends from a broader social perspective.
We also noted the Sweden ScienceNet project financed by VINNOVA in our mapping efforts. The project’s purpose was to build a national database of information on research projects begun in 2008 and later. The database contains information about a project’s research field, researchers, sources of funding, duration and
financing. The information reveals whether the research project has been financed
using public or private funds. In some cases, project descriptions also reveal information about utilization activities. Presently, the database is managed by the
Swedish Research Council under the name SweCRIS.352 It is also linked to a large
European initiative. A beta version of SweCRIS has been available to the public
online since October 2014.353

346 The pilot project Patentinformation som underlag i ärendeprocessen
347 See Annex 4 – Outtake – Landscaping analysis.
348 This attempts to evaluate whether an invention meets the legal requirements for novelty and the inventive
step. The documentation for a Preliminary Patentability Report consists of a description of the invention in the form
of an independent patent claim, or a detailed description of the problem (problem formulation) together with a
solution. This documentation allows for an evaluation of the differences between the prepared documentation and
the other relevant documents received. The difference must generate a technical effect, and this provides the argumentation for the patent. In cases where the invention is described as a concept in accordance with the above, it
can be difficult to carry out a Preliminary Patentability Report, as it is not clear which differences actually exist, if any,
between the prepared documentation and the documents received through the review. Both patent and nonpatent-related literature from international databases forms the basis for the services. All relevant documents from
the technical field, regardless of when they were published, are used in the searches.
349 Thomson Reuters is a leading supplier of external information and analytical services.
350 Orbit is another leading tool developer within the field of patent information.
351 Through the services Thomson Innovation, Thomson IP Manager, Thomson Data Analyzer and so on.
352 SweCRIS’ management group consists of representatives from Swedish financiers and academic institutions.
353 http://swecris.se/converis/publish/startpage?lang=1

396

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

10.4.2 External information as a basis for research maps
As noted previously, the process support for the positioning work begins with identifying knowledge fields and their components in the form of various tree structures. The main information sources fall into the categories discussed in Chapter
8.4.1. These are primarily private and public information actors who provide services within research information, patent and civic information, and business information.354 The sources mentioned are used to different degrees when gathering
information, depending on what is requested in identifying relevant research and
how it is utilized. This information is used to build a tree structure in which
knowledge fields are visualized in relation to one another.
The KMP programme’s work revealed the need to systematically process information
sources to construct relevant research maps. Databases for scientific publications and
patents are the most common sources of information. An initial step in this search is
to evaluate which keywords and/or classes are relevant. A thorough analysis of relevant keywords increases the possibility of finding relevant published summaries in
the selected databases.
By evaluating authors, subject areas and citations based on scientific publications, an overview of researchers’ research positions and impact is gained.
Various research groupings and collaboration activities can be identified on
both individual and organizational levels through collaboration analysis based
on searches. In the initial stage, the range of scientific databases offered by
Gothenburg University Library more than covers current needs.355
The results generated from keyword and class searches in patent databases provide
a further foundation for possible collaboration activities. The publication delay
caused by the patent application process must also be considered. PRV’S Patent
Mapping service gives both a static and a dynamic overview of a certain area, that
is, of actors’ positions over time and at present.
Civic and business information from Thomson Reuters, for example, and public
information from Internet-based search engines can also provide support in developing this research map. SweCRIS provides information about which research
areas are financed and by whom.
Furthermore, it is important to interview key people and experts to verify and/or
gather additional information that could be critical in constructing a relevant
research map.
10.4.3 External information as a basis for utilization maps
Just as sources and tools are combined when drafting the research map, they are
also used to construct the utilization map. When framing of the questions, we are
354 See Figure 58. The mapping of information services.
355 See 8.4.3 for information about Gothenburg University Library’

397

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

looking for a different type of information. By searching in the university library’s
databases, we can obtain a simple answer as to whether works within the research
field have been published. We must, however, be aware that research may have
been published in educational materials. In that case, we cannot locate the
research material through the sources and tools we have presented in this chapter,
even though it is considered publicly available from a utilization logic.
Using the published patent applications or the approved patents together with
patent information, we can discern the research result’s fields of application.
Through PRV’s Prior Art service, for example, we can identify how different technology fields are utilized. The information is especially clear when the technical
invention’s area of application must be included in, or specified by, the patent
claims and/or the description contained in the patent document.
Civic and business information provides details about which value constellations are
relevant for the research field and specific utilization. Business information can also
provide insight into how research results in the form of technical solutions, for
example, are utilized in different ranges of products and services through actors and
any cooperations. Some examples of sources are business websites, annual financial
reports and other publicly available information. Databases for sources of financing,
like SweCRIS, can potentially provide information about which utilization areas
receive research financing, which actors provide financing and for what purpose
they do so.
The state’s and general public’s view of the research area and the potential utilization may also need to be taken into consideration. Civic information such as news,
legal cases, information about consortium collaborations, public debates and and
public opinion polls from Statistics Sweden can add relevant information to a given
context.
Taken together, all the information sources noted above can assist in the drafting of
utilization maps. It is also important to interview key individuals and experts to
verify and/or gather additional information that could be critical in constructing a
relevant utilization map.
10.4.4 External information as a basis for control maps
Searching databases containing scientific publications allows us to determine
whether the research field is represented; that is, whether published research results
exist. From a control perspective, published research results are typically publicly
available (included in the public domain). This means they are free for anyone to
use as long as a patent application has not been submitted prior to their publication. As such, the knowledge field can be viewed as openly available. Thus, freedom to operate applies to further utilization.
Patent information shows how a knowledge field is covered by patent claims. The
control aspect can naturally, and as needed, be divided into geographic areas, technology area, industry, actors and so on. Development over time at the technology

398

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

and actor levels can be registered to provide a dynamic perspective. PRV’s Prior Art
and Patent Mapping search services are suitable for this purpose.
An FTO analysis can also be performed to better understand different control
positions within a given knowledge field. Doing so reveals different actors’ positions in relation to one another and what impact claimed intellectual property
rights have on an environment’s own research result. Separate collaborative and
licensing alternatives can be identified from the patent information analysis in
cases where one’s own control position needs to be strengthened and where one’s
own research result may need improved control to be a relevant part for other
actors. An environment’s own control position can be evaluated and possibly
strengthened through PRV’s Preliminary Patentability Report service. The service
is not obvious for mapping positions, but is still important for how an individual
research result can be positioned in relation to the map field’s actors.

10.5 Conclusions
Like the claiming process, the support system for positioning academic environments develops the institutional system and procedures through which the task of
collaborating and promoting utilization is integrated into academic environments.
A collegial process is initiated within academic environments through the Innovation Office’s development of its proactive approach. This involves a process that
naturally gathers information about the activities of other academic environments
within its field and how they collaborate with various actors in society. Hopefully, it
is natural in this process to continuously contemplate how different utilization
processes occur for the environment’s own research. There is evidence that this
stimulates an environment’s own research at least as much as it promotes a collegial
approach to utilization.
Teamwork by the Innovation Office and an Innovation Academy will also make the
positioning process a learning and development process in which university employees develop their individual ability to work with different external landscapes. The
university library, PRV and others make it possible for this approach to be supported by advanced information. Entrepreneurs’ schools and other practice-oriented
education programmes can also serve as resources. Procedures make it possible for
these actors to develop a cooperative relationship that is adapted to suit the academic environments’ needs and demand.
The KMP programme concludes that the support system should be developed
based on a “process tool” for evaluating research and utilization landscapes. The
model focuses on how maps over these landscapes can be drafted. To make the
information collected comprehensible and easily reviewed, special knowledge trees
are constructed. These later make it natural to think in terms of how an environment’s own intellectual assets create positions in various knowledge fields.

399

11. Utilization decisions
11.1 Support system for decision-making in utilization
and collaboration contexts
Evaluation of how to formulate a support system for operational management by
objectives, deliberations and decisions on how to utilize and manage research
results during collaborations.
The most important support system is the one for concrete activities promoting
utilization and collaboration. The KMP programme’s support systems for claiming
intellectual assets and positioning academic environments are intended to enable
operational utilization within academic environments. The claiming process and
positioning process both create supporting data which academic environments can
use for deciding how they can and should promote utilization and collaborate,
respectively. Once these two support systems have been implemented, it becomes
possible to develop a third support system for decisions about operational utilization and collaboration. This support system aims to enable deliberations about the
operational utilization of knowledge assets and how an environment should act in
external research and utilization landscapes.

CLAIM

DECIDE

Support system for decision-making
in utilization and collaboration contexts

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 139. Support system for enabling decisions about utilization

400

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

This involves evaluating how we can design a support system that will proactively
stimulate and enable the decisive capabilities within the academic environments.
We want to develop a system that enables researchers and academic managers to
make decisions about utilization within the framework of the university’s assumption of responsibility as a government authority. The support system should have a
normative influence, so that the actual utilization processes are managed as an
integrated part of academic work. Referring to the discussion in Part 2 of this
book, this involves developing the ability of academic environments to balance different utilization models so that they may assume appropriate social responsibility.
Within the KMP programme, we have limited ourselves to decisions about concrete
utilizations of knowledge assets. There are many more decisions needed about how
academic environments position themselves and manage knowledge assets in collaborative relationships in general. Our focus has been on direct deliberations
about how utilization should take place. This involves developing a support system
that clarifies which decisions should be made and which measures should be implemented for utilization to be realized. It is important to assign distinct roles when
making decisions and operational utilization within the framework of the academic
operation. One conclusion is that a support system specifically for utilization deliberations lays the groundwork for defining how decision-making about collaborations should be handled in general.
The KMP programme has also considered it natural to look beyond what merely
commercial value creation. Pursuing the commercialization of knowledge and creating as many companies as possible can never be the primary goal for universities,
research institutes and similar organizations. Instead, their foremost aim must be
finding a form of utilization that serves the public interest. One of the KMP programme’s primary tasks has been clarifying what is meant by utilization in this
context. As noted earlier, we have identified four utilization logics that we believe
should provide the basis for all deliberations. Claiming of knowledge assets clarifies the knowledge assets that deliberations focus on, while the positioning process
clarifies the external preconditions. In accordance with the utilization logics, the
support system should enable academic environments to make decisions about the
extent to which and how they should:
● make research results publicly available;
● make research results users relevant to specific users and stakeholders;
● utilize research results through innovation processes;
● make research results available in contractual networks (open research
and innovation platforms).
Our evaluation work has revealed that it is far from possible in every case to manage decisions about utilization in accordance with these broader perspectives within researchers’ private spheres. From an operational perspective, it is important to
understand how to manage the combination of the work done by a researcher in
the university’s name and work done in a private capacity. The KMP programme
concluded that the university should offer to take over its employees’ rights when
necessary and desirable from the researchers’ perspective. We have also concluded
that the Innovation Office should develop its organizational capability to license
knowledge assets. A clear feature of the support system is how it enables a devel-

401

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Process support
when utilizing
knowledge assets

Procedures for
making decisions
about utilization and
the collaboration
management of
knowledge assets

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION
AND UTILIZATION

Tools for
university
licensing

Contract
templates

Figure 140. Elements of the support system for making decisions about the utilization

opment whereby the university takes control of the rights to its employees’ findings.
Even so, the basic premise is that employees own the rights to their research results
and they should also have the ability to engage in promoting utilization in a private
capacity. To a large degree, the aim of the support system is to develop the university’s organizational ability to promote utilization while allowing its employees to
retain control over their own research results.
The IAM framework for this third support system, as expanded on within the KMP
programme, came to include the following features:
Action plan for collaboration and utilization: Like the claim-staking and positioning
processes, the starting point is the general action plan that we believe all academic
environments should prepare. By preparing this action plan, an academic environment is defining which objectives are considered important. Assessing the academic
environment’s position will further clarify how the academic environment can
pursue these objectives. Claiming of knowledge assets means that we have distinct
knowledge assets that require concrete deliberations about utilization.

402

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures for making decisions about utilization and the collaboration management of knowledge assets: Here, too, the procedures lay the foundation for the
support system’s implementation. Moreover, procedures play a particularly important role in this respect. In this instance, this involves developing procedures that
enable concrete decision-making. In general, this entails creating procedures that
give researchers and academic environments sufficient autonomy to make decisions about how utilization should take place and then put these decisions into
practice. This should be the case regardless of whether this is done in the university’s name or in a private capacity. The procedures should clearly specify who is
responsible for what when enabling researchers and how various operational support measures are to be initiated. As noted earlier, however, it should be possible,
in certain conditions, to transfer the management of knowledge assets to the
Innovation Office. A particular challenge is designing procedures that specify how
the university will take control of intellectual property assets. All in all, these procedures lay the groundwork for an operational approach for determining how to
make utilization decisions within the framework of the university as an organization. Naturally, the procedures must be in line with the control system developed
at the university level, as discussed in Part 2 of this book.
Process support for decisions about utilizing knowledge assets: Here, the support
system looks at the necessary considerations for decisions about promoting utilization within the framework of the university as an organization. The process aims to
enable academic environments to balance various utilization models. This should
be based on wanting to assume public responsibility and on both considerations
related to collaboration ethics and to the university’s position as a state-run institution. We also want to create a process that gives academic environments, the
Innovation Office and others a frame of reference for how the university as an
organization should enable academic environments and individual researchers to
promote utilization.
Tools for university licensing for the public benefit: Another important feature of
the support system is how the university organization can and should manage its
employees’ research results for licensing. The tool aims to clarify the university’s
value proposition to its employees. As above, the tool creates a frame of reference
for interaction between employees and the university when the university comes to
an agreement with an employee to take control of knowledge assets rights. The
Innovation Office is responsible for the value propositions themselves, for seeing
that negotiations are carried out and for ensuring that what has been agreed on is
implemented.
Contract templates: The KMP programme concluded that there needs to be templates specifying how various relationships and transactions should be managed
when managing knowledge assets. These templates are still currently under development.
A general observation is that this third support system has only been partially tested within the framework of the KMP programme. As noted, it requires the relatively extensive implementation of other parts of the programme. In some parts,
such as concrete deliberations about how utilization should occur based on the dif-

403

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Process support when
utilizing
knowledge assets

Procedures for
making decisions
about utilization
and the
collaboration
ACTION
PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION AND
management
of
UTILIZATION
knowledge assets.
Tools for
u
university
licensing

Contract templates
tes

Figure 141. Procedures for deciding about utilization and the collaborative management of
knowledge assets

ferent logics, a multi-year development project was conducted within both the public and private spheres. All in all, however, it appears that there is a great need for
further development in this regard.

11.2 Procedures for making decisions about utilization and the
collaboration management of knowledge assets
11.2.1 Assessing which procedures and principles need to be developed
As noted previously, it is important to distinguish between the Innovation Office’s
procedures for supporting the deliberations of academic environments for making
administrative decisions on the one hand, decisions as an employer etc., on the
other. It is the former that will be evaluated here. These efforts to determine the
need for procedures has also been based on how the interaction between the academic environments and the Innovation Office should be designed and effected.
As noted earlier, this involves drawing up procedures that enable researchers and
academic environments to have sufficient autonomy to make decisions about how
utilization should occur and then put these decisions into practice. In this way, the
procedures lay the groundwork for implementing the support system.
With the above distinction in mind, we have concluded that the former paves the
way for the latter. Developing operational procedures for interaction between the
Innovation Office and academic environments is perhaps the most important means
of developing procedures for the actual decision-making process. The Innovation
Office’s procedures become an important tool for implementing the university
system discussed in Part 2.

404

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

It has been the KMP programme’s explicit aim to avoid excessive bureaucratization.
It is important that collaborative and utilization work within the university as a
public authority is both practicable and straightforward. If not, the collaboration
and utilization-related task will fail to be integrated. For this reason, it is important
that the Innovation Office assumes a proactive responsibility. As the university
“matures”, it will be natural for the Innovation Office to take on a less prominent
role.
The KMP programme has not attempted to produce definite procedures. Instead it
has tried to specify a number of principles/norms from which procedures can be
developed. We recognize that we have not made much progress in this regard.
Relatively extensive work will be required to achieve suitable procedures in the
interaction between the Innovation Office and academic environments.
Presumably, different routines will be developed depending on whether it is a collaboration and utilization environment, academic environments with strategic utilization projects or an innovation environment strategic for the university. To date,
we have only begun to discuss what might be included in a general procedure.

11.2.2 General procedures for making utilization decisions and the collaborative
management of knowledge assets
We have established a number of principles on which we believe the procedures
for the support system should be developed.
The academic environment and researchers are responsible for promoting the utilization and management of knowledge assets in collaboration
The researchers and academic environments are responsible for promoting utilization and, thereby, for necessary deliberations and ensuring that decisions are made
correctly. This is a basic assumption for all efforts. Each academic environment is
tasked with preparing an action plan for collaboration and utilization. In combination with any existing IA portfolio and road map, this plan provides a solid
foundation on which to base deliberations and decisions. The KMP programme
views it as important to emphasize that deliberations and decisions should be a
collegial responsibility. Furthermore, public responsibility must form the basis for
assuming responsibility.
Currently, individual researchers are still largely responsible for deciding the extent
to which they intend to promote utilization in public and private capacities, respectively.
Person responsible for innovation and collaboration for an academic environment
A key approach is that an individual must be designated responsible for integrating
the collaboration and utilization task into the academic environment’s work. This
person needs to encourage and enable collegial responsibility within the academic

405

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

GENERAL PROCEDURES FOR MAKING DECISIONS
ABOUT UTILIZATION AND THE COLLABORATIVE
MANAGEMENT OF KNOWLEDGE ASSETS

• The basic assumption is that it is the researchers and the academic environment
that are responsible for deliberations and making decisions about how they intend
to promote the utilization of knowledge assets. It is the individual researchers who
must decide as to which decisions should be made in the university’s name and in
a private capacity, respectively
• The academic environment’s manager has a special responsibility to enable
researchers and teachers to promote utilization in both public and private capacities
• Academic environments should appoint a person to manage the integration of the
task of promoting utilization and collaboration who is also responsible for ensuring
that a collegial responsibility develops in connection with deliberations about
utilization and collaboration.
• Through agreements with their academic manager, researchers should be able
to assign control of their intellectual assets to the university
• Researchers should be able to turn to the Innovation Oﬃce for assistance during
deliberations about how knowledge assets should be utilized and how decisions
should be made
• Academic managers should be able to turn to the Innovation Oﬃce for assistance
during deliberations about how knowledge assets should be utilized and how
decisions should be made
• An academic environment can come to an agreement with the Innovation Oﬃce
to receive more on-going support during deliberations on how to promote
utilization and manage knowledge assets in collaboration
• Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Oﬃce should oﬀer access
to tools and models for which considerations etc. are relevant to promoting
utilization as an integrated part of academic activities
• The Innovation Academy should oﬀer training to both individual researchers and
academic environments about which considerations are relevant when promoting
utilization as an integrated part of academic activities
• The Innovation Oﬃce should oﬀer a number of general value propositions when
taking control of researchers’ knowledge assets for the purpose of licensing them
in the university’s name. These should specify both incentives and other terms
and conditions
• If researchers choose to take advantage of value propositions oﬀered by the
Innovation Oﬃce for licensing in the university’s name, the Innovation Oﬃce will,
in part, assume responsibility for making decisions about speciﬁc utilization
activities
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 142. General procedures for making utilization decisions and the
collaborative management of knowledge assets

environment. The person responsible for innovation and collaboration is also
responsible for coordination. It is also natural for this person to view their task as
to promote the academic environment’s interests. That is not to say that they should
not work to promote researchers’ utilization of assets in a private capacity. As noted
earlier, this person also has an important role to play as the liaison between the
academic environment and the Innovation Office and Innovation Academy.

406

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The academic environment’s manager has a special responsibility to help enable
researchers and teachers to promote utilization in both public and private
capacities
A key approach is that the managers of the academic environment assume a special
responsibility for enabling their employees to promote utilization in both public
and private capacities. This responsibility stems from the regulatory code that governs their work. Academic managers have a delegated responsibility as public
employees, employers and a contracting party. Managers must assume substantial
responsibility if the task of promoting is to be successfully integrated into academic
activities.
The Innovation Office also has a responsibility to support academic managers.
There is a great need for developed, clear procedures in line with the “process support” that is described in more detail in the next section. Developing more detailed
procedures for the interaction between the Innovation Office, managers and individual researchers will largely define the university’s operational assumption of
responsibility for promoting utilization and managing research results in collaboration.

Through agreements with their academic manager, researchers should be able to
assign control of their intellectual assets to the university
The opportunity for researchers to promote utilization in the university’s name and
under public control is a key idea. This makes it considerably easier for researchers
to promote utilization as a collegial process within academic environments, without
needing to constantly wrestle with the challenge of privately holding the rights to
the intellectual assets. The idea is that employees will continue to exercise control
over their intellectual assets within the larger framework of the university’s overarching ownership and control.
A researcher employed by the university should be able to turn to their manager
when intellectual assets are to be assigned to the university. The Innovation Office
should develop procedures for facilitating this kind of assignment process.

Researchers should be able to turn to the Innovation Office for assistance during
deliberations about how knowledge assets should be utilized and how decisions
should be made
It is key in this context that researchers are able to turn to the Innovation Office
for counsel and support. For example, they may request help in determining which
general considerations they should have. They might also ask for help with specific matters for which they have good potential to conduct the actual analysis on
their own. As such, it is especially important that a procedure clearly specifies how
to obtain answers to questions and access to support measures.

407

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

An academic environment can come to an agreement with the Innovation Office to
receive more on-going support during deliberations on how to promote utilization
and manage knowledge assets in collaboration
If an academic environment has a more extensive need for advice and support, it
should be possible for it to come to an agreement with the Innovation Office that it
assume responsibility. In such cases, the environment must be classified as an A, B,
or C environment.
Together with the Innovation Academy, the Innovation Office should offer access
to tools and models for which considerations etc. are relevant to promoting utilization as an integrated part of academic activities
It is important that the Innovation Office and other actors responsible for the support system ensure that suitable process support, contract templates, instructions
and suchlike are available to researchers. A system and procedures need to be
developed through which researchers can conveniently gain access to needed tools.
The Innovation Academy should offer training to both individual researchers and
academic environments about which considerations are relevant when promoting
utilization as an integrated part of academic activities
Like the claiming process, it should be possible for both researchers and academic
managers to gain access to training. The Innovation Academy should be able to
offer this type of training to various actors at the university. Training initiatives
aimed at the academic environment as a whole should also be in place, e.g. groupbased training for academic environments. Thus, a clear system and procedures are
needed for how various individuals and environments can gain access to training
about considerations and decisions when promoting utilization and managing
research results in collaborative relationships.
The Innovation Office should offer a number of general value propositions when
taking control of researchers’ knowledge assets for the purpose of licensing them in
the university’s name. These should specify both incentives and other terms and
conditions.
The Innovation Office should design value propositions for researchers in when
assuming control of intellectual assets for the purpose of licensing them in the public
name (see below). These value propositions must state the terms and conditions
under which the rights will be assumed. Procedures need to be developed to guide the
interaction between researchers and the Innovation Office as concerns the transfer
itself and negotiations related to the transfer.
If researchers choose to take advantage of value propositions offered by the
Innovation Office for licensing in the university’s name, the Innovation Office will,
in part, assume responsibility for making decisions about specific utilization activities. Procedures are also needed to determine how interaction should take place
after an agreement has been signed

408

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

11.3 Process support for utilization deliberations
11.3.1 Assessing the process for enabling making utilization decisions in academic
environments
A key conclusion from the KMP programme is that a fairly clear process is needed
for determining how the utilization of knowledge assets can and should occur as an
integrated part of academic activities. Of central importance is the question of
which decisions may be made independently by researchers and teachers. It is at
least equally important to clarify the different ways in which managers and others
can enable researchers and academic environments. As process support, the model
is aimed at academic environments and academic managers.
The basic assumption is that the Innovation Office offers support to the academic
environments when these are to make decisions about how they intend utilization to
occur. Like the proposed proactive work method, this process takes on somewhat
different forms depending on which academic environment is concerned. Viewed as
a tool, the model is designed with a focus on the interaction between academic environments and the Innovation Office. The process itself is intended for implementation in the academic environments. The ambition is that the tool will stimulate a
collegial process in academic environments. At the same time, as has been discussed
previously, it is critical that each individual academic environment designates a specific person in charge of this responsibility. The level of the Innovation Office’s
involvement will depend on the environment and on how far it has come in the
implementation process (see also the evaluation of procedures below).

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures for decisions
about utilization and
the cooperative management
of knowledge assets

Process support
when utilizing
knowledge assets.
ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION AND
UTILIZATION

Tools for
university
licensing

Contract templates
lates

Figure 143. Process support when contemplating how academic environments should
promote utilization

409

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Once again, it is important to emphasize that the model is only intended to create a frame of reference for various considerations that arise in the operational
process.

ID

Category

Description

IA01

Solution

ABC

IA02

Database

XYZ

IA03

Instruction

AEI

IA04

Creation

DEF

ASSET LIST

How can we utilize
specific
knowledge assets?

How do we ensure
that we uphold our
social responsibility?

CONSIDERATIONS CONCERNING
ETHICAL
UTILIZATION
CONSIDERATIONS

How should we
manage the decisionmaking process
within the public
institution?

Utilization
decisions

CONSIDERATIONS NECESSARY
FOR A PUBLIC INSTITUTION

Figure 144. Process support for deliberations and utilization decisions
The model consists of a number of steps that, admittedly, are not necessarily
sequential in practice. The starting point for deliberations is having an IA portfolio
of knowledge assets for which the academic environment intends to promote utilization in one way or another. Using the IA portfolio as a starting point, the use of
specific research results is considered from a number of operational standpoints. We
have laid out the following steps within the model: 1) considerations concerning
utilization, 2) considerations related to research and innovation ethics and 3) considerations necessary for a public authority. Combined, it is hoped that these considerations will result in a number of concrete decisions that, in turn, will produce a
number of operational measures for the specific research results. In the model, these
are reflected in a number of decisions about utilization and IA control.
Overall, we can say that the model can be viewed as a “framework” for the considerations pertinent to an academic environment. At the same time, this is a concrete process that can be carried out with the active support of the Innovation
Office. It is a process based on the lessons learned from evaluating the risks associated with collaboration and promoting the utilization of research results. This
process is initiated in accordance with the procedures from a number of different
contexts. As the main process in the support system, it will thus work proactively
and, hopefully, stimulate the development of a collegial decision-making capacity in
the academic environments. In this way, the process can lay the foundation for how
cases can be handled for decisions about utilization and collaboration.
11.3.2 Considerations concerning utilization
The support system’s primary purpose is in various ways to enable operational
deliberations about the extent to which and how the specific knowledge assets
should be utilized in accordance with the four utilization logics. In this respect, a
key question is to what extent utilization should be promoted within the framework

410

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

of the academic environment and by researchers in a private capacity, respectively.
Another consideration concerns whether it is relevant to accept one of the value
propositions in which the university undertakes to work for licensing research
results in the public name.
We have also pinpointed a number of steps for considerations about utilization.
First, it is a matter of considering which opportunities are available to promote
utilization. Here, the road map is of key importance. The evaluation of research
and utilization landscapes generates a number of opportunities to develop one’s
position for utilization work. Many considerations deal with weighing different
utilization opportunities against one another and, thereafter, deciding which
opportunities offer the greatest potential.
A second step concerns identifying restrictions associated with various utilizations.
This involves both weighing the different utilization logics against one another and
assessing existing restrictions in connection with parallel utilizations, and of determining whether particular obligations exist in contracts or similar. This second step
will reveal a number of the challenges resulting from the various utilizations. Here,
too, both the claim-staking process and the positioning analysis will provide key
decision-making data.
A third step involves reviewing the preconditions for utilization based on which
resources and incentives exist. This third step will clarify more definitely what
should be done in the university’s name and what should be done by researchers in
a private capacity. Is it reasonable to expect researchers to promote utilization within the framework of their employment, or should this be done as part of secondary
employment? After this review of available resources, it becomes clearer whether or
not it is better to take advantage of one of the university’s offers to assume the
rights to the knowledge assets. For example, the best option may be to take advantage of one of the value propositions in which the university undertakes to work to
license the research result for public benefit.

CONSIDERATIONS CONCERNING UTILIZATION

How can we utilize
specific knowledge assets?

ID

Category

Description

IA01

Solution

ABC

IA02

Database

XYZ

IA03

Instruction

AEI

IA04

Creation

DEF

Opportunities &
Preconditions

Obligations &
Restrictions

• What opportunities do we
have to utilize the knowledge
assets?
• According to which logics do
we have the best opportunity
to promote utilization?
• To what extent can
utilization occur in the
university’s name and by
researchers in the private
sphere, respectively?

• Are there any restrictions
on parallel utilization?
• Have any contractual
obligations been agreed
to that aﬀect utilization?
• Are there any restrictions
concerning infrastructure
assets, etc.?

Resources &
Incentives
• What resources exist within
theacademic environment?
• What resources can we
apply for?
• What resources can be
obtained for utilization in the
private sphere?
• Which ﬁnancial incentives
do researchers have?

Figure 145. Considerations concerning utilization

411

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Opportunities and preconditions
The primary consideration consists of how the concrete knowledge assets should be
utilized. What are the various opportunities available to utilize? Naturally, there are
a range of different opportunities to promote utilization. As noted earlier, it may be
reasonable to begin by considering what is done ordinarily and how to identify
additional opportunities in accordance with the road map.
In principle, this involves reviewing the considerations for each individual knowledge asset. It is reasonable that academic environments should be able to decide
which knowledge assets should be utilized and according to which logic. For each
knowledge asset, we can ask ourselves how it should be made available to the general public, be made relevant for specific buyers, and be included in innovation
processes and in open contractual networks. The claim-staking process and the
positioning process reveal both preconditions and opportunities. The research
group knows both which results should be utilized and how this can be done.
Together with the road map and other evaluation material, the IA portfolio constitutes an important source of data on which to base decisions. The action plan has

OPPORTUNITIES AND
PRECONDITIONS

How can we utilize
specific knowledge assets?

ID

Category

Description

IA01

Solution

ABC

IA02

Database

XYZ

IA03

Instruction

AEI

IA04

Creation

DEF

To what extent should
we make knowledge
assets publicly
available through:
1. Scientific
availability
a) Scientiﬁc
articles?
b) Books?
c) Reports?
d) Conference
presentations?
2. Education-based
availability
a) Lectures,
seminars, etc.,
in which research
results are
presented?
b) Textbooks, other
educational
materials?
3. Popular sciencebased availability
a) Popular
science books
b) Debate articles
and scope of
participation in
public dialogue?
c) Websites?
d) Posts about
the research result
in social media
e) Science TV/radio?

To what extent should To what extent should
we make knowledge we utilize knowledge
assets applicable and assets through
relevant for specific
innovation processes:
users and stake1. Project-based
holders through:
innovation
1. Scientific
a) Social
availability
innovations?
a) Commissioned
b) Service
research
innovations?
b) Collaborative
c) Product
research?
innovations, such
as research tools,
2. Educationdiagnostic tools?
based availability
a) Occupational2. Licensing-based
training?
innovation
b) Degree projects?
3. Company-based
c) Commissioned
innovation
education?
d) Handbooks,
instructions
manuals?
3. Project-based
availability
a) Development
projects?
b) Partnerships?
c) Licensing and
consulting
services?
d) Lobbying?

To what extent should
we make knowledge
assets available in
contractual networks
through:
1. Research-driven
networks
a) Open databases
containing
research results?
2. Industrial networks
a) Open innovation
processes?
b) Common
standards?
c) Industrial
development
clusters?
3. ”Commons”
a) Open source code
platforms?
b) Creative
commons?
c) Crowd-sourcing?

Figure 146. Opportunities and preconditions for utilization in accordance with the four logics

412

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

staked out a direction and a level of ambition. Now it is a matter of realizing these
for the specific knowledge assets.
Working to make knowledge assets publicly available (included in public domain):
The basic assumption is that the researchers and academic environments are
responsible for promoting utilization. A fundamental consideration when promoting the utilization of research results will always be when and how their publication should occur. Moreover, these are processes that have largely already been
institutionalized within the framework of the university’s core activities. When
working to make knowledge assets publicly available, the KMP programme has
concluded that, currently, development work should focus on accessibility that is
not realized through traditional academic publishing or education. Typical considerations that should be reviewed are:
● What should we do to make knowledge assets really available to the
general public? That is to say, which concrete means should we use to
make them part of the public domain?
● How can we promote knowledge assets to be utilized in practice, for
example, by ensuring that available publications are actually read and
understood by a wider audience?
● How can we ensure that knowledge assets are included in relevant
education programmes in a way that gives students and others the
opportunity to apply them in practice?
Nowadays, practically all university departments and other academic environments
have access to public relations officers. Without question, these are important
resources in communicating research results to the surrounding community. The
Innovation Office will likely have a more limited role to play when it comes to
making research results publicly available. However, the support work with claiming and positioning means that the Innovation Office has an important function in
pointing out what should be made publicly available and how this can be done.
Working to make knowledge assets applicable and relevant for specific users and
stakeholders: In all likelihood, this is a utilization logic that will develop most once
the university has improved its organizational capability. Often, the claiming
process, combined with the positioning process, will clarify the potential this offers.
It is natural for utilization according to this logic to be an integrated part of academic activities. Still, there is a great need for improvement here. There are many
research results that do not reach the actors that will have a use for it. Typical
considerations that arise through are:
● Which specific potential users and stakeholders should we target for
the various knowledge assets?
● Which means should we use to transfer knowledge assets to them?
● How should we package and transfer knowledge assets to make them
relevant for the specific buyers?
● Which control (e.g., concerning intellectual property assets) do we need
to offer the specific buyers to give them the ability and desire to utilize
the knowledge assets?
The conclusion from the KMP programme is that advanced collaboration between

413

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

the academic environments and the Innovation Office could be very important when
promoting utilization using this logic.
Promoting utilization through innovation processes: An important conclusion from
the KMP programme is the importance of academic environments in assuming
greater responsibility for what was described earlier as project-based innovation
activities. Typical considerations in this context are:
● Which knowledge assets should we treat as ideas?
● Which ideas should we promote as innovations and innovation
processes?
● Which other intellectual assets and which control do we need to
engineer the concrete innovation processes?
Obviously, assistance from the Innovation Office is required when deliberating
utilization through innovation activities.
Promoting the use of knowledge assets through contractual networks/open
platforms: Utilization using this logic needs to include a number of considerations.
There is much to suggest that academic environments will assume increasingly
greater responsibility for this type of utilization. Some examples of necessary
considerations include:
● In which existing open platforms should we include the specific
knowledge assets?
● To what extent should we develop our own contractual networks and
open platforms in which we include knowledge assets?
● How should we regulate how different actors can include knowledge
assets in the platform?
● How should/will we regulate access to the knowledge assets and the
use of the same?
The Innovation Office will also likely play a decisive role in cases where academic
environments intend to utilize knowledge assets through contractual networks.
When developing institutional collaboration with the surrounding world, a great
need for professional assistance is apparent. Even just considering what is possible
when developing joint knowledge platforms requires extensive, specialized expertise.
Utilization in a public or private capacity: In this context it is important to consider to what extent utilization should occur in the university’s name and by
researchers in a private capacity, respectively. Another necessary decision is
whether the university should assume the rights to intellectual assets. This issue
requires consideration, particularly once it becomes better understood how the
specific assets should be utilized. The KMP programme concluded that this
involves choosing between four general alternatives for taking action.
When promoting utilization using the four logics, certain activities lend themselves
better to implementation as part of academic work, while others fall more naturally into the category of personal side projects. It is possible to distinguish between
utilization that occurs in the name of the university and that which occurs in the
private sphere. During the first phase of analyzing opportunities and preconditions,

414

Utilization in
the public sphere
with private control

Utilization in
the public sphere
with public control

Utilization in
the private sphere
with private control

Utilization in
the private sphere
with public control

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Figure 147. Considerations concerning utilization in public and private capacities

intentions for these two alternatives should be expressed. Of importance, the fact
that they hold the rights to a specific research result as private individuals does not
necessarily mean that the researchers view it as their duty to promote its utilization
outside of their employment.
Traditionally, it has even been common for work to be carried out within the
framework of the researcher’s employment, but when the work has generated
revenue, it has been treated as extra income for the researcher. For example,
researchers commonly promote the utilization of research results by writing text
books within the framework of their employment. Thus, researchers promote
utilization in the name of the university, but retain private control.
It also happens that utilization occurs in the private sphere, but with the university
holding company as the owner of the research result. For example, situations
where researchers assign their research result to the university holding company so
that it can be managed as a project. Thus, a distinction can be made between cases
of utilization where the researcher has control over the research result and where
the university and or its holding company holds the rights to the result.
It is primarily in connection with promoting utilization through innovation processes that these types of considerations take on relevancy. An important feature of the
KMP model is that it should be possible for researchers to promote utilization in
the university’s name and with public control. Promoting utilization through a
collegial process within academic environments helps individual researchers greatly.
The Innovation Office has an important role to play in administering just such a
transfer. This opportunity may be useful when wanting to make knowledge assets
available to specific buyers.
Moreover, in certain circumstances, researchers should be able to sign an agreement giving the university control to allow the Innovation Office and others within the university to promote utilization. Researchers should be able to weigh how
much help they would like from the university as an organization. The university
then assumes a special responsibility for promoting utilization through innovation
processes in the public name (read more about this in the following sections).

415

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Obligations and restrictions
A second step involves identifying restrictions for different kinds of utilization.
This involves weighing the different utilization logics against one another to assess
which restrictions exist in parallel forms of utilization and investigating whether
special obligations exist within contracts or similar. This second step will reveal a
number of the challenges resulting from the various utilizations. Here again, both
the claim-staking process and the positioning analysis provide important supporting data. Among others, the following questions can be posed:
● Are there any existing restrictions about parallel utilizations?
● Are there any pre-existing contractual obligations that have a bearing
on utilization?
● Are there any restrictions concerning infrastructure assets and so on in
the academic environment?
The claim-staking process, in particular, provides a basis from which an academic
environment can make decisions about the above and other questions. The process
makes it clear that assets cannot be utilized in accordance with all the different
logics simultaneously. This leads to deliberations about which utilization activities
should be avoided and which should be prioritized.
Resources and incentives
Other key considerations are resource requirements for the various utilization alternatives. Typical questions that arise and influence decisions about which type of utilization should be pursued are:
● What resources exist within the academic environment?
● What resources can we apply for?
● What resources can be acquired to facilitate utilization in the private
sphere?
● What incentives are there for researchers?
Here again, addressing these questions allows for a decision to be made about which
utilization activities are impracticable due to a lack of resources and which measures
should be prioritized. Naturally, access to resources affects the degree to which utilization occurs on a private basis. The question of incentives is of key importance.
11.3.3 Considerations related to collaboration ethics
We label the second category of considerations as collaboration ethics. This
involves examining alternative actions from the standpoint of ethical norms and
approaches. As above, we employ a three-step process.
In principle, collaboration ethics-related questions can be considered after having
reached a decision about how best to promote utilization of the knowledge assets.
In practice, however, this occurs in parallel. This parallel approach does not prevent a collective, collegial discussion about collaboration ethics after concluding
the examination of utilization considerations.

416

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Social values and interests
The first step concerns social responsibility. The academic environment and individual academics must decide the extent to which various utilization activities
involve assuming social responsibility. Relevant questions might include how the
activities contribute to achieving the following:
● the overarching goals established in the action plan
● the common values established in the Swedish Higher Education Act
(högskolelagen)
● the ambitions for positioning the academic environment.
A dialogue about social benefit is a natural part of a collegial approach to collaboration and utilization. The claim-staking and positioning process helps make the
dialogue about social benefit more concrete for both research results and the
academic environment. It becomes more natural to pursue public benefit.
Academic freedom and academic values
A second step considers how different utilization activities might affect academic
independence and other academic values. Typical aspects that require discussion
and taking a position are:
● researcher independence and ability to be critical;
● the research work’s transparency and openness;
● the freedom to conduct continuing research and education.
Here again, thanks to the claim-staking and positioning process, it is possible to
make the dialogue more concrete to focus on the effects of specific activities.
Naturally, it is particularly relevant to consider how to avoid too great a negative
effect when these risks exist.

CONSIDERATIONS RELATED TO
COLLABORATION ETHICS

How do we ensure that we
uphold our social responsibility?

ID

Category

Description

IA01

Solution

ABC

IA02

Database

XYZ

IA03

Instruction

AEI

IA04

Creation

DEF

Social Values
and Interests

Academic Freedom and
Other Academic Values

Do the various
utilization activities
support:
• The overarching goals
established in the action plan?
• The common values
established in
the Swedish Higher Education
Act?
• The ambitions for positioning
the academic environment?

Do the various utilization
activities aﬀect:
• Researcher independence
and ability to be critical?
• The research work’s
transparency and openness?
• The freedom to conduct
continuing research and
education?

Conflicts of Interest

Do conﬂicts of interest arise
due to:
• Individuals who occupy more
than one post?
• The risk of private ﬁnancial
interests being prioritized
over public responsibility?
• The risk of individuals’
prestige being prioritized
over public responsibility?

Figure 148. Considerations related to collaboration ethics

417

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Conflicts of interest
The third step involves considering conflicts of interest. As noted earlier, there is
almost always some kind of conflict of interest when it comes to promoting utilization. Rarely do the interests of the individual researchers, the research group and
the university and the relevant public interests coincide completely. Ultimately, it is
a question of whether the conflicts of interest are directly detrimental and whether
or not they need to be addressed. Some examples of circumstances that should be
considered are:
● individuals who occupy more than one post;
● the risk of private financial interests being prioritized over public
responsibility;
● the risk of individuals’ prestige being prioritized over public
responsibility.
If a conflict of interest exists, it is likely best resolved by the person who is most
involved in the conflict declining to participate in the decision-making process. This
is particularly challenging in Sweden due to the notion of professor’s privilege. The
assumption of greater responsibility by academic environments would resolve the
conflict caused by professor’s privilege. In the main, academic managers (and the
Innovation Office) will take on key roles in managing conflicts of interest.
11.3.4 Considerations necessary for a public institution when making decisions
about utilization
A third category of considerations concerns how decisions are to be made and implemented. Once researchers and academic environments have decided how they plan to
promote utilization, the next question is how to implement this decision. As noted
earlier, this is not a linear process involving a number of consideration and implementation steps. Deliberations occur in parallel and as an integrated part of concrete

CONSIDERATIONS OF PUBLIC AUTHORITIES

How do we manage the
decision process within the
public authority?

ID

Category

Description

IA01

Solution

ABC

IA02

Database

XYZ

IA03

Instruction

AEI

IA04

Creation

DEF

Administrative
considerations

Considerations
as an employer

To what extent do the public
authority need to:
• Make administrative
decisions on the
management of resources?
• Do case management and
registration?
• Do the management of
public documents and
conﬁdentiality?

To what extent do the
employer need to:
• Make decisions about job
duties and compensation
• Evaluate and make decisions
about secondary employment
and private consultancy work?
• Manage operations?

Figure 149. Considerations of public authorities

418

Considerations as a
contracting party
To what extent do
representatives for the
university need to:
• Participate in negotiations
with external collaborative
partners?
• Be actively involved in
applying for external funds?
• Ensure the contract’s formal
drafting and signing?

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

action. The KMP programme’s ambition is not to “bureaucratize” collaboration and
utilization processes. Instead, it wants to enable academics to assume greater public
responsibility within the framework of their academic activities. In many cases it is
sufficient to hold an open, collegial dialogue, while in other contexts it is important
that the academic managers or the administration be involved. Because it is the
researchers and academic environments who are primarily responsible for promoting
utilization, they are the ones who often must initiate participation in this discussion.
When do academic managers need to be involved, for example? The question of
when the administration is expected to manage various matters is equally relevant.
We have taken the university’s responsibility as a state-run institution, contracting
party and employer as our starting point. It is important that the decisions made be
managed in a way that befits these three roles.
In keeping with the evaluation in Part 1 of this book, there are a number of questions that need to be addressed within the framework of the university’s role as a
public authority. We have not aimed to make this model all inclusive. Instead, we
wanted to highlight important considerations that academics must be aware of.
Thus, the model provides only a simplified overview of the actual situation that
will need to be addressed going forward.
Administrative considerations
We have chosen to call the first part of these considerations administrative considerations. It is crucial to decide the extent to which the utilization of specific knowledge assets requires management by the administration. Generally, this involves
considering to what extent the following are needed:
● administrative decisions on the management of resources;
● case management and registration;
● the management of public documents and confidentiality.
As previously stated, the claim-staking process considerably simplifies determining
what needs to be considered. It involves deciding how specific intellectual assets and
decisions about them should be managed. Considerations of what should be done in
the public name and what should be subject to public governance are of major
importance. As suggested earlier, a key question is if and when the decision should
be made for the university to assume control of the specific intellectual assets. If
everything is to be done in the private sphere, administrative considerations are
unnecessary. However, to the extent that the specific utilization activity requires the
use of public resources, administrative considerations may be necessary. In this case,
it is reasonable that the university as a public authority will take this responsibility
seriously and, among other things, ensure that it has control over what were
described earlier as infrastructure assets.
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that, under the present circumstances, it is
important that the Innovation Office assumes significant responsibility in these
considerations. It is important that this be done in a well-ordered fashion and with
the awareness that it is easy to become mired in protracted questioning and excessive formalities. This is especially true when there are too few procedures in place

419

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

and uncertainty about what needs to be done. As such, the Innovation Office has
a key role to play in demonstrating that these kinds of considerations have the
potential to stimulate increased utilization and public responsibility. Of course, in
the long term it is reasonable that academic environments will manage this on
their own through interaction between academics, the administration and academic managers.
Considerations as an employer
When the government has entrusted researchers with managing their knowledge
assets, both within the framework of their public employment and in a private
capacity, it is unavoidable that the university should also have a major responsibility
to uphold as their employer. One very clear conclusion drawn within the KMP
programme is that empowering leadership is required. Viewed from the standpoint
of the academic environment, it thus becomes a question of to what degree the
employer needs to:
● make decisions about job duties and compensation paid for service;
● evaluate and make decisions about secondary employment and private
consultancy work;
● manage operations.
It is obvious that a number of the relevant decisions cannot be held by the
researchers alone. As discussed, the challenges of conflicts of interest, for example,
are especially evident where researchers have the right to use knowledge assets in a
private capacity. A conclusion from the situation in Sweden is that it is reasonable
that secondary employment will increase. Before utilization occurs in a private
capacity, a dialogue should at least have been held with the researcher’s immediate
superior about the relevant research result, how the utilization will occur, to what
degree it is based on the pursuit of public responsibility, and how it will affect the
university in relation to its continuing research and finances.
It is reasonable that the Innovation Office should play a supporting role in interaction between employer and employee. In Part 2 it was noted that, in line with the
EU recommendation, it is reasonable that the Innovation Office and the holding
company assist in managing the conflicts of interest that may arise from various
innovation processes.
Considerations as a contracting party
A third step involves considerations that relate to the university as a contracting
party. Naturally, within the framework of concrete utilization activities, a number of
considerations must be considered in this regard. Generally speaking, this once again
involves deciding how to create an empowering leadership. From the standpoint of
the academic environment, we feel that representatives for the university should consider such issues as whether to:
● participate in negotiations with external collaborative partners;
● be actively involved in applying for external funds;
● ensure the contract’s formal drafting and signing.

420

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The KMP programme’s conclusion is, perhaps unsurprisingly, that the Innovation
Office should assume a proactive responsibility here, too. There is a great need to
develop procedures and organizational capability in this area.
11.3.5 Utilization decisions and IA governance
The model presented here is intended to enable academic environments to assume
greater responsibility for utilization and collaboration. As previously noted, a
single knowledge asset, in principle, can be utilized in many different contexts.
Such is the nature of knowledge. Admittedly, various forms of control can limit the
ways in which utilization can occur, at the same time as they can also enable different utilizations. An academic environment that focuses on promoting utilization

Open communication
and accessibility

PUBLIC DOMAIN

Included in opensource community

Included in
innovation cluster

Included in
partnership

Transfer to own/
jointly owned
company

Included in
commons

COMMONS

Included in external
research consortium

OPEN INNOVATION
(PLATFORM)

Transfer to
project incubator or
equivalent

Transfer through
implementation
commissions

INNOVATION PROJECT
(IDEA)

Transfer in
contract
education
SPECIFIC USER PROJECT
(RESULT)

Licenced
knowledge transfer

Transfer through
contract
research

Private management
by researchers

Transfer through
research
collaboration

Collegial management in the
academic environment

INTELLECTUAL ASSETS

Figure 150. Model for overview of IA decisions and transactions

421

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

will transfer knowledge assets in various contexts. An important element of the
proactive and reactive support given by the Innovation Office is offering the
chance to gain an overview. When utilizing knowledge assets, the decision-making
process results in a mapping of ongoing activities.
The claiming process is the primary driver of this mapping and provides an
overview of how the specific knowledge assets are utilized. This overview makes it
possible to direct the processes and management of the relevant knowledge assets.
The information gathered and its structuring provides a portfolio overview and,
thus, should be added to the IA list.

11.4 Tools for university licensing for the public benefit
11.4.1 Evaluation of a model for when and how the university can assume control of
research results
It was especially important during the KMP programme to evaluate how an innovation office can and should act in situations where it is reasonable for the university to
take control of the rights to research results. As noted earlier, researchers should be
able to enter into agreement with the university that the Innovation Office will
assume responsibility for claimed knowledge assets and intellectual property assets
for the purpose of licensing them in the public name. The evaluation focused on the
university’s value proposition for its employees. The ambition is to introduce a model
that stimulates advanced interaction between the university and its employees to
achieve greater public responsibility. As explained, the idea is that the Innovation
Office will be responsible for the value propositions themselves, for conducting
negotiations and for ensuring that what has been agreed upon is implemented. The
Innovation Office’s work concerning IAM means that they will have the ability to
assume responsibility for promoting utilization in a completely different way.
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Procedures for
making decisions about
utilization and
the cooperative management
of knowledge assets

Tools for
university licensing.
Value
and
V
control models

ACTION PLAN FOR
COLLABORATION AND
UTILIZATION

IT support for
documenting
knowledge assets,
contracts, and managing
analytical data.

Figure 151. Tool for university licensing

422

Contract
ontract templates

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The evaluation resulted in a model that allows the university, by agreement, to
assume responsibility for utilization in accordance with all four utilization logics. If
the ambition concerning utilization is limited to making knowledge assets publicly
available, there is no need for the university to take over the rights to results. It is
when academic environments wish to promote utilization in accordance with the
other three logics that the assumption of control by the university becomes relevant. The evaluation resulted in a model in which the university, on certain conditions, will offer to take over the rights to specific knowledge assets and intellectual
property assets from researchers to utilize them by: 1) making them available to
specific buyers, 2) conducting innovation processes, 3) including them in contractual networks and platforms. The value propositions should vary in line with the
ambition.
CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Level 3: Licensing for
open platforms

The university assumes the rights to intellectual assets so it can be included
in commons and open innovation processes.

Level 2: Licensing for innovation

The university assumes the rights to intellectual assets so it can conduct
innovation projects based on ideas.

Level 1: Licensing for knowledge
transfer to users and stakeholders

The university assumes the rights to intellectual assets to make research
results available to collaboration partners, employers and other stakeholders.

Figure 152. University licensing with three different value propositions
It was determined that the terms and conditions which form the basis for an
assumption of control by the university should differ according to the intended
ambition for licensing. Each category of value proposition follows its own logic.
Our proposed value proposition focuses primarily on the university’s obligations
and the incentives offered. Certainly, in a real-life situation it may be relevant to
combine value propositions. It is not impossible that the university might assume
responsibility both for ensuring that a specific buyer receives access to certain
knowledge assets at the same time as it initiates an innovation project. This is why
we have elected to talk about value propositions at different levels.
Common for the propositions is that the university takes control of the rights to the
specific intellectual assets. The basic premise is that the university will not further
assign these to others, but simply license them. The university assumes responsibility for the continued claiming process concerning both the knowledge assets and the
intellectual property assets. Among other things, this means that the university handles applications for intellectual property protection, to the extent it is required.
This tool is of pivotal importance within the framework of the KMP programmes.
It is not an especially detailed model. As a tool, it only highlights key principles

423

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

related to value propositions. This model has not yet been implemented at the
University of Gothenburg. The work done with centres of excellence, schools of
entrepreneurship and other operations based on the university’s assumption of
responsibility as an owner proves that it is feasible. At the same time, it is important to emphasize that the KMP programme has not yet come so far as to formulate general value propositions or to even draft contracts. Significant critical challenging and development remains to be carried out.
Nonetheless, our conclusion is that our work paves the way for a Swedish model
for innovation offices in which universities engage in licensing based on the desire
to uphold their public responsibility. The model may even be applicable in countries where universities own the rights to all research results by default. Regardless
of who owns the rights, this involves interaction between university and researcher
in which there is a need to clarify both responsibility and incentive.
11.4.2 Value proposition based on the pursuit of public responsibility
The university’s value proposition for its employees should be formulated based
on the principles discussed primarily in Part 2. The KMP evaluations have shown
that the more committed the university is to enabling and stimulating utilization
by its researchers, the clearer it becomes that it is neither fair to its employees nor
correct in its role as a public institution to allow employees to manage intellectual
assets independently. The KMP programme has more closely defined increased
responsibility from three main perspectives:
● the university’s interest in and aim to carry on its core activities of
research and education;
● researchers’ interest in being able to manage their own knowledge
assets within the framework of public operations;
● researchers’ interest in the university as an organization assuming
responsibility for knowledge assets and working to promote their
utilization.
The model also establishes two premises that should be clarified in the dialogue
with researchers and academic environments:
● the university’s offer to take control of knowledge assets does not mean
that it recognizes that researchers always own the full rights to their
knowledge assets and can prevent the university’s utilization of these;
● the university’s offer to take control of knowledge assets should not be
understood as a way to limit researchers’ own opportunities to
promote utilization in both public and private capacities.
These premises are in line with the ten principles established for the university’s management of knowledge assets (see Chapter 6). The model aims to satisfy the principle
that the university should offer the opportunity for researchers and academic environments to promote utilization through licensing in the university’s name. That said,
it is also important that the other nine principles be applied in practice. In this
instance, the Innovation Office has a key role to play in clarifying the premises in
operational activities.

424

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

No limitation of the university’s responsibility to ensure continued research and
education
The conclusion reached through the evaluation of the professor’s privilege in Part 1
is that the understanding of professor’s privilege is by no means clear. It is not even
certain that the professor’s privilege can be claimed at all outside of the realm of
patent law. It is very much a matter of an interpretation of the prevailing practice.
Typical for this type of interpretation is that it can change over time.
Assessing how to integrate promoting utilization with academic activities has
revealed that the university needs to assume greater responsibility for the right to its
employees’ knowledge assets, not least of all so as to safeguard continued research
and education. It is reasonable that the university should make the following
demands:
● Infrastructure knowledge assets, that is, things that are used
continuously in the academic environment, must be available to the
university;
● Knowledge assets needed for continuous research or other academic
activities must be available to the university;
● Knowledge assets are to be available and managed as background
knowledge and project results in contracts for research collaboration
and other collaborations;
● It must be possible for researchers and the university to prevent the
immoral and unethical use of knowledge assets.
These demands do not necessarily mean that the university claims to taking over
the rights. It simply means that university employees are not able to prevent the
university from utilizing knowledge assets in these contexts. At the same time, situations may no doubt arise in which, based on these principles, it is reasonable
for the university to take responsibility for managing the rights to knowledge
assets. For example, it is not at all unreasonable for the university to lay claim to
having rights to databases considered infrastructure assets.
No limitation on researchers’ mission of promoting utilization in public and private
capacities
Conversely, it is important to clarify that the value propositions established do not
limit employees’ opportunities to promote utilization. These should be viewed as
supplementary opportunities that should be appraised. Additional principles that
should be emphasized in this context:
● Knowledge assets should be utilized to the greatest extent possible.
Their utilization must be based on core academic values and the
ambition to safeguard the public interest;
● The basic assumption is that the researcher(s) and teachers(s) who
created a knowledge asset hold the rights to it, which is why they also
have the primary responsibility for promoting its utilization;
● Knowledge assets must be made available to the general public within
a reasonable time frame and to the greatest extent possible. To the

425

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

extent that patents and other legal protection are important in ensuring
their utilization, knowledge assets may be kept secret
● If the researchers/teachers agree to promote the utilization of
knowledge assets by developing an innovation project within the
framework of an academic environment’s activities, the university will
assume the rights to the knowledge assets to the extent necessary and
reasonable for the project’s implementation
● The university must support researchers’ utilization of knowledge
assets in a private capacity
It follows from these principles that researchers are primarily the ones who should
be able to promote the utilization of their knowledge assets. This should be possible
both in their work at the university and as private persons. It should be possible to
do so under either private or public control. It is particularly interesting to note that
many researchers appear to be interested in managing their research results as a
group within the sphere of public operations and under public control.355 This also
generates a relatively large degree of freedom for researchers. The conclusion drawn
by the KMP programme is that, by observing these principles, a well-balanced
approach can be achieved within operation-oriented activities.
11.4.3 Licensing for knowledge transfer to users and stakeholders
This model focuses on cases in which the university should offer to assume intellectual asset rights from researchers and take on an active responsibility to promote
utilization, primarily through the Innovation Office. The first value proposition is
for the university to take over the intellectual asset rights to promote the transfer of
research results to specific users.
The university takes over intellectual users rights to make them
available to users
The logic here is that it is much simpler if control of intellectual assets is concentrated in one place when an academic environment has intellectual assets that are
involved in many different knowledge transfers. Of course, this value proposition
is of particular interest when an academic environment has a number of relationships that need to be managed and that involve the same knowledge assets. It may
be a matter of signing multiple agreements on collaborative research, commissioned research, commissioned education or other utilization measures. The university centralizes control to determine who has the right to what intellectual
assets. The university retains the rights and offers various actors licences to utilize
the intellectual assets. A standard licensing agreement is signed once the university
has developed an intellectual asset, after which other actors are offered the right to
utilize it. In practice, commissioned research contracts and other collaboration
contracts also involve different forms of licensing.
355 Cf. the discussion in Chapter 2.

426

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

The value proposition primarily consists of the university become a contracting
party with the specific buyers and assuming responsibility for ensuring that relevant expectations are met. Researchers avoid assuming personal contractual obligations with the buyers. Undoubtedly, this can be a relief for researchers by avoiding having to assume personal responsibility for managing the agreement. At the
same time, the normal situation will continue to be that the assets still need to be
managed even when the researchers maintain control. Not all situations warrant
the university stepping in and offering to take control over the rights to intellectual
property.
Claiming intellectual assets combined with positioning the academic environment
provides a good overview of which societal stakeholders that should be targeted
regarding knowledge assets. It becomes immediately obvious that there is a need to
develop collaborative relationships with a range of actors that have key roles for
the academic environment. It also gives a fairly clear indication of which research
results it is relevant to make available to the specific users. The IAM work involves
a more holistic approach when it comes to promoting utilization. For certain academic environments, it is not feasible to assume responsibility for anything more
than research and education itself. Obviously, these types of environments have the
most exciting research and generate the most interest among buyers. Furthermore,
it is not uncommon for advanced IAM to lead to academic environments generating interesting opportunities for research financing and for more academic research
collaboration. The Innovation Office’s involvement can be critical to realizing the
opportunities for public benefit that were identified during the claim-staking and
positioning processes.
The Innovation Office ensures the management of intellectual assets
In more concrete terms, the value proposition consists of the Innovation Office taking over the management of knowledge transfers to users of research results. As
noted earlier, this value proposition primarily involves ensuring formal management of assets. However, the Innovation Office should also assume an active
responsibility for contributing to knowledge assets reaching as many specific buyers as possible. According to the model, the Innovation Office’s value proposition is
divided into four main parts:
● responsibility for claiming intellectual assets for transfer;
● responsibility for seeking out and initiating relationships with specific
buyers;
● responsibility for negotiating agreements, drafting and entering into
agreements, oversight to ensure that agreements are honoured and
so on;
● responsibility for ensuring that the transfer itself takes place and that
it attains applicability.
This value proposition greatly expands the opportunity for researchers to manage
their research results themselves, though under university ownership and in the
name of the university. It is reasonable to agree on a case-by-case basis the division of responsibility between the academic environment and the Innovation
Office.

427

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

In the claiming process, the Innovation Office should typically have responsibility
for determining what constitutes background knowledge and project results in
each relationship. When intellectual property rights protection is needed, this
should also be done by the Innovation Office. The Innovation Office appears to
need to do relatively extensive work. In practice, this work can be divided among
multiple actors.
An especially interesting feature of this value proposition is that Innovation Office
offers to play an active role in finding users etc. for intellectual assets. This feature
creates the potential to develop what can be viewed as a more traditional licensing
function. In addition to ensuring transfer through commissioned research work,
commissioned courses, collaborative research and so on, the Innovation Office is
also engaged in certain out-reach efforts in which users are offered access to knowledge assets. In certain contexts, it is reasonable for users to pay royalties or similar
to gain access to research results. It should also be explicitly stated that the
Innovation Office will assume special responsibility in this regard. However, the
purpose behind this will never be to bring in as much money as possible. Instead,
the main focus is working for research results to reach buyers and be utilized.
Internationally, the traditional form of licensing continues to be an important tool.
The Innovation Office also plays an important role in the actual transfer process, in
which knowledge assets are made available to the specific users.
All in all, the Innovation Office needs to develop its knowledge transfer capacity in
the same way that other knowledge transfer organizations develop this capacity.
Researchers can also participate
As noted earlier, the fact that the university has assumed control of a right does
not mean that the researchers cease to be involved. Researchers should have the
opportunity to influence and play an active part in the work of making the relevant knowledge assets available. One conclusion drawn by the KMP programme
is that researchers and academic environments should be able to enter into agreements with the university on the management of the intellectual assets within the
framework of the university’s operations. The basic premise is that the researchers
themselves promote utilization from within the academic environment. Naturally,
this can be done with the support of the Innovation Office.
According to this model for university licensing, the basic assumption is rather that
the responsibility for promoting utilization lies with the Innovation Office. This
responsibility can undoubtedly be limited to certain activities. As a result, an agreement is needed between the Innovation Office and the academic environment on
how this responsibility is to be divided. It is reasonable for the Innovation Office to
provide a number of possible solutions, depending on the nature of the situation.
Researchers have the right to receive royalties and other compensation when relevant
The value proposition should state that it must be possible for researchers to receive
compensation when research results are made available to specific users. Firstly,

428

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

researchers should be able to receive payment when they help promote utilization
over and above what is expected from financing for research and education.
Secondly, they should have the opportunity to receive a share of any royalty or similar that is collected.
It is not a primary aim that the university or researchers should earn money from
their research. However, it is important to promote utilization in a competitionneutral way. This is especially relevant when it is a matter of utilizing research
results that have commercial potential in the business world. There is a long tradition of companies asking universities to carry out commissioned research work
and other collaborative research to gain access to research results with commercial
relevance for them. Because these companies invest in the research, it is traditionally seen as reasonable for them to make certain demands about the rights to the
results. If a university has already obtained a certain research result that a company wishes to hold a certain right to, it is reasonable that the company should pay
for this right. It is not entirely clear just what is involved in developing a competition-neutral approach. This, in itself, is one reason why the Innovation Office
should take on a prominent role.
In line with the incentives discussed in Part 2, it is reasonable that, when the university assumes the rights to a result, the researchers should have the right to
receive compensation for the utilization activities they participate in. First and foremost, their job descriptions should include conducting utilization activities. If a
researcher’s contribution exceeds what is ordinarily required as part of their
research and education responsibilities, they should be entitled to receive additional compensation. This compensation may reasonably differ from case to case.
Compensation may take the form of payment for overtime or other forms of reimbursement. In addition, researchers should also have the right to their share of any
royalty payable. A reasonable basic assumption is that equal shares should go to
the university organization, the academic environment, and the researchers collectively, i.e. one-third each. This, however, needs to be developed further. This
applies from a purely administrative standpoint, also, given that licensing in the
university’s name is not currently common.
Researchers can conduct innovation work
The university’s assumption of control chiefly concerns managing the complexity
that arises when there are multiple buyers who require access to specific knowledge
assets. To the extent that there is a need for and the scope required to conduct innovation work, at this level, it should be up to the researcher to decide how this should
occur. The researcher can request a licence from the university to conduct an innovation project.
Researchers should be able to prevent the unethical use of knowledge assets
In accordance with the principles, researchers should be able to prevent immoral
and unethical use of knowledge assets. Even so, this is obviously not easy to
achieve in practice. Nonetheless, the university should be in the habit of setting

429

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

this type of condition when entering into agreements for the transfer of intellectual
assets. It is also one reason why the university should, as a rule, not assign intellectual property assets, but simply license them instead.
11.4.4 Licensing for innovation
The second level is an expanded value proposition in which the university assumes
responsibility for developing an innovation project.
The university assumes the rights to intellectual assets so it can conduct innovation
work
In this value proposition the university undertakes to also conduct innovation
projects. As noted previously, the KMP programme’s conclusion is that it is in
researchers’ interests to be able to conduct innovation projects within the framework of the university’s operations. Researchers allow the university to take control
of the rights so that they can run innovation projects in the public name and under
public control. This does not necessarily mean that the researchers wish to receive
help from the Innovation Office with the innovation work itself. Often, it is a matter of being given sanction to carry out their work within the framework of the
academic environment’s operations.
According to this model, the idea behind the value proposition is to expand the
responsibility further. The Innovation Office should assume a certain responsibility
for the actual innovation work itself. Over and above the assumption of responsibility already discussed, the Innovation Office undertakes to staff and stage one or
more innovation projects related to the knowledge assets. Experience gained
through the KMP programme suggests that the schools of entrepreneurship — that
is, programmes in entrepreneurship and innovation at the Master’s level — are
very important when running innovation projects. Students are an important
resource in the work of promoting the utilization of research results through innovation processes. The Innovation Office has a role to play here in coordinating
various resources and actors.
As explained earlier, the claiming and positioning processes generate an entirely new
insight into what constitute potential innovations and feasible innovation processes.
Furthermore, they make it considerably easier to delimit the actual innovation project. They clarify which researchers are originators and bearers. Moreover, a relatively
good understanding exists of which external actors are active in the field and with
whom there may be reason to collaborate. Student groups can suitably participate in
both the claim-staking process and the positioning process. Doing so generates sound
insight that can be applied if and when they become involved in running concrete
innovation projects at a later date. From the academic environment’s perspective, it
gains access to a resource that can achieve a significant amount in a relatively short
period of time. Students gain the opportunity to benefit from very exciting learning
processes. The value proposition has all the potential to create a win-win situation
for all involved.

430

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Researchers have the right to royalties and similar compensation to the extent that
such becomes relevant
In the same way as above, a researcher should have the right to compensation and
royalties if such becomes relevant. If the project eventually results in the formation
of a company, the employee in question should be offered ownership. The exact
method for managing researchers’ demands for compensation and influence on the
projects should be developed over time and according to the nature of the specific
case. In this context, also, the researcher should be able to prevent knowledge assets
from being utilized in an immoral and unethical manner.
11.4.5 Licensing for open platforms
The third level is a further-expanded value proposition in which the university
assumes responsibility for developing and managing contractual networks within
which open access to knowledge assets is regulated. This may include developing
open databases, open commons and open industrial networks. In principle, this is
a more advanced value proposition compared with the two presented above. In
this case, the Innovation Office assumes a more extensive portfolio-oriented
responsibility for knowledge assets. This can apply to both internal and external
intellectual assets. At this level, it is a matter of designing the value propositions to
suit the specific situation.

11.5 Conclusions
This third support system focuses on enabling deliberations about the operational
utilization of knowledge assets and how best to behave in external research and utilization landscapes. The support system concretizes to an even greater degree what
is involved in developing an institutional system and procedures in which the task
of collaborating and promoting utilization is integrated into academic environments. In this support system, the procedures are particularly important in supplying the academic environments’ needs and demand.
The support system’s primary feature is a process that pinpoints the relevant factors
that should be considered within the framework of an academic environment when
deciding how to promote utilization. Of particular importance is a model for how
researchers can assign their research results to the university. In the same way as the
other support systems, this support system focuses on the Innovation Office’s role. It
is the Innovation Office that, to a large degree, is tasked with assisting academic
environments to integrate decision-making for promoting utilization. It is also the
Innovation Office that plays the main role after the university assumes control of
the rights to researchers’ intellectual assets. All in all, the Innovation Office will
engineer an institutional development in which the university as an organization
assumes greater responsibility for promoting utilization and collaborating.

431

12. Administrative governance of
intellectual assets
12.1 Support system for organizing knowledge assets
in academic environments
Evaluation of how a support system should be designed for the administrative governance of knowledge assets, intellectual property assets, contracts etc. within the
university as an organization.

The final evaluation within the framework of the KMP programme looked at the
administrative governance of research results in various transactions and relationships. One of the main conclusions drawn within the KMP programme is that there
is a clear need for a support system to enable the administrative governance of
knowledge assets, intellectual property assets, contracts and the like within the
framework of the university’s operations. It might seem that this should be an
obvious part of the existing administrative management system and that there
should be no need for a special support system connected to an innovation office.
However, our conclusion is that, in practice, we are far removed from such a reali-

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

Support system for organizing knowledge assets
in academic environments

Figure 153. Support system for the administrative management of intellectual assets

432

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

ty. At present, it is very much a matter of finding a balance between what should
be managed by researchers in a private capacity and by the university as an organization. It is unavoidable that the Innovation Office will come to play a key role in
developing formats for this kind of management.
It has become apparent that a research organization that develops a work method
for IAM requires a sustainable system and procedures for gaining an overview of,
and control over, all intellectual assets and all contracts entered into. Some kind of
portfolio-based management is needed. The more assets and contracts, the greater
the need for administrative control. It is obvious that universities deal with enormous numbers of intellectual assets and related transactions in which we exercise
control over them. Administrative control can be distributed among the various
operations or centralized as a function of the common administration. A well-developed management system will likely entail control being both centrally located and
dispersed. At the same time, the KMP programme was able to establish that the
challenges with matters of financial control and confidentiality reveal the importance of considering to what degree the university can and should use its holding
company. For example, is it reasonable that the university as an organization
should manage patent portfolios or should this be done by the holding company?
It is first and foremost the claim-staking process that reveals the importance of a
more highly developed administrative management. At the same time, it is this
process that lays the foundation for how management takes place. If we use the
proposed tools and other methods, we will acquire a good overview of the various
intellectual assets. We will also gain an overview of how research results are transferred and used in collaborative relationships and of their significance as researchrelated infrastructure. Further, we will also gain an overview of who created each
individual research result. Within the KMP programme we have concluded that,
at least during the development phase, the university requires a special support
system for:
● administering knowledge assets;
● administering intellectual property assets;
● administering contractual transactions and relationships;
● administering claims in external collaboration structures.
A pivotal reason is that the concept of the professor’s privilege has resulted in a
stance whereby the university tends to avoid issues that concern the management of
intellectual property. Our conclusion is that this is unfortunate. Even if the university lays claim to intellectual property, there remains a great need for administrative
control over their management. The more academic environments integrate the
tasks of promoting utilization and collaborating into their ordinary activities, the
more important administrative management becomes.
The KMP programme has gone to great lengths to evaluate the legal prerequisites
and other aspects for developing administrative governance within the university
as a state-run organization. The evaluation reveals the importance of developing
the administrative governance, financial control and role as a contracting party.
The evaluation has also revealed that, at present, the university as an organization
is not ready to undergo any major administrative reform in these respects. There is

433

CLAIM

DECIDE

POSITION

ORGANIZE

much to suggest that organizational development is needed. Not least of all on
these grounds, it is important that support systems are developed that result in
improved management for the academic environments where there is both a need
and a demand. In this respect, it would be beneficial for the Innovation Office and
the rest of the administration to proceed by trial and error. An exaggerated focus
on case management, archiving, financial control and suchlike risks resulting in
unnecessary bureaucratization. Within the scope of the KMP programme, we have
only just begun the dialogue about how the Innovation Office should develop its
procedures through interaction with the rest of the organization.

12.2 Procedures for the administrative management of intellectual
assets and contracts
The development work carried out within KMP revealed the importance of an
improved administrative management of the intellectual assets variously controlled
by the university. In parallel with a developed claim-staking process, it is clear that
an administrative system is needed that encompasses all of the university’s three
roles – public administrative authority, employer and contracting party. In fact, all
three roles need to be considered in connection with all asset management, i.e. that
of knowledge assets, intellectual property assets and contracts.
Here, too, it is important to highlight the difference between the Innovation
Office’s procedures for helping enable academic environments to manage intellectual assets, and the actual procedures for how the administrative management
should be performed within the framework of the university’s role as a public
institution. Through its procedure, the Innovation Office is well equipped to
encourage and support academic environments in allowing the university’s holding
company to administer the management of intellectual property assets, for example. In the same way as for the procedures for deliberations and decision-making,
we believe that the Innovation Office can lay the groundwork for a universitywide system and procedures.

12.3 Conclusions
This fourth support system focuses on enabling the administrative management of
knowledge assets, intellectual property assets, contracts and the like within the
framework of the university’s operations. As noted earlier, it might seem that this
should be an obvious part of the existing administrative management system and
that there should be no need for a special support system connected to an
Innovation Office. However, from an operational perspective, the KMP programme
has demonstrated that we are far removed from any such reality. At present, we
need to identify formats for developing a balance between what should be managed
by researchers in a private capacity and what should be managed by the university
as an organization. The Innovation Office has a decisive role to play in developing
frameworks for this kind of management.

434

The KMP Formula

435

13. Summary
13.1 The KMP formula for increased public responsibility in academic
environments
The KMP programme has focused on investigating and developing work methods,
processes and models that help the university assume organizational responsibility
for collaboration and utilization. In doing so, the programme ultimately aims to
develop the university’s ability to enable its researchers and teachers to assume
greater public responsibility. The basic ambition is to promote the idea that collaboration and utilization is an integrated part of an academic environment’s activities
and is characterized by academic values and a striving to uphold public responsibility.
To enable an overview of the programme at its highest level, we have developed
what we refer to as a “KMP formula”. This is not a mathematical formula which
guarantees a particular result. Instead, it constitutes an attempt to make a relatively large-scale programme comprehensible and, hopefully, also implementable.

IAM-FRAMEWORK

The “operational capability”
of the university to enable
the researchers and academic
environments to utilize/collaborate

DEVELOPMENT CIRCLE

KNOWLEDGETRIANGLE

The ”organisational capability”
of the university to enable
the researchers and academic
environments to utilize/collaborate

The ability to understand,
manage and fulﬁl expectations
on the university to integrate research,
education and utilization/collaboration

Figure 154. The KMP formula
The KMP programme has the university as an organization as its central focus and
works to develop the university’s capabilities. The programme has three primary
components, each of which focuses on developing a certain overarching capability:
1) The ability to understand, manage and fulfil expectations, 2) the ability to develop leadership, operational support, related support systems and, not least of all,
complete academic environments, and 3) the ability to promote utilization from an
operational standpoint and to collaborate.
The KMP programme’s point of departure and objective is the university’s ability to
understand and fulfil the expectations placed on it with collaboration and promoting utilization. The programme’s primary concern has been to assess and clarify the
expectations placed on universities as organizations by the government. That said,

436

in light of the nature of universities and the fundamental value of independent
research, it is at least as important to assess and understand what expectations academics place on universities as organizations. Naturally, it is also important to take
into consideration the expectations and wishes of the surrounding community.
Accordingly, the KMP programme has focused on developing models for understanding established expectations and for managing these on the basis of this
understanding.
The KMP programme has demonstrated that meeting established expectations
requires developing two overarching capabilities. The first is developing individual
capabilities for promoting utilization and collaboration from an operational standpoint. The second is developing an organizational capability consisting of appropriate leadership, operational support, related support systems and, not least of all,
complete academic environments. These two primary capabilities act as mutual
levers; that is to say, their relationship is more dynamic than that of purely complementary capabilities. Combined, they lay the foundation for achieving a longterm sustainable result. Moreover, they are also prerequisites underpinning the
ability to establish goals and evaluate achievements.
The KMP formula provides a normative structure for the capabilities that universities must develop to integrate promoting utilization and collaborating into their
academic activities. The formula frames the normative ambition that has characterized the KMP programme. A large part of the programme’s work has concerned
assessing different aspects and issues to produce models and processes for developing the required capabilities. Admittedly, there is an inherent risk in developing
overly simplified and stylized models. At the same time, it is important to have
access to normative models that can be applied in practice and that help reduce
complexity. Whether or not the KMP programme’s various models actually contribute to such a development depends on their collective normative influence.
Their long-term consequences are uncertain, making on-going critical assessment
necessary. In this respect, it should be noted that the KMP programme’s work can
be seen as at the core of what is sometimes called “new public management”.
There is good reason to manage all change processes within academia with the
utmost care. One of the KMP programme’s primary aims has been (and continues
to be) to create a basis for discussion. Thus, its work should by no means be
viewed as once and for all time complete. On the contrary, it is an area that
requires on-going critical review, and to which new perspectives and experience are
added continually.

13.2 A knowledge triangle for identifying expectations
and conditions
13.2.1 How can universities develop their ability to understand and manage both
internal and external expectations?
The expectation that has had the greatest impact on the KMP programme is that
universities should incorporate collaboration and promoting utilization as integrated parts of their academic activities. That is to say, the university as an organiza-

437

COLLABORATION/UTILIZATION

KNOWLEDGE-TRIANGLE

EDUCATION

RESEARCH
The ability to understand,
manage and fulﬁl expectations
on the university to integrate research,
education and utilization/collaboration

Figure 155. The knowledge triangle as a normative model in the KMP formula
tion is expected to ensure that its researchers and academic environments will collaborate and promote utilization as integrated elements of research and education,
respectively. While this requirement stems directly from Sweden’s Higher
Education Act, it is also clearly evident in acts of parliament and in policy speeches by politicians. The same expectation is also voiced in research circles. Much of
the work that aims to ensure that research results are actually utilized cannot be
easily separated from research activities themselves. The knowledge triangle captures just this interrelationship.
The knowledge triangle depicts the normative influence that stems from the expectation that universities as organizations should have the ability to integrate collaboration/utilization into their academic activities. This is this normative process
that, in turn, requires a university’s various representatives to acquire an advanced
understanding of what this means in purely practical terms: What concrete expectations are associated with collaboration and utilization when these are to take
place within the framework of the university’s activities? Politicians and the
Swedish government allocate significant public resources to universities and have
lofty expectations for universities’ ability to contribute to societal development,
but what does this equate to in more practical terms? What, in reality, does the
State in its capacity as the principal of the universities expect of universities as
organizations?
13.2.2 How do universities manage the state’s expectations under the prevailing
circumstances?
The majority of Swedish universities are public authorities. This means that the

438

RESEARCH

RULE-BASED
GOVERNANCE

PROGRAMME & PROJECT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

RESOURCE & RESULT-BASED
GOVERNANCE

GOVERNANCE
BY OBJECTIVES

COLLABORATION/UTILIZATION

EDUCATION

Figure 156. The knowledge triangle and state governance

commission to collaborate and promote utilization must be managed within the
framework of this organizational form. Accordingly, the university’s actions comprise an element of governmental governance. By analyzing the governmental governance of universities, the KMP programme has identified what we consider the
framework for a model for both expectations and conditions for collaboration and
utilization by universities. As a normative process, governmental governance
involves both expectations and conditions related to the university’s activities.
Governmental governance as a collective whole establishes the framework for the
public authority model. We have observed that the Swedish government is neither
especially clear nor instructive when it comes to the expectations it places on universities. Neither do the conditions defined by the state stand out as particularly
favourable for actual opportunities to integrate collaborating and promoting utilization.
Within this framework, individual universities have the opportunity and, in our
eyes, also the obligation to develop their own models. We believe that the various
forms of governance involved need to be further developed at the university level.
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that governance mechanisms need to be
developed at the university level if universities are to fulfil the government’s expectations. Universities must consider the government’s explicit ambitions and established rules and regulations, while at the same time establishing their own requirements. They should utilize their autonomy to translate governmental governance at
the university level.

439

Governance by objectives at the university level
With governance by objectives, universities should make clear that, as organizations, they have a public responsibility to promote utilization. The Higher
Education Act addresses universities as organization. Promoting utilization is part of
employed academics’ public duty and can reasonably be considered a matter of
working for the good of society. Although a clarification of this sort may seem
superfluous, it serves as an important and natural signal that universities must
assume greater responsibility for managing knowledge assets. We have observed
that there is a clear need to concretize what is meant by promoting utilization at the
university level. The government’s existing management-by-objectives framework is
not sufficient in this respect. Universities need to provide clear instructions on the
kind of activities typically viewed as utilization-promoting activities. In this case, the
State’s governance by objectives needs to be developed at the university level.
Norm-based governance at the university level
Our analysis of the state’s rule-based governance revealed that the potential for the
university to promote utilization is either imprecise or uncertain in several respects.
This presents a number of challenges on several different levels. One obvious conclusion is that the existing public authority model is not well suited to universities in
general nor to promoting utilization, in particular. At the same time, it is obvious that
many of the rules for public authorities may be very important for developing universities’ organizational capabilities. A reasonable assumption is that the current situation requires a more highly developed operations model at the university level. We
believe that universities should place special emphasis on identifying and managing
different types of risks associated with promoting utilization. Risks associated with
the inability to achieve utilization should be given special consideration. Mapping the
different risks associated with operational objectives can help clarify the impact of
the state’s other rule-based management. The shortcomings (or however one wishes
to define these characteristics) of the public authority model should naturally be considered in risk management.
Sweden’s Higher Education Act does not specify the university management’s, university administration’s and researchers’ respective responsibilities with promoting
utilization. Consequently, one crucial element in developing universities’ organizational capabilities is the division and clarification of responsibilities. The EU’s recommendation, for example, emphasizes the importance of universities assuming
strategic responsibility for knowledge transfer and innovation. Universities are
largely governed by the academics as a profession; that is to say, their researchers
and teaching staff have considerable influence over their activities. As such, it is
unclear just what an assumption of strategic responsibility entails for a university
organization. Thus, it is important to develop norms that clarify and allocate
responsibility among different “spheres of power” and levels within the university.
One key factor in the development of these norms is researchers’ direct responsibility within the framework of their public employment. The expanded responsibility
to promote utilization should reasonably affect the scope and focus of work obligations. On the other hand, the employer’s responsibility for managing collaboration

440

is of major importance. Issues concerning conflicts of interest and disqualification
arise from time to time and must be managed. It thus becomes clearer to researchers
how they may utilize research results in the form of secondary employment. All in
all, this leads to a clarification of the university’s role and thereby also contributes
to its increased autonomy.
One critical factor concerning the university’s organizational capabilities is the system and procedures that determine how knowledge assets are to be managed within the framework of the university’s activities. In its 2008 research bill, the Swedish
government stated that it intended to introduce a disclosure system for research
results with commercial potential. As mentioned earlier, no such system has been
realized. One reasonable inference is that each individual university is responsible
for determining how it intends to manage knowledge assets from an organizational
standpoint. This is directly related to how the university intends to enable and support its researchers and academic environments in their promotion of asset utilization. One important conclusion drawn is that the university should distinguish
between situations where it intends to play a role in the prospective utilization of
an asset and situations in which the university needs to control the asset in
research contexts, for example. The university’s promotion of the utilization of
knowledge assets does not necessarily mean that it lays claim to the right to utilize
such assets. Another key issue concerning the management of knowledge assets is
how to manage and ensure confidentiality where necessary.

Programme- and project-based governance at the university level
It is clear that it is both increasingly desired and important for universities to play the
roles of stakeholder and contracting party in international research and collaboration
arenas. To a significant extent, external stakeholders expect universities to be able to
manage both portfolios of intellectual assets and contracts. Universities are now more
often required to design both commercialization strategies and strategies for open
access as part of their contractual relationships. Consequently, they have the opportunity to establish special requirements for the management of collaboration processes
on a project basis. The KMP programme’s conclusion is that universities need to
develop their organizational capabilities when acting as contracting parties and managing research results as knowledge assets in both their national and international
contractual relationships. Universities also have holding companies that can play a
role in these contexts when it comes to administering certain intellectual assets.

Resource- and result-based governance at the university level
It is difficult to separate resource-based governance from other forms of governance. At the university level, there is much to suggest that setting aside significantly increased resources to support promoting utilization and collaboration would be
useful. The universities have relatively large discretion in this regard. As far as the
Swedish government is concerned, there is nothing to prevent universities from
using their basic funding for such activities. In addition, universities should ensure

441

that projects and resources allocated for promoting utilization in connection with
externally-financed research programmes are, in fact, used for this purpose.
At the same time, it is clear that the state is gradually increasing the expectations it
places on universities to demonstrate increased concrete societal impact. All indications suggest that, in the future, research funding will increasingly be decided based
on various indicators that show the research’s degree of societal impact. Universities must embrace and manage this development, which is international in nature.
We know from experience that the normative effect of this type of results-based
management might result in non-desired consequences. In the current phase, it is
critical for the university to be able to play an active role in this development and
to accurately discern the concrete expectations that are established. It is especially
important that emerging normative effects result in developing the university’s ability to meet its social responsibility. Naturally, it is also crucial to ensure that this
development unfolds in line with an academic approach that upholds independence
and the principle of academic freedom in research.
Model for compliance and the development of public governance
at the university level
All in all, the KMP programme has resulted in a model that is intended to provide
a collective overview of public governance of collaboration and promoting utilization. The model is intended for use in determining expectations of a university and
the extent to which the university’s actions harmonize with governmental governance. It is important to note, however, that in keeping with the idea of autonomy,
universities have a normative space that enables them to further develop State control. Consequently, the model demonstrates the importance of the university’s management assuming active responsibility for and developing governance at the university level.
13.2.3 How should universities manage academics’ expectations based on
the prevailing circumstances?
As organizations, universities are strongly influenced by the academics as a profession. Ultimately, it is their researchers and teaching staff who determine to what
extent integration actually occurs. It is a core academic value that researchers should
enjoy a large degree of freedom in their work. This freedom applies to the object of
their research and to how their research is conducted, but also to if and when their
research results are published. Inevitably, governance at the university level needs to
focus primarily on helping researchers and teaching staff to conduct research and
provide education with a scientific basis. This governance also reasonably includes
the responsibility to enable academics to assume greater public responsibility through
their work.
Given its focus on developing the university’s organizational capabilities, the KMP
programme has prioritized basing its work on the expectations of researchers and
academic environments, respectively. Taken as a whole, the researchers’ concrete

442

actions and expectations for the future form the conditions the university must
consider when developing its organizational capabilities. For this reason, the KMP
programme has needed to develop a more detailed understanding of how
researchers and academic environments promote utilization and how they view
their ability to carry out this mission.
The programme’s analyses of academic environments provided a deeper understanding of what it means for the university to promote utilization as an integrated
part of research and education.
Expectations for utilizing research results according to four different logics
In analyzing which expectations and conditions exist for utilizing research results
within the framework of academic environments, we were able to discern a number
of utilization logics. As we see it, four logics should be applied for an academic environment to promote utilization, thus also providing four logics that the university
should consider when developing its organizational capabilities. Based on how
research results can be managed as knowledge assets, researchers can choose to do
any of the following:
● make the knowledge assets publicly available
● make the knowledge assets applicable to specific users/stakeholders
● develop the knowledge assets as innovation processes
● implement the knowledge assets in open contractual network processes

COLLABORATION/UTILIZATION

Contractual networks

Innovation processses

Applicable for speciﬁc stakeholders

Publicly available
RESEARCH

EDUCATION

Figure 157. The knowledge triangle and the various ways of promoting utilization

443

Our assessment concludes that the academic environments expect to be able to
promote utilization according to one or more of these logics. Our analysis of the
academic environments led to the conclusion that promoting utilization is not
especially well developed within the framework of the university’s organizational
responsibility. We believe that this must be viewed as a material risk.
Consequently, we chose to conduct a risk analysis of the sphere of activity, using
academic environments as the risk environment.
Risks that academic environments will be unable to integrate
promotion of utilization
In time, we identified a number of different types of risk. Ultimately, we were able
to determine something like a risk model for the university’s ability to promote
utilization. The assessment revealed a number of issues that we believe the university should consider in trying to enable its researchers and academic environments
to promote utilization. It was clear that researchers and the academic environments have differing views on the degree to which the following circumstances
exist:
● unclear work assignments, limited resources and limited incentives for
academics (researchers and teaching staff)
● unclear role division
● failure on the part of managers to assume responsibility and provide
support
● unclear norms concerning the task of promoting utilization
● a lack of support from the administration
● undeveloped organizational management of knowledge assets for
utilization purposes
● limited capabilities for assessing knowledge assets and for testing
different ways of utilizing them.
By concretizing these issues, we have been able to identify and illustrate more specific risks in academic environments. In this way, from a KMP perspective, we
showed that well-developed management and administrative support, particularly
on the part of the Grants and Innovation Office, are critical.
Self-assessment model for academic environments
In this regard, the KMP project ultimately resulted in a model for academic environments to assess their utilization and the conditions for utilization (a self-assessment model and a risk-management model). The model is based on the four utilization logics and enables the academic environments to assess and discuss collegially
what public responsibility reasonably entails within academia. Acting in harmony
with these logics demonstrates how academic environments contribute to the creation of “public resources” by managing research results as intellectual assets. The
KMP programme’s plan for the model intends to enable the academic environments
to analyze and discuss the interplay between academia’s public responsibility, the
development of public resources and societal impact.

444

13.3 A “development circle” for organisational capabilities
in universities
13.3.1 How can and should universities develop their capabilities as organizations to
assume public responsibility?
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that a major assumption of responsibility for
enabling researchers and academic environments to collaborate and promote utilization requires the development of the university as an organization. A change
process must be implemented. First and foremost, the university’s management and
academic managers must be prepared and willing to drive a change process in
which the university’s various operations contribute to integrating collaboration
and utilization and which results in a process characterized by a desire to meet
public responsibility.

DEVELOPMENT CIRCLE

The ”organisational capability”
of the university to enable the
researchers and academic
environments to utilize/collaborate

Figure 158. The university circle as a normative model in the KMP formula

On an overarching level, our ambition has been to construct a model that demonstrates how university management and academic managers can and should
approach collaboration and promoting utilization. Our dual basic point of departure was academic responsibility and responsibility as a public authority. Is it possible to develop a model to help academic managers promote innovation processes
and other utilization, while at the same time clearly safeguarding the academic values and norms on which the public authority model rests?

445

13.3.2 University management sets the stage based on a number of processes
By assessing the university’s triple role as a public authority, employer and contracting party, we were able to illuminate certain interconnected key processes both
within and for academic leadership.
The primary focus was on leadership at the university management level, although
consideration was also given to all other levels — academic managers, the administration and even academic staff. We concluded that a leadership model is needed
that includes 1) a risk-management process, 2) a governance-by-objectives process
and 3) a norm-development process.

Risk Management Process

Governance by
Objective Process

Governance by
Norms Process

Figure 159. The university circle and three leadership processes
The risk assessment provides an overview of the challenges that exist and, as such,
hopefully also a realistic understanding of the organization’s opportunities. It also
provides the basis for both the governance-by-objectives process and the normdevelopment process. While risk assessment can be carried out at the university
management level, it can and should also be conducted within a set academic environment. The same applies to the governance-by-objectives process and the normdevelopment process. These three processes comprise a kind of “toolbox” for academic leadership when it comes to promoting the utilization of research results.
13.3.3 Governance-by-objectives process
The KMP programme also attempted to clarify how the governance-by-objectives
process can and should be carried out. In time, it became clear to us how a model

446

could be used to drive this process. Our assessment led us to realize that a governance-by-objectives model can be used in four processes. These are:
● risk assessment and the assessment of existing governance by objectives
● the formulation of objectives
● the preparation of action plans and the establishment of an
implementation plan
● monitoring and the development of indicators for gauging impact.
Objectives need to be formulated at every organizational level, from the university
level to the researcher level. For the KMP programme, it is natural to begin with
the university management’s and academic managers’ responsibility for governance
by objectives. Governance by objectives is unquestionably an important process
within academic leadership. It allows managers to hold a dialogue and to achieve
consensus on a broad front, which is often necessary if academic activities are to
become more than just isolated efforts and individual achievements.
Understanding their own sphere’s operations is a recurring challenge for managers
in academia. Although the majority of university department heads, deans and
vice-chancellors are academics, it is still difficult for them to get a good grasp of
others’ activities because these are often carried out at a specialized professional
level and are characterized by the individuals’ disciplinary approaches. As discussed previously, we believe that the risk assessment work, if it adopts the academic environments as its starting point, is an important means for academic managers to gain at least some understanding of the challenges that exist within different parts of their organization. In doing so, a foundation is laid for governance-byobjectives work.
Successful vision and strategy work must include collegial processes. The objectives
established at the managerial level should not only enjoy the support of subordinates, but also be the same kind of objectives that the academic environments are
pursuing in their own activities. Because it is the researchers and teaching staff as
individuals and as groups who, in some sense, ultimately determine the content of
the academic activities, it is essential that they be involved in management-by-objectives processes for their own organization. The more highly developed the management-by-objectives process is at the group level, the greater the potential for leadership that enables.
The KMP programme’s primary focus is the academic environments’ management
of research results as knowledge assets in collaborations and for utilization.
Assessments of research results and academic environments generate dialogues
about objectives and strategy: Which overarching objectives does the academic environment want to achieve? How should the academic environment be positioned and
which values should it strive to realize? Based on more general considerations like
these, how should concrete knowledge assets be utilized in accordance with the different logics? Or, in other words, which objectives should be established? How
many and which publications and other communications activities should be pursued, for example? Which collaborations should be initiated and developed? What
investments are needed? The more an academic environment pursues governance by
objectives in this way, the simpler it will be for academic managers to pursue a gov-

447

ernance by objectives that enables. Doing so allows academic managers to begin to
contemplate and establish objectives based on the knowledge assets held by the
researchers. It also becomes possible to evaluate positions of strength and suchlike
at the departmental and faculty levels, for example, which encourages a future-oriented dialogue about governance by objectives that enjoys good support from those
involved.
To the extent that the KMP programme succeeds in its aim, governance by objectives will create significantly greater opportunities for both the concrete work done
within academic environments and for better-developed leadership and management. Irrespective of development, a dialogue is important to reach a consensus on
objectives at the above-discussed levels. Doing so will initiate a process. The KMP
programme’s contribution is that this process will occur from the bottom up and
be grounded in the researchers’ research.
According to the KMP programme’s conclusions, a second phase of the process
involves an interplay between the following:
● Objective-oriented discussions about how to promote the utilization of
concrete knowledge assets and how to manage these cooperatively as an
integrated part of the academic environment’s activities. The ambition is
for the academic environments to develop a “collaboration and
utilization plan”.
● Collegial objective-oriented discussions about what we wish to achieve
within the university.
● Discussions initiated by managers aimed at drawing up and confirming
relevant recorded visions and strategies.
In the objective-oriented discussion, the model is used to decide the means and ends.
The more ends are perceived as means, the more reasonable it may be to view them
as features of the strategy.
The implementation process and the preparation of action plans
The mere fact that a process has been carried out that establishes and adopts
visions and strategies does not in itself ensure that they will also be realized. This is
especially true when the process has mainly occurred at the overarching university
level. Here it is important to realize that, in academic contexts, the implementation
of a vision and strategy is very much bound up with collegial processes. Researchers and teaching staff must embrace the objectives and actively pursue them in and
for their own organization. Obviously, this is much easier to achieve if the objectives are a result of researchers’ and teachers’ involvement and own deliberations,
which the KMP programme’s approach relies on.
As part of efforts to implement Vision 2020 at the University of Gothenburg, it was
decided to prepare action plans every four years and operational plans every year.
This took place at both the university management and faculty levels, and was
explicitly governance by objectives. The KMP programme’s work revealed that
action plans/operational plans are effective tools in the second phase of the man-

448

agement-by-objectives process being conducted at the university management level.
Here again, governance by objectives must be applied. That said, this does not
involve working with the overarching objectives on an abstract level to any significant degree. If it is to be done at all, the work should be concrete, such as by specifying the environment’s objectives and clarifying what goals are to be pursued concerning social justice.
It is critically important to ensure a close correlation between the governance-byobjectives process implemented in the academic environments and that implemented at the university level.
13.3.4 Norm development, role allocation and institutional development
The KMP programme crucially found that norm development at universities is one
of the most important processes within academic management and leadership. Our
conclusion is that leadership ability in developing norms, governance by objectives
and risk assessment are decisive in enabling academic environments to integrate
collaboration and utilization promotion of knowledge assets. We believe that a
focus on these three processes strengthens leadership in itself, especially at the university management level. They make clearer what the university needs to manage
in its roles as a public authority, employer and contracting party in collaborative
relationships.
A model for the institutional development of the university’s organizational
capabilities for collaboration and promoting utilization
Perhaps the KMP programme’s most important task has been to assess how to
enable institutional development that leads to the ability to promote utilization.
This is undeniably a relatively complex situation, characterized by a lack of coherent control at the State level and a more or less constant influx of new initiatives
and projects. Through our assessment, we have concluded that university management has a decisive role to play in enabling institutional development. At the same
time, we are aware that there are good reasons for trying to reduce the complexity
that exists. As a result, our efforts have focused on developing a dual model for
norm and institutional development.
At its simplest level, the model is intended to serve as a basis for one or more policies and for a number of instructions. In principle, we believe that by adopting as a
starting point the previously discussed norms about roles and responsibilities, the
management of knowledge assets and incentives, we could potentially develop a
policy that paves the way for integrating collaboration and utilization into the university’s principal mission. Moreover, in doing so, this also implements the EU’s recommendation on knowledge transfer and the management of intellectual assets.
Our conclusion is that “core norms” have now been identified. Thus, norms concerning roles and responsibilities, the management of research results as objects of
transaction, and incentives can lay the groundwork for institutional development.

449

it y

Ma

nagement’s C
ap
ies
ilit

How should the
university develop its
organizational
capabilities
concerning
collaboration
and promoting
utilization?

ab

The capabilities
of researchers
and the academic
environments?

Uni
ve
rs

The capabilities of prefects
and other leaders?

The Innovation
Oﬃce’s and
administration’s
capabilities?

The capabilities in the
interface with the external
innovation system?

Figure 160. The university circle – a model for institutional development
Here, too, it is difficult to break clear of the complexity entirely. Norms recorded in
documents have little effect if they are not realized in practice; that is, they must be
clearly communicated and become ideas around which to position oneself. In our
recommended model, this involves managing processes, the first and foremost
among these being institutional development processes. In more complex contexts,
the model addresses how to drive a number of key processes to achieve institutional
development. We have identified the following processes:
● the process of formulating policies and instructions
● the implementation process and the development of organizational
functions and support systems
● the process of developing normative structures for contracts
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that academic leadership is needed with the
ability to initiate and drive these processes. This will help develop the codes of
practice required for enabling the academic environments to promote utilization
and to collaborate. Our conclusion is also that, just like the governance-by-objectives process, the norm-development process should begin with a risk-assessment
process. Taking the various steps in the risk assessment provides an overview of
the need for norm development. Risk assessment has played a very important role
within the KMP programme. We believe that academic managers should conduct

450

risk assessments on a recurring basis. We have also concluded that the codes of
practice presented and their actual effect and suitability should be re-examined
from time to time.
Allocation of roles in connection with the responsibility to promote utilization and to
collaborate
One of our most important conclusions regarding institutional development was
that a clearer division of roles is needed to handle responsibility for managing the
integration process in academic environments. We arrived at the following role
division:
● The researcher/teacher has the right and the primary public responsibility
to promote the utilization of their knowledge assets as an integrated
part of academic activities and as a joint/collegial responsibility in
academic environments.
● Academic managers are responsible for enabling researchers to collaborate and utilize knowledge assets as an integrated part of operations, for
ensuring that collaboration and utilization occur in harmony with the
university’s responsibility as a public authority and core academic values,
and for ensuring that the university acts as a professional contracting
party in external relationships.
● The Innovation Office has both a reactive and a proactive responsibility
with the academic environments to ensure that knowledge assets are
utilized and managed in a professional manner in collaborations. This
includes responsibility for developing a number of organizational
functions, such as for licensing and coordinating support systems.
● The holding company is responsible for creating the preconditions for
and for offering researchers/teachers the chance to commercialize their
research results and other knowledge (in a private capacity) and for
ensuring that this occurs in line with governance principles and other
norms that the university must apply.
● An academic training unit, the “Innovation Academy”, is responsible for
following the work at the university and ensuring that there are arenas
for role-specific training, as well as for critical dialogue about the
university’s work on utilization and collaboration.
The details will differ depending on how the specific university organizes its
work. On a more general level, however, it should be possible to implement the
institutional system and procedures described here at all universities.
Ten principles for managing knowledge assets
Procedures are crucial for operationally implementing the following ten principles for
the university’s management of knowledge assets:
1) The utilization of knowledge assets is to be based on core academic values and a striving to uphold public responsibility.
2) The basic assumption is that the researcher(s) and teacher(s) who have

451

created the knowledge asset hold the rights to it and, thus, they also
have the primary responsibility to promote utilization.
3) Knowledge assets that comprise infrastructure, that is, things that are
used continuously in the academic environment, must be available to the
university.
4) Knowledge assets that are needed for continuous research or other academic activities must be available to the university.
5) Knowledge assets must be available and managed as background knowledge and project results in contracts concerning research collaboration
and other collaboration.
6) Knowledge assets must be made available to the general public within a
reasonable time frame and to the greatest extent possible. To the extent
that patents and other legal protections are important in ensuring utilization, knowledge assets may be kept confidential.
7) If the researchers/teachers agree to promote the utilization of knowledge
assets by developing an innovation project within the framework of
activities at the academic environment, the university will assume the
rights to the knowledge assets to the extent necessary and reasonable for
the project’s implementation.
8) The university is to provide the opportunity for researchers and academic
environments to promote utilization through licensing in the university’s
name.
9) The university must support researchers’ utilization of knowledge assets
in a private capacity.
10) It must be possible for researchers and the university to prevent the
immoral and unethical use of knowledge assets.
Against this backdrop, operational procedures have been designed with a principal focus on developing processes for the more proactive support of academic
environments.
Five principles for managing researchers’ incentives
Researchers and academic environments should be able to receive resources, support and time within their work duties to promote in various ways the use of their
knowledge assets in the university’s name.
It is important that the procedures ensure the implementation of the principles
developed for researcher incentives. These are:
1) It should be possible for researchers and academic environments to
aguire resourses, support and time among their duties to promote in various ways the use of their knowledge assts in the university’s name.
2) When recruiting and promoting researchers and teachers, emphasis
should be placed on their ability to make research results generally available, to make research results available to specific users/stakeholders, to
manage projects and run social innovation projects, to develop open
knowledge platforms, or to promote utilization in other ways.
3) Researchers and academic environments that assume special responsibility for developing knowledge assets for innovation projects run in the

452

name of the university should be eligible to receive special resources,
support and time to do so within their work duties.
4) If the university assumes the right to a researcher’s knowledge assets to
license them or in other ways utilize them, the researcher has the right to
a portion of the income generated.
5) At the basic level, researchers and teachers have the right to the income
generated when they work to promote the utilization of their knowledge
assets in a private capacity.
The process of formulating policies and instructions
We view policies as key instruments for identifying and establishing a number of
core norms. In accordance with the previously noted EU recommendation, it may
be appropriate to draw up multiple policies. An important insight from the KMP
programme is that we are involved in a learning process. This is equally true when
it comes to drafting policies. State governance and concrete impact need to be continually monitored. A collegial dialogue should precede all policy drafting.
Presumably, we need to secure a process that regularly reviews the policy. At any
rate, this certainly applies to the various instructions. Our conclusion is that the
drafting policies and instructions are processes that should reasonably be initiated
and managed by university management and the academic managers, while being
characterized by great transparency and participation. Other control instruments at
the university management level will also need to be assessed and revised. One such
instrument is the delegation schedule. Clarifying responsibility and the assignment
of roles may very well result in certain parties requiring greater authority to represent the university.
The implementation process and the development of support systems
and organizational functions
Norms have little effect if they are not communicated and are not implemented by
those whom they concern. The KMP programme’s aim is that norms should result in
the creation of a number of codes of practice. Our conclusion is that a number of support systems are needed in which these norms are implemented and developed. The
support systems make up critical key processes in creating the necessary codes of
practice.
University management needs to do its part if the Innovation Office is to be able to
drive processes that develop support systems. A number of different actors will be
involved in the above discussion. This will be a long-term process in which a number of mistakes will likely be made before the support systems is fine-tuned and
effective.
13.3.5 The Innovation Academy
The KMP programme has come to the conclusion that the university should either
establish a special training unit or develop an existing training unit. Our proposal is

453

that university management should establish “an academic training unit (the Innovation Academy) responsible for following the work at the university and ensuring
that there are arenas for role-specific training, as well as for critical dialogue about
the university’s work on utilization and collaboration”. In this respect, the KMP programme has also concluded that university management should formulate and establish an overarching mission with a number of specific responsibilities. These responsibilities are:
● to create arenas for learning, dialogue and critique
● to initiate, secure and provide role-specific training and further training
● to monitor, oversee and communicate collaboration and utilization
activities
By assuming these three responsibilities, the unit will take on a central and important
complementary role. The unit should closely work with university management and
the Innovation Office, while also basing its work on academic freedom. Within academia, it is always crucial to strike a balance between different spheres of power. An
important conclusion of the KMP programme is that an academic training unit is of
central importance in enabling integration of the mission to collaborate and promote
utilization. It is as a complement to the Innovation Office’s work and the academic
managers’ assumption of responsibility that the training unit plays an important role
in enabling the academic environments to promote utilization and to collaborate. As
far as possible, an innovation academy should pursue and enjoy collegial legitimacy.
As an academy, we suggest that it should be governed by utilization and collaboration coordinators from all of the university’s departments and faculties.

13.4 An IAM framework for operational collaboration
and utilization
13.4.1 How can and should universities develop their operational capabilities
for promoting utilization and collaborating?
The Innovation Office plays an especially prominent role in developing the university’s operational capabilities. The KMP programme concludes that the Innovation
Office can help develop these capabilities by providing a number of support systems.
For this reason, the KMP programme assessed which operational management/
governance instruments enable the integration of collaboration/utilization with the
university’s primary activities of research and education. One of our general
hypothesis is that the management of knowledge assets and other intellectual assets
is crucial to integrate research, education, collaboration and utilization. We saw
this as a possible way for the university to assume increased responsibility for collaboration in a system where the “professors privilege/teacher’s exemption”
applies. In our assessment, we have established that models for managing knowledge assets and other intellectual assets (IAM) can be used as tools for a host of
different functions within academic activities, such as in open access management,
project management, research collaboration, licensing and social innovation activi-

454

ties. Within the KMP programme, it was clear that IAM is as much about how to
manage research processes as it is about managing utilization processes. During
our assessments, it became apparent that there are clear differences in the degree to
which academic environments should devote themselves to a more comprehensive
management of knowledge assets. For example, the difference between how the
natural sciences and social sciences should manage these assets became apparent.
Certainly, we observed that practically all academic environments in some sense
pursue the utilization of research results and the management of research results in
collaboration and utilization processes. As such, all academic environments need
IAM, even though the extent of their need differs greatly.

IAM-FRAMEWORK

The “operational capability”
of the university to enable
the researchers and academic
environments to utilize/collaborate

Figure 161. IAM framework as a normative model in the KMP formula

We have identified four key processes through our evaluation of the university’s
operational capabilities. If implemented, we believe that these will enable the organization to better promote the utilization of research results. These are: 1) Claiming
knowledge assets, 2) evaluating and positioning academic environments in relation
to the outside world, 3) making decisions about concrete ways to utilize and implement these in the academic operations, and 4) organizing the management of
knowledge assets, intellectual property rights and contracts within the university’s
organization. The KMP programme’s conclusion is that a support system is needed
for each of these key processes. For this reason, our evaluation has focused on
developing procedures, sources of information, process support and other models
that can serve as fundamental components within these support systems. To a large
extent, our evaluation has consisted of continual trial and error in developing procedures and models with normative functions that allow operational realization of
the four key processes.

455

13.4.2 The Innovation Office’s coordinating and developmental role
One constant feature of the KMP programme is its focus on the Innovation Office’s
role as an interface with researchers in their public roles. We have determined that a
Swedish model for innovation offices might reasonably entail developing academic
environments and, in doing so, contributing to a more comprehensive public
responsibility that has been expanded for the long term. As such, an overarching
concept in relation to academic environments’ needs and level of demand seemed
fitting. We realized that, in practice, making just a division of responsibility possible
requires clear procedures. These procedures should be designed based on clearly
defined roles, among which the Innovation Office is allocated relatively extensive
authority.
One of the KMP programme’s most important conclusions is that strong leadership
at the university level is needed if a university is to be able to integrate collaboration and promoting utilization. There is much to suggest that the Innovation Office
should assume a prominent responsibility both for driving the various operational
processes and for developing the infrastructure for collaboration and utilization. We
believe that the Innovation Office should play a proactive role in developing a collegial responsibility for collaboration and utilization in the academic environments.
From an operational standpoint, it is the researchers and academic environments
that determine to what extent collaboration and utilization become integrated into
their work. In keeping with the conclusions presented above, we believe that the
academic environment can and should adopt a collegial and dialogue-based
approach to developing its public responsibility. It is possible to assess to what
degree an academic environment should engage in IAM based on its ambitions and
existing processes. That is to say, an academic environment can gain an overview of
what should reasonably be done. It is important that academic environments concretize their ambitions to a large degree in a general action plan for utilization and
collaboration. This would make explicit the individual academic environment’s need
and demand for support and an advanced organizational capability.
It is also important that someone within the academic environment be assigned specific responsibility for fulfilling the task to collaborate and promote utilization. The
point here is that a specific individual needs to be responsible for ensuring these
efforts are part of a collegial process that is integrated into daily activities. Because
this person is also the designated contact in interactions with the Innovation Office,
the Innovation Academy and, not least of all, university management, we lay the
institutional foundation for the four key processes.
It is also important that the Innovation Office be part of the university’s internal
administration. This makes it much easier for the Innovation Office to assume a
coordinator’s role in relation to other supporting stakeholders, such as education
providers, communications officers, the university library’s bibliometricians, entrepreneurship schools, holding companies and other external structures.
All in all, this means that the Innovation Office’s activities should be based on a
number of advanced and specific responsibilities. These responsibilities are:

456

● to promote utilization under the auspices of the university
● to provide both reactive and proactive support to academic

environments
● to develop and provide a number of support systems as a coordinating

actor
● to ensure the existence of a number of necessary organizational functions

for collaboration and utilization.
As part of our evaluation, we analyzed and discussed how the Innovation Office’s
responsibility in these respects should be concretely formulated and manifested in a
number of operational procedures.
13.4.3 Support systems for integrating collaboration and promoting utilization
The KMP programme concluded that the support systems provided by an innovation office for promoting utilization of research results should be based on the support processes included in the IAM framework discussed earlier. Accordingly, the
Innovation Office should develop and provide four support systems. Admittedly, it
is entirely possible to envisage just one comprehensive support system. However,
we realized the value, at least in the development phase, of having four separate
systems. Each support system represents a specific, proactive work method for academic environments. Moreover, each system is intended to initiate a key process
related to collaboration and promoting utilization within academic environments.
Support systems for identifying and evaluating intellectual assets
A distinguishing feature of the IAM framework as a support system is that it is
based specifically on the goal of promoting utilization as an integrated part of
operations. Thus, it is not a support system that is primarily intended to uncover
new products, services or other ideas, even if this might very likely be one of its
results. Instead, it is principally a matter of developing a support system in which
academic environments identify and administer research results that both represent
and have public value. The Innovation Office’s work with knowledge assets creates
a proactive process in relation to the academic environments, which gradually
develop their own organizational capabilities for managing their research results. In
the utilization context, the prevailing “idea logic” is thus supplemented with a logic
based on intellectual assets. The latter represent the research result as both a public
and private resource.
The support system for claiming intellectual assets lays the foundation for an institutional system that integrates collaboration and promoting utilization into academic environments. A collegial process is initiated within the academic environments through the Innovation Office’s development of its proactive approach. The
interaction with the Innovation Academy makes the claim-staking process a learning and development process. The university library, the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office (PRV) and others ensure that the work method is supported by
reliable information. Entrepreneurs’ schools and other practice-oriented education

457

programmes can serve as resources in the claim-staking processes. Procedures
ensure that the various actors develop a collaborative relationship that is adapted
to suit the academic environments’ needs and demands.
The KMP programme has also concluded that a support system for claiming intellectual assets should include a number of models and conceptual tools. For institutional development to occur, it is important that a number of tools are both used
and supplied by the Innovation Office, presented and discussed within the
Innovation Academy and, in time, implemented on a broad front in academic environments. To achieve this ambition, we have developed the following:
● process support for the actual claim-staking process
● a model for categorizing intellectual assets
● a model for managing various claims to the intellectual assets.
Combined, these three tools have proven to have potential, not least of all in their
ability to provide an overview of the interplay between research results as individual objects and as a collective portfolio. This achievement opens many opportunities for the concrete management of not only collaboration and utilization, but
also of research processes themselves. Through our assessment, we came to realize
that, combined, these tools provide the foundation for a proactive model for innovation offices.
Support system for assessing an academic environment’s position in national and
international research, collaboration and utilization arenas
The KMP programme’s ambition is to develop a support system intended to initiate
a process in which academic environments position themselves and develop as collaborative actors in research and utilization arenas. This support system is based on
a logic focused on the academic environment in relation to the surrounding world.
Here, this involves enabling academic environments in a structured way to orient
themselves in relation to external research, research collaboration or other collaboration and utilization processes. Like the support system for claim-staking, a support system for positioning promotes the proactive development of organizational
capabilities within academic environments.
In this regard, the support system revolves around a process for determining how
an academic environment’s positioning should be assessed and supported. Once
again, the ambition is to create a process that gives academic environments and the
Innovation Office a frame of reference in their efforts to strengthen academic environments in different ways. For this reason, we have developed a model as
“process support” in positioning academic environments. In this support system’s
case, it has been especially important to create good sources and services providing
external information. Cooperation with the university library and PRV has been
very important for this.
The KMP programme’s conclusion is that this support system, together with the
support system for claiming intellectual assets, creates a more complete and solid
approach to collaboration and utilization within academic environments.

458

Support system for decision-making concerning operational utilization and
collaboration
Once the two support systems for claim-staking and positioning have been implemented, a third support system could be developed for making decisions about
operational utilization and collaboration. In this case also, the support system
should proactively stimulate academic environments to implement their action plans
based on their concrete knowledge assets. This involves enabling a process in which
researchers and academic managers make decisions about and conduct concrete utilization activities within the framework of the university’s responsibility as a public
authority. This means developing a support system with clearly-defined roles for
collaboration and utilization within academic activities. To a certain extent, the
Innovation Office will have the authority to make decisions, for example concerning licensing in the public name. The intention is for the support system to enable
utilization decisions that are based on both being a public authority and upholding
public responsibility.
Consequently, the support system revolves around which considerations are necessary when making decisions about promoting utilization within the framework of
the university as an organization. Here, too, the ambition is to create a process that
gives the academic environments, the Innovation Office and others a frame of reference for how the university as an organization should work to enable academic
environments and individual researchers to promote utilization. Hence, we have
developed a process support for making decisions about utilizing knowledge assets.
Another important feature of the support system concerns how the university as an
organization can and should manage its employees’ research results for licensing,
once it has assumed the rights to these through an agreement signed with employees.
A tool needs to be developed for the Innovation Office for licensing in the public
name. Much like the other tools, this tool will provide a frame of reference for determining how activities can and should be conducted.
Support system for the administrative management of intellectual property
assets, knowledge assets and contracts
The fourth support system builds on the preceding systems and focuses on how
knowledge assets, intellectual property assets, contracts and other institutional creations should be managed within the framework of the university’s activities in the
long term. This involves developing the administrative management of intellectual
assets.
The KMP programme has devoted much effort to evaluating the legal circumstances
that have a bearing on this kind of management. Our evaluation reveals the importance of developing the administrative management, financial control and the university’s role as a contracting party. However, there has been no real evaluation of
how this should be handled from an operational standpoint.

459

13.5 A Swedish model for collaboration and the utilization of
research results
Viewed from a collective normative perspective, the ambition is for the KMP programme to pave the way for an institutional model for collaboration and utilization that enables academic environments to assume a form of public responsibility
that is appropriate for them. This would be an institutional system in which academics assume both individual and collegial responsibility and which allows them
to choose to what degree they consider it most expedient to:
● assign, by means of agreement, their research results to the university to
manage them themselves as an integrated part of their own academic
activities
● manage research results in a private capacity, e.g. for commercialization
purposes in cooperation with the university’s holding company
● assign, by means of agreement, their research results to the university to
be licensed or managed in social innovation processes or in some other
form of project in the university’s name.
The interplay between academic environments, the innovation office, the innovation
academy and a university’s holding company creates the framework for a Swedish
model for collaboration and the utilization of research results.

460

List of figures
Figure 1.
Figure 2.
Figure 3.
Figure 4.
Figure 5.
Figure 6.
Figure 7.
Figure 8.
Figure 9.
Figure 10.
Figure 11.
Figure 12.
Figure 13.
Figure 14.
Figure 15.
Figure 16.
Figure 17.
Figure 18.
Figure 19.
Figure 20.
Figure 21.
Figure 22.
Figure 23.
Figure 24.
Figure 25.
Figure 26.
Figure 27.
Figure 28.
Figure 29.
Figure 30.
Figure 31.
Figure 32.
Figure 33.
Figure 34.
Figure 35.
Figure 36.

The challenge of implementing the knowledge triangle
Knowledge-based collaboration in academic environments
Institutional base for continuous learning and dialogue
Organizational capabilities for collaboration and promoting
utilization
The KMP programme’s three main areas
The first part of the KMP programme
The second part of the KMP programme
The third part of the KMP programme
Evaluation of state governance of universities
Evaluation of state objectives for universities
Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance
Evaluation of the state’s rule-based governance of universities
Evaluation of state governance of universities’ management of
intellectual assets
Evaluation of state rule-based governance of internal governance
Evaluation of state governance of employees’ ability...
Evaluation of public research financiers’ expectations of
universities’ ability
Evaluation of the expectation that universities will collaborate
with the surrounding community
Evaluation of the expectation that universities will act as
contracting parties
Evaluation of expectations of the universities’ management of
intellectual assets
Evaluation of expectations on universities to contribute to open
access
The EU’s description of universities’ open access management
Evaluation of the state’s resource- and result-based governance
The Swedish Research Council’s model
Evaluation of expectations and preconditions in academic
environments
CIP’s categories of knowledge assets
Four logics for academic environments that promote utilization
Model for self-assessing academic environments promotion
of public access
Model for self-assessing making knowledge applicable
to stakeholders
Model for self-assessing how academic environments promote
utilization through innovation
The university’s different arenas for research and innovation
Assessing how academic environments promote utilization by
making knowledge accessible in open contractual networks
Assessing risks in academic environments in the promoting
utilization
Self-assessment of risks related to being able to make research
results publicly available
Self-assessment of risks related to being able to make research
results applicable for stakeholders
Self-assessment of risks related to utilization through innovation
Self-assessment of risks with utilization through open platforms

29
34
37
38
40
41
44
47
52
58
63
65
71
76
81
85
88
90
93
97
98
100
107
112
117
120
122
124
127
129
130
135
137
140
145
148

461

Figure 37.
Figure 38.
Figure 39.
Figure 40.
Figure 41.
Figure 42.
Figure 43.
Figure 44.
Figure 45.
Figure 46.
Figure 47.
Figure 48.
Figure 49.
Figure 50.
Figure 51.
Figure 52.
Figure 53.
Figure 54.
Figure 55.
Figure 56.
Figure 57.
Figure 58.
Figure 59.
Figure 60.
Figure 61.
Figure 62.
Figure 63.
Figure 64.
Figure 65.
Figure 66.
Figure 67.
Figure 68.
Figure 69.
Figure 70.
Figure 71.
Figure 72.
Figure 73.
Figure 74.
Figure 75.
Figure 76.
Figure 77.
Figure 78.
Figure 79.
Figure 80.
Figure 81.

462

Questions for university management regarding the development
of leadership
Key processes to enable collaboration and utilization of
knowledge assets
Evaluation of governance by objectives as a tool for university
management
Model for discussing operational objectives
Interest-oriented governance by objectives
Value-based governance by objectives
Evaluation of normative control as a tool for university
managements
Evaluation to facilitate development of a number of
operational procedures
Norms for allocating responsibilities
Specification of the responsibilities of academic environments
Specification of responsibilities for academic managers
Specification of responsibilities for the innovation office
Specification of responsibilities for an external structure for
commercialization
Norms for managing research results
Norms for incentives in academic environments
Clarification of the responsibilities of an academic training
structure
Support systems within the KMP programme
Action plan for collaboration and utilization
Part one of an action plan for collaboration and utilization
Part two of an action plan for collaboration and utilization
Part three of an action plan for collaboration and utilization
Chart of information services
Main elements of the support systems
Support system for claiming intellectual assets
Elements of the support system for claiming knowledge assets
Procedures for claiming intellectual assets
Questions as support when developing procedures
General procedure for academic environments
Special procedure for strategic collaboration and
utilization environments
Special procedure for university-strategic environments
Model for process support when claiming knowledge assets
Claiming process for knowledge assets
Identifying research results
Claiming scientific value
Claiming benefit
Claiming a control position
Asset list
Example of an asset list
Asset list with ‘tags’
Example of an asset list with ‘tags’
Asset list with ‘personal tags’
Example of an asset list with ‘personal tags’
Examples of asset bearers
Example of a portfolio evaluation based on value and control
Example of an evaluation with specified publication and
research opportunities

156
169
171
173
177
178
200
205
215
217
219
222
225
229
236
243
264
266
267
268
269
276
285
288
289
292
293
294
299
302
303
304
305
308
310
312
314
315
316
316
317
317
318
319
319

Figure 82.

Example of an evaluation in which the biomechanic control
system IA14 should possibly be patented
Figure 83. Tools for categorizing intellectual assets
Figure 84. Categorizing research results
Figure 85. Categorizing research results as knowledge assets
Figure 86. Data as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 87. Example of data
Figure 88. Database as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 89. Example of database
Figure 90. Observation as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 91. Example of observation
Figure 92. Theoretical framework as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 93. Example of theoretical framework
Figure 94. Solution as category of knowledge assets
Figure 95. Example of technical solution
Figure 96. Visualization as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 97. Example of visualization
Figure 98. Instructions as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 99. Example of instructions
Figure 100. Software as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 101. Example of software
Figure 102. Narrative as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 103. Example of narrative
Figure 104. Creation as a category of knowledge assets
Figure 105. Example of creation
Figure 106. Categorizing knowledge assets as protected and protectable
Figure 107. Categorizing knowledge assets as background knowledge
and project results
Figure 108. Knowledge assets based on their importance in academic
environments
Figure 109. Example of infrastructure assets
Figure 110. Model for organizational control of knowledge assets
Figure 111. Claims to intellectual assets
Figure 112. Mapping different claims
Figure 113. Novelty and confidentiality clearance
Figure 114. Dependence clearance
Figure 115. Sources of research and innovation-related information
Figure 116. Support system for positioning academic environments
Figure 117. Features of the support system for positioning academic
environments
Figure 118. Procedures for positioning academic environments
Figure 119. General procedure for academic environments
Figure 120. Process support when positioning academic environments
Figure 121. Positioning process
Figure 122. Overarching questions
Figure 123. A case study
Figure 124. Preparing a knowledge tree
Figure 125. A knowledge tree with fields and sub-fields
Figure 126. Example of a knowledge tree with fields and sub-fields
Figure 127. Evaluation of research areas and research position
Figure 128. Example of an analysis of knowledge fields
Figure 129. Example of an analysis of relevant research groups
Figure 130. Example of an analysis of how research groups cooperate
Figure 131. Example of the characterization of commercialization activities

320
321
322
325
326
326
327
328
328
329
329
330
331
331
332
332
333
333
334
335
335
336
336
337
339
345
347
348
351
353
356
357
359
362
369
370
372
374
376
377
378
380
381
382
382
383
384
385
386

463

within different knowledge areas, who cooperate and where
they are active
Figure 132. Example of utilization areas and utilization position
Figure 133. Evaluation of the IP landscape and control position
Figure 134. Example of an analysis of utilization areas
Figure 135. Example of an analysis of control positions
Figure 136. Example of an analysis of the development of a control position
in relation to complementary knowledge areas
Figure 137. All components of the road map
Figure 138. Sources of research and innovation-related information
Figure 139. Support system for enabling decisions about utilization
Figure 140. Elements in the support system for making decisions about
utilization
Figure 141. Procedures for deciding about utilization and the collaborative
management of knowledge assets
Figure 142. General procedures for making utilization decisions and the
collaborative management of knowledge assets
Figure 143. Process support when contemplating how academic environments
should promote utilization
Figure 144. Process support for deliberations and utilization decisions
Figure 145. Considerations concerning utilization
Figure 146. Opportunities and preconditions for utilization in accordance
with the four logics
Figure 147. Considerations concerning utilization in public and private
capacities
Figure 148. Considerations related to collaboration ethics
Figure 149. Considerations of public authorities
Figure 150. Model for overview of IA decisions and transactions
Figure 151. Tool for university licensing
Figure 152. University licensing with three different value propositions
Figure 153. Support systems for the administrative management of
intellectual assets
Figure 154. The KMP formula
Figure 155. The knowledge triangle as a normative model in the KMP
formula
Figure 156. The knowledge triangle and state governance
Figure 157. The knowledge triangle and the various ways of promoting
utilization
Figure 158. The university circle as a normative model in the KMP formula
Figure 159. The university circle and three leadership processes
Figure 160. The university circle — a model for institutional development
Figure 161. IAM framework as a normative model in the KMP formula
Figure 162 to 171 available at www.iis.gu.se
Figure 162. Identification and assessment of assets in a research environment
Figure 163. Analysis of an asset portfolio and the external environment
Figure 164. New and existing utilization opportunities
Figure 165. Information and analysis of assets in a research environment
Figure 166. Available ways of utilizing research results
Figure 167. The needs of external stakeholders to deliver research
Figure 168. Analysis of assets
Figure 169. The character of value of assets in research environments
Figure 170. Analysis of the most important assets and impact in society
Figure 171. Strategic research and contractual networks

464

388
388
390
391
392
394
394
395
400
402
404
406
409
410
411
412
415
417
418
421
422
423
432
436
438
439
443
445
446
450
455

List of sources and bibliography
Parliament and government Bills356
Prop. 1971:30 with proposal for general administrative courts act, etc.
Prop. 1973:90 with proposal for a new form of government and new parliamentary
order, etc.
Prop. 1985/86: 11 with proposal for amendments to the Higher Education Act
(1977:218).
Prop. 1992/93:1 on the independence of universities and colleges – freedom for
quality.
Prop. 1992/93:48 on amendments to intellectual property laws in response to the
EEA Agreement, etc.
Prop. 1992/93:170 Research for knowledge and progress
Prop. 1996/97:5 Research and society.
Prop. 1998/99:94 Certain research issues. Prop. 2000/2001:3 Research and renewal.
Prop. 2004/05:80 Research for a better life.
Prop. 2006/07:43 Freedom to choose – an increased influence for universities and
university colleges when university board members are appointed.
Prop. 2006/07:91 Confidentiality during research collaborations.
Prop. 2008/09:50 A lift for research and innovation.
Prop. 2009/10:149 Academia for the age – increased freedom for universities and
university colleges.
Prop. 2010/11: 1 Budget bill for 2011.
Prop. 2010/11:38 Expanded collaboration within research, education and
innovation – sustainable energy.
Prop. 2011/12: 1, expenditure area 16 Education and University Research.
Prop. 2012/13:30 Research and innovation.

Appropriation directives, etc.
Government decision I:8 U2013/1700/F, Assignment to investigate and propose suggestions for a model for allocating resources to universities that includes peer
reviewing of the quality and relevance of their research.
356 Research bills are in italics.

465

Appropriation directions for the 2010 budget year regarding appropriations 2:54.
Appropriation directive for the 2012 budget year for universities.
Appropriation directives for the 2012 budget year for appropriations 1:22
Contribution to the commercialization of knowledge and innovations, etc. in expenditure area 24 Industry.
Appropriation directive for the 2012 budget year regarding appropriations 2:69.
Individual educational providers within higher education, etc.
Appropriation directive for the 2012 budget year regarding appropriations 2:70,
Special expenditures at universities, etc.
Appropriation directive for the 2013 budget year regarding appropriations 3:13,
Special expenditures for research purposes.
Appropriation directive for the 2013 budget year. Vinnova - Innovation Agency in
expenditure area 24 Industry.
Appropriation directive for the 2014 budget year regarding grant 2:64 Special
expenditures at universities.
Appropriation directive for the 2014 budget year regarding the Swedish Research
Council – Education and University Research appropriation 3:1.
Change of appropriation directive for 2014 budget year relating to Vinnova –
Innovation Agency in expenditure area 24 Industry – Appropriations 1:2 Research
and Development

Government-funded public inquiries
SOU 1994:136 Public authorities’ contracts.
SOU 1996:70 Collaboration between universities and industry.
SOU 1998:128 Research policy.
SOU 2000:80 Public employees’ secondary employment.
SOU 2005:95 Utilization of university discoveries.
SOU 2007:75 Governing the state– the government’s governance of its administration.
SOU 2008:104 Independent institutions of higher learning.
SOU 2008:118 Governance and control – proposals for more effective public
administration
SOU 2008:119 Background report for the 2006 administration committee.

466

SOU 2010:24 Copyright regulated in contracts.
SOU 2012:41 Innovation-supporting operations at universities and university colleges: Survey, analysis and proposals for improvements.

The Swedish National Audit Office
Growth through collaboration? Universities and the surrounding society
(RiR 2005:2).

Government Agencies
The Swedish Research Council
FOCUS - proposal for division of research areas for a new national quality assessment system. Http://www.vr.se/download/18.439efd48145f49ad5fb137/13999911
98241/FOKUS+indel-ningsf%C3%B6rslag+140529.pdf.

VINNOVA
Effektanalys av starka forsknings- & innovationssystem – Vinnova Analys VA
2011:07.
Petrusson, U., Universitetet i kunskapsekonomin – VFI 2007:01.

The Swedish Agency for Government Employees
Circular 2002:A 8, 2002-12-04.

Swedish National Finance Management Authority
ESV 2009:38 Guidelines on internal control and inspection. A support for authorities' implementation of the regulations governing internal control and inspection.
ESV 2012:47 Guidelines for handling operational risks – The process in accordance
with the regulation governing internal control and inspection.

EU
Common Actions for Growth and Employment. 20.7.2005 COM(2005) 330 final.
Seventh Framework Programme of the European Community for research, technological development and demonstration activities (2007–2013). Decision no
1982/2006/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 18 December 2006.
Commission recommendation on the management of intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and Code of Practice for universities and other public
research organizations. 10.4.2008. C (2008) 1329.

467

Annex I - Code of Practice. Commission recommendation on the management of
intellectual property in knowledge transfer activities and code of practice for universities and other public research organizations.
Europe 2020 Flagship Initiative. Innovation Union. 6.10.2010. COM (2010) 546
final.
Guidelines on open access to scientific publication and research data in Horizon
2020. Http://ec.europa.eu/research/participants/data/ref/h2020/grants_manual/hi/
oa_pilot/h2020-hi-oa-pilot-guide_en.pdf.
Horizon 2020 – The Framework Programme for Research and Innovation.
30.11.2011. COM(2011) 808 final.
REGULATION (EC) No 1906/2006 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND
OF THE COUNCIL of 18 December 2006 (laying down the rules for the participation of undertakings, research centres and universities in actions under the Seventh
Framework Programme and for the dissemination of research results (2007–2013).
OJ 2006/L 391/1.
Strategic Innovation Agenda (SIA) the contribution of the EIT to a more innovative
Europe.

Universities
Cambridge
The University’s mission and core values. Http://www.cam.ac.uk/about-the-university/how-the-university-and-colleges-work/the-universitys-mission-and-core-values.
Chalmers
Chalmers – för en hållbar framtid, Vision, mål och strategier 2008-2015 med
utblick mot 2020.Http://www.chalmers.se/SiteCollectionDocuments/
om%20chalmers%20dokument/PVU%20Visioner%20mm/Vision_mal_o_
strategier_broschyrdec08.pdf.
Policies, guidelines and strategies for utilization. Https://www.chalmers.se/
insidan/SV/om-chalmers/verksamhetsdokument/nyttiggorande.
University of Gothenburg
Förändring för kvalitet och förnyelse, Forsknings- och utbildningsstrategier 20092012. Https://www.gu.se/digitalAssets/1039/1039508_Fus.pdf.
IE2011 – Utredning av samverkansuppgiften vid Göteborgs universitet med särskilt
fokus på området innovation och entreprenörskap. Https://www.gu.se/digitalAssets/
1342/1342115_ie-rapport_web.pdf.
Policy for Utilization of Intellectual Property Rights at the University of Gothenburg
Http://gul.gu.se/public/pp/public_noticeboard_attachment/fetch?messageId=1082778
&fileId=24749130.

468

Strategic plans 2007-2010. Http://www.gu.se/digitalAssets/718/718966_
Strategisk_plan060817_lag.pdf.
Universitetsgemensam handlingsplan 2014-2016 & Verksamhetsplan 2014 – Dnr V
2013/780. Http://medarbetarportalen.gu.se/digitalAssets/1465/1465171_2014universitetsgemensam-hand-lings—och-verksamhetsplan.pdf.
Vision 2020.Http://medarbetarportalen.gu.se/vision2020?skipSSOCheck=true& referer=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.se%2F.
Karolinska Institutet
Forsknings- och utbildningsstrategi 2009-2012. Http://ki.se/sites/default/files/ki_strategi_2009-2012.pdf.
Strategi 2012, Karolinska Institutets utvecklingsstrategi 2010-2012.
Http://ki.se/sites/default/files/strategi_2012_sv.pdf.
The Royal Institute of Technology (KTH)
Policy för intellektuella tillgångar skapade vid KTH, Policy 3/2013.
Http://intra.kth.se/regel-verk/overgripande-styrning/upphovsratt/policy-for-intellektuella-tillgangar-skapade-vid-kth-1.449484.
Utvecklingsplan 2013-2016. Http://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.412831!/Menu/general/column-content/attachment/KTH_Utvecklingsplan_2013_16.pdf.
Vision 2027. Http://intra.kth.se/polopoly_fs/1.147445!/Menu/general/column-content/attach-ment/v2027sv%20slutversion.pdf.
University of Copenhagen
Strategy for the University of Copenhagen 2016. Http://www.e-pages.dk/ku/611/.
Linköping University
Forsknings- och innovationsstrategi för Linköpings universitet 2013 – 2016.
Http://www.liu.se/insidan/strategier/foinnstrategi/1.453414/LiUs_Fo_InnovationStrat
egi_20dec-version.pdf.
Linköpings universitet, Beslut Dnr LiU-2010-00310, Bedömning av arbetet med
intern styrning och kontroll.
Linköpings universitets strategi för internationaliseringsplan 2013-2020 – Beslut
Dnr LiU- 2012-02058. Http://www.liu.se/insidan/strategier/styrdokument/
1.83615/LiU-internationaliseringsplan-2013-2020.pdf.
Lund University
Lunds universitets vision, mål och strategier. Http://www.lu.se/om-universitetet/
vision-mal-och-strategier.

469

Strategisk plan för Lunds universitet 2012-2016 – Beslut Dnr LS 2011/162.
Http://www5.lu.se/upload/regelverket/organisation/Strategisk_plan_2012.pdf.
Norwegian University of Science and Technology (NTNU)
Knowledge for a better world, NTNU – Internationally Outstanding, Strategy 20112020. Http://www.ntnu.no/info/strategi_ntnu_eng.pdf.
Policy for the protection and management of intellectual property rights (IPR) and
physical material at the Norwegian University of Science and Technology (NTNU) S-sak 36/10. Http://www.ntnu.edu/c/document_library/get_file?uuid=7991407eb243-40df-9156-221679d32dc0&groupId=157534.
Oxford
Strategic Plan 2013-2018. Https://www.ox.ac.uk/about/introducing_oxford/strategic_plan_201318/index.html.
Umeå University
Umeå universitet möter framtiden med gränslös kunskap, Umeå universitet 2020 –
Vision och mål – Dnr: UmU 100-394-12.
Http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/101/101522_100126_final-vision_umu_2.pdf.
Utbildnings- och forskningsstrategier vid Umeå universitet avseende perioden 20092012. Http://www.umu.se/digitalAssets/31/31922_25267_utbildnings-forskningsstrategier-2009-2012.pdf.
Uppsala University
Mål och strategier för Uppsala universitet – UFV 2007/1478.
Http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/14/14263_3mal-och-strategier-for-uu.pdf.
Handlingsplan för internationalisering fram till 2014-12-31 – UFV 2013/103.
Http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/233/233677_3handlingsplan-for-internationalisering2014.pdf.
Program för internationalisering vid Uppsala universitet – Dnr UFV 2008/2064.
Http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/23/23992_3program-for-internationalisering.pdf.
Verksamhetsplanen för Uppsala Universitet 2014 – UFV 2012/1917.
Http://regler.uu.se/digitalAssets/247/247713_3vp2014_20130617_slutlig.pdf.

Literature
Brunsson, N. and Sahlin-Andersson, K. (2000), Constructing Organizations “The
Example of Public Sector Reform. Organization Studies 2000, 21:721, Sage.
Http://oss.sagepu.com/content/21/4/721.

470

Bruun, N. (1993), Upphovsrätt i anställning – nuläge och utvecklingstendenser i
Vennebog till Mogens Koktvedgaard. Nerenius & Santérus Förlag AB, Stockholm.
Clarysse, B., Tartari,V. and Salter, A. (2011), The impact of entrepreneurial capacity,
experience and organizational support on academic entrepreneurship. Research
Policy 40, 1084–1093.
Edquist, C. (2005), Systems of Innovation – Perspectives and Challenges. Fagerberg,
Mowery and Nelson (eds). The Oxford Handbook of Innovation, Oxford University
Press.
Fagerberg, J., Mowery, D. and Nelson, R. (2005), The Oxford Handbook of
Innovation. Oxford University Press.
Franklin, S.J., Wright, M. and Lockett, A. (2001), Academic and Surrogate
Entrepreneurs in University Spinout Companies, Journal of Technology Transfer,
127–141.
Grimaldi, R., Kenney, M., Siegel, D.S. and Wright, M. (2011), 30 years after
Bayh–Dole: Reassessing academic entrepreneurship. Research Policy 40,
1045–1057.
Hellner, J. (1990), Lagstiftning inom förmögenhetsrätten : praktik, teori och teknik.
Juristförlaget Stockholm.
Hult, K. and Walcott, C. (1989), Governing Public Organizations – politics, structures and institutional design. Brooks/Cole Publishing Company.
Karnell, G. (1968), Lärares upphovsrätt. Skolvärldens årsbok 1968.
Karnell, G. (1972), Läromedelsrätt.
Larsen, M. (2011), The implications of academic enterprise for public science: An
overview of the empirical evidence. Research Policy 40:1, Issue 1, 6–19.
Lenberg, E., Geijer, U. och Tansjö, A. (2009), Offentlighets- och sekretesslagen: en
kommentar. Pärm 1, Stockholm Norstedts juridik.
Levin, M. and Koktvedgaard, M. (2007), Lärobok i immaterialrätt. 9th ed.
Norstedts.
Madell, T-E. (1998), Det allmänna som avtalspart – särskilt avseende kommuns
kompetens att ingå avtal samt avtalens rättsverkningar. Norstedts Juridik AB.
Lidhard, J., and Petrusson, U. (2012), ESO 2012:8 Forskning och Innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande.
Lidhard, J., and Petrusson, U. (2012), Background report ESO 2012:8 Forskning
och Innovation – statens styrning av högskolans samverkan och nyttiggörande.
Merton, R. (1973), The Sociology of Science. University of Chicago.
Osborne, S. (2010), The New Public Governance? Emerging perspectives on the
theory and practice of public governance. Routledge.

471

Petrusson, U. (1999), Patent och industriell omvandling. Norstedts Juridik,
Stockholm.
Philpott, K., Dooley, L., O’Reilly, C. and Lupton, G. (2011), The entrepreneurial
university: Examining the underlying academic tensions, Technovation 31.
Rosén, J. (1993), Digitaltekniken i juridiken – The impact of Digital Tecnology on
Copyright Law. Nordiskt Immateriellt Rättsskydd 2.
Rosén, J. (2006), Upphovsrättens avtal. 3rd edition Norstedts Juridik AB.
Sandgren, C. (2003), Rätten till undervisningen och forskningen, XXVI SULF’s
publication series.
Schubert, T. (2009), Empirical observations on New Public Management to increase
efficiency in public research – Boon or bane? Research Policy 38.
Sjöblom, S. (2011), Den starka statens styrningsproblem. Publications from the project Förvaltningslösningars språkliga konsekvenser. (Språkon) Evaluation programme Arttu: undersökningar no. 13.
Strömberg, H. and Lundell, B. (2006), Allmän förvaltningsrätt, uppl. Liber.
Strömholm, S. (2002), Vem äger forskningen?, Justus.
Wolk, S. (2008), Arbetstagares immaterialrättigheter. Rätten till datorprogram,
design och uppfinningar m.m. i anställningsförhållanden. Norstedts Juridik. 2nd edition.

Websites
Http://www.aimday.se
Http://blog.iamanager.se/5-techniques-for-identifying-intellectual-assets/
Http://entrepreneur.chalmers.se/
Http://www.forte.se/sv/Om-FAS/Styrande-dokument/
Http://www.sahlgrenska.gu.se/utbildning/mom/gibbs/
Http://swecris.se/converis/publicweb/startpage?lang=1
Http://www.timeshighereducation.co.uk/world-university-rankings/2013-14/worldranking

472

Annex 1
Summary of meetings within the KMP project
The KMP project is the result of several years of information collection. We have
participated in and conducted numerous meetings, seminars, workshops, conferences and gatherings that has allowed us to gather the knowledge that has been crucial to realizing the KMP project. A summary of this work is found below in the
following order:
1) Management and administrative meetings within the framework of KMP
2) Conferences, seminars, workshops and other meetings
3) Workshops within the framework of the seminar series Knowledge-driven
Collaboration
4) Meetings and workshops within the framework of sub-projects with the Swedish
Patent and Registration Office – Patent information as support in case processes

1. Management and administrative meetings within the framework
of KMP
Management meetings within the framework of the Institute for Innovation and
Social Change (IIS). These meetings took place twice a semester or four times a year.
The Institute is governed by this steering committee, where the vice-chancellor
responsible for collaboration and innovation is the chair, and all the deans at the
University of Gothenburg’s (GU) faculties and a student representative are included.
Executive committee meetings and planning meetings. The KMP project’s operations
were primarily conducted in collaboration between an academic research and teaching group, the Grants and Innovation Office at the University of Gothenburg, and
GU Holding. These meetings have taken place every two weeks during the project.
Those responsible for each organization were called to these meetings, with the primary focus on participating in the work to ensure the KMP project’s development.

2. Conferences, seminars, workshops and other meetings
Within the framework for the KMP project, numerous meetings, seminars, workshops and conferences have been attended and organized. These gatherings together
have served as the learning and development process of crucial importance for the
conclusions presented in this book. The purpose has been to gain knowledge, participate in and contribute to discussions, and document the necessary knowledge. This
knowledge has been collected and saved through recordings or other documentation
from several events. Below is a selection of the events that have taken place as part
of the project's learning and development process.

473

Date

Main focus

12 Nov 2008

Swedish University of Agricultural Ultuna – Presentation of
the university's role in the knowledge economy at the conference “Who owns biological natural resources? Obstacles and
opportunities for your research”.

28-29 May 2009

University Lawyers Conference, Borås – The theme of the
conference was “the academic exception’s existence or nonexistence”.

6-9 Sep 2009

CIP FORUM 2009, Gothenburg – Organization of this forum
with a focus on innovation’s future – “The future of innovation”.

16 Oct 2009

The Association of Swedish Higher Education (SUHF),
Arlanda, Stockholm
– Conference on copyright with focus on copyright in academic settings.

24 Feb 2010

The Club for Young Business Lawyers (KYAJ), S/S
Marieholm, Gothenburg.
Lunch meeting with a focus on rights and knowledge management in collaboration with businesses, academia and the public sector “The Changing Role of Business Lawyers”.

10-12 Mar 2010

Swedish Network for Innovation & Technology Transfer
Support (SNITTS) Åre – The focus was “open innovation”.

22 Apr 2010

Innovation Day at the University of Gothenburg Jonsered
Manor, Partille
– Discussion about the University of Gothenburg’s focus on
innovation and utilization.

24 Aug 2010

Swedish Network for Innovation & Technology Transfer
Support (SNITTS) vice-chancellors meeting, Saltsjöbaden,
Stockholm – The theme was “Utilization of Swedish
Research”.

27 Sep 2010

The Association of Swedish Higher Education (SUHF),
Eskilstuna – Presentation of the “Academia in the Knowledge
Society" at the conference "Innovative Education for an
Innovative Future."

29-30 Sep 2010

Focus Innovation, Lindholmen Science Park, Gothenburg –
The theme was “The Emergence of Intellectual Property-based
Knowledge Markets”.

18 Oct 2010

Workshop with the Royal Academy of Engineering Sciences
and Västra Götaland, Stockholm – The theme was “Regional
and national interactions for knowledge-driven development,
with Västra Götaland as the example” and focus on “Global
trends - what characterizes the leading knowledge regions”.

474

Date

Main focus

18 Jan 2011

Entrepreneurship and Small Business Research Institute
(ESBRI), Stockholm – Estrad lecture with the theme
“Intellectual Assets – How to build businesses in a knowledgebased economy”.

29 May-1 Jun 2011 CIP Forum 2011, Gothenburg. Organization of forums with
some 500-600 participants. National and international experts
and leaders from industry, government and academia participated. Presentation of how the private and public sectors
could build structures and other conditions for innovation in a
knowledge-based economy. The focus was “How to translate
the New Wealth of Nations – knowledge and innovation – to
lead to profitability, competitiveness and prosperity?”
22 Sep 2011

Baker & McKenzie, Stockholm – Presentation of “Intellectual
Asset Management in Knowledge-based Business”.

6 Sep 2011

Swedish Foundation for Strategic Research and Mistra Urban
Futures, Stockholm
– presentation at the Knowledge Foundation meeting focused
on “the responsibility of research financiers’ responsibility for
controlling utilization."

24 Jan 2012

Universities Denmark (Danish equivalent to SUHF),
Copenhagen – Presentation focused on “The Possibilities of
Universities in the Knowledge Economy”.

2-3 Feb 2012

The University of Gothenburg and Aarhus University –
Collaboration Meeting at management level focused on “The
Possibilities of Universities in the Knowledge Economy”.

13 March 2012

Meeting with Curt Carlsson – Presentation of the University
of Gothenburg's vision efforts and how the university works
with the collaboration and innovation. The theme was innovation support activities at universities and university colleges.

14 March 2012

Meeting with the university board, University of Gothenburg
– IE2011 – Utredning av samverkansuppgiften vid Göteborgs
universitet [translation: Study of the Collaboration Mission at
the University of Gothenburg].

7 Jun 2012

KMP meeting with VINNOVA, Gothenburg – Discussion
about the progress of KMP’s work.

28-29 Aug 2012

Planning conference at Sven Lovén Center for Marine
Sciences Kristineberg, Fiskebäckskil – The conference was
focused on discussing work related to KMP. Participants came
from academia, the Research and Innovation Service (now the
Grants and Innovation Office) and GU Holding.

475

Date

Main focus

3 Sep 2012

The Swedish Network for Innovation & Technology Transfer
Support (SNITTS) conference, Saltsjöbaden – Presentation of
the ESO report “Research and Innovation - Government
Control of Utilization and Collaboration at Universities”
authored by Jan Lidhard, Finance Department, and Ulf
Petrusson, University of Gothenburg, at the conference
“Innovation by Collaboration”.

4 Sep 2012

Swedish Network for Innovation & Technology Transfer
Support (SNITTS) – Legal, Rosenbad – Seminar with the
theme “State governance of the university utilization and collaboration”.

27 Sep 2012

Nordic Council of Ministers, Gothenburg – The theme was
“How do we create competitive universities with explicit
social responsibility?”.

27 Sep 2012

Seminar for innovation advisors in West Sweden, Halmstad –
The theme was “Research and innovation — the State’s governance of collaboration and utilization by universities”.

1 Oct 2012

KMP meeting with VINNOVA, Stockholm – Discussion about
the progress of KMP’s work.

11 Oct 2012

Swedish Agency of Public Management, Stockholm – Meeting
on regulatory control of universities with a focus on utilization. Presentation of KMP and a subsequent discussion of the
governance and management of higher education institutions
working in the area.

17 Oct 2012

The leadership program for future research leaders and
Ingvar Carlsson Award, Foundation for Strategic Research –
The theme was “How do you take responsibility for and to
work strategically with the utilization of your research?”.

23 Oct 2012

World Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO), Belgrade –
Three-day seminar with presentations on the theme
“Technology transfer in the knowledge economy” and the
focus was successful examples of technology licensing.

21 Nov 2012

KMP meeting with VINNOVA at the University of
Gothenburg, Gothenburg – Discussions about the progress of
KMP’s work.

26 Nov 2012

Seminar “Research and innovation – better conditions?",
Gothenburg – Presentation of the ESO report “Research and
innovation – the state's governance of collaboration and utilization by universities” authored by Jan Lidhard, Finance
Department, and Ulf Petrusson, University of Gothenburg.

476

Date

Main focus

27 Nov 2012

Jonsered Seminar, Lerum – The theme was “Strategic utilization of research” and focused on the knowledge in a region,
organization and utilization.

22 Jan 2013

Natural Science Faculty’s Dean’s Advisory Board, University
of Gothenburg –Presentation and discussion regarding the
progress of KMP’s work.

25 Jan 2013

Institute for Innovation and Social Change, the Research and
Innovation Office and GU Holding – KMP meeting with discussion on the progress of the work.

1 Feb 2013

Planning conference Ågrenska Villan, Gothenburg – The conference was intended to discuss the work undertaken related
to KMP. Participants primarily from the University of
Gothenburg, the Research and Innovation Office and GU
Holding.

5 Feb 2013

KMP meeting with VINNOVA about the Knowledge Triangle
– Presentation of the University of Gothenburg's collaboration
and innovation work.

11 Feb 2013

Meeting with university management and vice chancellors,
University of Gothenburg – Presentation of the University of
Gothenburg's collaboration and innovation work.

19 Feb 2013

The training programme for the University of Gothenburg's
administrative managers – Training session focused on Vision
2020, collaboration and utilization of research.

20 March 2013

Manager development programme at the University of
Gothenburg – presentation of development work within collaboration with focus on the utilization of knowledge.

21-22 March 2013

Meeting with the Centre for Intellectual Property (CIP) –
Presentation and discussion of the University of Gothenburg's
collaboration and innovation work.

3 Apr 2013

Meeting with the university director and area manager for
Academic Support, University of Gothenburg – Presentation
and discussion about University of Gothenburg's collaboration
and innovation work.

25-26 Apr 2013

Lawyer conference for university lawyers, Stockholm –
Presentation of “Research and innovation — the State’s governance of collaboration and utilization by universities”.

22 May 2013

Meeting with the university director, University of
Gothenburg – Presentation of the University of Gothenburg's
collaboration and innovation work.

477

Date

Main focus

10 Jun 2013

Meeting with steering committee for pedagogic development
and interactive learning, University of Gothenburg –
Presentation of development work within collaboration and
utilization.

12 Jun 2013

Visits to the Center for Innovation and Entrepreneurship,
Aarhus University – Presentation of the University of
Gothenburg's collaboration and innovation work.

13 Jun 2013

Strategy meeting with Linköping University, Linköping –
Presentation of the University of Gothenburg's collaboration
and innovation work.

24 Jun 2013

Strategy meeting with VINNOVA – Discussion about KMP’s
work and its development.

21 Aug 2013

Meeting with Ministries of Education and Industry,
University of Gothenburg – Full day meeting with officials
from the various departments.

3 Sep 2013

Meeting with the University Board, University of Gothenburg
– Presentation of the university's collaboration and innovation
work.

27 Sep 2013

Meeting with Mid Sweden University’s management,
University of Gothenburg – Presentation of the university's
collaboration and innovation work.

27 Oct 2013

Meeting with the Royal Swedish Academy of Engineering
Sciences – Responsible for the workshop “Entrepreneurship
and innovation support” with the theme “Innovation Sweden
– growth and development in Västra Götaland.”

1 Nov 2013

Full day meeting of the university’s deans, University of
Gothenburg –
The progress of KMP’s work was discussed under the theme
“an institutional arrangement for knowledge-based collaboration."

22 Jan 2014

Meeting with the university director, University of
Gothenburg – Presentation of the university’s collaboration
and innovation work.

10-14 Mar 2014

Conducted the course “Intellectual Property, Ethics & the
Utilization of Academic Research in Health/Life Sciences”,
Gothenburg – Five-day course for participants from five different countries. The theme was the challenges and opportunities
associated with utilization of research.

24 Mar 2014

Meeting with university management, University of
Gothenburg – Presentation of the university's collaboration
and innovation work.

478

Date

Main focus

26 Mar 2014

Seminar on Vision 2020, University of Gothenburg – The
theme was “Does the university have the prerequisites for taking social responsibility?” and the focus was on
“Collaboration in complete academic environments."

3 Apr 2014

KMP Day, University of Gothenburg – The theme was “How
to build the research and innovation office of the future?”.
Participants were innovation office managers, university management, etc. representing universities from throughout
Sweden. Managers from the Patent and Registration Office
and VINNOVA participated.

7 Apr 2014

Meeting with university management, University of
Gothenburg – Discussion about the university's collaboration
and innovation work.

9 Apr 2014

Introductory course and seminar, University of Gothenburg –
Presentation of innovation and utilization for all new graduate
students at the university.

14 Apr 2014

Meeting with the management council, University of
Gothenburg – Presentation and discussion about the university's collaboration and innovation work.

23 Apr 2014

Meeting with the university director, University of
Gothenburg – Discussion about the university's collaboration
and innovation work.

13 May 2014

Introductory course and seminar, University of Gothenburg –
Presentation of “Innovation, utilization and social change –
the university's role in society” for all new employees at the
university.

20 May 2014

Manager Development Programme, University of Gothenburg
– Training day for 23 managers from throughout the
University of Gothenburg. Presentation and discussion about
knowledge collaboration with the focus on “How does the
university work for the utilization of research and other
knowledge within the public authority model?”.

21 May 2014

Manager Meeting, University of Gothenburg – The presentation and subsequent discussion with about 80 managers from
throughout the university with a focus on “Collaboration that
develops, with a focus on the utilization of research”.

9 Jun 2014

Meeting with the Management Council, University of
Gothenburg – Presentation and discussion about the university's collaboration and innovation work.

19 Aug 2014

Planning day, Ågrenska villa – Discussion about the progress
of KMP’s work.

479

Date

Main focus

3 Sep 2014

Swedish Network for Innovation & Technology Transfer
Support (SNITTS) conference – Lectures about KMP’s work at
the conference “Innovation by Collaboration”.

25 Sep 2014

Meeting with Linköping University's Director of Staff,
University of Gothenburg – Linköping University's Director of
Staff visited the University of Gothenburg for an exchange of
experience/study visit. Presentation and discussion about the
progress of KMP’s work and about complete academic environments.

8 Nov 2014

Manager Development Programme, University of Gothenburg
– Training day for 23 managers from throughout the
University of Gothenburg. Supervision of group work with a
focus on knowledge collaboration and the theme “How does
the university work for the utilization of research and other
knowledge within the public authority model?”.

17 Oct 2014

Introductory course and seminar, University of Gothenburg –
Presentation of innovation and utilization for all new graduate
students at the university.

21 Oct 2014

Chalmers Impact Day, Chalmers University of Technology –
Presentation of the KMP’s work under the theme “Who is
Responsible for Impact? – Roles and Responsibilities of
Universities, Research Funding Agencies and the
Government.”

Within the framework of KMP’s work, meetings and relationships have been
built over the years with both national and international universities and other
actors. This work has aimed to strengthen the university's work in collaboration, innovation and utilization. Below is a selection of these collaborative and
development partners: Chalmers University of Technology – Sweden,
Linköping University – Sweden, Aarhus University – Denmark, Norwegian
University of Science and Technology – Norway, India Institute of
Management Bangalore – India, Zhejiang University – China, Ministry of
Industry, Ministry of Education, the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
VINNOVA and more than 30 different research environments have been
visited.

3. Workshops within the framework of the seminar series
Knowledge-driven Collaboration
As part of the project's learning and development process, a number of workshops have taken place. A number of these have taken place within the framework of the seminar series “Knowledge-driven Collaboration.” The purpose
has been to document and discuss the learning and development process from
recent years in the context of the institute’s work with a focus on the development of the university as a collaborative organization. The seminar series
‘Knowledge-driven Collaboration’, which took place in the autumn 2013, had
the following learning and development ambitions:

480

Date

Main focus

17 Sep 2013

Lessons regarding the challenges of working with collaboration and utilization within the framework of complete academic environments.

26 Sep 2013

Lessons on how operational support should be developed.

11 Oct 2013

Lessons on how an institutional model should be designed.

17 Oct 2013

Lessons on how management support should be developed.

22 Oct 2013

Lessons on how operational support external to the public
authority should be developed; how the interface to the external innovation system should be developed.

19 Nov 2013

Lessons on how the academic abilities should be developed
through the development of university-wide training programmes.
Participants included individuals directly or indirectly involved
in the development work in recent years and who have contributed to development of the operations. This included people who have been and are employed in the Research and
Innovation Office, GU Holding and academia within the
University of Gothenburg. The seminars have created a better
understanding of how a university can be a pro-active collaborative organization. This applies in particular to innovative
knowledge-driven collaboration but also societal challengedriven collaboration.

4. Meetings and workshops within the framework of sub-projects
with the Patent and Registration Office – Patent information as
support in case processes.
The sub-project “Patent information as support in case processes” has
involved a number of meetings that have together contributed to further
understanding of how innovation and utilization can be used in university
activities. Below is a sample of the meetings that took place within the subproject.

481

Date

Main focus

October 2011

Meetings with Research and Innovation Services – Initial internal discussions on a bibliometric and patent information project.
The development of a conceptual approach begun.

November 2011

Meeting with University Library – Discussion about the project
plans, the University Library's role and participation and the
KMP project.

November 2011

Meeting with the Innovation Office West – Discussion about the
project's structure and division of labour.

Nov/Dec 2011

Meeting with Research and Innovation Service and
the University Library – Discussion about the project's approach
and expectations.

Nov/Dec 2011

Meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office –
Discussion about the project and its realization.

19 Apr 2012

Meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office –
Participants from the Research and Innovation Service and
Sahlgrenska Academy. Discussion about the project’s structure,
the Patent and Registration Office and the role of universities’
competitiveness in global research and innovation.

9 May 2012

Major meeting with the University Library – Discussion about
the structure and the University Library's participation.

June 2012

Meeting between the Patent Office and the Ministry of Industry
– Discussion about the project.

28-29 2012

KMP workshop, Kristineberg – Project presentation focusing on
the link to KMP.

2 Oct 2012

Meeting with GU Holding – Discussion about the project's
visionary aspects and GU Holding's participation. Focus on the
practical application of patent information services.

18 Oct 2012

Workshop and major meeting with the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office – Discussion about the project and its
design. Participants from the University Library, GU Holding
and the Research and Innovation Service.

January 2013

Joint teaching with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Training for students at the second-cycle level.

21 Jan 2013

Workshop with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Focus on information about the work methods of
innovation advisors for the analysis of development potential.

482

Date

Main focus

6 Mar 2013

Video conference with the Patent and Registration Office and
the Research and Innovation Office – Discussion on the
progress of the work and comments on prepared materials.

14 Mar 2013

Training and subsequent meeting with the Swedish Patent and
Registration Office – The Patent Office held a presentation on
patents and patent information for parties involved in research
and innovation. IA listing/lists and research trees were discussed
at the subsequent meeting. GU Holding participated in this meeting.

18 Mar 2013

Video conference with the project management – Focus on
reports, doctoral education and material difficulties.

26 Mar 2013

Meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
Stockholm – Project management meeting with focus on the
Patent and Registration Office’s services, especially in relation to
the University of Gothenburg and the project's timetable. GU
Holding also participated in this meeting.

5 Apr 2013

Video conference with the project management – Discussion on
the project's progress and development.

8 Apr 2013

Meeting with Research Project 1 – Discussion on the project's
progress and development.

22-23 Apr 2013

Workshop with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Focus on the target group Managers. Vice-chancellor with responsibility for collaboration and innovation participated in the discussion on the need of managers for material
that supports decision making.

May 2013

Meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office –
Discussion on future training for innovation advisors,
researchers and other universities.

15 Oct 2013

Presentation of training for the Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Presentation entitled “Innovation Information in
Practice”.

17 Oct 2013

Presentation of training for the Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Presentation entitled “Innovation Information
Seminar””.

23 Oct 2013

Presentation of training for the Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Presentation entitled “Innovation Information
Analysis Seminar”.

29 Oct 2013

Presentation of training for the Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Presentation entitled “IP Platforms and Utilization
Approaches”.

483

Date

Main focus

27 Jun 2014

Meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration Office,
Gothenburg – Discussion on future cooperation in relation to
the KMP project’s development.

26 Aug 2014

Planning meeting with the Swedish Patent and Registration
Office – Planning of training modules at second-cycle level for
the joint instruction with the Patent Office.

16-17 Sep 2014

Joint teaching with the Swedish Patent and Registration
Office, Gothenburg – Training for students at the secondcycle level.

30 Sep 2014

Joint teaching with the Swedish Patent and Registration
Office, Gothenburg
– Training for students at the second-cycle level.

484

Annex 2
List of academic environments which have attended during
the KMP programme
Project
Project 1
Project 2
Project 3
Project 4
Project 5
Project 6
Project 7
Project 8
Project 9
Project 10
Project 11
Project 12
Project 13
Project 14
Project 15
Project 16
Project 17
Project 18
Project 19
Project 20
Project 21
Project 22
Project 23
Project 24
Project 25
Project 26
Project 27
Project 28
Project 29
Project 30
Project 31
Project 32
Project 33

Project year
2008
2008
2008
2008
2009
2009
2009
2009
2009
2010
2010
2010
2010
2010
2011
2011
2011
2011
2011
2012
2012
2012
2012
2013
2013
2013
2013
2013
2013
2013
2013
2011
2011

Faculty/university
No. of intellectual assets
Sahlgrenska Academy
14
Chalmers University of Technology
8
Sahlgrensk Academy
77
Chalmers University of Technology
5
Sahlgrenska Academy
17
Sahlgrenska Academy
17
Faculty of Science
11
Sahlgrenska Academy
11
Sahlgrenska Academy
14
Faculty of Education
24
Faculty of Science
9
Sahlgrenska Academy
12
Sahlgrenska Academy
6
Sahlgrenska Academy
17
Faculty of Science
20
Sahlgrenska Academy
27
Faculty of Fine, Applied and Performing Arts
15
Chalmers University of Technology
15
Chalmers University of Technology
13
Faculty of Social Sciences
21
Sahlgrenska Academy
12
Faculty of Science
18
GU Holding
8
Faculty of Science
20
Sahlgrenska Academy
29
Sahlgrenska Academy
10
Faculty of Education
12
Sahlgrenska Academy
17
Chalmers University of Technology
3
Faculty of Arts
59
Faculty of Science
4
Sahlgrenska Academy
44
IT Faculty
21

These environments represent the “broad” university (faculties of the University of
Gothenburg and Chalmers University of Technology). The selected environments
have shown an ambition to learn and to develop in the field for collaboration and
to promote utilization.

485

486

487

488
